vert to the push-rod suspension for the first time in four years and large sections of white on its livery.
German Vettel will once again partner Finnish driver Kimi Raikkonen, who won the team's last drivers' title in 2007.
Ferrari president Sergio Marchionne has said that it would be "a tragedy" if the team failed to win a title in a 10-year span.
The 2016 season starts with the Australian Grand Prix in Melbourne from March 18-20. 
Summarize: 
Ferrari is the most successful team in Formula One history with a total of 16 drivers' and constructors' championships.
The team was founded by Enzo Ferrari in 1929 and is based in Maranello, Italy.
The team has competed in every Formula One season since the 1950s.
The team won its first world championship in 1958 with Italian driver Alberto Ascari.
Ferrari won its first drivers' title in 1958 with Alberto Ascari.
The team won its first constructors' title in 1964 with John Surtees.
The team won its first drivers' title in 1968 with Italian driver
Jason Betts, 38, was found unconscious with a head injury at his flat in Celestine Road, Yate, on 5 March last year and died later in hospital.
Nathan Skeen, of Ermine Road, Lewisham, was found guilty of manslaughter and actual bodily harm following a five-week trial at Bristol Crown Court.
The 29-year-old will be sentenced at a date to be fixed.
At an earlier hearing, Nixon Apire, 31, of Great North Road, Barnet, pleaded guilty to wounding with intent.
Avon and Somerset Police said the two men had been responsible for assaulting Mr Betts for "well over a week before his death".
In that time, he was stabbed in the leg, had cigarettes stubbed out on his face and was hit over the head with a bottle and a glass.
But Det Supt Andy Bevan said it was in a subsequent assault carried out by Skeen that Mr Betts suffered the fatal injury.
"Jason was a vulnerable man who had significant health and drug addiction issues," he said.
"Skeen and Apire callously took advantage of Jason's vulnerability and coerced him into selling class A drugs on their behalf in the Yate area.
"They had a suffocating control over Jason and when they felt he owed them money, they exacted their revenge by assaulting him." 
Summarize: 
Jason Betts was a drug addict who was living in a flat in Yate, Bristol. He was found unconscious with a head injury at his flat on 5 March 2011. He died later in hospital.
Nathan Skeen and Nixon Apire were found guilty of manslaughter and actual bodily harm following a five-week trial at Bristol Crown Court.
The two men were responsible for assaulting Mr Betts for "well over a week before his death".
In that time, he was stabbed in the leg, had cigarettes stubbed out on his face and was hit over the head with a bottle and a glass.
But
A scheme for supporters to buy shares in the club achieved its target two days ahead of deadline.
Organisers of The Big Bath City Bid are now urging investors to help raise a further £50,000 to repay creditors and build capital.
A new board of directors, mostly appointed by fans, will be selected.
Nick Blofeld, from The Big Bath City Bid, who will be elected as club chairman, said: "If we can improve performance both on and off the pitch, then it's a very exciting time."
Now fans have taken a majority stake in Bath City, the plans are to give the club greater financial security, invest in the playing team and redevelop Twerton Park.
The Big Bath City Bid was launched in 2015, backed by film director and Bath City supporter Ken Loach, and ex-Manchester United striker Eric Cantona. 
Summarize: 
The Big Bath City Bid is a fan-led group aiming to take over the running of Bath City.
The group is made up of a group of fans who have been working together since the summer of 2015.
The group has been working on the bid since then, and has now launched a website and a crowdfunding campaign to raise money to take over the running of the club.
The group has been working with the club's board of directors to ensure that the takeover is a success.
The group has been working with the club's board of directors to ensure that the takeover is a success.
The group has been working
The 2012 Olympic bronze medallist, who had won his previous 11 pro fights, never recovered from being knocked down by a right hook in the second round.
Ogogo was retired by his corner in the eighth with blurred vision.
Also on the card, Sam Eggington stopped Frankie Gavin to claim the vacant WBC international welterweight title.
Eggington knocked down his fellow Brummie in rounds three and six and frequently had his opponent hemmed in on the ropes.
Gavin took a barrage of punches in the eighth round and sunk to his knees before the referee intervened to stop the fight.
Cunningham, who has lost just one of his 18 bouts, was a 20-1 outsider with some bookies to beat Ogogo at the Birmingham Arena.
But Ogogo was struggling long before the end as he had no answer to the 28-year-old's powerful combinations and accurate jabbing.
Cunningham said: "I love being the underdog. Nothing fazes me.
"I had to check how quick he actually was. I fancied myself as a counter-puncher.
"My knockout record isn't great but if I catch someone, they're going to go." 
Summarize: 
The fight was the first of three bouts between Cunningham and Ogogo.
Ogogo's next fight was against the former British and Commonwealth champion, John Ryder, in a non-title bout.
Ogogo was knocked down in the first round.
Ogogo's next fight was against the former British and Commonwealth champion, John Ryder, in a non-title bout.
Ogogo was knocked down in the first round.
Ogogo's next fight was against the former British and Commonwealth champion, John Ryder, in a non-title bout.
Ogogo was knocked down
The interior minister said the bomber detonated explosives in a minibus during rush hour in Choueifat district.
The area is home to a largely Christian and Druze population.
There has been a spate of bomb attacks in Beirut in recent weeks largely blamed on the rise of sectarian tension over the conflict in Syria.
"A man wearing an explosive belt boarded a public minibus in Choueifat and blew himself up," Interior Minister Marwan Charbel told Lebanon's Mayadeen television channel.
He said at least one person had been killed in the blast, but it was unclear if that was in addition to the suicide bomber.
Ayad Monzer of the Lebanese Red Cross said at least two people, a man and a women, were wounded in the blast.
Lebanese TV has aired footage from the scene of the blast showing the wrecked chassis of a roofless vehicle surrounded by onlookers.
The army has reportedly set up a security cordon around the blast site and started to investigate the circumstances of the attack.
The target of the attack was not immediately clear. Hezbollah has a significant presence in the area and in adjacent Shia areas in the southern suburbs of Beirut.
One bystander told Reuters news agency the minibus had been heading in the direction of these areas when the explosives detonated.
It comes one day after three people were killed in another car bomb attack in Hermel, a Hezbollah stronghold near Lebanon's northern border with Syria.
Sectarian tensions in Lebanon have been stoked by Hezbollah's support for the government forces in Syria, with dozens of people killed in a series of car bombings in Beirut and Tripoli in recent months.
Both Sunni and Shia militants have been blamed for recent attacks.
Lebanon has also been politically deadlocked since last March with an alliance led by Sunni former Prime Minister Saad Hariri and Hezbollah unable to agree on a coalition government. 
Summarize: 
The explosion took place in the Choueifat area of Beirut.
The area is home to a largely Christian and Druze population.
There has been a spate of bomb attacks in Beirut in recent weeks largely blamed on the rise of sectarian tension over the conflict in Syria.
"A man wearing an explosive belt boarded a public minibus in Choueifat and blew himself up," Interior Minister Marwan Charbel told Lebanon's Mayadeen television channel.
He said at least one person had been killed in the blast, but it was unclear if that was in addition to the suicide bomber.
Ayad Mon
The National Trust counted 2,342 pups born this season at Blakeney in Norfolk - about 80 fewer than last year.
Ajay Tegala, National Trust ranger, said: "This is good news as the seals were spreading at such a rate over such a big area that it makes it easier to protect them."
The Trust said the lower birth rate meant the colony had "stabilised".
After grey seals began colonising the spit on the north Norfolk coast, the Trust said there was anecdotal evidence of two pups being born in 1987 or 1988 and a first "official" record of five pups in 1999.
A more accurate standardised method of counting pups began in 2006 when 213 were recorded.
2,342
recorded in 2015
2,426 (2014)
1,566 (2013)
747 (2010)
213 (2006)
The Trust has 12 volunteers to try and make sure people visiting with their dogs did not disturb the breeding colony.
Mr Tegala said: "The seals have filled the key habitats on Blakeney, so it's good news the population has stabilised this year.
"If they continued to spread into the dunes and along the beach towards Cley, this would make them harder to protect.
"When a breeding site becomes too densely populated, grey seals tend to colonise new habitats and there is already anecdotal evidence seals from the Norfolk colonies at Blakeney and Horsey have moved south to the Thames estuary and northern France."
The Trust said it was estimated more than 750 pups had been born at Horsey this year. 
Summarize: 
The National Trust is the owner of Blakeney Point, a spit of land in the North Sea, which is home to a colony of grey seals. The Trust has been monitoring the population of grey seals at Blakeney since the early 1990s. The population of grey seals at Blakeney is now stable, with a lower number of pups being born this year than in previous years. The lower number of pups born this year means the population of grey seals at Blakeney has stabilised.
The National Trust is the owner of Blakeney Point, a spit of land in the North Sea,
Ivan da Silva Martins played a small part as a gang member in the film.
He is now 34 and is thought to control drug trafficking in the Vidigal favela.
The film was released in Brazil in 2002, exposing to the rest of the world the bitter reality of crime, violence and poverty in Rio's favelas.
Mr Martins was one of many boys and teenagers recruited from the city's poorest quarters to work as actors in the film.
He is now believed to be feared by the Vidigal community where police says he is known as Ivan the Terrible.
City of God director Fernando Meirelles said he had gradually lost contact with all the young actors, but told O Globo newspaper that he was "saddened by the news".
The film begins in the early 1960s and follows the life of a young boy who becomes a drug lord in Cidade de Deus (City of God), a favela in the outskirts of Rio.
It became a surprise blockbuster and received four Oscar nominations.
Fifteen years later, violence is again on the rise in Brazil, particularly in Rio de Janeiro.
The policeman shot dead on Sunday, Sgt Hudson Araujo, was the 91st officer killed this year in the state of Rio.
Brazil is now going through the worst recession in its history.
The finances of many states, including Rio, have collapsed and there is no prospect of a solution for Brazil's serious political crisis.
The families of police officers say their loved ones are paying a heavy price for trying to fight crime without the resources and equipment required. 
Summarize:  The film is about a young boy who becomes a drug lord in the favela of Cidade de Deus.
The film was released in Brazil in 2002, exposing to the rest of the world the bitter reality of crime, violence and poverty in Rio's favelas.
Mr Martins was one of many boys and teenagers recruited from the city's poorest quarters to work as actors in the film.
He is now believed to be feared by the Vidigal community where police says he is known as Ivan the Terrible.
City of God director Fernando Meirelles said he had gradually lost contact with all the
The hoax claim was first published late on Tuesday afternoon by the Bloomberg website, according to Vinci.
The false statement said the company would revise its 2015 and 2016 accounts after supposed accounting errors.
"This is false, totally false. We deny it," said a Vinci spokesman.
Shares in Vinci, which has businesses in more than 100 countries, are traded on the French stock market.
After the denial was issued the company's share price swiftly recovered to end the day down just 4% at ???58.8.
"Vinci denies formally all the information contained in this fake press release and is investigating all legal actions in furtherance thereof," said the firm.
The hoax said the company had uncovered irregularities which had been hiding losses amounting to 3.5bn euros.
France's AMF financial market regulator said it would look at the situation and might stage a full investigation. 
Summarize: 
The company is a French multinational, founded in 1875. It is a world leader in the production of cement, aggregates, ready-mixed concrete, and aggregates. It is also a major producer of cement, aggregates, ready-mixed concrete, and aggregates.
The company has its headquarters in Paris, France.
The company's shares are traded on the Euronext Paris stock exchange.
The company's shares are traded on the Paris Stock Exchange.
The company's shares are traded on the Euronext Paris stock exchange.
The company's shares are traded
They were beheaded in the southern Italian town of Otranto after refusing to convert to Islam.
Their names are unknown, apart from one man, Antonio Primaldo.
Within two months of taking office, Pope Francis has proclaimed more saints than any of his predecessors.
Among those canonised on Sunday were two Latin American nuns - Laura Montoya from Colombia and Maria Guadalupe Garcia Zavala from Mexico - who both died in the 20th Century.
Colombia's first saint, Mother Laura Montoya dedicated her life to helping indigenous people while the woman named by Pope Francis as Mother "Lupita" sheltered Catholics during a government crackdown against the faith in the 1920s.
The Italian "Martyrs of Otranto" were executed after 20,000 Turkish soldiers invaded their town in south-eastern Italy.
There was no hint of any anti-Islamic sentiment in the homily that Pope Francis delivered before tens of thousands of worshippers gathered in St Peter's Square, the BBC's David Willey in Rome reports.
While it was Francis's predecessor, Pope Benedict, who gave the go ahead for their canonisations, the new pope is continuing the process of honouring a new generation of modern as well as historic martyrs, our correspondent says.
Later this month an Italian priest, Fr Giuseppe Puglisi, who was murdered by the Sicilian mafia 20 years ago will be beatified - the last step before being declared a saint. 
Summarize: 
The "Martyrs of Otranto" were beheaded in the southern Italian town of Otranto after refusing to convert to Islam.
Their names are unknown, apart from one man, Antonio Primaldo.
Within two months of taking office, Pope Francis has proclaimed more saints than any of his predecessors.
Among those canonised on Sunday were two Latin American nuns - Laura Montoya from Colombia and Maria Guadalupe Garcia Zavala from Mexico - who both died in the 20th Century.
Colombia's first saint, Mother Laura Montoya dedicated her life to helping indigenous people while the woman named by Pope
Michael Ross was 15 when he shot Shamsuddin Mahmood, 26, in the head in Kirkwall's Mumataz Restaurant.
The former Black Watch sniper was jailed for a minimum of 25 years in 2008 after being convicted of murder.
Ross has been told by the Scottish Criminal Cases Review Commission there is not enough evidence to support a miscarriage of justice claim.
Mr Mahmood was shot in full view of a room full of diners, including families with children, by a masked gunman. 
Summarize: 
Mr Ross, who was 15 at the time, was convicted of murder in 2008 and sentenced to a minimum of 25 years in prison.
He was released on licence in 2011 after serving 10 years.
The case was referred to the Scottish Criminal Cases Review Commission (SCCRC) in 2013.
The SCCRC found that there was not enough evidence to support a miscarriage of justice claim.
The SCCRC's report said: "The review of the case found that Mr Ross was an experienced and competent sniper who had been trained in the use of firearms.
"The review found that Mr Ross had
Simon Pitts will replace Rob Woodward, who announced in April that he would step down from the STV board within 12 months.
Mr Pitts is currently managing director of online, pay TV, interactive and technology at ITV, having spent 17 years at the company.
He will join the STV board on 3 January.
In a statement, STV said that Mr Pitts had overseen strong growth in ITV's digital businesses and had been "one of the main architects of the company's recent transformation".
STV chairwoman Margaret Ford said: "The combination of Simon's sector experience, drive and track record in delivering strategic change make him an ideal candidate to lead STV's next phase of growth."
Mr Pitts said: "I have got to know STV well during my time at ITV and I'm excited by the opportunity to lead a company with such a strong brand and relationship with its audience.
"I'm looking forward to working with everyone at STV to make the most of its great potential in the future." 
Summarize: 
STV is a Scottish television company, which is the largest commercial television broadcaster in the United Kingdom.
In November 2013, STV was awarded the licence to broadcast Channel 3 in Northern Ireland.
STV is the only commercial television broadcaster in the UK to have a news service.
STV operates three television channels:
STV2 is a Scottish television channel that launched on 1 November 2006. It is available on the digital terrestrial television platform in Scotland, and is available in high definition on Freeview, and on Sky and Virgin Media in the UK.
STV3 is a Scottish television
Mark Munro, 31, and James Robertson, 27, deny killing Russell Robertson by pushing him over railings at Bainsford Bridge, Falkirk.
It is alleged that they repeatedly punched Mr Robertson on the hands and prised his fingers from the bridge railings in May last year.
A jury at the High Court in Glasgow is hearing closing speeches in the trial.
Mr Munro says he was trying to help Russell Robertson after his co-accused pushed him over the railings.
Mr Robertson claims he initially struggled with Russell Robertson, but had left by the time he went over the bridge.
In his closing speech to the jury, advocate depute Alan Cameron said: "The accused's account of what happened wildly contradict each other.
"They can't both be telling the truth.
"I say both are lying because they want to avoid the consequences of their actions which led to the death of Russell Robertson."
Defence QC Derek Ogg, representing Mr Munro, said: "That night what Mark Munro wanted to do was go home.
"He is described as mellow and his co-accused as happy that night.
"Then there is an incident which must have lasted for less than a minute and everything changes.
"A person loses his life and two others face the prospect of a conviction for the most serious crime."
Mr Ogg said there were few eye-witnesses, despite the area being busy that night, and asked the jury to consider carefully what witnesses claimed to have seen and how far away they were at the time.
He said Mr Munro said he was trying to help Russell Robertson by grabbing him as he fell and swinging him onto the embankment.
That movement caused Mr Robertson to hit his head on a metal stanchion under the bridge, causing the fractured skull which killed him.
Mr Ogg told the jurors: "If you accept the reason he grabbed Russell Robertson and swung him was to help him then he is not guilty of anything and you must acquit him."
The QC said that if the jury instead believed Mr Munro had assaulted Russell Robertson then they should convict him of culpable homicide, rather than murder.
The trial before judge Lady Carmichael continues. 
Summarize: 
The accused's account of what happened wildly contradict each other.
They can't both be telling the truth.
I say both are lying because they want to avoid the consequences of their actions which led to the death of Russell Robertson.
The accused's account of what happened wildly contradict each other.
They can't both be telling the truth.
I say both are lying because they want to avoid the consequences of their actions which led to the death of Russell Robertson.
The accused's account of what happened wildly contradict each other.
They can't both be telling the truth.
The male swan, known as George, was injured when he was shot in Pittville Park, Cheltenham, last month.
More than £6,000 was raised to help pay for his treatment and for a reward to catch the person responsible.
Some of the cash will be used to build the purpose-built pools at the wildlife rescue centre where he was treated.
Last week George was released back on to the lake where he has lived for several years and is now doing "very well".
Caroline Gould, from Vale Wildlife Hospital and Rehabilitation Centre at Beckford near Tewkesbury, said: "He is eating well and in the water a lot, splashing about and loving being back, by the looks of it."
"Altogether, with gift aid, we've raised well over £7,000. It's absolutely amazing. It's unbelievable the support George got."
She said the money would be used to build "proper" rehabilitation pools.
"We can't just dig ponds because we're on a flood plain and we've got no drainage.
"They've got to be specialist pools with pumps and drains. It won't be a cheap job.
"We thought it would be nice to use the rest of the money, George's legacy, to give better facilities to patients like George."
A 15-year-old boy and a 48-year-old man, both from Cheltenham, were released on bail after being arrested last week under the Wildlife and Countryside Act. 
Summarize: 
George is a male swan, known as George, who was shot in Pittville Park, Cheltenham, last month.
More than £6,000 was raised to help pay for his treatment and for a reward to catch the person responsible.
Some of the cash will be used to build the purpose-built pools at the wildlife rescue centre where he was treated.
Last week George was released back on to the lake where he has lived for several years and is now doing "very well".
Caroline Gould, from Vale Wildlife Hospital and Rehabilitation Centre at Beckford near Tewkesbury, said:
The incident happened on Saturday morning in the Templehall area of Kirkcaldy.
A man followed the woman into her house in Harris Drive as she entered about 10:00.
She was then assaulted and threatened. The suspect left the property after about four hours, police said.
Det Insp John Anderson said: "This was a terrifying ordeal for the victim that took place in her own home and we are eager to trace this man as soon as possible.
"Anyone who recognises his description or saw anyone acting suspiciously in the Harris Drive area yesterday morning or afternoon is urged to come forward. People may also have seen him before or after the incident elsewhere in the Templehall area."
The suspect was described as about 30 to 40 years old, 5ft 4ins tall, with a medium to stocky build. He had a shaved head with a scratch to his face and head.
He also had an earring and was wearing a black zipped jacket with a brand logo on one of the shoulders.
The man was also wearing very distinctive 'Police' brand blue denim cargo jeans, which had long straps to the front.
Police later said that witnesses had come forward who described a man matching the suspect's description leaving from the rear of a block of flats which leads to a communal area dividing Davar Drive and Harris Drive.
They said the suspect may have visible injuries to his face caused during a struggle with the victim.
Det Insp Anderson said a highly visible police presence would be patrolling in the area to reassure the community.
Police are reviewing CCTV footage. 
Summarize: 
1. A woman was assaulted and threatened in her own home.
2. The suspect was described as about 30 to 40 years old, 5ft 4ins tall, with a medium to stocky build. He had a shaved head with a scratch to his face and head.
3. He also had an earring and was wearing a black zipped jacket with a brand logo on one of the shoulders.
4. The suspect was also wearing very distinctive 'Police' brand blue denim cargo jeans, which had long straps to the front.
5. Police later said that witnesses had come forward who described a man matching
The project between Jaw Brew and bakery Aulds was set up by Glasgow Chamber of Commerce and Zero Waste Scotland.
The micro-brewery, based at Hillington Park in Glasgow, found the bread could be mashed without adding fermentable sugars, to create a low-alcohol beer.
The blonde beer, Hardtack, is available in local pubs and specialist shops.
Aulds supplies bread on a sale or return basis, which means there is often a large surplus of bread at the end of each day.
The majority of this goes to food banks, and now the remainder is given to Jaw Brew.
The brewery owner Mark Hazell said: "We were delighted to partner with Aulds to produce a sensational beer which is also helpful to the environment and fits well with Jaw Brew's ethos.
"We have had a lot of interest from specialist beer shops, as well as local golf and rugby clubs that are keen to offer a low alcohol alternative to the current on-sale market."
The project was recognised as part of "The City Circle Scan of Glasgow", led by Glasgow Chamber of Commerce in collaboration with Zero Waste Scotland, Circle Economy and Glasgow City Council.
The scan looks at potential areas to make the largest economic sectors within the city more "circular".
Alison McRae, of Glasgow Chamber of Commerce, said the collaboration put Glasgow a step closer to creating a "leading" circular economy city. 
Summarize: 
The project between Jaw Brew and bakery Aulds was set up by Glasgow Chamber of Commerce and Zero Waste Scotland.
The micro-brewery, based at Hillington Park in Glasgow, found the bread could be mashed without adding fermentable sugars, to create a low-alcohol beer.
The blonde beer, Hardtack, is available in local pubs and specialist shops.
Aulds supplies bread on a sale or return basis, which means there is often a large surplus of bread at the end of each day.
The majority of this goes to food banks, and now the remainder is given to Jaw Brew.
The 18-year-old disappeared as she walked to her parents' house in Coventry in December 1991. Her body has never been found.
Nigel Barwell and his brother-in-law, Thomas O'Reilly, deny her murder.
Marilyn Payne said Nicola was looking forward to Christmas in a new home with her partner and son.
"She would never have left her son," she told jurors at Birmingham Crown Court.
The court has heard Miss Payne's family received a number of anonymous phone calls after her disappearance.
Marilyn Payne said they were made by one person, whom she described as being "very vicious".
Prosecutors allege Miss Payne was abducted and murdered as she crossed wasteland known as the Black Pad in Coventry.
Mr Barwell, of Copperas Street, and Mr O'Reilly, of Ribble Road, Coventry, are now aged 51, but were both 27 at the time of her disappearance, on 14 December 1991.
In evidence, Miss Payne's father, John, said it was unusual for her to walk to their house.
He told the court he first called her boyfriend, Jason Cook, when his daughter did not reach their home and then started to search for her.
The trial continues. 
Summarize: 
Nigel Barwell and Thomas O'Reilly were both charged with the murder of Nicola Payne.
On the first day of the trial, the jury was shown a video of the last time Miss Payne was seen alive.
She was seen walking along the Black Pad, a wasteland area near to her home.
She was then seen walking along a footpath, before turning off the path and walking towards a house.
She was then seen walking along a footpath, before turning off the path and walking towards a house.
She was then seen walking along a footpath, before turning off the
The incident took place during their Rogers Cup match earlier this month.
An ATP review found the 20-year-old guilty of "aggravated behaviour".
The Australian had already received a $10,000 (£6,400) tournament fine for the "unacceptable comments", which were picked up by on-court microphones.
The fine and ban will be imposed if Kyrgios incurs any fines for verbal or physical abuse over the next six months, or accumulate fines totalling more than $5,000 (£3,200) for any other offences at ATP-sanctioned tournaments.
Although world number 41 Kyrgios apologised for the comments, Switzerland's French Open champion Wawrinka, 30, called for major action to be taken.
The ATP's head of rules and competition Gayle David Bradshaw said: "This incident reflected poorly on our sport.
"Nick has expressed regret. The best result would be that he learns a lesson and that he understands he is responsible to the tour and to fellow players for both his actions and his words."
Kyrgios also received a $2,500 (£1,600) fine for unsportsmanlike conduct relating to a comment made to a ball person during the Rogers Cup match in Montreal.
He previously came under heavy criticism for his behaviour after appearing to stop trying when he was given a code violation during his defeat by France's Richard Gasquet at Wimbledon in July. 
Summarize: 
Kyrgios was fined $10,000 (£6,400) for the incident, which took place during the second set of his match against Wawrinka at the Rogers Cup in Montreal.
The 20-year-old Australian received a code violation for unsportsmanlike conduct after he was heard to say: "You're f****** pathetic, you're a f****** wanker, you're a f****** loser, you're a f****** coward, you're a f****** little bitch."
Wawrinka, who was leading 3-0 in the second set,
Public payphones are set to become an even less familiar sight in Scotland as an estimated one third of the country's phone boxes have been earmarked for closure.
No calls were made from more than 700, of Scotland's 4,800 call boxes, last year.
BT has begun consulting on plans to close about 1,500 phone boxes around the UK.
The firm has said that payphone usage has declined, by more than 90% over the last decade, as the popularity of mobile phones has surged.
But as these readers' pictures show some telephone boxes across Scotland have been getting a new lease of life.
Send us your photos to scotlandpictures@bbc.co.uk or Instagram at #bbcscotlandpics 
Summarize: 
The Scottish Government has launched a consultation on the future of payphones in Scotland.
The consultation will look at the future of payphones in Scotland and will consider the future of the network of payphones in Scotland.
The consultation will look at the future of payphones in Scotland and will consider the future of the network of payphones in Scotland.
The consultation will look at the future of payphones in Scotland and will consider the future of the network of payphones in Scotland.
The consultation will look at the future of payphones in Scotland and will consider the future of the network of payphones in Scotland.
The
Tata Sons, owners of Tata Steel, replaced "lame duck" Cyrus Mistry with his predecessor Ratan Tata last week.
Tata Steel employs almost 7,000 workers around Wales, including more than 4,000 at its plant in Port Talbot.
Community Union said Tata must now engage in discussions on the long-term future for steelmaking in Europe.
In a joint statement Community's general secretary Roy Rickhuss and Frits van Wieringen, chairman of the Tata Steel European Works Council, said: "The news that Cyrus Mistry has been removed as chairman came as a surprise to us all.
"However we wish Ratan Tata well in taking over the reins at this challenging time for Tata Steel Europe.
"At this time we are asking Tata to alleviate the uncertainty for the workforce, customers and suppliers, by clarifying the situation regarding the strategic direction of the European operations.
"Furthermore, it is imperative Tata now engage with us to discuss their long-term vision and plans for steelmaking Europe."
Mr Mistry has lashed out at the way his sudden departure was handled.
In a no-holds-barred email to the board seen by the BBC, Mr Mistry said he had become a "lame duck" chairman and alleges constant interference, including being asked to sign off on deals he knew little about.
He also warned the company risks huge writedowns across the business.
Tata said it currently had no response to the allegations.
Last week, Tata Steel's UK head Bimlendra Jha praised the "significant effort" to turn things around - after Port Talbot was said to be losing Â£1m a day earlier this year.
Tata looked to sell its UK business, but paused the process in July.
Losses at Port Talbot have been reduced by a turnaround plan and better market conditions such as rising steel prices and a drop in the pound's value. 
Summarize: 
Tata Steel's UK business lost Â£1.1bn in the year to March, its biggest annual loss in more than a decade, as the company struggled to compete with cheaper imports.
The loss was worse than the Â£1.1bn estimated by analysts in a Reuters poll.
The company said the loss was due to a combination of factors including a sharp fall in the value of the pound, which has made its products more expensive in overseas markets, and a slowdown in demand for steel in Europe.
The company is now looking to sell its UK business, but has paused the process in July.
The Women's European Championship qualifier was scheduled for Cardiff's Sport Wales National Centre.
The fixture was first called off in early March after the Kosovan team had their visa applications denied.
"It is disappointing," said chairman of Table Tennis Wales, Bernard Carter.
Mr Carter said this time the visas had been approved, but delays with travel documents meant the Kosovan team had not been able to travel.
It has proved a frustrating and costly situation for the sport in Wales with number one Charlotte Carey having flown in from Sweden for the clash and protégée, 10-year-old Anna Hursey, set to make her senior international debut.
Mr Carter added: "It's frustrating, a real mess-up to be honest, it's difficult to rearrange these fixtures, but we are determined it will go ahead in the future."
Find out how to get into table tennis with our special guide. 
Summarize:  "The Women's European Championship qualifier was scheduled for Cardiff's Sport Wales National Centre.
The fixture was first called off in early March after the Kosovan team had their visa applications denied.
"It is disappointing," said chairman of Table Tennis Wales, Bernard Carter.
Mr Carter said this time the visas had been approved, but delays with travel documents meant the Kosovan team had not been able to travel.
It has proved a frustrating and costly situation for the sport in Wales with number one Charlotte Carey having flown in from Sweden for the clash and protégée, 10-year-old Anna Hursey, set to make
Demand "far outstripped" the availability, said founders of Ocean Studios at the Royal William Yard.
All applications were put to a panel of experts who decided who got the rented studios at the former naval yard.
The aim is to offer artists space to create, sell their work and get help from business advisors.
Leigh Mason, joint founder of the development, which opens in July, said: "We're so pleased with our carefully selected collective of residents and we know they are equally as excited as us to get in there and start doing what they do best.
"It was exactly for these creative talents and diversity of practice that we created this inspiring space in the first place."
For those who were not successful, there are associate programmes, short courses and a communal working space for many more than those in the studios.
Successful applicants Nadja Wüthrich and Nicholas Leverington have relocated from Switzerland to pursue ceramics and photography.
Mr Leverington said: "We looked at many places to relocate to, and we believe that Ocean Studios is perhaps the most exciting development for artists in the UK at this moment.
"We think it will bring a lot of artists to Plymouth." 
Summarize: 
The Royal William Yard was a former Royal Navy base in Devonport, Plymouth, England. It was established in 1859 and closed in 1996. The yard was used for the construction of ships and the repair of ships.
The Royal William Yard was the largest dry dock in the world, with the largest crane in the world, the largest floating dock in the world, the largest floating dry dock in the world, the largest floating crane in the world, the largest floating crane in the world, the largest floating crane in the world, the largest floating crane in the world, the largest floating crane in the world, the largest
The 28-year-old, who made 16 appearances for United last season, is new head coach Robbie Neilson's first signing of the summer.
Hearts had their SPFL transfer embargo lifted on Wednesday after officially exiting administration.
"He's got a lot of experience and is a good player," Neilson told the club's website.
"He's got a great attitude and a great work-rate. His mentality for coming in and doing things properly is what we need from the older players.
"They need to set an example and he certainly does that.
"I took the under-20s against Dundee United in January and Morgaro was playing. He was fantastic.
"It was a cold Tuesday night, it was bucketing down and blowing a gale but he worked really hard and helped the United youngsters.
"For me, that sold me on him. If he can do that for them then he can do it for us."
Gomis spent five years at Tannadice over two spells, and has been capped twice by Senegal.
He goes into a Hearts squad looking to bounce back to Scotland's top-flight, after they were relegated to the Championship in season 2013-14. 
Summarize: 
Morgaro Gomis is a striker who is known for his pace and dribbling skills. He is also known for his work rate and ability to score goals. He is a very good finisher and is known for his ability to score goals from outside the box. He is also known for his ability to score goals from the penalty spot. He is also known for his ability to score goals from free kicks. He is also known for his ability to score goals with his head.
He is a very good finisher and is known for his ability to score goals from outside the box. He is also known for
Sleman Ahmed, 33, was detained in Bordesley Green in Birmingham, and Shamel Zorab, 37, in Eccles in Greater Manchester.
The Iraqi nationals are wanted by authorities in Belgium and are due in court on Friday.
They are accused of being in contact with a web of people-smugglers and collecting fees from migrants.
The National Crime Agency (NCA) and Belgian Federal Police are investigating a Kurdish criminal network suspected of smuggling people into the UK in lorries.
Ten people have already been arrested in Belgium and await trial there.
The arrests were part of an operation co-ordinated by the NCA and supported by officers from Greater Manchester Police and West Midlands Police.
Colin Williams from the NCA said: "We believe this crime group is involved in attempting to smuggle people into the UK on an almost daily basis, and our co-operation with the Belgian authorities on this investigation continues."
Mr Ahmed and Mr Zorab are due at Westminster Magistrates Court for an extradition hearing on Friday. 
Summarize: 
A Kurdish criminal network is suspected of smuggling people into the UK in lorries.
Ten people have already been arrested in Belgium and await trial there.
The arrests were part of an operation co-ordinated by the NCA and supported by officers from Greater Manchester Police and West Midlands Police.
Colin Williams from the NCA said: "We believe this crime group is involved in attempting to smuggle people into the UK on an almost daily basis, and our co-operation with the Belgian authorities on this investigation continues."
Mr Ahmed and Mr Zorab are due at Westminster Magistrates Court for an extradition hearing on
The 41-year-old, who was dressed in the Scotland away top and a tartan hat and ginger wig, was seen on TV waving a Saltire and cheering with Uruguay fans.
Mr McConville has been doing charity work in Brazil, donating football strips to children.
He was criticised by some England fans after their team lost 2-1.
Mr McConville is said to have also travelled to South Africa to support Uruguay in the 2010 World Cup.
His brother Damien McConville took to Facebook to share a picture of him.
"The Tartan Army Fan partying with the Uruguayans is Mark McConville who brought lots of fitba strips for weans in the Amazon region," he said.
Another friend, Billy Mclaughlin said: "Mark McConville I just seen you on TV."
Carol Anne Barr said: "Lookin good cousin Mark!"
Some England fans were not amused by the sight of a Scot celebrating their team's defeat and posted their thoughts on social media.
England's 2-1 defeat means Roy Hodgson's men have lost their opening two games and have only a slim chance of qualifying for the knock-out stages of the World Cup.
"The flags are missing from the cars. British newspapers aren't heralding imminent victory. In pubs from Penrith to Plymouth there's a distinct lack of gaiety, optimism and hope.
"I for one couldn't be happier.
"As a Scotsman resident in London, I've come to dread the wildly delusional over-confidence that grips my adopted homeland every time an international football tournament is staged...
Read more - The joyful dearth of World Cup hype 
Summarize:  A Scottish man who lives in London, who supports England, goes to Uruguay to support Uruguay, then goes to Brazil to support Uruguay and now is in Brazil to support Uruguay.
"I'm not sure how I feel about this.
"On the one hand, it's a nice gesture.
"On the other, it's a bit weird.
"I'm not sure if I should be glad or sad that Mark McConville is supporting Uruguay.
"I'm not sure if I should be glad or sad that Mark McConville is supporting Uruguay.
"I'm not sure if I should be glad or
Ann Maguire, 61, was stabbed to death by Will Cornick at Corpus Christi Catholic College, Leeds, in April 2014.
A full inquest is scheduled to begin at Wakefield Coroners' Court in November.
The Maguires have said they have "many unanswered questions" and challenge the West Yorkshire Coroner's decision to exclude "vital" evidence and witnesses.
Live updates and more stories from Yorkshire
Cornick, who was 15 at the time, was given a life sentence in 2014 after admitting murdering Ann Maguire, who had taught Spanish at Corpus Christi for more than 40 years.
Because he quickly admitted responsibility, police never fully reviewed the evidence.
A full inquest is not usually held following a successful prosecution but in January 2016 it was announced that one would be held into the death.
The family's lawyers, Irwin Mitchell, said the Maguires have "serious concerns" about the scope of the inquest.
Senior coroner David Hinchliff said it was "inappropriate" to comment at this stage.
Yogi Amin, of Irwin Mitchell, said: "The family hoped a full public inquest would examine the full chain of events and all the evidence available so lessons could be learned to reduce the risk of similar incidents happening again.
"They have become very concerned about the scope of the full inquest hearing scheduled for later this year.
"The police investigation was itself limited in scope, as the defendant quickly admitted responsibility meaning there was no examination of all the evidence publicly."
In 2015, the family was told no Serious Case Review would be held.
In November 2016, a report by Leeds Safeguarding Children Board said no-one could have predicted or prevented Mrs Maguire's murder.
Also in 2016, a council Learning Lessons Review was held, but a recent pre-inquest review revealed many conversations had not been recorded. 
Summarize: 
The Maguires have said they have "many unanswered questions" and challenge the West Yorkshire Coroner's decision to exclude "vital" evidence and witnesses.
Live updates and more stories from Yorkshire
Cornick, who was 15 at the time, was given a life sentence in 2014 after admitting murdering Ann Maguire, who had taught Spanish at Corpus Christi for more than 40 years.
Because he quickly admitted responsibility, police never fully reviewed the evidence.
A full inquest is not usually held following a successful prosecution but in January 2016 it was announced that one would be held into the death.
The family
Smyth wrote a letter from his prison cell, castigating the then Bishop Cathal Daly for stating that he (Smyth) had "done severe damage to the Church".
The serial child abuser's letter also blamed the media for creating an atmosphere of "shame" over his crimes.
His letter was read out at Historical Institutional Abuse (HIA) inquiry.
The inquiry, which is being held in Banbridge courthouse, County Down, is examining child abuse allegations in church, state and voluntary children's residential institutions dating back to 1922, but has set aside a dedicated module on the case of the late Brendan Smyth.
Writing from his cell in Magilligan prison in 1994, Smyth said that he wanted to express his "anger and disbelief" that Cathal Daly had said the case had damaged the Catholic Church.
Describing the then Bishop Daly as "lofty and intellectual", the convicted child abuser went on to blame the media.
He said: "Whatever my failings - and there are many - it is not they, but the media reporting of them which has created an atmosphere of mixed shame and embarrassment."
The HIA inquiry also heard the only sanction the Catholic Church imposed on Smyth was to stop him hearing confessions.
The decision to withdraw Smyth's right to hear church-goers' confessions was made by Bishop Francis McKiernan in the Irish cross-border diocese of Kilmore.
The bishop's sanction followed a "secret" inquiry into allegations against the paedophile priest in 1975.
The 1975 inquiry was conducted by three priests, including Fr John Brady - who later became Cardinal Sean Brady and replaced Cathal Daly as the leader of the Catholic Church in Ireland.
Cardinal Brady resigned last year.
The HIA hearing, which began examining Smyth's case on Monday, has been told that there is nothing to show that any other action was taken to stop his abuse or to help the children he had abused. 
Summarize: 
The HIA inquiry, which is being held in Banbridge courthouse, County Down, is examining child abuse allegations in church, state and voluntary children's residential institutions dating back to 1922, but has set aside a dedicated module on the case of the late Brendan Smyth.
Writing from his cell in Magilligan prison in 1994, Smyth said that he wanted to express his "anger and disbelief" that Cathal Daly had said the case had damaged the Catholic Church.
Describing the then Bishop Daly as "lofty and intellectual", the convicted child abuser went on to blame the media.
He said: "Whatever
Lynne Braund, 54, from Barry, Vale of Glamorgan, was left with critical injuries following an assault in Glanmor Crescent on 4 August.
South Wales Police said she later died at Morriston Hospital, Swansea.
A man, 63, from Penarth, is due to appear at Cardiff Magistrates' Court on 2 September.
Police said Ms Braund's family are being supported by specially-trained family liaison officers. 
Summarize: 
A man, 63, from Penarth, is due to appear at Cardiff Magistrates' Court on 2 September.
Police said Ms Braund's family are being supported by specially-trained family liaison officers.
A man, 63, from Penarth, is due to appear at Cardiff Magistrates' Court on 2 September.
Police said Ms Braund's family are being supported by specially-trained family liaison officers.
A man, 63, from Penarth, is due to appear at Cardiff Magistrates' Court on 2 September.
Police said Ms Braund's family are being supported by specially-trained
Launching the party's campaign, Leanne Wood will argue electing the largest ever group of Plaid MPs would put Wales in the "strongest position possible" as polls point to a hung parliament.
She will address party activists in a rally at Ffos Las Racecourse in Trimsaran, near Llanelli.
Plaid Cymru currently has three MPs and has never had more than four.
On Thursday, the party warned SNP election gains could divert resources to Scotland, with Plaid's campaign coordinator Lord Wigley arguing a "strong group" of his party's MPs would be needed to stop Wales losing out. 
Summarize: 
The party has been campaigning for a second referendum on Welsh independence, and has been critical of the Welsh Government's handling of the Brexit process.
The party has been critical of the Welsh Government's handling of the Brexit process, and has called for a second referendum on Welsh independence.
The party has called for the Welsh Government to be given greater powers over the Brexit process.
The party has called for the Welsh Government to be given greater powers over the Brexit process.
The party has called for the Welsh Government to be given greater powers over the Brexit process.
The party has called for the Welsh
Yorkshire Ambulance Service had warned they warned it could be overwhelmed on Saturday and Sunday, when wintry weather hit the region.
It said the most serious calls were up almost 30% on last year.
Dr David Macklin, director of operations at the ambulance service, said extra staff and volunteers were drafted in to cope with the demand.
He said compared with 2013, there were over 7,000 more calls to the NHS non-emergency number 111.
The ambulance service covers about 6,000 square miles across the Yorkshire and Humber region, and serves more than five million people.
It said before Christmas it was "very busy" and predicted that because GP practices and NHS services closed over Christmas, they would get "an even higher volume of calls for seasonal illnesses and incidents".
According to the ambulance service:
Dr Macklin said the increase in 999 calls was likely to last into the early part of next year. 
Summarize: 
The Yorkshire Ambulance Service warned it could be overwhelmed on Saturday and Sunday, when wintry weather hit the region.
It said the most serious calls were up almost 30% on last year.
Dr David Macklin, director of operations at the ambulance service, said extra staff and volunteers were drafted in to cope with the demand.
He said compared with 2013, there were over 7,000 more calls to the NHS non-emergency number 111.
The ambulance service covers about 6,000 square miles across the Yorkshire and Humber region, and serves more than five million people.
It said before Christmas
Steven Hearl, 63, was jailed for six years and four months after admitting raping a schoolgirl in Alvechurch, Worcestershire, in 1987.
Solicitor General Robert Buckland appealed, saying it was too lenient.
Hearl's sentence was increased by 20 months by three Court of Appeal judges.
Hearl, of Hunters Walk, Birmingham, had previously admitted four offences including rape and sexual assault.
He was caught when officers from Warwickshire and West Mercia Police's major crime review team examined evidence in unsolved sexual assaults and rapes to trace offenders still at large.
Worcester Crown Court heard Hearl forced the girl into a cornfield before using her clothing to bind and blindfold her while he carried out the attack.
The Court of Appeal was told the effect of the attack on the victim was especially severe and led to "self-imposed exile".
She was forced to move away from the area because people did not believe her account of the attack and she suffered recurring nightmares and anxiety.
The court was also told the victim had been relieved when Hearl was finally identified as her attacker and her account had been vindicated. 
Summarize: 
The Court of Appeal was told the victim had been relieved when Hearl was finally identified as her attacker and her account had been vindicated.
The Court of Appeal was told the victim had been relieved when Hearl was finally identified as her attacker and her account had been vindicated.
The Court of Appeal was told the victim had been relieved when Hearl was finally identified as her attacker and her account had been vindicated.
The Court of Appeal was told the victim had been relieved when Hearl was finally identified as her attacker and her account had been vindicated.
The Court of Appeal was told
All the team members say they will continue their protest until the school gets satisfactory answers on the issue.
The university suspended the players this week after an internal inquiry without providing any reasons.
Police earlier declined to arrest or charge any of the players over claims a woman was assaulted in September.
The woman has told police she was drunk when she was assaulted by several men at an off-campus apartment.
Some of the players have said that they had consensual sex with her.
The Minnesota team now say they are not ruling out missing the Holiday Bowl on 27 December against Washington State. 
Summarize:  The players are protesting the university's handling of the case. They are not saying they will not play in the Holiday Bowl. They are saying they will not play until the university gets satisfactory answers.
The players are not saying they will not play in the Holiday Bowl. They are saying they will not play until the university gets satisfactory answers.
The players are not saying they will not play in the Holiday Bowl. They are saying they will not play until the university gets satisfactory answers.
The players are not saying they will not play in the Holiday Bowl. They are saying they will not play until the university gets satisfactory answers.
The
Goals from Trésor Mputu Mabi and Rainford Kalaba were enough to give the holders a win in Lubumbashi on Sunday.
It means Mazembe are top of Group D, following SuperSport United's 2-2 draw with Horoya on Friday.
16 teams feature in the Confederation Cup group phase.
Zambia's Zesco United kicked off their Confederation Cup group campaign with a slender 1-0 victory over Egypt's Smouha on Saturday in Group C.
The hosts left it late in front of their own fans in Ndola before Jackson Were stepped up to score from the penalty spot in the 73rd minute.
Zesco are aiming to become the first Zambian winners of the Confederation Cup having reached the Champions League semi-finals last year.
Also on Saturday, record three-time Confederation Cup winners CS Sfaxien of Tunisia found the going tougher than expected against group-stage debutants Mbabane Swallows of Swaziland, winning 1-0.
Having scored seven goals in two home qualifiers, the Tunisians had to settle for just one, from Alaa Marzouki on 31 minutes in Sfax.
Nevertheless, Sfaxien go top of Group B, after South Africa's Platinum Stars were held to a 1-1 draw at home by Mouloudia Alger of Algeria.
Former Confederation Cup winners FUS Rabat of Morocco were 3-0 winners over Kampala Capital City Authority (KCCA), the first Ugandan club to qualify for the group stage of a continental competition.
KCCA came close to shocking title-holders Mamelodi Sundowns of South Africa in the Champions League before being demoted to the Confederation Cup.
On Friday, Substitute Thuso Phala scored to salvage a 2-2 draw for SuperSport United of South Africa against Horoya of Guinea in the opening Confederation Cup group game.
It was a disappointing start to Group D for the Pretoria club, who had scored 11 goals in three home victories en route to the expanded 16-club mini-league phase.
SuperSport United's coach, Stuart Baxter, becomes South Africa boss later this month. 
Summarize: 
The Confederation Cup is a 16-team competition, with the top two teams from each group progressing to the knockout phase.
The final is played at the National Stadium in the capital, Pretoria.
The Confederation Cup is the second-tier competition for African clubs, below the Champions League.
The Confederation Cup is played in a round-robin format, with each team playing each other once.
The top two teams from each group progress to the knockout phase, with the winners of the two-legged final going through to the Confederation Cup.
The final is played at the National Stadium in the capital, Pretoria
The five-time world champion, 39, was included in the draw but said last week that he would decline the invitation to play without stating why.
Tournament organiser have now confirmed the two-time winner will not feature.
O'Sullivan's decision not to play means Ruhr Open winner Rory McLeod will now be assured of an invite to play in the event, which begins on 10 November.
Writing on Twitter last week, O'Sullivan said: "I don't want fans buying tickets for Coventry thinking I'm playing. I said I hadn't entered weeks ago. Nothing's changed."
World champion Stuart Bingham will play the opening match of the tournament, while the likes of Neil Robertson, Shaun Murphy and world number one Mark Selby will also be in action. 
Summarize: 
The tournament will be played over five days from 10 to 15 November, with the final day scheduled for Sunday, 15 November.
The tournament will be played at the Ricoh Arena, Coventry, England.
The prize fund is £1,000,000, with the winner's prize of £500,000.
The total prize fund is £1,500,000.
The winner of the tournament will be the first player to win three successive frames in a match.
The winner of the tournament will be the first player to win six successive frames in a match.
The winner of the tournament will be
In a submission to the government, the academics claim the tunnel approach will be a "visual blemish" and ruin views of the winter solstice sunset.
They also warn it will place the area's future archaeology at risk and cause a "destructive impact" to the site.
Highways England says a tunnel will cut congestion and improve journey times.
The busy A303 currently passes within a few hundred metres of the ancient Wiltshire monument.
The 1.8 mile (2.9 km) dual carriageway tunnel proposal forms part of a Â£2bn government scheme to upgrade all remaining sections of the road between the M3 and M5.
The tunnel plan has the backing of English Heritage and the National Trust.
A report by UNESCO and the International Council on Monuments and Sites has also recognised the benefits of the project.
However, the group of archaeologists, which includes Mike Parker Pearson, professor of archaeology at the University of Sheffield and the University of Buckingham's Prof David Jacques warn that the proposed tunnel entrance and approach road will be "a vast gash on the landscape".
They believe a southern bypass is the only option which will not severely impact the site. They also argue it would be cheaper to build and less damaging to the landscape.
The academics say advances in technology mean the area could still offer up further major archaeological revelations "if the monuments and their precious setting are not wrecked".
"Planning at Stonehenge must be cautious and always propose minimal intervention," they added.
A spokesman for Highways England said: "We are working closely with key organisations within the World Heritage site, and we continue to find the best solution possible to improve journeys for drivers while also protecting Stonehenge."
He said a public consultation on the tunnel plan, which runs until 5 March, is "offering people the chance to see our initial proposals and we have been exploring fully the potential locations for the tunnel".
"For now, we can only identify broad possible locations for the tunnel portals but the plan is to put them beyond the horizons of the stones," he added. 
Summarize: 
The Wiltshire tunnel plan is part of a £2bn government scheme to upgrade all remaining sections of the A303 between the M3 and M5.
The tunnel plan has the backing of English Heritage and the National Trust.
A report by UNESCO and the International Council on Monuments and Sites has also recognised the benefits of the project.
However, the group of archaeologists, which includes Mike Parker Pearson, professor of archaeology at the University of Sheffield and the University of Buckingham's Prof David Jacques warn that the proposed tunnel entrance and approach road will be "a vast gash on the landscape".
They believe a
A by-product of a musical age that's long been forgotten?
For years, vinyl records have been seen by many as a thing of the past, but are they?
New figures out today are another indicator that the tide could be turning for the once "near extinct" format.
Earlier in the year we told you that 18 to 24-year-olds are buying more vinyl records than any other age group under 50.
Today there's more good news for fans of the LP.
Data collected by The Official Chart Company shows that 800,000 records have been sold so far this year.
That's already more than were bought during all of last year (780,674).
The figures suggest that vinyl sales are on track to top one million this year.  The last time that happened was all the way back in 1996.
That year the Fugees' LP The Score was the top-selling record. In 2014 it seems it's the Arctic Monkeys' album AM that has helped drive sales.
The Indy rockers' fifth studio album is the biggest-selling of the year on vinyl, following up its success as 2013's best-seller.
But it's not just down to one band. Jack White, Oasis, Led Zeppelin and newcomers Royal Blood make up the top five best-selling vinyl artists of 2014.
In total 112 LPs have sold more than 1,000 copies - more than double the number of titles compared with this time last year.
The figures released today by the Official Charts Company show just how far the format has come in the past few years.
Back in 2007 when vinyl was at its lowest ebb only 205,292 records were sold.
Lynne McDowell from the British Recorded Music Industry (BPI) said: "Vinyl may once have been considered a by-product of a bygone era but it is now well and truly a flourishing format making a comeback in a digital age.
"It appears that music fans still crave a tangible product that gives them original artwork, high audio quality, and purity of sound".
So don't be surprised if your mates start turning up to parties with a stack of LPs as well as their MP3 player.
Follow @BBCNewsbeat on Twitter and Radio1Newsbeat on YouTube 
Summarize:  Vinyl sales are on track to top one million this year.
The last time that happened was all the way back in 1996.
That year the Fugees' LP The Score was the top-selling record. In 2014 it seems it's the Arctic Monkeys' album AM that has helped drive sales.
The Indy rockers' fifth studio album is the biggest-selling of the year on vinyl, following up its success as 2013's best-seller.
But it's not just down to one band. Jack White, Oasis, Led Zeppelin and newcomers Royal Blood make up the top five best-selling vinyl artists
Gorwel is calling for the post to be created after consulting businesses.
New Prime Minister Theresa May has made David Davis Secretary of State for Exiting the EU in her first cabinet.
Welsh ministers said they had already announced their "immediate priorities" following the referendum and would make further statements in due course.
Gorwel said businesses see Brexit as an opportunity to "transform" the Welsh economy and make it "less dependent on government support."
The think tank's chairman Meirion Morgan said: "With Theresa May now prime minister, we can be in no doubt that Brexit will dominate the UK Government's agenda for the foreseeable future.
"We're patently aware of the significant impact an EU exit will have on Wales and know the Welsh government is aware of it too.
"It is now crucial that the people of Wales have strong political leadership and we feel a minister is required to lead and focus on Brexit."
A Welsh Government spokesman said: "This is a broad set of recommendations, most of which represent a common sense approach and many of which we are already pursuing.
"The first minister has already announced our immediate priorities and will be making further statements in due course." 
Summarize: 
The Welsh Government is to appoint a minister to lead the Brexit process in Wales.
The think tank Policy Network has called for the post to be created after consulting businesses.
New Prime Minister Theresa May has made David Davis Secretary of State for Exiting the EU in her first cabinet.
Welsh ministers said they had already announced their "immediate priorities" following the referendum and would make further statements in due course.
Gorwel said businesses see Brexit as an opportunity to "transform" the Welsh economy and make it "less dependent on government support."
The think tank's chairman Meirion Morgan said: "With
The emphasis on data in England's schools does nothing to boost learning, said Association of Teachers and Lecturers leader Mary Bousted.
Dr Bousted called on the government to cut this workload to make teaching a more attractive profession.
Ministers have promised measures to ease the paperwork burden on teachers.
"The average working week for a teacher is now 60 hours and that average includes the school holidays. So in term time teachers are working excessive hours," Dr Bousted told the BBC  ahead of the ATL conference in Liverpool.
"And the problem is so much of what they're doing isn't related to effective teaching and learning.
"It's just bureaucratic paper filling, data driven, mind-numbingly useless work they're doing for accountability purposes rather than raising standards of teaching and learning."
Dr Bousted urged the government to implement the findings of three reports on teacher workload in England which it published over the Easter weekend.
She warned: "If teachers have no time to relax, no time to recover from what is a very demanding job, then they are leaving the profession.
"Unless we do something about this workload problem then there aren't going to be teachers to teach children."
Education Secretary Nicky Morgan has accepted the findings of the three reports which urge reductions in the time teachers spend on marking, lesson planning and data collection.
Mrs Morgan said she agreed "nothing is more damaging to the profession than wasting the passion and expertise of teachers and school leaders on unnecessary tasks".
Her announcement, over Easter, came as the National Union of Teachers annual conference called for "sustained strike action" over workload.
A survey of 876 ATL members revealed the following views:
"The government needs to sit up and take responsibility for the recruitment crisis," said a primary teacher from Suffolk.
"Policies come in and then go out and we are left focusing on paperwork not the children," said an academy teacher from Wiltshire.
A London head of department said: "My partner is a solicitor in the City. I shouldn't feel like I have less free time than him, he is on three times my pay!"
Dr Bousted urged the government "to accept we are facing a crisis and put credible measures in place that will produce systemic change". 
Summarize: 
"The government is failing to tackle the teacher workload crisis and is instead focusing on the wrong issues, according to the head of the Association of Teachers and Lecturers."
"The government needs to take responsibility for the recruitment crisis and put in place credible measures to tackle the teacher workload crisis," said Dr Mary Bousted, the ATL's general secretary.
"The government needs to accept that we are facing a crisis and put in place credible measures that will produce systemic change."
"The government is failing to tackle the teacher workload crisis and is instead focusing on the wrong issues, according to the head of the Association of Teachers and Lect
Nadal, who beat Andy Murray in the last four, won 7-5 5-7 6-0, his 68th win from 100 finals on the ATP World Tour.
A double fault from Monfils, 29, closed out the first set in Nadal's favour and the Spaniard recovered from losing the second to see off the 13th seed in two hours 46 minutes.
The 29-year-old has now won clay-court titles in each of the past 13 years.
Nadal won eight consecutive titles before losing the 2013 final to Novak Djokovic and called his first Masters honour since Madrid two years ago "so special".
"I had a tough season last year, but I've had better preparation this year - even with a tough start to the season," added Nadal, who withdrew from last month's Miami Open with a virus.
"It's great to win a Masters title again. I hope this week will help me a lot."
It is a record-equaling 28th Masters title for Nadal, bringing him alongside top-ranked Djokovic, but a third Masters final defeat for Monfils.
They conceded 34 break points between them with Nadal converting eight of his 21 chances to edge his opponent, who managed five from 13.
Monfils, a runner-up in the Rotterdam Open in February, earned the backing of the Monte Carlo Country Club crowd as he tested Nadal throughout.
But having earlier saved set point, the pressure told on the Frenchman and he double-faulted to hand fifth seed Nadal a close-fought opening set.
The pair traded five breaks of serve in a gruelling second, but it was Monfils who edged the former world number one to level.
Nadal then took control of the decider and raced into a 5-0 lead before landing a forehand winner at match point to win for the ninth time in Monte Carlo as he builds to next month's French Open, which he will be seeking to win for a 10th time.
Never want to miss the latest tennis news? You can now add this sport and all the other sports and teams you follow to your personalised My Sport home. 
Summarize:  Rafael Nadal won the Monte Carlo Masters for the ninth time, beating Jo-Wilfried Tsonga in straight sets.
In Victoria, lightning strikes sparked more than 250 fires on Tuesday night, fire authorities said. A fire ban has been issued across the state.
In Melbourne, a tennis player and a ball boy at the Australian Open collapsed in the heat.
Temperatures in the city remained above 30C for much of Tuesday night.
Country Fire Authority chief officer Euan Ferguson said in a statement: "The extreme temperatures [in Victoria] over the coming three days will test fire services and the community. It's critical we minimise the risk of any fires before Friday."
Firefighters have been able to contain most of the fires in the state, although a number of fires remain out of control.
Emergency fire warnings have been issued for the Victoria communities of Yaapeet and Nypo, with fire authorities urging residents to evacuate due to "a fast moving, out of control bushfire travelling in a south easterly direction".
In 2009, fires in Victoria killed 173 people and destroyed 2,000 homes.
Meanwhile Adelaide, the capital of South Australia, experienced its fourth hottest day on record, reaching 45.1C (107F).
More than 14,000 properties have experienced power cuts, with many thought to be caused by thunderstorms and lightning strikes, ABC reported.
In Tasmania, there were reports of road tar melting in the heat.
Croatian tennis players Ivan Dodig feared he "could maybe even die" before retiring from his match as heat was once again a significant factor on day three of the Australian Open.
After temperatures of 42C (107.6F) on Tuesday, there was a peak of 41.5C, with greater cloud cover, on Wednesday.
Dodig, 29, withdrew two hours and 22 minutes into his second-round match with Damir Dzumhur in Melbourne.
"Thirty minutes after the match, I could not walk," he said.
Bush fires in Western Australia destroyed more than 50 homes earlier this week, the BBC's Jon Donnison in Sydney reports.
Last year was recently declared Australia's hottest on record, further raising questions about the impact of climate change, our correspondent adds. 
Summarize: 
Canada's heat wave is expected to continue into the weekend, with temperatures reaching as high as 42C (107.6F) in some parts of the country.
The heat wave has caused power outages and prompted warnings for people to stay out of the sun.
The heat wave is expected to continue through the weekend, with temperatures in some areas reaching as high as 42C (107.6F).
The heat wave is expected to continue through the weekend, with temperatures in some areas reaching as high as 42C (107.6F).
The heat wave is expected to continue through the weekend, with temperatures in
The Anglian Sovereign covers Orkney and Shetland but was sent to shadow the escort of a cargo ship to Lewis after it ran aground on Monday night.
The incident came just days after the Western Isles' tug, Anglian Monarch, was withdrawn from coastguard duties.
Other UK emergency towing vessels were withdrawn last year.
In October, the UK government agreed to short extensions to the contracts for the hire of two vessels for Scotland following a campaign by local authorities and politicians.
The funding package for the Anglian Monarch ended at the weekend and at midnight for the Anglian Sovereign.
Talks are still going on between the UK government and the oil and gas industry about how future cover for the Northern Isles might be provided and funded.
Shetland Islands Council convener Sandy Cluness had described the withdrawal of the Anglian Sovereign without a deal being finalised as a "disgrace".
However, MP Alistair Carmichael has told BBC Scotland that the vessel will stay on duty to allow an agreement to be reached. 
Summarize: 
The Anglian Sovereign was withdrawn from the Northern Isles on the 3rd of November.
The Anglian Monarch was withdrawn from the Northern Isles on the 2nd of November.
The Anglian Sovereign was withdrawn from the Northern Isles on the 2nd of November.
The Anglian Sovereign was withdrawn from the Northern Isles on the 2nd of November.
The Anglian Sovereign was withdrawn from the Northern Isles on the 2nd of November.
The Anglian Sovereign was withdrawn from the Northern Isles on the 2nd of November.
The Anglian Sovereign was withdrawn from the Northern Isles on the
Shanay Walker was found dead in her bed in Nottingham in July 2014.
She was living with her aunt, Kay-Ann Morris, 24, who denies murder.
Shanay's mother Leann Walker told Nottingham Crown Court she had struggled to cope after the birth of Shanay's sister.
She told how she developed depression and anxiety in the year after her second child's birth and eventually agreed to Shanay being put into care.
Ms Walker said she was unhappy when Ms Morris was granted guardianship in 2011.
She said Shanay's father nominated his sister Kay-Ann Morris, of Beckhampton Road, Nottingham, as guardian - which was eventually made official.
The court heard in subsequent visits Shanay showed signs of bruising and "seemed distant".
She told the jury she received a phone message on the morning of Shanay's death from Ms Morris saying: "I'm sorry. I wasn't strong enough."
A post-mortem report showed Shanay had more than 50 injuries on her body and had died of a brain injury.
The court has heard Ms Morris told police officers Shanay had accidently fallen down the stairs.
The prosecution said the aunt was "covering up the truth" that she had subjected her niece to a "sustained, vicious and brutal beating".
Shanay's grandmother Juanila Smikle, 53, of Easegill Court in Top Valley, also denies cruelty charges relating to Shanay and four other children.
Ms Morris is also charged with cruelty against two other children in 2011.
The trial continues. 
Summarize:  Shanay Walker was found dead in her bed in Nottingham in July 2014. She was living with her aunt, Kay-Ann Morris, 24, who denies murder. Shanay's mother Leann Walker told Nottingham Crown Court she had struggled to cope after the birth of Shanay's sister. She told how she developed depression and anxiety in the year after her second child's birth and eventually agreed to Shanay being put into care. Ms Walker said she was unhappy when Ms Morris was granted guardianship in 2011. She said Shanay's father nominated his sister Kay-Ann Morris, of Beckhampton Road, Nottingham, as guardian - which was
The 37-year-old midfielder featured for an hour of Sunday's 4-0 loss to Ross County at Pittodrie.
"I wanted to stay in football and, although there were a few possibilities on the go, to remain here was a no-brainer," Robson told the Dons website.
"Ultimately, I would like to manage one day and this is a great way to learn the ropes."
Robson, who started his career with Inverness Caley Thistle, was a league winner with Celtic in 2008 and enjoyed League Cup success with Celtic and Aberdeen.
Capped 17 times by Scotland, he moved to hometown club Aberdeen in 2013. 
Summarize: 
Robson was born in Inverness, Scotland. He began his career with Inverness Caley Thistle before moving to Celtic in 2008. He won the Scottish Premier League title with Celtic in 2008 and the Scottish League Cup with Celtic in 2011. He also won the Scottish Cup with Celtic in 2013. He moved to Aberdeen in 2013. He won the Scottish League Cup with Aberdeen in 2015. He retired from playing in 2016.
Robson was appointed as the new manager of Aberdeen on 1 June 2017, succeeding Derek McInnes.
Robson was appointed as the new manager of Aberdeen on 1 June 2017
County rejected an offer for the 23-year-old from English Championship newcomers Burton Albion last week.
"We're not looking to sell Jackson," County manager Jim McIntyre told BBC Scotland.
"He's one of our best players. He's getting game time under his belt and is developing."
Irvine, who joined County permanently from Celtic last summer after a season on loan, helped the Dingwall club finish sixth in the Scottish Premiership and beat Hibernian in the League Cup final.
It was their first national trophy and there was more joy in recent weeks for the midfielder as he won his 10th cap as a substitute in a 1-0 win over Greece.
"When he plays the way he has, like in the League Cup final, people sit up and take note," said McIntyre of the Brewers' failed bid.
McIntyre has signed three defenders - Christopher Routis, formerly of Bradford City, Kenny van der Weg, previously of Breda, and Erik Cikos, who was with Slovan Bratislava - and former Wolverhampton Wanderers goalkeeper Aaron McCarey already this summer.
However, he confirmed that he is still looking to make one or two changes to his squad in preparation for the new season. 
Summarize: 
"Jackson Irvine has been offered to Burton Albion but we are not looking to sell him. He's one of our best players. He's getting game time under his belt and is developing."
"Jackson Irvine has been offered to Burton Albion but we are not looking to sell him. He's one of our best players. He's getting game time under his belt and is developing."
"Jackson Irvine has been offered to Burton Albion but we are not looking to sell him. He's one of our best players. He's getting game time under his belt and is developing."
"Jackson Irvine has been offered to Burton Albion
The 22-year-old will make his 50th appperance for the side if he plays in the Scarlets' European Champions Cup fixture against Saracens on Sunday.
Evans has started all but one of the region's Pro12 matches this season and has played 19 games so far this term.
"I've grown up supporting the region and it's an honour to wear the jersey and to represent the club," Evans said.
"I'm looking forward to continuing my development within the region over the next few years and hopefully one day push for international honours.
"My focus at the moment is the Scarlets and hopefully making the top four in the Pro12."
Evans can play on the wing as well as full-back and was on standby for Wales' tour of New Zealand in the summer of 2016.
"Steff has had a great start to the season and has played a lot of rugby for us. He's an exciting attacking player but has also put the time in on the training field on areas of the game that he needed to work on," Scarlets head coach Wayne Pivac said.
"It's pleasing to see young local guys like Steff wanting to commit their future to the region and we look forward to see him continue to grow as a player." 
Summarize: 
Born in Llanelli, Evans attended Ysgol Gyfun Gymraeg Glantaf and was a pupil at Ysgol Gyfun Ystalyfera. He started his career at the Scarlets in 2010, making his debut against the Ospreys in the 2010–11 Pro12. He made his first start against the Ospreys in the 2011–12 Pro12, and scored his first try against the Ospreys in the 2012–13 Pro12.
Evans was selected for the Wales Under-20 squad for the 2011 IRB Junior World Championship and was part of the squad that
Seven celebrities had to pull out of the last series of the Channel 4 winter sports show after injuring themselves.
Channel 4 said there had been a thorough review of safety standards.
Former England rugby captain Jason Robinson and footballer Robbie Fowler are taking part in the new series.
Model and businesswoman Caprice is also thought to have signed up.
The show sees celebrities compete at winter sports including ski-jumping, bobsleigh and speed skating.
The last series made headlines after a number of celebrities suffered injuries.
Olympic gymnast Beth Tweddle had to undergo surgery on her neck after a fall while training for the show, which prompted the first review into safety procedures on the show.
Channel 4 said at the time that events were "no more difficult" than in previous series and all competitors had "undertaken a rigorous training programme to prepare them for the show".
A second review of safety was undertaken at the beginning of February.
Holby City actress Tina Hobley has said she has struggled to "drive, dress [and] wash my hair" following  an accident on the show.
Hobley broke her arm in two places and injured her knee and shoulder in a fall.
She told Hello Magazine her injuries "have had a huge impact" on her life and family.
The Jump: Series three's injured celebrities
Earlier this year former Girls Aloud singer Sarah Harding told how she was still "struggling" with her knee after suffering a ruptured ligament while taking part in the show.
She said she was "in constant pain" with a knee injury, adding that such pain "can take a massive toll on your mental as well as physical wellbeing".
Stars that were drafted in to take part in the last series after other celebrities pulled out were also injured.
They included ex-EastEnders actor Joe Swash who chipped a bone in his shoulder and former England rugby player Ben Cohen, who lost two teeth and needed 20 stitches.
The series will be filmed in Austria again and will be broadcast over six weeks in the new year.
Davina McCall will return as presenter.
Follow us on Twitter @BBCNewsEnts, on Instagram, or if you have a story suggestion email entertainment.news@bbc.co.uk. 
Summarize:  The Jump: Series 3, the latest series of the Channel 4 winter sports show, will see celebrities take part in ski-jumping, bobsleigh and speed skating.
The Jump: Series 3, the latest series of the Channel 4 winter sports show, will see celebrities take part in ski-jumping, bobsleigh and speed skating.
The Jump: Series 3, the latest series of the Channel 4 winter sports show, will see celebrities take part in ski-jumping, bobsleigh and speed skating.
The Jump: Series 3, the latest series of the Channel 4 winter sports show,
25 January 2016 Last updated at 07:22 GMT
By setting up remote cameras, they've managed to capture the entire year in the Antarctic, which has revealed some of the threats the penguins face.
BBC science reporter Victoria Gill, travelled to the Antarctic, where she was given access to the research sites.
The project to count penguins is being run by Penguin Lifelines. 
Summarize: 
The project to count penguins is being run by Penguin Lifelines.
The project to count penguins is being run by Penguin Lifelines.
The project to count penguins is being run by Penguin Lifelines.
The project to count penguins is being run by Penguin Lifelines.
The project to count penguins is being run by Penguin Lifelines.
The project to count penguins is being run by Penguin Lifelines.
The project to count penguins is being run by Penguin Lifelines.
The project to count penguins is being run by Penguin Lifelines.
The project to count penguins is
The 60-year-old employee, who does not want to be named, had her left index finger sliced off below the knuckle at Drumlan Hall Farm, Tattenhall in 2013.
The Health and Safety Executive (HSE) said she had been cleaning the machine as requested, unaware it was turned on.
Tattenhall Dairy Products Ltd, which makes Cheshire Farm Ice Cream, admitted two safety failings over the incident.
It was also ordered to pay costs of more than £11,000 at Chester Magistrates' Court for breaches of the Provision and Use of Equipment Regulations 1998 and the Management of Health and Safety at Work Regulations 1999.
The HSE said the fruit feeder machine attachment had to be cleaned regularly to make ice cream.
It was done by removing the chute which fed in the fruit. This exposed dangerous moving parts.
The HSE said the victim had assumed the machine was switched off on 8 August 2013 and her finger became caught in rotating blades when she tried to remove cookies.
An investigation found that while staff had been told to switch the machine off during cleaning, there were no other measures in place.
Speaking after the hearing, HSE inspector Lorna Sherlock said it was "almost inevitable" an employee would forget at some point to check it was switched off and it should have had suitable guarding or, as a minimum, a robust safety system in place.
The company has since installed an interlocking device on the machine so power is automatically cut off when the chute is removed. 
Summarize: 
The HSE said the victim had assumed the machine was switched off on 8 August 2013 and her finger became caught in rotating blades when she tried to remove cookies.
An investigation found that while staff had been told to switch the machine off during cleaning, there were no other measures in place.
Speaking after the hearing, HSE inspector Lorna Sherlock said it was "almost inevitable" an employee would forget at some point to check it was switched off and it should have had suitable guarding or, as a minimum, a robust safety system in place.
The company has since installed an interlocking device on the machine so power is
The left-hander top scored with 93 before being caught by Ben Brown off the bowling of Oliver Robinson as the home side were all out for 234.
Robinson and Chris Liddle each took three wickets, but Steve Magoffin was the pick of the bowlers with 4-48.
In reply, Sussex lost Ed Joyce for 12 before closing on 33-1.
The visitors began the day with six fast bowlers unavailable, as Chris Jordan and Matt Hobden joined their injury list, but rose to the challenge as they pinned down the home side, who never really got going.
Malan was the only player to pass 50, with Nick Compton Middlesex's next highest scorer with 39.
Their stand of 90 was the mainstay of the innings after the early loss of openers Sam Robson and Nick Gubbins, but when Compton was caught at second slip that heralded a slump from 114-2 to 123-6.
Malan put on 55 with Ollie Rayner to calm the home side's fears, but when Rayner was out for 28 two balls after tea, the innings lost momentum. After Malan's dismissal, Toby Roland-Jones added 16 and Tim Murtagh 13, with Ravi Patel unbeaten on six.
Sussex reached 33-1 off 16 overs before the close and will have ended the day the happier team. 
Summarize: 
Sussex's second innings began with a collapse, as they lost their first four wickets for just 15 runs, with Ben Brown taking three wickets.
The home side were all out for just 78, with Brown taking 4-22.
Summarize:
Sussex batted first and were all out for just 83, with Ben Brown taking 4-23.
Summarize:
Sussex batted first and were all out for just 83, with Ben Brown taking 4-23.
Summarize:
Sussex batted first and were all out for just 83, with
Cyclist Kim Ashton, who won six golds in Jersey last summer, has decided not to race in Gotland because of concerns about the team's selection policy.
Officials have chosen the squad but will not name it publicly until the mountain bike line-up is finalised.
"I've made the decision to withdraw because of selection politics," Ashton told BBC Radio Jersey.
"It's sad that I can't defend my titles and try and achieve the same feat twice," she added in a brief statement sent to the BBC.
Ashton was one the home stars of the 2015 Games, winning individual and team gold in all three of the events she entered; the time trial,road race and town centre criterium.
"The Jersey Cycling Association has yet to select part of the team," said the association's president Peter Hubert.
"I would also chair the appeals panel, were there to be any, and therefore it would be inappropriate [for me] to make any public comment as it could compromise that role."
Ashton's withdrawal is the latest indication that Team Jersey will have a very different feel to it for Gotland 2017, with a number of high-profile absentees likely.
Tennis player Scott Clayton has already said he is 'unlikely' to compete as he focuses on qualifying for Wimbledon, while international archer Lucy O'Sullivan has raised concerns over costs and her schedule.
As host island Jersey had the biggest squad at last summer's Island Games, but sent a much smaller team to Bermuda in 2013 due to the cost of the event.
The 2019 games will be held in Gibraltar after Menorca pulled out of hosting the event, leading to a number of sports being dropped due to a lack of facilities, although cycling and volleyball won a reprieve. 
Summarize: 
The Jersey Cycling Association has yet to select part of the team. I would also chair the appeals panel, were there to be any, and therefore it would be inappropriate [for me] to make any public comment as it could compromise that role.
The Jersey Cycling Association has yet to select part of the team. I would also chair the appeals panel, were there to be any, and therefore it would be inappropriate [for me] to make any public comment as it could compromise that role.
The Jersey Cycling Association has yet to select part of the team. I would also chair the appeals panel, were there to
Rizlaine Boular, 21, from central London, Mina Dich, 43, from south-west London, and Khawla Barghouthi, 20, from north-west London have also been charged with conspiracy to murder.
They were arrested following a counter-terror operation last month in which Ms Boular was shot by police.
They will appear at Westminster Magistrates' Court on Thursday.
Ms Dich, who is the mother of Ms Boular, was arrested in Kent and Ms Barghouthi was arrested in north-west London on 27 April.
Ms Boular was arrested three days later after being discharged from hospital.
All others arrested in connection with the investigation have been released from police custody, the Metropolitan Police said. 
Summarize: 
The three women are accused of conspiring to commit acts of terrorism between June 2014 and March 2016.
The three women are accused of conspiring to commit acts of terrorism between June 2014 and March 2016.
The three women are accused of conspiring to commit acts of terrorism between June 2014 and March 2016.
The three women are accused of conspiring to commit acts of terrorism between June 2014 and March 2016.
The three women are accused of conspiring to commit acts of terrorism between June 2014 and March 2016.
The three women are accused of conspiring to commit acts of terrorism between June 2014 and March 2016.
Metal detectorists found the spoon handle with an engraving of "Wild Man" near Woodbridge in Suffolk.
A leading historian has hailed the discovery as a "rare find".
Some of the earliest writings about The Wild Man come from Spain in the 9th Century and he was described as "barbaric, chaotic and unrestrained".
The 15th Century handle, found two years ago, was declared as treasure at an inquest in Ipswich this week.
Covered in leaves and brandishing a club, the hairy Wild Man was a popular medieval mythical figure mostly found in pictures and literature rather than on objects.
Professor of history Ronald Hutton, from the University of Bristol, said: "It's certainly one of the earliest depictions of the Wild Man.
"There would have been earlier ones on manuscripts and tapestries but not like this."
He said it would have been owned by someone "well-off" and from the "upper to middle class".
People were fascinated by the creature who was "barbaric, chaotic and unrestrained", he said.
"This might have been given to someone as a present to remind them of how not to behave," he added.
"He was a bogey in a world obsessed with religious and social order, an awful warning of the consequences of a lack of either."
The figure is being valued by the British Museum, which will then decide what to do with it. 
Summarize: 
The Wild Man was a popular mythical figure in medieval times. He was a hairy, wild man who lived in the woods and was often depicted in stories and pictures. He was a bogey in a world obsessed with religious and social order, an awful warning of the consequences of a lack of either.
The Wild Man was a popular mythical figure in medieval times. He was a hairy, wild man who lived in the woods and was often depicted in stories and pictures. He was a bogey in a world obsessed with religious and social order, an awful warning of the consequences of a lack of either.
The Wild Man was
Daisy Mae Burrill died at Manchester Children's Hospital on 14 March, three days after being found at a property in Warren Street, Fleetwood, Lancashire.
A post-mortem examination revealed she died from a head injury, Lancashire Police said.
John Burrill, 30, from Gordon Road, Fleetwood, appeared for a brief hearing at Blackpool Magistrates' Court and was remanded in custody.
He is due to appear at Preston Crown Court on Tuesday.
A 29-year-old woman arrested on suspicion of causing or allowing the death of a child has been released without charge.
The baby was found at 06:30 GMT on 11 March and taken to Blackpool Victoria Hospital having suffered a suspected cardiac arrest.
She was transferred to Manchester Children's Hospital. 
Summarize: 
A 29-year-old woman arrested on suspicion of causing or allowing the death of a child has been released without charge.
The baby was found at 06:30 GMT on 11 March and taken to Blackpool Victoria Hospital having suffered a suspected cardiac arrest.
She was transferred to Manchester Children's Hospital.
A post-mortem examination revealed she died from a head injury, Lancashire Police said.
John Burrill, 30, from Gordon Road, Fleetwood, appeared for a brief hearing at Blackpool Magistrates' Court and was remanded in custody.
He is due to appear at Preston Crown Court on
The prank involves people dressing up as clowns to deliberately scare or intimidate members of the public.
Police Scotland said it had received a "few sporadic reports of individuals dressed as clowns" in some areas in Scotland.
The reports did not specifically involve threats or violence.
But police said anyone "seeking to cause distress and potential harm to anyone" should be aware that action would be taken.
The craze appears to have been inspired by clown-related pranks in the US and has seen a string of copycat incidents across the UK recently.
Last week a hoaxer admitted a "sighting" in Glasgow was faked.
A Facebook page called "Killer Clowns in and around Glasgow" said a clown had been spotted underneath a bridge.
The post was shared more than 1,000 times before the poster admitted the picture had been taken elsewhere.
In a statement, Supt David Duncan, from Police Scotland, said: "We have had a few sporadic reports of individuals dressed as clowns in some areas in Scotland.
"It is assessed that there is a current trend of similar incidents on social media, many of which have been confirmed as hoaxes and emanate from overseas.
"The reports which have been made to local police officers are being investigated and do not specifically involve threats or violence.
"However, any person seeking to cause distress and potential harm to anyone should be aware that police will take action.
"If anyone has any concerns they should report the matter to police." 
Summarize:  "The craze appears to have been inspired by a series of copycat incidents in the US and has seen a string of copycat incidents across the UK recently."
The craze appears to have been inspired by a series of copycat incidents in the US and has seen a spate of copycat incidents across the UK recently.
Last week a hoaxer admitted a "sighting" in Glasgow was faked.
A Facebook page called "Killer Clowns in and around Glasgow" said a clown had been spotted underneath a bridge.
The post was shared more than 1,000 times before the poster admitted the picture had been
Environmentalists have protested against the ships in recent years, saying they damage the city's fragile lagoon.
From January 2014, the number of cruise ships allowed through Venice will be cut by 20%.
Ships of more than 96,000 tonnes will be banned from the centre of the city from November next year.
Prime Minister Enrico Letta's office also announced plans to open up a new canal route to the city - thereby allowing big vessels to enter the city by a kind of back door, the BBC's Alan Johnston reports from Rome.
The measures were announced after a meeting between Mr Letta, the mayor of Venice and other local politicians on Tuesday.
A spokesman for those who have protested against the ships told Italian media that the measures constitute a first step and that their campaign will go on.
Concerns over big ships sailing too close to shorelines have increased since the Costa Concordia cruise liner ran aground off a Tuscan island in January 2012, killing 32 people.
Those who oppose the ships argue that they are grotesquely out of keeping with the beautiful old city and that they disgorge unsustainable numbers of visitors into the squares and alleyways, our correspondent reports.
But there is also a powerful lobby in Venice that favours the cruise ship trade and welcomes the economic benefits it brings, he adds. 
Summarize:  Venice is the most visited city in Italy, with about 7 million tourists per year. The city is a UNESCO World Heritage Site, and has been the setting for many films, including "The Grand Budapest Hotel" and "The Talented Mr. Ripley".
The charges relate to comments made to referee Wayne Barnes and his assistants after the 21-19 loss at London Irish.
Last October, Diamond received a £5,000 fine and a 12-week suspended ban after an incident against Northampton.
Referees are entitled to respect at all times, whether the final whistle has been blown or not
The Sharks' chief executive has been charged under Rule 5.12 which covers "conduct prejudicial to the interests of the union and/or the game".
Diamond - who has also been handed a £4,000 fine - will be unable to enter the playing enclosure, technical area, approach match officials and communicate or attempt to communicate directly with match officials before, during and after the game on the day of the match until the ban expires on 20 June.
In a statement, the RFU panel, which was chaired by Sean Enright, said: "Referees strive to do the best they can in a highly pressurised environment. Wayne Barnes is acknowledged as one of the best referees in the game. Referees are entitled to respect at all times, whether the final whistle has been blown or not."
Barnes was the focus of Diamond's post-match comments at the Madejski Stadium when he said: "I'm concerned about the referee being absolutely right about the penalty at the scrum.
"It is hard to take when such a crucial decision is made like that. He has to be 100% right that we wheeled the scrum.
"He ought to come to a coaching session and see that the wheel went out of the game 10 years ago."
The former hooker was handed a heavier sanction than the one he received following the match against Saints as his previous punishments were suspended until 31 May 2013, on the condition there were no repeat offences.
At his previous hearing, Diamond was also told he had to undergo a course of media training before the end of the season. 
Summarize: 
Diamond has been charged under Rule 5.12 which covers "conduct prejudicial to the interests of the union and/or the game".
The charge relates to comments made to referee Wayne Barnes and his assistants after the 21-19 loss at London Irish.
Last October, Diamond received a £5,000 fine and a 12-week suspended ban after an incident against Northampton.
Referees are entitled to respect at all times, whether the final whistle has been blown or not.
The Sharks' chief executive has been charged under Rule 5.12 which covers "conduct prejudicial to the interests of the union and
Gillen Fuels, in Londonderry, said the lorry was in a "fuel yard filled with kerosene, gas oil and bottled gas".
Police said the fire caused "substantial damage" to two vehicles in the yard on Heather Road.
The incident happened at about 22:30 BST on Friday night.
The company wrote on Facebook that it was "disgusting that people can enter our property and vandalise our lorries".
"The lorry was parked next to numerous oil lorries with kerosene on board and if that fire had not been contained in time our whole livelihood would have been up in flames, not to mention businesses on either side of us
"Someone could have been seriously hurt but thankfully no one was hurt and we would like to thank the fire service (who) acted so quickly.
"To those who entered our property and done this, CCTV will be checked on and police are on the matter." 
Summarize: 
The fire started in the fuel yard of the company, which is located in the city of Londonderry.
The fire spread to two vehicles in the yard, which were filled with kerosene, gas oil and bottled gas.
The fire caused "substantial damage" to the vehicles.
The fire spread to a nearby building, which was also filled with kerosene, gas oil and bottled gas.
The fire caused "substantial damage" to the building.
The fire spread to a nearby building, which was also filled with kerosene, gas oil and bottled gas.
The fire caused
Play was delayed until mid-afternoon and Derbyshire began steadily before Hamish Rutherford (68) was dismissed.
Wayne Madsen fell lbw shortly after to Graham Napier (1-59).
Opener Chesney Hughes however (66 not out) remained firm, thrashing spinner Dan Lawrence for six, before both sides shook hands for the draw with Derbyshire on 261-4.
The result keeps Essex top of the Divison Two table, 18 points ahead of second-placed Kent. 
Summarize: 
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Summarize:
Det Con Sharon Garrett, 48, died in a five-vehicle collision on the A141 near Wyton, Cambridgeshire, in June 2014.
Danny Warby, 27, of Runcton Holme near King's Lynn, appeared at Peterborough Crown Court and denied the charge.
A further hearing is due on 21 October with a trial expected to take place on 7 December.
Det Con Sharon Garrett died when the Renault Clio she was driving was involved in a collision with two other cars and two lorries on 6 June, 2014.
She was married to a police officer with two children and had joined the Cambridgeshire force in 1991.
Mr Warby was released on bail. 
Summarize: 
The trial of Danny Warby, 27, of Runcton Holme near King's Lynn, appeared at Peterborough Crown Court.
He was charged with causing death by dangerous driving.
The court heard that the crash happened on the A141 near Wyton, Cambridgeshire, on 6 June, 2014.
Mr Warby was driving a Renault Clio when he was involved in a collision with two other cars and two lorries.
The court heard that Mr Warby had been driving at 70mph in a 50mph zone when he collided with the lorries.
He was also charged with
The routes will connect the Greater Manchester town's centre with surrounding residential areas.
Wigan Borough Council has been awarded a grant from the Department for Transport for the scheme.
The plans will be on show during a drop-in session on 18 July, so people in the town can offer feedback on the project before work begins later this year.
The drop-in session will be held at Newtown Working Men's Club in Anson Street between 14.00 and 19.00 BST.
The routes will be added to parts of Robin Park Road, Warrington Road, the Wallgate/Queen Street junction, Saddle junction and Pemberton cycleway.
The work is expected to be completed by summer 2018.
Councillor David Molyneux, cabinet member for regeneration, said: "These routes inbound to Wigan town centre are flat and short in distance, making them perfect for commuters who live close by.
"The plans are still in their design stages so I'd encourage people, whether you're a keen cyclist or not, to have a look at the routes and tell us what you think." 
Summarize: 
The route will be on the same route as the existing bike route, which is a short, flat and quiet route.
The route will be on the same route as the existing bike route, which is a short, flat and quiet route.
The route will be on the same route as the existing bike route, which is a short, flat and quiet route.
The route will be on the same route as the existing bike route, which is a short, flat and quiet route.
The route will be on the same route as the existing bike route, which is a short, flat and quiet route.
The
While most will be hoping to return to Cardiff Bay for another term of office, more than a dozen members have already confirmed they will not be standing again.
Of the 13 politicians calling it a day, eight have served since the first assembly election in 1999.
Two others were first elected in 2003.
Ten of those stepping down are Labour politicians including the current Presiding Officer Dame Rosemary Butler and the economy and education ministers, Edwina Hart and Huw Lewis.
Other retiring Labour AMs include Gwenda Thomas, the former deputy minister for social services, and the former deputy minister for tackling poverty, Jeff Cuthbert.
The Labour Chief Whip Janice Gregory is also standing down.
Plaid Cymru has three members who will not be returning to the Senedd including former heritage ministers Rhodri Glyn Thomas and Alun Ffred Jones.
"It was a very exciting time when the assembly was set up," Mr Thomas said.
"Of course it was set up under a first secretary with a system of committees really discussing the devolved areas and then 17 years later we're a legislative body with full legislative powers within the devolved areas so we've moved very quickly and we've moved a great distance," he added.
"The last 17 years have been enjoyable and productive.  Hopefully a great deal has been achieved."
Plaid Cymru's Jocelyn Davies who served as deputy minister for housing is also stepping down.
Despite the assembly being dissolved the Welsh government will continue with its business up until the election.
Welsh Labour
Dame Rosemary Butler, Newport West
Christine Chapman, Cynon Valley
Jeffrey Cuthbert, Caerphilly
Keith Davies, Llanelli
Janice Gregory, Ogmore
Edwina Hart, Gower
Huw Lewis, Merthyr Tydfil and Rhymney
Sandy Mewies, Delyn
Gwyn R Price, Islwyn
Gwenda Thomas, Neath
Plaid Cymru
Jocelyn Davies, South Wales East region
Alun Ffred Jones, Arfon
Rhodri Glyn Thomas, Carmarthen East and Dinefwr 
Summarize: 
The Welsh Government will continue with its business up until the election.
The assembly will be dissolved on 30 March.
The election will be held on 3 May.
The election will be held on 3 May.
The election will be held on 3 May.
The election will be held on 3 May.
The election will be held on 3 May.
The election will be held on 3 May.
The election will be held on 3 May.
The election will be held on 3 May.
The election will be held on 3 May.
The election will be held on 3 May.
The election
The glasshouse building, which is part of Parc Tawe, is home to more than 5,000 plants, many of which are extinct from their natural habitat.
Swansea council needs to save £75m over the next three years and closing Plantasia is on the list of new savings proposals.
It was opened in 1990. 
Summarize: 
The glasshouse building, which is part of Parc Tawe, is home to more than 5,000 plants, many of which are extinct from their natural habitat.
Swansea council needs to save £75m over the next three years and closing Plantasia is on the list of new savings proposals.
It was opened in 1990.
Summarize:
The glasshouse building, which is part of Parc Tawe, is home to more than 5,000 plants, many of which are extinct from their natural habitat.
Swansea council needs to save £75m over
The 18-year-old Cameroon youth international has agreed terms on a three-year deal and will arrive at Ajax on a free transfer when his Barcelona contract expires in June.
Onana has been in Barcelona's youth system since 2010 and this season was promoted to their Under-19 team, but he has not played a senior game.
He caught the eyes of the Dutch side when he played for Barcelona against Ajax in November in the Uefa Youth League, the continental youth competition for clubs competing in the Champions League, and the four-time European champions have swooped in ahead of other interested teams.
The Cameroon-born Onana joined the famous Barcelona La Masia academy through a link with the Samuel Eto'o football foundation in Cameroon.
Compatriot Fabrice Ondoa, 19, is expected to be first choice for Cameroon at this month's Africa Cup of Nations in Equatorial Guinea even though he has yet to make a first-team appearance for Barcelona. 
Summarize: 
Onana is a central defender who can also play as a defensive midfielder. He is strong in the air and is good in the tackle. He is also good at passing the ball out from the back.
He is a versatile player who can play in several positions in the back line. He is a good tackler and is good at intercepting the ball. He is also good at passing the ball out from the back.
Onana is a versatile player who can play in several positions in the back line. He is a good tackler and is good at intercepting the ball. He is also good at
Gracie, 10, walks half a mile from her home to Freeport Braintree, Essex, every day from 09:00 until it closes.
Her owner Lee Johnston said he created a Facebook page after receiving several calls a day from worried shoppers.
"She's savvy with cars. This is what she's always done, and she's always come out unscathed," he said.
Mr Johnston said spreading the word about Gracie's shopping habit had been a "battle at the start", but the Facebook page seemed to have "sorted it out".
"Once I explain how she loves Freeport, people accept it. I have to convince them that's just what she does," he said.
Gracie, who was rescued from a centre in Witham, was originally from Wembley according to her microchip - and no-one is quite sure how she travelled the 60 miles in between.
"We think she likes people and shops because she was brought up in the city," Mr Johnston said.
"She likes to pop into a shop, have a look around, go in another, maybe have a sleep.
"She likes sitting in people's laps, a bit of company. She goes in changing rooms."
Mr Johnston said if shops did not appreciate her company they "kicked her out", but she had been made welcome in most stores.
Freeport's manager Josef O'Sullivan said Gracie had become a "very popular visitor" at the centre since moving to Braintree 10 months ago.
"Gracie has become a frequent visitor to Freeport Braintree and almost treats the centre as her second home," he said.
"[She] has become quite the 'celebrity' amongst our retailers and visitors. If only cats could spend money..." 
Summarize:  Gracie, a 10-year-old cat, walks from her home in Braintree, Essex, to Freeport Braintree every day, where she spends the day shopping.
She is a regular visitor to the shopping centre, where she has become a "very popular visitor".
Her owner, Lee Johnston, said he created a Facebook page after receiving several calls a day from worried shoppers.
"She's savvy with cars. This is what she's always done, and she's always come out unscathed," he said.
Mr Johnston said spreading the word about Gracie's shopping habit had been a "battle
The one-vehicle accident happened on the Woggle Road between Westhill and Blackburn at about 15:35.
The road was closed as a result, with diversions in place via the B979.
The man was taken to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary by ambulance. 
Summarize: 
The road was closed for several hours, but reopened at about 21:00.
The road was closed again at about 23:00, but reopened at about 01:30.
The road was closed again at about 01:30, but reopened at about 04:00.
The road was closed again at about 04:00, but reopened at about 05:00.
The road was closed again at about 05:00, but reopened at about 06:00.
The road was closed again at about 06:00, but reopened at about 07:00.
The road was
Mohanad Shareef Hammadi, 25, received his sentence hours after Waad Ramadan Alwan was given a lesser sentence.
Co-defendant Alwan, 30, also an Iraqi, received a 40-year sentence after he agreed to co-operate with prosecutors.
The two men were arrested in May 2011 and pleaded guilty last year to conspiring to help al-Qaeda in Iraq.
They admitted using improvised explosive devices against US soldiers in Iraq were also accused of plotting to send weapons and money to the organisation.
Hammadi, who testified during the trial, said he had been raised in poverty and that life was forever changed after the US invasion of Iraq in 2003.
But prosecutors accused him of changing his account in order to secure a shorter sentence.
Alwan could have received a sentence of up to life in prison. 
Summarize:  The two men were arrested in May 2011 and pleaded guilty last year to conspiring to help al-Qaeda in Iraq.
They admitted using improvised explosive devices against US soldiers in Iraq were also accused of plotting to send weapons and money to the organisation.
Hammadi, who testified during the trial, said he had been raised in poverty and that life was forever changed after the US invasion of Iraq in 2003.
But prosecutors accused him of changing his account in order to secure a shorter sentence.
Alwan could have received a sentence of up to life in prison.
The two men were arrested in May 2011 and pleaded guilty last
The man's body was found in Lurgan Park in Lurgan on Friday morning. Police say they are treating his death as suspicious.
The man has not yet been identified. Police are investigating the circumstances of his death.
Lurgan Park has been closed while investigations take place. 
Summarize:  The man's body was found in Lurgan Park in Lurgan on Friday morning. Police say they are treating his death as suspicious.
The man has not yet been identified. Police are investigating the circumstances of his death.
Lurgan Park has been closed while investigations take place.
On Friday, April 1, 2018, at approximately 7:00am a man was found dead in Lurgan Park. The man's body was found in Lurgan Park in Lurgan on Friday morning. Police say they are treating his death as suspicious.
The man has not yet been identified. Police are investigating the circumstances of his death
He had been in a coma since Sunday after being admitted to the cardiac surgery unit of a hospital in Rome, according to the reports.
His 1974 work A Special Day, which he wrote and directed, received Best Foreign Film and Best Actor nominations for star Marcello Mastroianni.
Italian Prime Minister Matteo Renzi said Scola was a screen "master".
His death left a "huge void in Italian culture", Mr Renzi tweeted (in Italian).
Scola directed 41 films and wrote the screenplay for almost 90, according to the Internet Movie Database.
He performed both roles in A Special Day, which saw Mastroianni and Sophia Loren develop a relationship against the backdrop of fascist 1930s Italy.
Other works include We All Loved Each Other So Much, The Family and Ugly, Dirty and Bad - for which he won best director at the Cannes film festival in 1976. 
Summarize: 
Born in Rome, Scola was the son of a lawyer.
He studied law at the University of Rome before turning to cinema in the early 1960s.
He began his career as a screenwriter, writing the screenplay for the 1966 film The Family.
Scola's first directorial work was the 1969 film Ugly, Dirty and Bad, which was based on a novel by the Italian writer Luigi Barzini.
The film was a critical and commercial success, and won Scola the best director award at the Cannes Film Festival.
The film also starred Mastroianni and was based on the life
A White House official said the infrastructure panel, which was still being formed, would not go ahead.
The decision comes after two other White House business councils were dissolved on Wednesday amid an exodus of chief executives.
Business leaders quit over Mr Trump's handling of violent clashes in Virginia involving white supremacists.
Bloomberg, CNBC and political newspaper The Hill reported that the president's planned Advisory Council on Infrastructure "would not move forward".
Mr Trump's reaction to last weekend's clashes at a far-right rally - which left one woman dead and nearly 20 people wounded - has sparked outrage and generated global headlines.
On Monday, Mr Trump belatedly condemned the white supremacist and neo-Nazi groups that rallied in a small Virginia town on Sunday.
But in a rancorous news conference on Tuesday he backtracked and again blamed left-wing counter-protesters for the violence too.
That prompted business leaders to quit his manufacturing and policy councils, and drew criticism from the bosses of other large US firms including Apple and JP Morgan.
Mr Trump signed an executive order last month establishing the Advisory Council on Infrastructure.
At the start of the year he said he was planning the council and named two well known New York property developers to lead the group.
Representatives for Steve Roth of Vornado Realty Trust and Richard LeFrak of LeFrak, whom Mr Trump named last winter, could not be reached immediately. 
Summarize: 
The president's infrastructure advisory council is not going to happen.
The president's infrastructure advisory council is not going to happen.
The president's infrastructure advisory council is not going to happen.
The president's infrastructure advisory council is not going to happen.
The president's infrastructure advisory council is not going to happen.
The president's infrastructure advisory council is not going to happen.
The president's infrastructure advisory council is not going to happen.
The president's infrastructure advisory council is not going to happen.
The president's infrastructure advisory council is not going to happen.
The president's infrastructure advisory council is not going
The 18-year-old man was assaulted at the town's railway station on Arduthie Road just before midnight on Saturday.
Officers want to trace a man and woman in connection with the incident.
PC Graham Crawford said: "This appears to have been a completely unprovoked attack which has resulted in a young man being seriously injured. Violent behaviour will not be tolerated."
The woman was described as being in her late teens to early 20s, tall, of a slim build, with long brown hair.
She was wearing a beige coloured jacket and beige knee high boots.
The man was described as being in his early 20s, of a medium build, with short dark hair.
He was wearing a dark blue puffy jacket, blue jeans and grey and black trainers. 
Summarize: 
I have been told that the police have been searching for a woman and a man in connection with this attack.
I have also been told that the police have been searching for a woman and a man in connection with this attack.
I have also been told that the police have been searching for a woman and a man in connection with this attack.
I have also been told that the police have been searching for a woman and a man in connection with this attack.
I have also been told that the police have been searching for a woman and a man in connection with this attack.
I have
Ore Oduba and partner Joanne jived their way to the top on Saturday night with a glittering display which wowed the judges.
It was only Craig Revel Horwood who could find the tiniest fault, leaving the dance duo 1-point short of a maximum score!
Danny Mac came in second spot while Ed Balls came rock-bottom with his paso doble.
This week Ore sent us an exclusive look behind the scenes on rehearsal day, showing us there's more than dancing he has to do on a daily basis.
But it's so far so good for the sports presenter who's got everyone guessing what he'll bring to the dance floor next... 
Summarize: 
"The first dance of the series, and the first dance of the series that's been danced by the two couples. It's a very tender, very romantic dance, and it's a very good one. It's a lovely dance, it's a very nice dance, and I think it's a very good start to the series.
"I think it's a very good start to the series, I think it's a very good start to the series. I think it's a very good start to the series. I think it's a very good start to the series. I think it's a very good start
The uncapped 26-year-old reported the injury after Saturday's 3-2 Premier League defeat by Leicester City.
Antonio was able to complete the 90 minutes at London Stadium, but West Ham manager Slaven Bilic indicated afterwards that he was a doubt.
England face Germany in a friendly on Wednesday before hosting Lithuania in a World Cup qualifier on Sunday.
Antonio's absence further weakens the attacking options of England boss Gareth Southgate.
Forwards Harry Kane, Daniel Sturridge, Danny Welbeck and Wayne Rooney are all out through injury, while Theo Walcott was left out of the squad.
In addition to Antonio, West Ham lost centre-back Winston Reid to a leg injury, while midfielder Pedro Obiang was taken off on a stretcher after rolling his ankle.
On the injuries to Antonio and Reid, Bilic said: "Hopefully, they will be fit after the international break." 
Summarize: 
"The following players have been called up to the England squad for the matches against Germany and Lithuania.
"Goalkeepers: Jack Butland, Jordan Pickford, Nick Pope
"Defenders: Trent Alexander-Arnold, Gary Cahill, Phil Jones, John Stones, Kieran Trippier, Kyle Walker, Danny Rose, Ben Chilwell, Harry Maguire
"Midfielders: Dele Alli, Eric Dier, Fabian Delph, Jordan Henderson, Jesse Lingard, Ruben Loftus-Cheek, Raheem Sterling, Harry Winks, Ashley Young
3 June 2016 Last updated at 08:54 BST
Staff at the Pairi Daiza wildlife park called it a "true miracle" because pandas struggle to reproduce in captivity.
There are fewer than 2,000 pandas alive in the wild, but numbers have increased in the last 10 years.
Hao Hao, whose name means "kindly", scooped up her baby and held it in her jaws to protect and clean it.
The cub was described as "a little pink sausage" and let out a cute squeal immediately after birth.
The little panda weighs just 171g (6oz) and has yet to be given a name. 
Summarize:  The panda cub was born at the Pairi Daiza wildlife park in Gifu, Japan. The cub was born to a pair of giant pandas, Hao Hao and Hua Mei. The panda cub was born at the Pairi Daiza wildlife park in Gifu, Japan. The cub was born to a pair of giant pandas, Hao Hao and Hua Mei. The panda cub was born at the Pairi Daiza wildlife park in Gifu, Japan. The cub was born to a pair of giant pandas, Hao Hao and Hua Mei. The panda cub was
Helder Costa (ankle) has missed Wolves' past two games but may feature.
Long-term absentees Connor Goldson and Shane Duffy are the only Brighton players unavailable for the Seagulls' trip to Molineux.
Full-backs Gaetan Bong and Liam Rosenior will hope to feature after being rested for the win at QPR. 
Summarize: 
Brighton are looking to bounce back from a defeat at QPR and a draw at Stoke City.
Wolves are looking to continue their unbeaten start to the season and have won their last two games.
Brighton's last five games have produced four wins and a draw.
Wolves' last five games have produced three wins and two draws.
Brighton have won their last three games at Molineux.
Wolves have won their last two games at Molineux.
Brighton have won their last three games at Molineux.
Wolves have won their last three games at
Swiss Abdi, 29, spent four seasons with the Hornets, scoring 25 goals in 115 league appearances.
Pudil of the Czech Republic was on loan with the Owls last season and played 35 times in the Championship.
"Thanks to everyone I'm really happy" the 30-year-old said on social media. "Thanks to Watford FC for nice three years. Good luck."
Find all the latest football transfers on our dedicated page. 
Summarize: 
The Hornets have announced they have signed the following players:
The following players have been released:
The following players have been loaned out:
The following players have been sold:
The following players have been loaned out:
The following players have been sold:
The following players have been loaned out:
The following players have been sold:
The following players have been loaned out:
The following players have been sold:
The following players have been loaned out:
The following players have been sold:
The following players have
After 20 hours of debate, a majority of 165 to 86 lawmakers voted in favour of repealing two bills which stood in the way of the agreement with creditors.
It is a victory for President Mauricio Macri who struck the deal after his election win in November.
It will now go to the Senate, where it will likely face stiffer opposition.
The debate in the Senate, where opposition parties have a majority, is scheduled to start later on Wednesday.
Time is of the essence: under the terms of the deal struck by President Macri with US creditors in New York, Argentina only has until 14 April to pay the holdouts.
These are the creditors who refused to agree to a restructuring of Argentina's debt after it defaulted on nearly $100bn (Â£71bn) in 2001.
At the heart of President Macri's deal is a cash payment of $4.7bn, about 75% of what Argentina owes, to the funds which sued the South American country in a US court over non-payment.
The previous government of President Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner refused to negotiate with the holdouts, whom it called "vulture funds".
The long-standing dispute has restricted Argentina's access to international credit markets.
While its Latin American neighbours can borrow with interest rates of about 5%, Argentina has been forced to pay at least double, leaving the country without much-needed financial help.
President Macri had warned lawmakers that a "no" vote would condemn Argentina to continue being a "financial pariah" shunned by global credit markets. 
Summarize:  Argentina's Congress voted to approve a deal with creditors, paving the way for the country to pay its debts.
The vote was a victory for President Mauricio Macri, who had struck the deal after his election win in November.
It will now go to the Senate, where it will likely face stiffer opposition.
The debate in the Senate, where opposition parties have a majority, is scheduled to start later on Wednesday.
Time is of the essence: under the terms of the deal struck by President Macri with US creditors in New York, Argentina only has until 14 April to pay the holdouts.
These are the
But they insisted that the water being supplied to urban areas across the country was still safe.
The figures come amid rising concerns for the environment affecting water and air quality, with the government seeking to cut down on pollution.
Much of that focus is targeted on the industrial north, which is one of the country's most heavily polluted areas.
The water ministry last week released a report (in Chinese) showing most of the samples drawn from over 2,000 shallow underground wells in the north and east in 2015 were of poor quality:
The report, covered widely by local media, drew concern about drinking water in general.
The ministry on Monday clarified in a statement (in Chinese) that the result only pertained to shallow wells serving those in the rural north-east.
It said it had focused on testing that region as it was known to have "comparatively acute water problems".
The ministry said drinking water for urban areas across the country came from deep underground aquifers which had water of "overall good quality", with 85% meeting national water quality standards.
However, the BBC's East Asia Editor Celia Hatton says this has done little to satisfy some environmentalists who note that China will have to dig deeper and deeper to find water that is clean enough for farms, and to support millions still living in the countryside.
China has pledged to improve environmental standards and cut down on industrial pollution, even as it grapples with a slowing economy that still relies significantly on heavy industry.
Part of its recently unveiled five-year plan for the economy focuses on improving water and soil quality. 
Summarize: 
China is the world's largest producer of coal, and the world's largest producer of steel.
China has a long history of pollution, and has been criticized for its pollution problems.
In the past, China has been criticized for its pollution problems.
China's pollution problems have been getting worse.
China's pollution problems are getting worse.
China's pollution problems are getting worse.
China's pollution problems are getting worse.
China's pollution problems are getting worse.
China's pollution problems are getting worse.
China's pollution problems are getting worse.
China's pollution problems are getting worse.
China's
The Queen's granddaughter and Toytown won individual European eventing gold in 2005 and the world title in 2006.
Toytown was retired from equestrian competition in 2011.
"I'm heartbroken that I had to say goodbye to my greatest friend and horse of a lifetime, Toytown. He was the most incredible athlete with the biggest heart," a statement from Tindall said.
"He made my career and I couldn't be more grateful to him for the amazing times we had together. I will miss you forever."
Find out how to get into equestrian with our special guide.
She bought Toytown as a seven-year-old in 1999, but injuries to the horse prevented them competing at the 2004 and 2008 Olympic Games.
However, they won both European individual and team gold in 2005, followed by world individual gold and team silver the following year, and a European team gold in Italy in 2007.
Tindall's husband, and former England, Bath and Gloucester rugby player Mike, said on Twitter: "Sad to say goodbye to the big man today, been a massive part of our lives giving us so many highs!"
BBC Radio Gloucestershire's Paul Furley:
At the peak of their partnership in 2005 and 2006, they were unbeatable.
There should have been Olympic appearances, but twice injury was to deny Toytown a place on sport's grandest stage.
Toytown was retired on home turf at Gatcombe in 2011, but got his moment in the Olympic spotlight at Cheltenham Racecourse a year later during the Olympic Torch relay.
Ironically just a few weeks later, Zara Tindall competed at the London Olympics on High Kingdom, winning team silver, but it's Toytown who'll always be the horse associated with her. 
Summarize: 
The Queen's granddaughter and Toytown won individual European eventing gold in 2005 and the world title in 2006.
Toytown was retired from equestrian competition in 2011.
"I'm heartbroken that I had to say goodbye to my greatest friend and horse of a lifetime, Toytown. He was the most incredible athlete with the biggest heart," a statement from Tindall said.
"He made my career and I couldn't be more grateful to him for the amazing times we had together. I will miss you forever."
Find out how to get into equestrian with our special guide.
She bought Toy
Eric Aniva, a sex worker known in Malawi as a "hyena", was the subject of a BBC feature last week.
He told the BBC that he did not mention his HIV status to those who hire him.
President Peter Mutharika said the police should investigate and charge him over the cases of defilement he had seemingly confessed to.
The BBC's Ed Butler, who covered the story about Malawi's sexual "cleansing practices", says in some remote southern regions of the country it is traditional for girls to be made to have sex with a man after their first menstruation.
Some of the girls are as young as 12 years old, he reported.
What is known as a "hyena" in Malawi culture is usually a man who has sex with widows or married women who cannot fall pregnant.
"While we must promote positive cultural values and positive socialisation of our children, the president says harmful cultural and traditional practices cannot be accepted in this country," presidential spokesman Mgeme Kalilani said in a statement
Mr Aniva would "further be investigated for exposing the young girls to contracting HIV and further be charged accordingly", he said.
The president had also ordered all men and parents involved to be investigated, Mr Kalilani said.
"All people involved in this malpractice should be held accountable for subjecting their children and women to this despicable evil," the statement said.
"These horrific practices although done by a few also tarnish the image of the whole nation of Malawi internationally and bring shame to us all."
Last year Malawi banned child marriage, raising the legal age of marriage from 15 to 18 - something activists hoped would put an end to early sexual initiations.
Mr Aniva told the BBC that he planned to stop taking part in sexual cleansing practices. 
Summarize: 
A sex worker in Malawi has confessed to having sex with young girls.
He said he did not tell the girls he had HIV.
President Peter Mutharika said the police should investigate and charge him over the cases of defilement he had seemingly confessed to.
The BBC's Ed Butler, who covered the story about Malawi's sexual "cleansing practices", says in some remote southern regions of the country it is traditional for girls to be made to have sex with a man after their first menstruation.
Some of the girls are as young as 12 years old, he reported.
What is known
They said the increase of about 1,000 would help to generate up to Â£3m for the local economy.
More than 300 acts have been lined up to appear over the four-day programme on the Raehills Estate near Beattock from 8 to 11 June.
The list of headliners includes Gogol Bordello, Boney M., Cat Power, So Solid Crew, 2ManyDJs and Admiral Fallow.
Founder Adam Curtis said that although attendances were increasing he did not anticipate the event getting  much bigger.
"We have got record numbers expected down in the field so it has crept from 8,000 to 9,000," he said.
"We are hoping for next year, for the 10-year anniversary, we should be at 10,000 people.
"The total number we are pushing to with the festival will probably stay under 15,000 so we are most of the way there."
The Eden Festival's value to the area's economy and visitor sector has been recognised by Dumfries and Galloway Council which this year provided the organisers with an Â£18,000 grant as part of its major events strategy.
Council events champion Adam Wilson said that was "pumping millions" into the region.
"For Moffat and Lockerbie and Dumfries, tourism is really important and there are a lot of people feel that actually the council isn't doing enough for the tourism industry," he said.
"I think it is a very significant strategy that we have - it is very important and it is working." 
Summarize: 
The Eden Festival is an annual music festival held in the Scottish Borders, near the village of Moffat.
The festival was established in 2003 by Adam Curtis and has since grown to become one of the largest and most successful festivals in the UK.
The Eden Festival is a four-day music festival held on the Raehills Estate near Beattock, Scotland. The festival is a non-profit making organisation and receives no public funding.
The Eden Festival is organised by a non-profit making organisation, The Eden Festival Ltd, and is run by a volunteer committee. The festival is run by a volunteer
The Met Office said wintery showers on Friday night could lead to ice forming as temperatures fall.
Up to 3cm (1.1in) of snow may fall on high ground and travel conditions could be "tricky", it added.
The warning is in place until 10:00 GMT on Saturday.
It covers Conwy, Denbighshire, Flintshire, Gwynedd, Powys, Wrexham, Ceredigion, Carmarthenshire, Merthyr Tydfil, Rhondda Cynon Taff, Neath Port Talbot, Blaenau Gwent, Caerphilly and Swansea. 
Summarize: 
The Met Office said a band of rain will move across Wales on Friday night, with some snow showers on higher ground.
The rain will turn to snow on higher ground, with up to 3cm (1.2in) of snow possible.
The snow will turn to rain on Saturday, with a risk of ice forming on untreated surfaces.
The warning is in place until 10:00 GMT on Saturday.
It covers Conwy, Denbighshire, Flintshire, Gwynedd, Powys, Wrexham, Ceredigion, Carmarthenshire, Merthyr Tydfil, Rh
The ape, called John Daniel, was adopted by Alyce Cunningham, from Uley, Gloucestershire, in 1918 after her brother bought it for Â£300 in London.
Village archivist Margaret Groom has published a collection of pictures of John Daniel in a book about Uley.
The animal was sold to an American when it became too big for Ms Cunningham to look after. It died in 1922.
Mrs Groom found the collection of photos in the village archives and said it was "quite unique to have a gorilla grow up here".
She said: "People still talk about it and a lot of people don't believe it. They say 'oh no that can't be possible'."
John Daniel was captured as a baby in Gabon and brought to the UK, where Ms Cunnigham's brother Rupert Penny saw it for sale in a department store.
She adopted the ape and nicknamed him Sultan.
Mrs Groom said John Daniel was raised like a normal child, had its own bedroom and could use the light switch and toilet.
She said the villagers were very fond of the ape, which would play with children, eat roses from garden and drink cups of tea.
Once it grew to adult size Ms Cunningham could no longer look after it so, in 1921, she sold it to an American for one thousand guineas.
She thought it would be sent to a home in Florida, but instead the ape ended up in Barnum and Baileys Circus.
There its health deteriorated, with reports reaching Ms Cunningham that the animal was pining for her.
She set sail for New York but the gorilla, by now aged four-and-a-half, died from pneumonia before she arrived.
The story of John Daniel is also set to be part of an exhibition later this year in Uley. 
Summarize:  John Daniel was a gorilla that was raised in the UK by a woman named Alyce Cunningham. He was bought by her brother for Â£300 in London, and then was sold to an American for one thousand guineas. He was then sent to a circus, where he died from pneumonia. The story of John Daniel is also set to be part of an exhibition later this year in Uley.
Media playback is not supported on this device
The 29-year-old will then return to the Brumbies for the start of the Super Rugby season.
Lealiifano has won 19 caps for the Wallabies and recently returned to action after recovering from leukaemia.
He will fill the gap left by Paddy Jackson, who has stepped aside from playing pending legal proceedings.
New Zealand-born Lealiifano made his debut for the Canberra-based franchise back in 2008 and earned his first international cap in the 2013 Test series against the British and Irish Lions.
He won his 19th international cap against England in June of last year.
Two months later, Lealiifano was diagnosed with leukaemia but he returned to action for the Brumbies in June.
Lealiifano was born in Auckland before moving to Australia at the age of seven.
The Australian international fly-half expressed thanks to the Brumbies for allowing his short-term move to the Irish province.
"I'm really excited to be joining up with Ulster Rugby and I'm looking forward to getting out there in front of the supporters at Kingspan Stadium," said Lealiifano.
Ulster's director of rugby Les Kiss said Lealiifano's arrival will be a "massive boost" for his side.
"It was paramount that we signed an experienced player to give us another option at fly-half and this is a fantastic solution for us," said Kiss.
"He has overcome significant challenges in his career and that is testament to his bravery and strong character.
"He's a proven leader and we're excited by the influence that he'll have on our young fly-halves Peter Nelson, Brett Herron, Johnny McPhillips and Callum Smith.
"We also have two exciting players in our Academy, Michael Lowry and Angus Curtis, who will also have a fantastic opportunity to learn from Christian."
Ulster start their Pro14 campaign against South African newcomers Cheetahs at Kingspan Stadium on Friday, 1 September. 
Summarize: 
The Ulster Rugby Academy is a rugby union academy based in Belfast, Northern Ireland. The academy is the second oldest in the country, behind the Leinster Rugby Academy in Dublin. The academy was founded in 1996 by the then Ulster Rugby chairman, Sir Basil McCrea, and was initially based at the University of Ulster's Jordanstown campus.
The Ulster Rugby Academy is the second oldest in the country, behind the Leinster Rugby Academy in Dublin. The academy was founded in 1996 by the then Ulster Rugby chairman, Sir Basil McCrea, and was initially based at the University of Ulster's Jordanstown campus.
The American, seeking to equal Steffi Graf's Open-era record of 22 Grand Slam titles, has also been struggling with a knee injury in the build-up.
But the 33-year-old world number one came through a testing match unscathed.
Sixth seed Petra Kvitova beat Luksika Kumkhum 6-3 6-1 on a scorching day.
The two-time Wimbledon champion has also had problems, with a stomach virus forcing her out of two warm-up events.
"I'm very pleased how I played and how I handled the nerves and everything else," said the Czech. "I had an interrupted lead-up and lost some weight but I'm feeling much better now."
Italy's Sara Errani, the 17th seed, had injury problems during her match and became the first women's seed knocked out, losing 1-6 7-5 6-1 to 21-year-old Russian Margarita Gasparyan. 
Summarize: 
The men's singles matches were:
The women's singles matches were:
The men's doubles matches were:
The women's doubles matches were:
The mixed doubles matches were:
The men's singles matches were:
The women's singles matches were:
The men's doubles matches were:
The women's doubles matches were:
The mixed doubles matches were:
The men's singles matches were:
The women's singles matches were:
The men's doubles matches were:
The women's doubles matches were:
The mixed
15 February 2017 Last updated at 18:25 GMT 
Summarize: 
The US President Donald Trump has signed an executive order that will suspend immigration from seven Muslim-majority countries for at least 90 days.
The order also suspends the US refugee program for 120 days and indefinitely bans Syrian refugees.
The order also suspends all refugee admissions for 120 days and indefinitely bans Syrian refugees.
The order also suspends all refugee admissions for 120 days and indefinitely bans Syrian refugees.
The order will also suspend all refugee admissions for 120 days and indefinitely ban Syrian refugees.
The order will also suspend all refugee admissions for 120 days and indefinitely ban Syrian refugees.
The order
Simon Hamilton made the announcement due to what he said was a rising demand for nurses across the health system.
The move will take the Department of Health's commission of annual student nursing places to 745.
The Royal College of Nursing in Northern Ireland said it was "very good news".
"I'm delighted that the minister has given it a priority in a financially constrained system but it's certainly a very positive step in the right direction," said Janice Smyth, a director of the college.
She added that another 1,500 nurses are still needed to plug "gaps" in Northern Ireland's nursing service.
The confirmation of additional nursing places is one of a number of new funding announcements made by Mr Hamilton in the final weeks of the Northern Ireland Assembly term before May's election.
The training places will be made available from the autumn.
Mr Hamilton said nurses are "central to the delivery of safe, effective and compassionate care".
"Even though we have increased the number of front-line nurses and midwives by 1,200 over the past four-and-a-half years, I recognise that the demand for nurses continues to rise," he said.
"I am deeply impressed by the quality of care provided by our nurses, and of the pre-registration training provided by our partner universities."
He added that nurses trained in Northern Ireland "are among the best in the world".
Mr Hamilton has also announced the set-up of a new task group to make recommendations on the future of nursing and midwifery in Northern Ireland. 
Summarize: 
The Minister of Health, Mr Hamilton, has announced that the Department of Health will increase the number of student nurses by 1,000 over the next three years.
The announcement was made due to what the Minister said was a rising demand for nurses across the health system.
The move will take the Department of Health's commission of annual student nursing places to 745.
The Royal College of Nursing in Northern Ireland said it was "very good news".
"I'm delighted that the minister has given it a priority in a financially constrained system but it's certainly a very positive step in the right direction," said Janice Smyth
They show the disease now kills about nine in every 100,000 women, compared with 11 in every 100,000 in 2001.
Faster diagnosis and better treatment mean women are now surviving with their cancer for longer - five-year survival has increased from 33% to 44% over that period.
But experts say more still needs to be done to tackle ovarian cancer.
About 7,000 women develop it each year, making it the fifth most common cancer in women in the UK.
And ovarian cancer remains difficult for doctors to diagnose, which means it is often not picked up until it is more advanced and harder to treat.
Hazel Nunn, head of evidence and health information at Cancer Research UK, said: "It's encouraging to see that the number of women dying from ovarian cancer is falling, especially as ovarian cancer can be difficult to diagnose and treat.
"It may be that use of the contraceptive pill, which has a protective effect, has helped to halt the rise in ovarian cancer rates.
"Still around 7,000 women develop the disease each year - so if you experience tummy pain, bloating or a sense of feeling full that won't go away, which happens on most days, then you should pop to your doctor.
"It's most likely to be something much less serious than ovarian cancer but it's still worth getting checked out."
Annwen Jones, of Target Ovarian Cancer, said despite improvements, the UK still lagged behind other European countries in terms of cancer survival and that the remaining high death rate among older women with the disease was of particular concern.
For women aged 15-39 diagnosed with ovarian cancer, 84% survived their disease for at least five years compared with 14% of those aged over 85 years at diagnosis, according to the National Cancer Intelligence Network report.
Ms Jones said: "If we only matched the European survival rates, 500 women's lives would be saved, every year." 
Summarize: 
Ovarian cancer is a disease in which abnormal cells in the ovaries start to grow and multiply.
The disease is most common in women over the age of 50, and is the fifth most common cancer in women in the UK.
Ovarian cancer is difficult to diagnose, and is often not picked up until it is more advanced and harder to treat.
The disease is most common in women over the age of 50, and is the fifth most common cancer in women in the UK.
Ovarian cancer is difficult to diagnose, and is often not picked up until it is more advanced and harder to treat.
The victim, in his 40s, was taken to hospital with life-threatening injuries following the stabbing at Plymouth station, but later died.
A 29-year-old man has been arrested on suspicion of murder and is in police custody.
British Transport Police said it was working to identify the man and inform his family and appealed for any witnesses to come forward.
More on the stabbing and other Devon and Cornwall news
Det Ch Insp Paul Langley said: "This was an attack on a man in broad daylight at a busy station in Devon.
"At this time, it is believed the two men knew each other and had an argument at the station, which resulted in one of the men assaulting the other.
"The victim was taken to hospital but he sadly died despite the best efforts of the medical teams."
A spokesman for South Western Ambulance Service said paramedics attended to two male casualties, one with minor injuries and another with head and shoulder injuries.
The ticket office of the station has been closed off due to the incident, leaving passengers unable to buy or collect reserved tickets.
A spokesman for Great Western Railway said: "Access to Plymouth station is restricted and the ticket office remains closed while police continue to investigate the incident this morning.
"The station remains open, with tickets available on platforms and on-board trains."
Network Rail said trains were "running as normal". 
Summarize:  A man was stabbed to death at Plymouth train station. The police are searching for the suspect.
The police are searching for the suspect.
The police are searching for the suspect.
The police are searching for the suspect.
The police are searching for the suspect.
The police are searching for the suspect.
The police are searching for the suspect.
The police are searching for the suspect.
The police are searching for the suspect.
The police are searching for the suspect.
The police are searching for the suspect.
The police are searching for the suspect.
The police are searching for the suspect.
The helicopter carrier Izumo is escorting a US supply vessel within Japanese waters.
The US ship is heading to refuel the naval fleet in the region, including the Carl Vinson aircraft carrier group.
North Korea has threatened to sink the Carl Vinson and a US submarine, amid rising tensions in the region.
It also carried out a failed missile test on Sunday, despite repeated warnings from the US and others to stop its nuclear and missile activity.
The BBC's Rupert Wingfield-Hayes in Tokyo says the Izumo is the pride of the Japanese navy, and is by far its biggest ship.
The 249m-long Izumo can carry up to nine helicopters, and resembles US amphibious assault carriers, reported The Japan Times.
Kyodo news agency said it was leaving its base in Yokosuka south of Tokyo to join the US supply ship, and accompany it to waters off Shikoku in western Japan.
Under Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, Japan is gradually pushing the limits of what its modern and powerful military is allowed to do, and with tensions high on the Korean peninsula, Mr Abe appears keen to try out the new laws for the first time, our correspondent says.
Japan's post-World War Two constitution bars its military from using force to resolve conflicts except in cases of self-defence.
The Izumo is the first warship deployed outside of military exercises under new laws passed in 2015 that allow Japan to come to the aid of an ally under attack known as "collective self-defence".
Mr Abe's government, which pushed for the change, faced criticism that the new laws could lead the country into unnecessary wars abroad - something Mr Abe has rejected.
The Izumo's deployment follows recent joint exercises conducted by Japan and the US, and other naval developments.
A French amphibious assault ship arrived in south-west Japan on Saturday for an exercise also involving Japanese, US and British naval forces.  South Korea has been conducting joint exercises with the US as well.
China last week also launched its second aircraft carrier. 
Summarize:  The US is sending a naval fleet to the Korean Peninsula. The US is sending a naval fleet to the Korean Peninsula. The US is sending a naval fleet to the Korean Peninsula. The US is sending a naval fleet to the Korean Peninsula. The US is sending a naval fleet to the Korean Peninsula. The US is sending a naval fleet to the Korean Peninsula. The US is sending a naval fleet to the Korean Peninsula. The US is sending a naval fleet to the Korean Peninsula. The US is sending a naval fleet to the Korean Peninsula. The US is sending a naval fleet to the Korean Peninsula. The US is sending a naval fleet to
Police Scotland said it was "keeping an open mind" as to whether the gun was linked to the crime groups involved in September's Gilmerton shootings.
The gun was found in Juniper Green on Monday.
Det Ch Insp Kenny Gray said: "The recovery of this handgun is a great result and demonstrates Police Scotland's commitment to tackling organised crime in the city."
He added: "Inquiries are ongoing to identify the owners of the handgun and the gun has examined for any forensic opportunities.
"The owning of illegal firearms will not be tolerated and we will act on every piece of information we receive in order to crack down on this illegal activity." 
Summarize: 
The gun was found in Juniper Green on Monday.
Police Scotland said it was "keeping an open mind" as to whether the gun was linked to the crime groups involved in September's Gilmerton shootings.
The gun was found in Juniper Green on Monday.
Det Ch Insp Kenny Gray said: "The recovery of this handgun is a great result and demonstrates Police Scotland's commitment to tackling organised crime in the city."
He added: "Inquiries are ongoing to identify the owners of the handgun and the gun has examined for any forensic opportunities.
"The owning of illegal firearms will not be tolerated and we
Qualcomm said the probe involved China's anti-monopoly law, but added that regulators told it the "substance of the investigation is confidential".
The firm said that it was "not aware or any charge" by the regulators that it had broken the law.
China has increased scrutiny of business practices that lead to higher prices for consumers.
In August, Chinese regulators levied a record fine of 670m yuan ($109m; Â£71m) on six foreign producers of baby milk formula for price-fixing.
China's National Development and Reform Commission, the body which is probing Qualcomm, also launched a pricing investigation into the pharmaceutical industry earlier this year.
The investigation against Qualcomm also comes at a time when China is gearing for the launch of 4G Long Term Evolution (LTE) Networks.
The country will start commercial 4G mobile communications services on 18 December.
China Mobile, the country's biggest mobile operator with over 700 million users, will be the first one to offer the services to its subscribers.
That will be followed by China Unicom and China Telecom, the country's other two major carriers.
The US firm is a key player in the area and some analysts suggested the probe against it may be an attempt to help domestic players in China.
"We suspect this investigation is related to the forthcoming launch of TD-LTE by China Mobile... and the negotiations on chip pricing and license pricing between Qualcomm and Chinese-based handset [manufacturers] that are likely occurring right now," said Travis McCourt an analyst with Raymond James & Associates.
Cody Acree, an analyst with Williams Financial, added: "You're getting ready to have this battle over 4G royalties and now you have this antitrust investigation".
"It may well be that this reform commission is beginning to throw up reasons and excuses for why China doesn't pay royalties on 4G." 
Summarize:  Qualcomm is being investigated by the Chinese government for price fixing.
The company has been accused of colluding with Chinese manufacturers to fix prices.
The company said it was "not aware or any charge" by the regulators that it had broken the law.
China has increased scrutiny of business practices that lead to higher prices for consumers.
In August, Chinese regulators levied a record fine of 670m yuan ($109m; Â£71m) on six foreign producers of baby milk formula for price-fixing.
China's National Development and Reform Commission, the body which is probing Qualcomm, also launched a pricing investigation into the
The Commission had applied more stringent restrictions to the march than in previous years.
The parade observed a single drumbeat passing by St Patrick's Catholic Church in Belfast on Friday evening.
Earlier, the Order lost a High Court bid to overturn restrictions on the parade along Clifton Street and Donegall Street.
The judge rejected claims that the Commission had not followed proper procedures in its Tour of the North determination.
Instead, he upheld the restrictions placed on the parade.
Afterwards, the Order said it was disappointed but would abide by the ruling.
Police said on Friday night that they were "encouraged by the manner in which all those present tonight conducted themselves and appreciate the efforts those involved went to in ensuring this was the case". 
Summarize: 
The parade was held on Saturday, August 12, 2013.
The parade was held on Saturday, August 19, 2013.
The parade was held on Saturday, August 26, 2013.
The parade was held on Saturday, September 2, 2013.
The parade was held on Saturday, September 9, 2013.
The parade was held on Saturday, September 16, 2013.
The parade was held on Saturday, September 23, 2013.
The parade was held on Saturday, September 30, 2013.
The parade was held on Saturday, October 7, 2013.
The parade was held on Saturday, October 14,
Hastings was due to play a full campaign for the Division Two side.
But the 31-year-old tore his patella tendon while playing for Australian side Victoria in the Sheffield Shield.
"Hopefully he will make an impact in the second half of the season should the operation go well," director of cricket Steve Rhodes said.
"We are seeking an alternative overseas bowler for the first half of the season, a quality replacement and the search is already on."
Pace bowler Hastings, who played for Durham in 2014 and 2015, has won 28 caps for Australia in one-day cricket and featured in nine Twenty20 internationals.
He made his only Test match appearance against South Africa in 2012.
Worcestershire also dealt with injury problems to their overseas players last season, with New Zealand all-rounder Mitchell Santner able to play just two games for the county because of a broken finger. 
Summarize: 
The Worcestershire squad for the 2016 County Championship season is:
The Worcestershire squad for the 2016 Royal London One-Day Cup is:
The Worcestershire squad for the 2016 Royal London T20 Cup is:
The Worcestershire squad for the 2016 NatWest T20 Blast is:
The Worcestershire squad for the 2016 Royal London One-Day Cup is:
The Worcestershire squad for the 2016 NatWest T20 Blast is:
The Worcestershire squad for the 2016 Royal London One-Day Cup is:
The 23-year-old, who was said to be a target for Arsenal, has agreed a four-year deal with the French champions.
Wolfsburg said both clubs had agreed to keep the financial details of the deal confidential.
"He's an outstanding footballer," said Wolfsburg boss Valerien Ismael. "I hope his move to France provides him with a fresh challenge." 
Summarize: 
In the summer of 2011, the French club released a statement saying that the player had signed a four-year contract with the club, but the player himself has not confirmed this.
In the summer of 2012, the player has signed a new contract with the French club.
In the summer of 2013, the player has signed a new contract with the French club.
In the summer of 2014, the player has signed a new contract with the French club.
In the summer of 2015, the player has signed a new contract with the French club.
In the summer of 2016, the player
Torrential downpours affected properties in Blackpool, Lancaster and Carnforth on Wednesday night, leaving some homes swamped in up to six inches of water.
Firefighters attended nine properties to pump out water or isolate electrics. There were no reports of any injuries.
Among those affected were some businesses in Lancaster that were hit by Storm Desmond in 2015.
Susan Grimes, who runs a hair salon which only re-opened last October, said she was "lost for words".
"There's no point being angry. You just carry on, keep going."
The flooding led to some temporary road closures around the county, but traffic had returned to normal by Thursday morning. 
Summarize: 
A woman has been charged with causing death by dangerous driving after a man was killed in a crash in Lancashire.
The crash happened on the A6 at the junction with the A683 in Carnforth, near Lancaster, at about 3.30am on Wednesday.
The woman, who was driving a Vauxhall Corsa, was arrested at the scene.
The man, who was in the car with his girlfriend, was taken to Lancaster Royal Infirmary, where he died.
The road was closed for several hours while the crash was investigated.
The woman, who was from the Lancaster area, was
Karen Whitmore claims she was "bullied and threatened" because she refused to turn a blind eye to the flawed way some of its buildings were sold off.
But, former chief executive Mike Robinson told the hearing Ms Whitmore was never asked to hide any facts.
Ms Whitmore, 49, was made redundant from her post as assistant director of organisation and governance in June.
Mr Robinson, who was chief executive between 2014 and 2016, said he had asked her to investigate the sale of council-owned Acklam Hall because there were accusations being made on social media and in the press.
A few weeks later she came back to him to say there had been no illegal action or corruption, he said.
The hearing had earlier been told about claims of a "laddish culture" at the council, with senior managers referring to women as "posh birds" and "fatties", but Mr Robinson said he did not recognise that language or behaviour.
He described the council as a "good place to work", and was unaware of any bullying that took place at the council during his time as chief executive.
The hearing, at Teesside Magistrates' Court, continues. 
Summarize: 
The council employees were told to "keep their mouths shut" about the sale of the council-owned Acklam Hall.
The council employees were told to "keep their mouths shut" about the sale of the council-owned Acklam Hall.
The council employees were told to "keep their mouths shut" about the sale of the council-owned Acklam Hall.
The council employees were told to "keep their mouths shut" about the sale of the council-owned Acklam Hall.
The council employees were told to "keep their mouths shut" about the sale of the council-owned Acklam Hall.
The
Commercial scallop fishing came to an end in the bay five years ago when it became a special area of conservation.
Whale and Dolphin Conservation (WDC), which launched the petition, described scallop dredging as "a highly destructive fishing method".
The Welsh government said a public consultation was being carried out.
Mick Green, of WDC, said: "We are delighted so many people support our view that the current proposal to open up protected areas to scallop dredging is wrong.
"We hope that the Welsh government will take notice of the high level of opposition to these proposals and withdraw them."
A Welsh government spokesman said it was "currently considering the establishment of a viable and sustainable scallop fishery", which was "in line with the evidence provided by the Bangor University study".
The public consultation ends on 17 February. 
Summarize:  
"The Welsh government is considering the establishment of a viable and sustainable scallop fishery in the Bangor Bay Special Area of Conservation (SAC). The Bangor University study concluded that the current scallop fishery is unsustainable and that the bay is not suitable for scallop dredging.
The Welsh government is consulting on the establishment of a scallop fishery in the Bangor Bay SAC. The consultation closes on 17 February.
The Bangor University study concluded that the current scallop fishery in Bangor Bay is unsustainable and that the bay is not suitable for scall
The world's longest ocean race - at 40,000 nautical miles - features 700 participants over its eight stages.
The first leg, which launched at St Katharine Docks, will see teams travel 6,000 miles to Brazil's Rio De Janeiro.
On each of the 70ft yachts, only the skipper is professional. The other crew members are all amateurs.
Around 40% of participants had never sailed when they signed up, organisers say.
Boats set off at 14:15 BST from St Katharine Docks and passed under Tower Bridge at 15:30 to the upper pool before beginning the parade along the Thames.
Racing will start off Southend at 12:30 BST on Monday.
Teachers, doctors, IT workers, students and an Ultimate Fighting Championship fighter are all among those taking part.
The youngest participant is 18 and the oldest is 74.
More than half of those taking part - 441 people - are from Britain.
Some crew members will be on board the yachts for the whole course of the journey, while others will compete only in certain stages.
After travelling to Brazil, the yachts will go on to South Africa, then to Albany in Western Australia.
From there, participants will sail to Queensland, and on to Vietnam and China.
They will continue to Seattle and from there to New York via Panama.
The final leg will see the yachts travel from New York back to London, where they are due at the end of July next year. 
Summarize: 
The race is the longest in the world, and the first leg of the race will be from London to Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. The race will start at 14:15 BST on Monday, June 2, from St Katharine Docks, London.
The race will then continue to South Africa, Albany, Western Australia, Vietnam, China, Seattle, New York, Panama, New York, and back to London.
The race will finish on July 31, 2012.
The race is the longest in the world, and the first leg of the race will be from London to Rio de Janeiro, Brazil
The European Ryder Cup captain from Dungannon also had a a bogey and four birdies as he finished with a three-over-par 75 in the Asian Tour event.
Clarke was joint 30th on four under and 17 shots behind winner Jamie Donaldson.
The Welshman, who started the day two shots behind overnight leader Clement Sordet, shot a 65 to win by three strokes from Lee Westwood.
. 
Summarize: 
"Thursday, 10 September 2013"
"Friday, 11 September 2013"
"Saturday, 12 September 2013"
"Sunday, 13 September 2013"
"Final round"
"Cumulative tournament scores, relative to par"
The substitute's glancing header came after Kirsty Hanson slotted in the opener early in the second half.
It leaves both sides with one point - and both need to win their final Group A games on Monday to have any chance of making the semi-finals.
Germany beat Spain 2-0 while England lost out 2-0 to the Netherlands.
It leaves England with one win from two Group B matches going into Monday's encounter against France, who hammered Italy 6-1.
It was an entertaining match at a sunny Mourneview Park with the Scots carving out the best chances in the first half.
Hanson beat two defenders before blazing just over before NI keeper Lauren Perry superbly tipped a powerful shot from Claire Adams onto the bar.
Amy Gallacher screwed her shot wide of the NI goal while at the other end Brenna McPartlan fired straight at keeper Rebecca Flaherty.
Scotland took the lead seconds after the restart with Hanson latching on to Gallacher's through ball before sliding it past the advancing Perry.
Northern Ireland wasted a good chance to equalise when Leyla McFarland was clear eight yards out only to scoop her shot straight at Flaherty.
McDaniel made no mistake with her late leveller, meeting Megan Reilly's corner at the near-post and directing the ball past Flaherty.
It meant a deserved first point of the competition for the teams but they face a tough task to progress to the semi-finals with Germany on six points and Spain three.
Northern Ireland take on the Germans, who have already qualified for the semis, in Ballymena on Monday evening while the Scots face Spain in Lurgan. 
Summarize: 
Scotland:
Northern Ireland:
Germany:
Spain:
Northern Ireland:
Scotland:
Northern Ireland:
Germany:
Northern Ireland:
Scotland:
Northern Ireland:
Scotland:
Northern Ireland:
Germany:
Northern Ireland:
Scotland:
Northern Ireland:
Scotland:
Northern Ireland:
Germany:
Northern Ireland:
Scotland:
Northern Ireland:
Germany:
Northern Ireland:
Scotland:
Northern Ireland:
Germany:
Spain
The teams were evenly matched at Liberty Stadium on Saturday, with the point leaving Everton sixth in the Premier League and Swansea eighth.
The Swans ended last season in that position - above Everton - and Monk believes their standing in relation to the Toffees is a sign of improvement.
"I think that was a good marker to see where we're at," he said.
"We more than matched them. I thought we were great.
"That shows how far we've come as a club, the fact we're talking about Everton with all their history and the power they have in this league.
"For us to feel we're on par and just as good as them... shows how far we've come as a team."
Swansea had suffered their first defeat of the season in their previous outing which was a 1-0 loss at Watford.
Monk was pleased his side reacted with an improved display against Everton, managed by former Swansea boss Roberto Martinez.
Media playback is not supported on this device
"That was more us. We were at it," said Monk. "I spoke to the players to remind them that's what we're exactly about.
"I thought it was a night and day performance compared to last week." 
Summarize: 
"I thought it was a night and day performance compared to last week" - Monk on Swansea's performance against Everton.
"I thought we were great" - Monk on Swansea's performance against Everton.
"That shows how far we've come as a club, the fact we're talking about Everton with all their history and the power they have in this league" - Monk on Swansea's performance against Everton.
"For us to feel we're on par and just as good as them... shows how far we've come as a team" - Monk on Swansea's performance against Everton.
"I think that was a
Bupa sponsored it for 22 years before pulling out in 2014. Supermarket Morrisons stepped in last year.
Chief Executive at The Great Run Company, Mark Hollinshead, said he was confident of finding a sponsor and was in talks with some "ambitious" brands.
The annual half marathon will take place on 11 September.
The 13.1-mile (21km) race, which is thought to be the second largest for participation in the world, takes place between Newcastle and South Shields.
Mr Hollinshead said: "We have several interesting conversations underway with some very ambitious brands but we are not in a position to announce anything."
Leah Gillooly, a lecturer in marketing at Manchester University, said there were a lot of events competing for sponsors and event organisers had to choose carefully to avoid being associated with "undesirable" brands.
In 2013, Newcastle United caused controversy when it named pay-day loans company Wonga as its sponsor.
Ms Gillooly said: "The run is a fantastic event, but the sponsorship landscape is tricky with a lot of events competing for brands.
"Organisers are commercial so they do have an eye on profit, but it's important when selecting a sponsor that they don't just choose the one offering the most cash."
She also said events can go ahead without sponsors, but they would not make as much money to put towards future events.
Morrisons said the company had been glad to back the run, but it was "focusing on other ways to reach customers". 
Summarize: 
Mohammed Khan, 31, Muserat Khan, 36, and Ateek Khan, 28, all of West Bromwich, targeted them in Oswestry.
Mohammed Khan, of Whitehall Road, was jailed for six years, Muserat Khan, of Greets Green Road, was given five years and nine months and Ateek Khan, of Oak Road, five years and six months. All admitted conspiracy to kidnap.
Zahoor Hussain, 39, of Whitehall Road, was acquitted of the same charge.
The case was heard at Shrewsbury Crown Court on Wednesday. 
Summarize: 
The victim was a young man who had been living in the UK for some time. He was a student and had been working in a local café. He was a devout Muslim and had been studying the Qur'an. He had been taking a taxi to and from work.
On the evening of Friday, May 16, 2006, the victim was walking home from work. He was approached by the three men. The victim was asked if he was a Muslim. He said he was. The three men then asked him if he would like to go to a mosque. He said he would. The three men then told him
Three cars were damaged in the incident in Ravenhurst Street, Highgate, at about 18:45 BST on Sunday.
A man aged 25 was arrested on suspicion of wounding and is in custody.
"Police received multiple 999 calls reporting a collision and people being injured," a West Midlands Police spokesman said.
Police said the man who suffered life-threatening injuries sustained them "from a collision with one of the cars".
"A number of other people have been taken to hospital with injuries," the spokesman added.
For more on this and other Birmingham news
Sean Phillips, force incident manager, said: "We've got officers at the scene trying to establish what has happened. We've also got officers at the hospital assisting those who have been injured."
Ravenhurst Street and Moseley Street are closed while police examine the scene.
Anyone with information is urged to contact the force on 101. 
Summarize: 
On Sunday, August 8, 2018, at about 18:45 BST, a man was arrested on suspicion of wounding and is in custody.
A man aged 25 was arrested on suspicion of wounding and is in custody.
Police received multiple 999 calls reporting a collision and people being injured.
A number of other people have been taken to hospital with injuries.
For more on this and other Birmingham news, please visit our website at http://www.birminghammail.co.uk/news/local-news/man-arrested-after-three-cars-damaged-in
Matt Salmon, 25, had worked for the club for three-and-a-half years, mainly as the academy physio.
He was originally diagnosed with lung cancer in 2010 but only announced his retirement on Wednesday following a consultation with doctors.
Speaking on Wednesday, he said he had loved "every single moment" of his job.
"It has been an incredibly difficult decision to resign from my dream job at the age of 25 but unfortunately I have reached a stage where I am not able to give our players the level of care they deserve," he said.
He thanked his colleagues for their support during his illness.
"The fact that people who achieved so much in the game offer their time and support shows what sort of club Mansfield Town is and mirrors the principles that the town was built on," he said.
"I will finish by wishing the club, players, staff and fans all the best for next season and I look forward to the club playing League One football, which everyone at the club deserves."
The club said Mr Salmon was surrounded by his family and friends when he died peacefully during the early hours of Friday.
Chairman John Radford said he was a "thoroughly decent person" and everyone at Mansfield Town would miss him.
In a statement, youth directors Mark Hawkins and Steve Hymas said: "Matt was an inspirational person, taken far too young." 
Summarize: 
He was a very good physio and was well-liked by the players. He was a very good physio and was well-liked by the players.
He was a very good physio and was well-liked by the players. He was a very good physio and was well-liked by the players.
He was a very good physio and was well-liked by the players. He was a very good physio and was well-liked by the players.
He was a very good physio and was well-liked by the players. He
It happened at about 05:00 BST on Saturday at Oxford Street's junction with Berwick Street.
Two males in the car and a woman passenger on the N55 bus were injured and taken to hospital.
Police said they had arrested three occupants of the car - the two injured males and another who was unharmed.
The Metropolitan Police said the car had been seen by officers on duty in a marked police car shortly before the collision.
The vehicle "did not stop and made off" before crashing, police said. 
Summarize: 
The car was seen by police on duty in a marked police car shortly before the collision.
The vehicle "did not stop and made off" before crashing, police said.
The car was seen by police on duty in a marked police car shortly before the collision.
The vehicle "did not stop and made off" before crashing, police said.
The car was seen by police on duty in a marked police car shortly before the collision.
The vehicle "did not stop and made off" before crashing, police said.
The car was seen by police on duty in a marked police car shortly before
The 24-year-old made 14 appearances in his first season at Elland Road, but failed to play a game for the senior team last term.
Sloth had one year left on his contract with the Championship side, who he joined from Aarhus in August 2014.
He has won eight caps for Denmark, the last of which came in March 2014.
Find all the latest football transfers on our dedicated page. 
Summarize: 
"I want to thank the fans for their support and I am looking forward to the new season," he said.
"I have a year left on my contract and I hope to be able to play for the team again soon."
"I have been here for two years and I have enjoyed my time here," he said. "I have played in the first team and I have played in the reserves. I have learned a lot and I am looking forward to the new season."
"I have been here for two years and I have enjoyed my time here," he said. "I have played in the
Police, fire and ambulance crews were called to the river near The Myrke at 19:00 BST on Friday.
South Central Ambulance Service said another man was taken to Wexham Park Hospital suffering the effects of cold.
Police warned anyone looking for the missing man not to enter the water as they could also be in danger.
Supt Kate Ford of Thames Valley Police said: "They should search from the bank only and, if they see anything they think is significant, they should speak to a police officer at the scene."
An ambulance service spokeswoman said: "We were called at 19:02 to reports of people in the water at Jubilee River.
"We sent two ambulance crews, an ambulance officer and Thames Valley Air Ambulance." 
Summarize: 
The river is a tributary of the River Thames, flowing through the city of Reading in Berkshire, England.
The river is approximately long. It flows through the town of Reading, Berkshire, England, and is a tributary of the River Thames.
The river is navigable by small craft, and is used for leisure purposes, such as rowing, canoeing, and fishing.
The river is popular with anglers, and is stocked with brown trout.
The river is popular with canoeists, and is used for training and racing.
The river is popular with row
Parkers were able to claim a refund after a traffic regulation order issued by Calderdale Council was found to be invalid.
Forms were filled in incorrectly in 2008 following a change in legislation.
The council estimated the blunder could cost it between £200,000 and £500,000.
To date, 3,800 claims have been made - with the council refunding more than £25,000 in the past four months.
On street parking charges were lifted in Halifax town centre on 8 October 2014. Parking charges are back in place from Monday at the previous rates. 
Summarize: 
Parking charges were lifted in Halifax town centre on 8 October 2014. Parking charges are back in place from Monday at the previous rates.
Parking charges were lifted in Halifax town centre on 8 October 2014. Parking charges are back in place from Monday at the previous rates.
Parking charges were lifted in Halifax town centre on 8 October 2014. Parking charges are back in place from Monday at the previous rates.
Parking charges were lifted in Halifax town centre on 8 October 2014. Parking charges are back in place from Monday at the previous rates.
Parking charges were lifted in Halifax town centre on
The picture featured the star over a picture of Hillary Clinton, with a text reading "Most corrupt candidate ever!" and a background of $100 bills.
Mr Trump has deleted the message.
The Mic website reports the image first appeared on a message board known for anti-Semitism and white supremacy.
Mr Trump's post, published on Saturday, prompted strong reaction on social media and accusations of anti-Semitism.
The Star of David is a Jewish symbol. It was used by the Nazis to identify Jews. It is also featured on the Israeli flag.
The billionaire deleted the picture and posted another image, with a circle covering the star, though tips of it were still visible.
The Mic report said the page at the forum where the picture was originally posted no longer exists.
It also said the message linked to a Twitter account where the same picture had been posted. It has since been deleted, but the website posted a picture of the original tweet.
Mr Trump and his campaign have not commented on the case.
Some social media users defended the tweet, saying the six-pointed star is a symbol used by sheriff's departments and that it is a graphic form widely available on computer programs.
Nevertheless, the tweet attracted heavy criticism.
Jonathan Greenblatt, from the Anti-Defamation League, said it was "long overdue" for Mr Trump to "step up, speak out and shut it down".
And Mrs Clinton's spokesman Josh Schwerin said on Twitter: "Why is there a Star of David?"
It is not the first time that Mr Trump has been criticised for racist and anti-Semitic messages.
He has already reposted comments made by supremacist groups on social media.
Earlier this year, he was criticised on his failure to disavow David Duke, a leader of the white supremacist Ku Klux Klan, who endorsed him. He later said he had on several occasions in the past disavowed Mr Duke.
Critics also point to his divisive remarks, especially about Muslims and immigrants. But the incidents do not appear to cause him damage among his supporters, analysts say. 
Summarize: 
The image was posted on a message board known for anti-Semitism and white supremacy.
The image was posted on a message board known for anti-Semitism and white supremacy.
The image was posted on a message board known for anti-Semitism and white supremacy.
The image was posted on a message board known for anti-Semitism and white supremacy.
The image was posted on a message board known for anti-Semitism and white supremacy.
The image was posted on a message board known for anti-Semitism and white supremacy.
The image was posted on a message board known for anti-Semitism and white supremacy.
Lecturer Martyn Lee, 54, of Meriden, was arrested at Coventry University in February 2014.
He admitted six counts of making and distributing indecent images of children.
Sophie Nightingale, 23, from Stafford, pleaded guilty to four charges of possessing and distributing indecent images of children.
They included one count of possessing extreme pornographic images.
The pair are due to be sentenced at Warwick Crown Court next month.
Coventry University said Lee had been dismissed following a disciplinary hearing in 2014, while performing arts student Nightingale was no longer at the university.
In a statement, it confirmed a university computer used by Lee was seized in connection with the investigation.
It said the couple's relationship and the offences they admitted "took place in their private lives and, in both cases, were outside the University's knowledge and jurisdiction".
"When the University was made aware, swift and appropriate disciplinary action was taken in line with our staff and student codes of conduct," it said. 
Summarize: 
The University of Warwick is a public research university located in Coventry, Warwickshire, England. It has approximately 18,000 students and is one of the largest universities in the UK by number of students.
The university was founded in 1965 as a successor to Coventry College of Education, which had been formed in 1899 as a teacher training college. The college was renamed Coventry College of Education in 1965 and was granted university status in 1992.
The university is organised into four faculties:
The university is a member of the Association of Commonwealth Universities, the European University Association, the International Association of Universities
Selman survived an awkward start and accelerated to reach the third century of his career.
Jacques Rudolph (58) and Colin Ingram (84 not out) played their parts in Glamorgan's best batting of the season.
Earlier the Foxes' last two wickets added 110 runs to frustrate the Welsh county's attack.
The big hitting of tail-enders Ben Raine, Clint McKay and Charlier Shreck looked to have swung the momentum in the home side's favour.
But Selman's increasingly confident innings and a mature knock from Ingram made sure that Glamorgan passed the follow-on target with just four wickets down, shortly before the close.
Leicestershire all-rounder Clint McKay told BBC Radio Leicester:
"They bowled quite nicely this morning but me and Charles (Shreck) got lucky enough to get away with a few and build that total past 400.
"(Rudolph) is a world-class player, he showed his class and batted beautifully, got them off to a nice start and we couldn't drag the scoring rate back throughout the day.
"I'd say it's even, four down on a very nice wicket, and the second new ball is going to be what makes the difference in the game."
Glamorgan batsman Nick Selman told BBC Wales Sport:
"Coming off the back of the last two games it was good to get some runs, me and Col [Colin Ingram] had the mindset of being busy and being positive.
"We got through a tough spell after lunch and reaped our reward afterwards, it was a shame to get out but hopefully Colin can kick on and get a big one.
"If we get through the new ball and get a good lead, the ball's going to be in our court." 
Summarize: 
Leicestershire (4pts) beat Glamorgan (0pts) by six wickets
Leicestershire (4pts) beat Glamorgan (0pts) by six wickets
Leicestershire (4pts) beat Glamorgan (0pts) by six wickets
Leicestershire (4pts) beat Glamorgan (0pts) by six wickets
Leicestershire (4pts) beat Glamorgan (0pts) by six wickets
Leicestershire (4
Its shares fell as much as 5% in early trading before recovering slightly.
At the weekend, Germany's Bild newspaper said the country's regulators had found evidence of emissions-cheating software in Fiat cars.
Rival VW has already been engulfed by a similar test-cheating scandal.
According to Bild's Sunday edition, the German Federal Motor Vehicle Office (KBA) had tested a Fiat car and discovered software that shut down emissions control technology after 22 minutes - two minutes after the end of a standard test.
The newspaper said the KBA had reported its findings to the European Commission and to the Italian authorities.
Fiat Chrysler has so far made no comment on the allegations.
It has also cancelled a meeting with the German authorities which had been due to take place last week, on the grounds that responsibility for testing lay with Italy.
The German transport minister, Alexander Dobrindt, has criticised Fiat's "un-co-operative attitude", which he described as "totally incomprehensible". 
Summarize: 
The German government is investigating Fiat's emissions-cheating software.
Fiat's shares fell as much as 5% in early trading on Monday.
Fiat has said it will not comment on the allegations.
Fiat's shares fell as much as 5% in early trading on Monday.
Fiat has said it will not comment on the allegations.
Fiat's shares fell as much as 5% in early trading on Monday.
Fiat has said it will not comment on the allegations.
Fiat's shares fell as much as 5% in early trading on Monday.
Fiat has said it will
A third of criminals under 21 went on to commit further offences in 2012-13 - down by 9.4% from a peak in 1997-98.
There was a fall of 28% in 21 to 25-year-olds reconvicted in the past decade.
Most likely to reoffend were people convicted of dishonesty crimes. The rates were lowest for those who committed a sexual crime.
"The [overall] reconviction rate has fallen by one percentage point for 2012-13," the report said.
"Between 2003-04 and 2012-13, the reconviction rate has fallen by 4.1 percentage points from 32.7 to 28.6, and the average number of reconvictions has fallen by 18% from 0.62 to 0.51."
The report added: "These reductions are set against the context of a falling number of crimes recorded by the police since 2004-05. Crime and victimisation surveys also reveal a similar pattern of falling incidence of crime."
People given drug treatment and testing orders (DTTOs) had the highest average number of reconvictions and there was a 60% reconviction rate for people imprisoned for three months or less. The rate was 10.1% for those serving more than four years.
"Those that commit relatively low-level crimes but in high volumes are more likely to be reconvicted, and are more likely to get short custodial sentences," the report said.
"Offenders under the age of 21 had the highest reconviction rate (33%) in 2012-13, and one of the highest average number of reconvictions per offender of the age groups (0.57) - but this is equal with the 26 to 30 age group, and only slightly higher than the 31 to 40 age group."
Men were more likely to reoffend than women.
Just under a third of people given community payback orders, including unpaid work in their local area, went on to commit further offences. 
Summarize: 
The report said: "The reconviction rate has fallen by 4.1 percentage points from 32.7 to 28.6, and the average number of reconvictions has fallen by 18% from 0.62 to 0.51.
"These reductions are set against the context of a falling number of crimes recorded by the police since 2004-05. Crime and victimisation surveys also reveal a similar pattern of falling incidence of crime."
The report said: "The reconviction rate has fallen by 4.1 percentage points from 32.7 to 28.6, and the average number of reconvictions
However, new recordings show mothers and calves "whisper" to each other, seemingly to avoid attracting predators.
The quiet grunts and squeaks can be heard only at close range.
By calling softly to its mother, the calf is less likely be overheard and preyed on by killer whales, scientists believe.
Dr Simone Videsen of Aarhus University in Denmark is part of a team of scientists who tracked eight baby whales and two mothers to learn more about the first months of a humpback whale's life.
They used special sound and movement recorders, which were attached to the whale's skin via suction cups.
"We were really surprised because humpback whales are really vocal normally and they have these long songs," she said.
"But when you look at the communication pattern between mother and calf you see that they're often silent and they do produce these weaker signals."
She said it was the first time that communication signals between mother and calf had been recorded in this way.
The researchers believe mothers and calves communicate quietly to avoid being overheard by killer whales or male humpback whales who are in search of a mate.
Calves must stay close to their mother to feed and grow before they set off on their long annual migration to the food-rich waters of the Antarctic.
The nursery grounds of tropical waters are key to their survival. Here, they must feed and build up fat stores to sustain them as they travel 5,000 miles across open water in rough seas.
The findings will help in the conservation of this habitat, say the researchers, who studied a population of whales outside Exmouth Gulf off West Australia.
"From our research, we have learned that mother-calf pairs are likely to be sensitive to increases in ship noise," said Dr Videsen.
"Because mother and calf communicate in whispers, shipping noise could easily mask these quiet calls."
There are two major humpback whale populations, one in the northern hemisphere and the other in the south.
Both breed in tropical waters and then migrate to the Arctic or Antarctic to feed.
Humpback whales are slow to reproduce; pregnancy lasts for 11 months and calves stay with their mothers until they are one-year-old.
The research is published in the journal, Functional Ecology.
Follow Helen on Twitter. 
Summarize:  Humpback whales communicate with each other in whispers to avoid being overheard by killer whales and male humpback whales.
Source: BBC News.
Photo: A humpback whale calf and its mother in the Gulf of Maine. Credit: NOAA.
Photo: A humpback whale calf and its mother in the Gulf of Maine. Credit: NOAA.
Photo: A humpback whale calf and its mother in the Gulf of Maine. Credit: NOAA.
Photo: A humpback whale calf and its mother in the Gulf of Maine. Credit: NOAA.
Photo: A humpback whale calf and
Street-based charity fundraisers will also be targeted from Sunday.
Anyone found breaching the conditions of the Public Spaces Protection Order could get a Â£100 fixed penalty.
Insp Kevin Warren said the aim was to "enhance" visitors' experience in the city centre and improve the "feeling of safety" within the Stow Hill ward.
Gwent Police and Newport City Council are working together on the initiative.
The conditions of the order for the restricted area are: 
Summarize: 
The order will be in place from 11pm to 7am every night.
The order will be in place from 11pm to 7am every night.
The order will be in place from 11pm to 7am every night.
The order will be in place from 11pm to 7am every night.
The order will be in place from 11pm to 7am every night.
The order will be in place from 11pm to 7am every night.
The order will be in place from 11pm to 7am every night.
The order will be in place from
The annual general meeting of Oil and Gas UK heard costs were on course to fall from more than $29 per barrel of oil produced to $16 by the end of 2016.
However, the industry is concerned only half of that cut can be secured, in the face of volatile supply chain prices.
The issue was raised at the meeting by chief executive Deirdre Michie.
A source explained later: "The cut in cost per barrel is probably a little better than what the industry initially set out to achieve.
"But the issue that really has to focus minds is whether the cost reduction is truly sustainable.
"Initial analysis suggests that around half of it potentially is.
"But keeping cost from creeping back into the basin will require the industry to keep a firm eye on eliminating wasteful practices, the development and implementation of new technologies and of course finding new and collaborative ways of working together across the supply chain."
The AGM in Aberdeen also heard about progress on co-operating across companies, for sourcing of spare parts across several sectors to cut back on stock-holding costs, and on the new Oil and Gas Authority's work to get producers co-operating in developing adjacent offshore fields.
There were also industry concerns raised about the Brexit process while discussions are going on in Brussels about the future of the Emissions Trading Scheme.
Ms Michie told the industry body's members of her lobbying of the government to ensure the oil and gas sector is considered within the negotiations, and that government is not distracted from industry needs while those talks are under way.
There is some concern within the industry that two-thirds of Europe's gas production will be from countries which are not in the European Union, after Britain joins Norway outside the Union.
That is seen as raising the risk that the remaining members of the EU developing policy that is more hostile to oil and gas production. 
Summarize: 
The UK oil and gas industry is facing a number of challenges in the coming years, including the need to reduce costs and secure a more stable supply of gas.
The industry is also concerned about the impact of Brexit on the sector, and the need to ensure the UK government is not distracted from industry needs while the negotiations are under way.
The industry is also concerned about the impact of Brexit on the sector, and the need to ensure the UK government is not distracted from industry needs while the negotiations are under way.
The industry is also concerned about the impact of Brexit on the sector, and the need to ensure the UK
The augmented reality game has been downloaded by millions of players, who are encouraged to venture into real-life places to hunt down virtual monsters.
But the game has proved controversial - with some users disregarding safety warnings, leading to car crashes, muggings, injury and even death.
Saudi Arabian clerics have called the game "un-Islamic". Indonesia has banned its military from playing the game, and a Cossack leader has said it "smacks of Satanism".
Police around the world have issued warnings to players in the hope of preventing further incidents.
So what do we know of the incidents so far?
On July 20, Jerson Lopez de Leon, 18, and his cousin Daniel Moises Picen, 17, were ambushed while playing the game south-east of Guatemala City.
Mr Lopez de Leon was killed and his cousin was seriously injured. Police found nearly 20 bullet casings at the scene but are unsure of the motive behind the killing.
On July 18, a man crashed into a parked police car in Baltimore, US, kept driving, and finally stopped at the end of the road after the police ran after him. Police say he admitted he was playing Pokemon Go at the time.
Baltimore Police say there were two other Pokemon Go related incidents just this week.
On July 19, a group of 20 teenagers stole a boat in efforts to catch Pokemon characters on a lake in Liverpool, UK.
The group abandoned the boat in the middle of the lake after the coastguard was called to investigate. The rescue team said users should take care not to put themselves and rescue services at risk.
A woman in New Jersey, US, had to be rescued by firemen after getting stuck in a cemetery tree while playing the game.
The fire chief issued a public safety warning, but saved the woman further embarrassment by not releasing her name.
On July 14, two men in California, US, fell up to 33m (108 ft) off a cliff after ignoring "no trespassing" signs while playing Pokemon Go.
Firefighters rescued the men and took them to a nearby hospital. They have not been charged with trespassing. 
Summarize: 
The game has been downloaded by millions of players around the world, who are encouraged to venture into real-life places to hunt down virtual monsters.
But the game has proved controversial - with some users disregarding safety warnings, leading to car crashes, muggings, injury and even death.
Saudi Arabian clerics have called the game "un-Islamic". Indonesia has banned its military from playing the game, and a Cossack leader has said it "smacks of Satanism".
Police around the world have issued warnings to players in the hope of preventing further incidents.
So what do we know of the incidents so far
Satao II, a 50-year-old so-called "giant tusker" was found dead near the Tsavo National Park border.
Conservationists at the park believe he may have been killed be a poison arrow, although the cause of death has not yet been confirmed.
Satao was named after another giant tusker killed by poachers in 2014.
There are now fewer than 30 African "big tuskers" - adult bulls with ivory large enough to brush the ground - in the world.
"I am pretty gutted really," Richard Moller, head of the Tsavo Trust, told AFP.
"This particular elephant was one that was very approachable, one of those easy old boys to find. Many are the others are much more difficult to see.
"He has been through lots of droughts and probably other attempts at poaching."
A team from the park and Kenyan Wildlife Service recovered the animal's enormous ivory tusks intact, before poachers could claim them, the park said.
One weighed 51.5kg, (113.5lbs) and the other 50.5kg.
His carcass was discovered in January during routine aerial surveillance of the 25,000 sq km national park, but was only announced Monday.
After the discovery, the park's teams tracked an "elephant poaching gang" deep into the park, and two poachers were arrested.
Among the items found with the poachers were three bows and 12 poisoned arrows, as well as an AK47 rifle, the park said.
"Although this is a very sad loss in everyway, we can take some positive from this in that Satao's carcass was indeed found with the ivory intact, and recovered before it could fall into the wrong hands and further fuel the illegal ivory market," the Tsavo Trust said.
"More importantly, this poaching gang... has been broken for ever." 
Summarize: 
1. The Tsavo Trust, a conservation group, announced that a "giant tusker" was found dead near the Tsavo National Park border.
2. The elephant was named after another giant tusker killed by poachers in 2014.
3. There are now fewer than 30 African "big tuskers" - adult bulls with ivory large enough to brush the ground - in the world.
4. "I am pretty gutted really," Richard Moller, head of the Tsavo Trust, told AFP.
5. "This particular elephant was one that
It means Monday was the deadliest day for Philippine troops since President Rodrigo Duterte was elected in May.
Abu Sayyaf is one of the smallest and most violent jihadist groups in the southern Philippines.
Its name means "bearer of the sword" and it is notorious for kidnappings and attacking civilians and the army.
Who are the Abu Sayyaf group?
The Islamic State threat in South East Asia
An army spokesman was quoted by Inquirer.net as saying that the soldiers were killed while fighting about 70 Abu Sayyaf fighters near the southern city of Barangay Maligaya.
At least five soldiers were wounded in Monday's fighting.
President Duterte ordered troops to eradicate Abu Sayyaf militants last week after they beheaded a kidnapped villager whose family was too impoverished to pay a ransom.
Officials said Monday's troop losses came after the army killed about 21 Abu Sayyaf gunmen, including an influential commander, on Friday and Saturday in fighting triggered by the beheading.
On Sunday eight Islamic militants linked to so-called Islamic State (IS) were freed from jail by at least 20 fighters from the Maute group who turned up at the Lanao del Sur jail in the southern city of Marawi to release them.
The Maute group has carried out several bombings and kidnappings in the southern Mindanao region.
The Philippines has faced separatist movements for decades in Mindanao, which is majority Muslim - the rest of the Philippines is mainly Roman Catholic.
The Maute group carries the black flag and insignia of IS, and has attacked troops, beheaded a soldier and beheaded two local workers earlier this year.
Several armed groups in the Philippines have pledged allegiance to IS, although the country's military says there is no evidence of active co-operation with foreign militants. 
Summarize:  Abu Sayyaf is a small but violent jihadist group in the southern Philippines.
It has carried out kidnappings and attacks on civilians and the army.
President Duterte ordered troops to eradicate Abu Sayyaf militants last week after they beheaded a kidnapped villager whose family was too impoverished to pay a ransom.
Officials said Monday's troop losses came after the army killed about 21 Abu Sayyaf gunmen, including an influential commander, on Friday and Saturday in fighting triggered by the beheading.
On Sunday eight Islamic militants linked to so-called Islamic State (IS) were freed from jail by at least 20 fighters from the Ma
"Stressed" Maggie May had to be sedated after getting wedged between the stairlift and a rail at her home in Helsington in Kendal, Cumbria.
RSPCA Inspector Chris Towler did not want to dismantle the stairlift and leave the tabby's owners with no way of getting upstairs.
He eventually managed to ease Maggie May out using a jack to make a gap.
A check-up revealed she was totally unscathed.
"The cat had followed her owner down the stairs when she got caught under the lift," Insp Towler said.
"An engineer loosened the post from the rail but was unable to move the chair off of the cat as the floor bolts were covered by the seat.
"We talked about calling the fire brigade to assist with their cutting equipment but I wanted to avoid damaging the stairlift."
Insp Towler used a jack to push against the rail and adjacent wall, creating a gap enabling Maggie May to slide free.
He added: "The vet took her back to the surgery, and I was extremely pleased to hear that she suffered no injuries and was allowed to return to her very relieved owner." 
Summarize: 
A cat was trapped between a stair lift and a railing. The cat was trapped for about two hours. The cat was trapped for about two hours. The cat was trapped for about two hours. The cat was trapped for about two hours. The cat was trapped for about two hours. The cat was trapped for about two hours. The cat was trapped for about two hours. The cat was trapped for about two hours. The cat was trapped for about two hours. The cat was trapped for about two hours. The cat was trapped for about two hours. The cat was trapped for about two hours. The cat was trapped for about
A new book provides details of 750 "secret places" and "wild adventures" in Scotland, according to its publishers.
Wild Guide to Scotland is latest in a series of adventure travel guide books.
Three Scottish writers and photographers have written the book and contributed photographs.
Kimberley Grant is a travel and lifestyle journalist and photographer from Glasgow.
David Cooper is a photographer, writer and mountaineer from the Shetland Isles.
And Richard Gaston is a travel and fashion photographer from Ayrshire.
Locations in the book include uninhabited islands, sea caves, beaches, glens and mountains.
They include Boreray a tiny island of St Kilda, an archipelago about 40 miles (64km) west of North Uist in the Western Isles.
Locations also include Staffa, an island in the Inner Hebrides famed for its hexagonal rock columns formed millions of years ago by volcanic eruptions and its Fingal's Cave.
The beaches include Aird a' Mhorain in North Uist and Uyea in Unst, Shetland.
Walks to mountain bothies and wild swimming are also featured. 
Summarize: 
Wild Guide to Scotland is a travel and adventure guide book.
It is published by the Scottish Mountaineering Trust.
The book is written by three Scottish writers and photographers.
Kimberley Grant is a travel and lifestyle journalist and photographer from Glasgow.
David Cooper is a photographer, writer and mountaineer from the Shetland Isles.
And Richard Gaston is a travel and fashion photographer from Ayrshire.
Locations in the book include uninhabited islands, sea caves, beaches, glens and mountains.
They include Boreray a tiny island of St Kilda, an archipelago about
Volunteers with the Eighth in the East project discovered the inscription during a survey of RAF Raydon near Ipswich in Suffolk.
Bruce Glenn scratched his name and home town into concrete in 1943.
Project manager David Cain said his details proved easy to trace because he came from the small Oklahoma town of Fargo, with fewer than 300 residents.
RAF Raydon was home to Fighter Squadrons of the US Eighth Army Air Force during World War Two.
Mr Cain said: "From the records we have accessed we're pretty sure we've found the right man.
"The dates of birth and location fits with Bruce and that he was a driver prior to the war."
Mr Glenn enlisted in October 1942 and he served in the US army for four years.
He died in 2002, but his widow Clarice, who lives in Richmond, Columbia, recently celebrated her 100th birthday by renewing her driving licence.
The project has asked Mrs Glenn's local newspaper, the Tri-City Herald, to put it in touch with her.
The Eighth in the East is a Heritage Lottery Fund programme of community archaeology that explores the legacy of the 8th USAAF during their time in Britain during World War Two. 
Summarize: 
A small town in Oklahoma, USA, named Fargo, which has a population of only 300, is the home of a man who served in the US army for four years during World War Two.
Bruce Glenn was a driver in the US army for four years during World War Two. He was a member of the 8th Air Force and served in the US army for four years.
Bruce Glenn was born in Fargo, Oklahoma, USA, on 4 July, 1921.
Bruce Glenn was a member of the 8th Air Force and served in the US army for four years.
Bruce Glenn was born in Fargo, Oklahoma
James Stutter, 37, admitted to a jury he "had a great idea" to make it after seeing the show, in which a chemistry teacher builds a methamphetamine lab.
However, he denied he was actually trying to make the drug in his Hemel Hempstead flat. He was convicted and given a two-year suspended jail term.
Sentencing him, Recorder Leslie Cuthbert told him he was "stupid".
St Albans Crown Court heard that when police raided Stutter's flat in March 2014, they found a recipe for the drug written by his girlfriend Eleanor Hunt.
Ingredients including lithium drained from batteries, Epsom salts and paraphernalia such as a coffee grinder, all of which could be used in drug production, were also seized.
More news from Hertfordshire
The couple both denied a charge of attempting to make methamphetamine.
During a trial last month the jury heard Stutter had been paying about Â£140 for a gram of the drug and thought it would be cheaper to manufacture his own.
His defence team argued he had not actually begun manufacturing anything.
Prosecuting, Roxanne Aisthorpe  told the jury: "You may have seen the TV series Breaking Bad. That laboratory was quite professional. That was not what happened in this case."
Ms Hunt was cleared of the charge but Stutter was convicted.
He admitted two further charges of possessing drugs with intent to supply.
Recorder Cuthbert told Stutter: "It is a sign of your stupidity that you watched a TV programme about methamphetamine and thought you could manufacture it."
He added: "You are 37 and should know better by this age." 
Summarize: 
1. The defendant was stupid.
2. The defendant was stupid.
3. The defendant was stupid.
4. The defendant was stupid.
5. The defendant was stupid.
6. The defendant was stupid.
7. The defendant was stupid.
8. The defendant was stupid.
9. The defendant was stupid.
10. The defendant was stupid.
11. The defendant was stupid.
12. The defendant was stupid.
13. The defendant was stupid.
14. The defendant was stupid.
Omar Badreddin, 18, Mohammed Alfrouh, 20, and Mohammad Allakkoud, 18, have pleaded not guilty.
A 16-year-old-boy, understood to be Syrian, has also been charged with sexual assault. It is not known if he has entered a plea yet.
Mr Badreddin came to the UK from Jordan last November under the government's refugee resettlement programme.
He and his family were judged to be vulnerable by the UN refugee agency.
The three adults charged in connection with the alleged incident on 10 May have been released on bail.
Their trial has been set for 26 September.
Mr Alfrouh has also been charged with sexually assaulting a second 14-year-old girl, to which he has pleaded not guilty.
The case of the 16 year old will be heard separately by a youth court.
Mr Badreddin is one of 1,602 Syrians who have arrived in the UK under the resettlement programme.
The scheme was designed to bring vulnerable Syrian refugees directly from refugee camps in the Middle East to the UK.
Those arriving have been screened and vetted by the UN.
The scheme will see 20,000 refugees come to Britain over the next four years.
The BBC's Newsnight has been following the progress of Syrian refugees and reporter John Sweeney says that although the case is at an early stage, police are concerned that the charges could raise tensions between locals and Syrian refugees in Newcastle. 
Summarize: 
1. The Syrian refugees are coming to the UK under the resettlement programme.
2. The scheme was designed to bring vulnerable Syrian refugees directly from refugee camps in the Middle East to the UK.
3. Those arriving have been screened and vetted by the UN.
4. The scheme will see 20,000 refugees come to Britain over the next four years.
5. The scheme was designed to bring vulnerable Syrian refugees directly from refugee camps in the Middle East to the UK.
6. Those arriving have been screened and vetted by the UN.
7. The scheme will see 20,000 refugees come to Britain over
The ferry sank in April 2014, killing 304 people - most of them children.
The remains of nine people are yet to be recovered and their families campaigned for the ship to be raised.
The captain and several crew members have been given jail terms for failing to protect passengers, as was the captain of a coast guard vessel involved in the botched rescue effort.
The passengers included 325 pupils aged between 16 and 17 from who were on a school trip to the holiday island of Jeju when the ferry sank.
The wreckage will be salvaged by a consortium led by Shanghai Salvage. It will be raised by next July at a cost of $73m (Â£47m).
To recover any bodies remaining within the ship, engineers will enclose the wreck in two sets of netting so that the complete contents will rise with the vessel, the BBC's Evans in Seoul reports.
It will be the grisliest of tasks but also one of much political sensitivity, he adds.
In April South Korean President Park Guen-hye promised the vessel would be raised at the earliest opportunity amid intense public criticism of the government.
Investigators have said the ferry sank after an inexperienced crew member made too fast a turn. The combination of an illegal redesign and overload meant the ship was unstable.
The owner of ferry operator Chonghaejin Marine Co, Yoo Byung-eun, disappeared after the disaster and was eventually found dead.
The ferry sank in waters between 37 and 43 metres (121 and 141 feet) deep.
While salvage operations have been undertaken in deeper seas, the site of the Sewol is a channel subject to notoriously dangerous currents and heavy surface winds.
Two divers died searching for bodies inside the vessel last year.
Sewol ferry: How it could be raised 
Summarize: 
The Sewol ferry sank in April 2014, killing 304 people - most of them children.
The remains of nine people are yet to be recovered and their families campaigned for the ship to be raised.
The captain and several crew members have been given jail terms for failing to protect passengers, as was the captain of a coast guard vessel involved in the botched rescue effort.
The passengers included 325 pupils aged between 16 and 17 from who were on a school trip to the holiday island of Jeju when the ferry sank.
The wreckage will be salvaged by a consortium led by Shanghai Salvage. It will be raised by next
Joe Townsend, who lives in Polegate, is part of an eight-man team of wounded ex-soldiers who are taking part in the 3,051 mile Race Across America (RAAM).
He will take part in the eight day race, from Saturday, on a hand cycle, after being hurt in an IED explosion.
Mr Townsend, 24, said it was a "challenge of epic proportions".
"I'm fairly anxious," he explained.  "The whole scale of the event is rather large - 3,051 miles across America, with 170,000 foot of climbing is going to be tough for anybody let alone a team of injured servicemen with life-changing injuries."
The team, which includes four double amputees on hand bikes and four on upright bikes, will cycle 350 to 500 miles a day, crossing 12 states.
Mr Townsend said the sheer blistering heat was one of his main concerns about doing the race.
"Being a hand cyclist, sitting just inches of the tarmac, you've got the sun beating down on you and the heat radiating off the tarmac which makes the cycling so much harder," he said.
Mr Townsend has completed in many endurance races since his injury in 2008, including the Bolton Iron Man in 2011, which he completed in just 12 hours.
He said: "It is proving to yourself that after disability, things still can be achieved and that there aren't any limitations really, you just need to adapt round to a way of achieving them."
The team are raising money for Help for Heroes to give back to other wounded servicemen and women. 
Summarize: 
The Race Across America is a 3,051 mile (5,000 km) bicycle race across the United States. It is a self-supported, non-competitive event, with the winner being the rider who completes the most miles. The race is not timed, and riders are not required to follow a pre-determined route.
The race began in 2004 as a way to raise money for the Wounded Warrior Project. The race was created by Steve Johnson, a former Marine who was injured in the Iraq War. The first race was from New York City to Los Angeles. The race was initially called the "
The 24-year-old was attacked by up to eight man with bats and was hit with the machete during the attack in Quinton, Birmingham.
West Midlands Police said the victim, who is lucky not to have been killed, had been in a property on Rilstone Road when a number of vehicles pulled up on Tuesday evening.
Police believe it to have been a targeted attack.
A spokesman described it as ferocious and violent and said the injured, whose arm was nearly severed, man was still in hospital with arm and back injuries. 
Summarize: 
The victim was attacked by up to eight men with bats and was hit with the machete during the attack in Quinton, Birmingham.
The victim, who is lucky not to have been killed, had been in a property on Rilstone Road when a number of vehicles pulled up on Tuesday evening.
Police believe it to have been a targeted attack.
A spokesman described it as ferocious and violent and said the injured, whose arm was nearly severed, man was still in hospital with arm and back injuries.
The victim was taken to hospital with serious injuries.
The victim was taken to hospital with
The Blues were given permission to construct a new ground on the site over three years ago.
"I don't want to put false hope in people's minds but we are 90% through the processes we have to do," Martin told BBC Look East.
"We're just tying up a couple of loose ends and it's looking good."
The new stadium is being funded in part by supermarket chain Sainsbury's, who in return will build a store at the club's current Roots Hall home.
Martin said the only decision before work begins is over who will win the contract to lead the construction at Fossetts Farm.
I still subsidise the club. It still needs seven or eight hundred thousand pounds put in this season, which we do month on month
"We've been out to tender and have those tenders back from four contractors," he explained.
"We've selected two. We're now conducting interviews with those two and hope to be through that process within the next three to four weeks.
"I don't want to put a date on it but we're very advanced. We've had a lot of properties to buy in and around Roots Hall and Fossetts Farm. Everything is at a very advanced stage.
"We're building not just a Sainsbury's store and a stadium but 30 flats for the local authorities."
And the Southend chairman has reiterated the importance of the proposed 14,000-seater stadium to the club's future.
"The stadium is critical," he said. "I still subsidise the club. It still needs seven or eight hundred thousand pounds put in this season, which we do month on month.
"That will continue until the income streams improve. Hopefully that will be through promotion but also through the stadium." 
Summarize:  Southend United are in the process of building a new stadium on the site of the current Roots Hall. The club's current stadium is owned by the local authority and the club is paying for the construction of the new stadium. The club is also paying for the construction of 30 flats for the local authority. The club's current stadium is owned by the local authority and the club is paying for the construction of the new stadium. The club is also paying for the construction of 30 flats for the local authority.
The new stadium is being funded in part by supermarket chain Sainsbury's, who in return will build a store at the
Citizens Advice Scotland (CAS) is calling for more to be done to tackle bad landlords in the private housing sector.
It was contacted by more than 6,000 tenants last year to report problems with landlords and poor housing.
The Scottish Association of Landlords said it was important that rules were enforced to drive rogue landlords out.
The number of tenants contacting CAS last year increased by 23% over the previous two years.
It's report highlights multiple cases of landlords failing to meet their legal responsibilities, refusing to do basic repairs and bullying or intimidating their tenants.
The organisation said it deals with 24 private rented housing cases every working day.
CAS housing spokesman Patrick Hogan said: "The figures we are publishing today are a shocking insight into the worst corners of the private rented sector in Scotland.
"We regularly see incidents of poor quality housing, dampness and condensation, poor electrical wiring and unsafe appliances not being repaired, with landlords too often responding to complaints by harassing, threatening and bullying."
John Blackwood, chief executive of the Scottish Association of Landlords (SAL) said: "As the CAS report acknowledges, most private landlords are doing the right thing and acting responsibly.
"The sector is already, and rightly, heavily regulated but it is important that those existing rules are enforced to ensure that rogue and criminal landlords are driven out of the market.
"These individuals do enormous harm to the reputation and business of our members and we will work with any partners to do more to eliminate them and their practices.
"SAL welcomes the call from CAS to encourage tenants to know their rights and take action against such bad practice." 
Summarize: 
Citizens Advice Scotland (CAS) is calling for more to be done to tackle bad landlords in the private housing sector.
It was contacted by more than 6,000 tenants last year to report problems with landlords and poor housing.
The Scottish Association of Landlords said it was important that rules were enforced to drive rogue landlords out.
The number of tenants contacting CAS last year increased by 23% over the previous two years.
It's report highlights multiple cases of landlords failing to meet their legal responsibilities, refusing to do basic repairs and bullying or intimidating their tenants.
The organisation said it deals with 24 private rented housing
Ilyas Ashar, 84, who repeatedly raped the girl at his Salford home, had his sentence extended from 13 years to 15 years by the Court of Appeal.
His wife, Tallat Ashar, 69, had her sentence increased from five years to six years.
The couple were originally sentenced at Manchester Crown Court in October 2013.
Ilyas Ashar was found guilty of 13 counts of rape as well as benefit fraud and trafficking.
Tallat Ashar was convicted of benefit fraud and trafficking.
The Court of Appeal increased the sentences on an application by Solicitor General Oliver Heald QC, who argued that they were unduly lenient.
Greater Manchester Police said the pair claimed thousands of pounds of benefits in the girl's name, while she was made to clean and cook at several houses belonging to the family.
The girl, now in her 20s, was found in the "sparse, cold and damp" cellar in 2009 by trading standards staff investigating allegations of illegal activity. 
Summarize: 
The girl was found in the "sparse, cold and damp" cellar in 2009 by trading standards staff investigating allegations of illegal activity.
She was taken to hospital where she was examined and found to have suffered a "significant sexual assault".
She was then taken to the police station where she was examined and found to have suffered a "significant sexual assault".
She was then taken to the police station where she was examined and found to have suffered a "significant sexual assault".
She was then taken to the police station where she was examined and found to have suffered a "significant sexual assault".
She was then taken to the
Anthony McSweeney, 70, was jailed for three years in 2015 for abusing a boy at a west London care home.
In the wake of the case an independent review was commissioned by the Dioceses of Brentwood and East Anglia.
The review said McSweeney was found with videos of adolescent boys in 1998 but this was not reported to police.
The review revealed how McSweeney was moved in 1999 from the Diocese of Brentwood, where he served at Saint Luke's in Harlow and at Saint Peter's in Eastwood, to St George's Parish, Norwich, which is part of the Diocese of East Anglia, after the tapes were discovered.
McSweeney's abuse conviction related to indecent assault and making indecent images of children between 1979 and 1981.
He was investigated as part of a police probe into allegations of a paedophile ring at the Grafton Close Children's Home in Hounslow.
In 1984, McSweeney was ordained at Ilford.
In a joint statement, the Dioceses of Brentwood and East Anglia said: "At the time of these events awareness of the need for child protection was in its infancy.
"Now over 95% of parishes have at least one safeguarding representative whose task it is to ensure that the concerns of the local clergy and parishioners are taken seriously, and to refer those concerns to the diocesan safeguarding coordinator." 
Summarize: 
The Diocese of East Anglia said it had been made aware of the allegations against McSweeney in 1998.
It said: "The diocese was aware of the allegations against him in 1998 and he was removed from ministry in 1999.
"The diocese has been informed that the allegations against him were not reported to the police at the time."
The Diocese of Brentwood said it had been made aware of the allegations against McSweeney in 1998.
It said: "The diocese was aware of the allegations against him in 1998 and he was removed from ministry in 1999.
"The diocese
A pitch inspection at 09:15 BST found the surface to be in an unplayable condition following heavy overnight rain.
No new date has been set for the rearranged fixture. 
Summarize: 
"Note: Gillingham's goal difference is the same as that of the other team"
The Chartered Institute of Public Finance and Accountancy said households face the largest rise in a decade.
There were 307 responses to its survey on bills for Band D properties, sent to all 420 English authorities.
The government said council tax was expected to be lower at the end of this parliament in real terms than in 2010.
Reality Check: What's the deal with council tax increases?
There are eight different council tax bill bands, based on the value of the property.
According to CIPFA, the above-inflation rise will take the average Band D bill across England to £1,590.53, an increase of £60.94.
It said the average increase includes contributions for police, fire, the Greater London Authority, and those without social care responsibilities.
Authorities with responsibility for social care are permitted to raise bills by up to 4.99% without triggering a referendum.
Smaller councils excluded from social care obligations can increase bills by up to 1.99%.
CIPFA said its survey indicated that 70% of the authorities responsible for social care were taking advantage of the extra 3% rise available to them.
The survey suggested among the authorities entitled to impose an additional social care precept - English counties, unitaries, metropolitan districts and London boroughs - the average increase on a Band D property would be 4.3%, 4.8%, 4.9% and 3.9% respectively.
Sean Nolan, director for local government at CIPFA, said the expected rise in council tax bills comes after six years of very low increases.
He said this was actively encouraged by the government, which had offered a grant if councils did not raise bills.
"The subsequent removal of this freeze grant shows a clear shift in public policy in general, but also a reflection of the strains being caused by social care pressures."
A spokesman for the Department for Communities and Local Government said it had "protected" residents by allowing them to veto excessive rises at a referendum.
He said a four-year funding settlement gives local authorities "the certainty they need to plan ahead", with almost £200bn being made available.
He added: "We've also announced an additional £900m for social care, meaning councils will have £7.6bn of dedicated funding to spend over this period." 
Summarize:  The government has announced that it will allow councils to raise council tax by up to 4.99% without a referendum.
This will mean that the average Band D council tax bill will rise by £60.94.
The government said it had protected residents by allowing them to veto excessive rises at a referendum.
The government said councils would have £7.6bn of dedicated funding to spend over this period.
The government said it would also give councils the power to raise council tax by up to 4.99% without a referendum.
The government said it would also give councils the power to raise council tax by up to
First TransPennine Express trains will be diverted, with fewer services to Chorley, Horwich Parkway and Lostock.
Diesel trains that currently run on the line will no longer be able to use it.
Network Rail said the Â£400m scheme will improve journey times. Work on the line to Chorley is due to begin on 8 December.
Hassard Stacpoole from Network Rail said: "The railway was built 170 years ago and we have to be able to put the equipment in to electrify the line, that is the overhead wires which carry the power.
"We are also upgrading the line speed, so journey times between places like Preston and Manchester and Bolton and Manchester will be quicker."
The first part of the electrification programme linking Manchester to the West Coast Mainline has been completed.
First TransPennine Express said the majority of services operating between Manchester and Cumbria / Scotland will be re-routed via Wigan.
A spokesman said trains would run during peak times on the Chorley route.
The electrification of the line is part of the government's plan for a new Northern Hub, from London to Birmingham and to Manchester and Leeds, announced in 2009.
Work on the line to Chorley is expected to be completed in 2016. 
Summarize: 
The electrification of the line is part of the government's plan for a new Northern Hub, from London to Birmingham and to Manchester and Leeds, announced in 2009.
Work on the line to Chorley is expected to be completed in 2016.
The electrification of the line is part of the government's plan for a new Northern Hub, from London to Birmingham and to Manchester and Leeds, announced in 2009.
Work on the line to Chorley is expected to be completed in 2016.
The electrification of the line is part of the government's plan for a new Northern Hub, from London to
Ms Kendall joined the BBC in 1983 as a trainee for the World Service and has reported on major global conflicts.
She will take up her post in July, taking over from the current master, Professor Adrian Dixon.
Peterhouse - Cambridge University's oldest college - has only been admitting women since 1985.
Ms Kendall said: "I feel very privileged to have been chosen by the fellows of Peterhouse to be their next master.
"On my visits to the college I have been struck by its friendly atmosphere and the way it has turned its reputation of being the university's oldest and smallest college to its advantage - balancing a respect for traditions with a readiness to adapt and innovate, and remaining small enough to foster an intimate environment, yet seek engagement with the wider world.
"I am thrilled to be joining the college and look forward to collaborating with everyone at Peterhouse on the challenges and opportunities ahead."
Professor Dixon said: "Bridget will bring to the college her exceptional skills in communication and knowledge of international affairs. She also provides an outstanding role model for students and young academics alike.
"Peterhouse has enjoyed great benefit by electing masters from a wide range of backgrounds: these include the church, the armed forces, the diplomatic services as well as academia.
"A distinguished BBC correspondent brings yet a new dimension and I greatly look forward to working with Bridget during the summer handover." 
Summarize: 
"Bridget Kendall has been appointed Master of Peterhouse, Cambridge University, from July 2013.
"Ms Kendall joined the BBC in 1983 as a trainee for the World Service and has reported on major global conflicts.
"She will take up her post in July, taking over from the current master, Professor Adrian Dixon.
"Peterhouse - Cambridge University's oldest college - has only been admitting women since 1985.
"Ms Kendall said: "I feel very privileged to have been chosen by the fellows of Peterhouse to be their next master.
"On my visits to the college
Police said four flag poles were damaged during the incident in the Diamond area.
It was reported shortly after 03:00 BST on Sunday.
The Orange Order has described the theft as "a deplorable act". 
Summarize: 
The Orange Order has described the theft as "a deplorable act".
The Orange Order has described the theft as "a deplorable act".
The Orange Order has described the theft as "a deplorable act".
The Orange Order has described the theft as "a deplorable act".
The Orange Order has described the theft as "a deplorable act".
The Orange Order has described the theft as "a deplorable act".
The Orange Order has described the theft as "a deplorable act".
The Orange Order has described the theft as "a deplorable act".
He will be available for three Championship games, eight in the T20 Blast and three in the One-Day Cup between 9 June and 18 July.
The 25-year-old scored 2,633 runs for New Zealand in 2015 across all formats, including eight centuries.
"His value as a player is beyond question," said Yorkshire head coach Jason Gillespie.
"His attitude, work ethic and leadership as an overseas player is brilliant."
Williamson and England's Joe Root, a Yorkshire team-mate, are currently joint second in the International Cricket Council Test batting rankings behind Australia captain Steve Smith.
The White Rose county have won the Championship title for the past two seasons and are looking to become the first side to do so three times in a row since their Yorkshire predecessors from 1966-1968.
"I am looking forward to joining the team for a third term this summer," Williamson told the Yorkshire website.
"It is enjoyable being part of a successful team that are hungry for ongoing success." 
Summarize: 
The Yorkshire team is made up of the following players:
The Yorkshire team is made up of the following players:
The Yorkshire team is made up of the following players:
The Yorkshire team is made up of the following players:
The Yorkshire team is made up of the following players:
The Yorkshire team is made up of the following players:
The Yorkshire team is made up of the following players:
The Yorkshire team is made up of the following players:
The Yorkshire team is made up of the following players:
The Yorkshire team is made up of the following
Goldson had preventative surgery on 30 March after an issue was detected during routine screening in February.
The 24-year-old has made 35 appearances for the Seagulls since signing from Shrewsbury Town in August 2015.
"I think as each day goes past and he feels better, he'll be more optimistic," Hughton told BBC Sussex.
"We're delighted with how it's gone and hopefully look forward to seeing him back in as quickly as possible.
"Of course being able to train in pre-season and look forward to next season, that's our hopes." 
Summarize: 
Goldson has been a regular for Brighton since his arrival from Shrewsbury Town in August 2015. He has made 35 appearances for the Seagulls in all competitions, scoring one goal.
Goldson has been a regular for Brighton since his arrival from Shrewsbury Town in August 2015. He has made 35 appearances for the Seagulls in all competitions, scoring one goal.
Goldson has been a regular for Brighton since his arrival from Shrewsbury Town in August 2015. He has made 35 appearances for the Seagulls in all competitions, scoring one goal.
Media playback is not supported on this device
The British men took the lead three times - through Phil Roper, Alastair Brogdon and Alan Forsyth - and each time they were pegged back.
Nevertheless, they top Pool A thanks to good wins against Canada and the world champions Australia.
On Thursday, Britain play the hosts India, who came bottom of pool B after two defeats and a draw.
"We're a bit disappointed we didn't play better but Belgium are a really strong side," Great Britain captain Dan Fox told BBC Sport.
"But, actually, we got the point we needed to top the group and we'll take it from there on Thursday."
India now stand between a much-changed Great Britain squad and their pre-tournament aim of reaching the semi-finals.
"They play really attacking hockey, they've got a lot of skilful players, and what we'll look to do is take the game to them," added Fox.
"The crowd will also be right behind them, so it'll be tough." 
Summarize: 
The British men took the lead three times - through Phil Roper, Alastair Brogdon and Alan Forsyth - and each time they were pegged back. Nevertheless, they top Pool A thanks to good wins against Canada and the world champions Australia. On Thursday, Britain play the hosts India, who came bottom of pool B after two defeats and a draw. "We're a bit disappointed we didn't play better but Belgium are a really strong side," Great Britain captain Dan Fox told BBC Sport. "But, actually, we got the point we needed to top the group and we'll take it from there on Thursday."
In a statement released on Sunday, it said that 101 of those freed were children and a further 67 were women.
The statement did not say if the girls abducted from a school in Chibok in April 2014 were among them.
The military also says that a Boko Haram commander was captured and several camps were cleared.
Boko Haram has killed some 5,500 civilians in Nigeria since 2014.
More than 200 of the Chibok girls are still missing, more than a year after they were kidnapped from their school in northern Nigeria.
Last October, the government said it had secured an agreement for a ceasefire and the release of the girls taken from Chibok, but Boko Haram subsequently denied this.
The abduction of the girls in Chibok sparked global outrage with many joining a campaign online to free them using the hashtag #BringBackOurGirls.
Several nations including the US and China vowed to help find them and there have been reported sightings of the girls, but none has been found to date.
At least 2,000 women and girls abducted by Boko Haram since the start of 2014, according to the human rights organisation Amnesty International.
Boko Haram's insurgency, and the army campaign against it, have killed more than 15,500 people since 2012. The violence has recently spread to neighbouring Niger, Chad and Cameroon.
Will new military base help defeat Boko Haram?
Why Boko Haram remains a threat 
Summarize:  Boko Haram is a terrorist group that has been fighting the Nigerian government since 2009. It has been responsible for the deaths of thousands of people, including civilians. Boko Haram has been known to have ties to Al-Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb.
Boko Haram is an Islamic extremist group that has been fighting the Nigerian government since 2009. It has been responsible for the deaths of thousands of people, including civilians. Boko Haram has been known to have ties to Al-Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb.
Boko Haram is an Islamic extremist group that has been fighting the Nigerian government since 2009. It has been responsible for the
Milton Keynes police boss Supt Gez Chiariello is alleged to have breached standards in relation to authority, respect and courtesy.
The 46-year-old joined Thames Valley Police in 2007 and became the town's area commander in 2014. He has been suspended from duty with immediate effect.
Acting Supt Vince Grey has been appointed to fill his role.
A date is yet to be scheduled for the misconduct hearing.
Deputy Chief Constable John Campbell said: "Thames Valley Police's professional standards department is currently investigating allegations of misconduct into Supt Gez Chiariello.
"The facts will be heard by a panel, chaired by a legally qualified independent chairperson, who will determine if there is a case to answer for gross misconduct and if there is, the appropriate sanction to be applied." 
Summarize: 
"The police officer was suspended from duty with immediate effect pending the outcome of the investigation.
"The force's professional standards department is investigating allegations of misconduct against the officer.
"The allegations relate to his behaviour towards a member of the public."
"The force's professional standards department is investigating allegations of misconduct against the officer.
"The allegations relate to his behaviour towards a member of the public."
"The force's professional standards department is investigating allegations of misconduct against the officer.
"The allegations relate to his behaviour towards a member of the public."
"The force's professional standards department is
They map out the procession, St Paul's Cathedral ceremony, military flypast, and the coffin's transportation on the Thames and by train for burial in Oxfordshire.
Seller Janet Bunnett was given the plans of "Operation Hope Not" by her policeman father, who worked the day of the funeral, on 30 January 1965.
They are expected to fetch between £400 and £600 when they are auctioned later.
Ms Bunnett, of Westerham, Kent, said her father Philip Bainbridge told her people were "running around like scolded chickens" behind the scenes on the day.
The former prime minister had died of a stroke on 24 January.
Talking of her father's role, Ms Bunnett said: "He was pretty busy.
"He didn't say an awful lot about it. I think he was sad to have to do it, because he'd been all through the war, and of course Winston Churchill was very famous.
"But he just wanted to do it well for the Old Man. So that's what they did, they worked really hard."
One million mourners lined the route, while 350 million people watched it on television around the globe.
The coffin was later transported via train to Oxfordshire for the private family burial in St Martin's Church in Bladon, close to Blenheim Palace.
Ms Bunnett said she was auctioning off the documents because she could not choose which of her six grandchildren to pass them on to.
"I thought if I could sell it... I could give them £100 each," she added.
"I know it's not a lot of money, but it would be something from their great granddad."
The documents go under the hammer at Farleigh Court Golf Course near Warlingham, Surrey.
Also on sale is a Winston Churchill Toby jug from 1940.
Designed by Clarice Cliff after Churchill became prime minister, only 350 of the 31cm (12.2 in) high jugs were produced.
It is estimated to sell for between £600 and £1,000. 
Summarize: 
The funeral procession was the largest ever seen in London.
The coffin was carried by a horse-drawn gun carriage from Westminster Hall to St Paul's Cathedral.
The coffin was then taken by train to Blenheim Palace, where it was placed in a temporary vault.
The coffin was then taken by train to Oxfordshire, where it was placed in a vault in St Martin's Church, Bladon.
The coffin was then taken by train to Westminster Abbey, where it was placed in the Poet's Corner.
The coffin was then taken by train to the RAF College, Cranwell, where it was placed
Joseph Hedley was killed in in his cottage in Tynedale, Northumberland. The crime has never been solved.
After being demolished in 1872, a team at Beamish Museum has now used records from old maps to find the location of what remains of his home.
Now the museum plans to recreate the building in its new development.
Murdered at his cottage on 3 January 1826, Mr Hedley's body was found by concerned neighbours.
Despite the crime making national headlines and a substantial reward being offered, his killer was never found.
Even though the cottage was demolished, sketches made in the wake of his death gave an "extremely rare insight" into its history.
A team at the museum used records from old maps and descriptions of the crime to identify the approximate location of the house.
Once they had discovered the rough site, they found parts of the building in the field.
Now the museum is going to excavate the site with members of the community so it can be replicated in its Georgian area.
Project officer Geraldine Straker said his life story is "fascinating" yet "tragic".
"We really want the local community to be part of this project to recreate Joe's cottage at Beamish, so we'll be letting people know how they can get involved, from taking part in excavating his cottage, to helping plan its recreation at Beamish," she said.
The move is part of a Â£17m development which will see the museum's Georgian area expanded, with new features including a Georgian coaching inn.
The project, which has received a Â£10.75m grant from the Heritage Lottery Fund, will also include  dedicated areas for people living with dementia, a cinema and a new 1950s development with replica social housing, a cafe, shops and police house, 
Summarize: 
The museum has a collection of over 10,000 objects, including items from the Iron Age, Roman and medieval periods.
The museum has a collection of over 10,000 objects, including items from the Iron Age, Roman and medieval periods.
The museum has a collection of over 10,000 objects, including items from the Iron Age, Roman and medieval periods.
The museum has a collection of over 10,000 objects, including items from the Iron Age, Roman and medieval periods.
The museum has a collection of over 10,000 objects, including items from the Iron Age, Roman and medieval
Police were called to a house on the Glenshane Road at about 04:30 BST on Saturday.
Det Ch Insp Michael Harvey said the 36-year-old woman's death was unexplained and was being treated as suspicious at present.
A post mortem examination will be carried out to establish the cause of death.
Police appealed for anyone with information to contact them. 
Summarize: 
The victim was found dead in her home in the Glenshane Road area of the town at about 04:30 BST on Saturday.
Police were called to the house and a post mortem examination will be carried out to establish the cause of death.
Police appealed for anyone with information to contact them.
The victim's name has not been released.
The death is being treated as unexplained at present.
A post mortem examination will be carried out to establish the cause of death.
Police appealed for anyone with information to contact them.
The victim's name has not
Emma Welch, 14, died on Thursday after complications during surgery to correct curvature of the spine.
Four days before her operation, she had led the bid to set a record for the largest number of teddies assembled on a mountaintop.
Emma and a team of volunteers climbed Snowdon with 135 soft toys in tow.
The teenager, of Chilcompton, Somerset, had also completed a 1,000-mile (1,609km) bike ride and scaled a height equivalent to Mount Everest on a climbing wall in aid of Brain Tumour Research.
Her fundraising efforts were inspired by Andrew Stammers, her minister at the Radstock Baptist Church, who has a brain tumour.
Mr Stammers, who is in close contact with Emma's parents Tony and Lesley, said she was "an amazing young woman" who "put everyone before herself".
"Her passion and determination was exceptional," he said.
"Emma did consider delaying her ascent of Snowdon until after her surgery, so I am so glad she went ahead with it."
"We now have such wonderful memories and pictures of her from that day as a lasting legacy."
Liz Fussey, of Brain Tumour Research, said Emma, who was diagnosed with scoliosis in 2012, had raised more than Â£5,000 for the charity.
"I have never encountered anyone like her, such drive and tenacity in someone so young," she said.
"I am deeply saddened and my heart goes out to Tony and Lesley for the loss of their adored daughter."
Emma's family have asked well-wishers to make donations through her Justgiving page as an alternative to flowers. 
Summarize:  Emma Welch, 14, died on Thursday after complications during surgery to correct curvature of the spine. Four days before her operation, she had led the bid to set a record for the largest number of teddies assembled on a mountaintop. Emma and a team of volunteers climbed Snowdon with 135 soft toys in tow. The teenager, of Chilcompton, Somerset, had also completed a 1,000-mile (1,609km) bike ride and scaled a height equivalent to Mount Everest on a climbing wall in aid of Brain Tumour Research. Her fundraising efforts were inspired by Andrew Stammers, her minister at
The 24-year-old, whose real name is Zoe Sugg, will drag down the average age of the competitors, who also include Jonathan Ross, Lulu, and former Prime Minister Gordon Brown's wife Sarah.
"I was genuinely a little bit shocked and very excited when I was asked to take part," she said.
The series begins on 11 February.
Taking place over four weeks, it will see 16 celebrities compete to be named star baker by show stalwarts Mary Berry and Paul Hollywood.
The line-up features former Radio 1 DJ Chris Moyles, fashionista Alexa Chung, comedian David Mitchell and TV presenter Gok Wan.
They are joined by DJ Jameela Jamil, comediennes Victoria Wood and Jennifer Saunders, Strictly champion Abbey Clancy and Kayvan Novak, from Channel 4's Fonejacker series.
Mary Berry said it had been "great fun" filming the series.
"Although there were some baking catastrophes, some surprising hidden skills were revealed," she added.
"One thing for certain is that anyone can have a go at baking and it's a great way to raise money for Comic Relief - and you are guaranteed to have a lot of fun!"
Regular presenters Sue Perkins and Mel Giedroyc will be joined by Jo Brand and Ed Byrne for the series, while an episode of spin-off show An Extra Slice will be broadcast on Red Nose Day itself, Friday, 13 March.
The bakery show has proved a great success, spawning a US spin-off and recently winning a National Television Award for "best skills-based reality series".
But Perkins recently revealed she had twice turned down the opportunity to work on the show.
"I have no ability to work out what is a good thing to do or not," she told Jonathan Ross on his ITV chat show. "I said no because [it] sounded ludicrous".
She added that the series had often turned contestants into divas.
"Sometimes television changes people," she said.
"It's amazing how quickly they turn," added her co-host, Giedroyc.
"Week one, they're all lovely. Week three, 'oh darling, this bowl isn't big enough.'" 
Summarize: 
The series will see 16 celebrities compete to be named star baker by show stalwarts Mary Berry and Paul Hollywood.
The line-up features former Radio 1 DJ Chris Moyles, fashionista Alexa Chung, comedian David Mitchell and TV presenter Gok Wan.
They are joined by DJ Jameela Jamil, comediennes Victoria Wood and Jennifer Saunders, Strictly champion Abbey Clancy and Kayvan Novak, from Channel 4's Fonejacker series.
Mary Berry said it had been "great fun" filming the series.
"Although there were some baking catastrophes, some surprising hidden skills were revealed
The centre-right governing coalition has vowed to continue austerity policies in place since 2011, after it was forced to seek a eurozone bailout.
The Socialists and other left-wing groups have criticised the cuts.
President Anibal Cavaco Silva called for a high turnout on Sunday, saying Portugal was facing a crucial moment.
The BBC's Alison Roberts in Lisbon says years of austerity have left Portugal's electorate deeply split, and with an unusually large number of undecided voters.
Socialist leader Antonio Costa has said that only a vote for his party is a "useful vote" against the government.
The centre-right Social Democratic Party led by Prime Minister Pedro Passos Coelho, and its right-wing ally, the People's Party, have put up joint lists of candidates in all electoral districts.
Unemployment has been falling for two and a half years, but many regard the recovery as fragile.
Read more: Coalition hopes to survive austerity anger
12%
of the workforce is unemployed
20%
of people live below the poverty line
485,000 emigrated from Portugal between 2011 and 2014
125% debt to GDP - the second highest rate in the European Union 
Summarize:  The Portuguese economy has been in a deep recession since 2011. The economy shrank by 4.5% in 2012, and by 3.2% in 2013. The economy is expected to grow by 0.5% in 2014, and by 1.5% in 2015. The unemployment rate is expected to fall to 12.5% in 2015.
The Portuguese economy has been in a deep recession since 2011. The economy shrank by 4.5% in 2012, and by 3.2% in 2013. The economy is expected to grow by 0.5% in 2014, and by 1.5% in 2015
There has been "repeated verbal demands about my removal from the post," he said in a letter to the president.
It comes a day after the Taliban killed at least 50 people including soldiers in a siege at Kandahar airport.
Mr Nabil and the president differ on Pakistan's role in fighting the militants, says the BBC's Dawood Azami.
Afghan officials often accuse neighbouring Pakistan of supporting Taliban activities in their country.
On Wednesday, Mr Ghani asked Islamabad to help broker peace negotiations with the insurgents during a regional peace conference in the country.
In a Facebook post on Tuesday, Mr Nabil doubted the positive outcome of President Ghani's visit to Pakistan and lashed out at Afghanistan's neighbour for "harbouring and supporting terrorism".
There have been reports that since President Ghani came to power last year, he has sidelined the intelligence chief over his stance on the government's policy towards its neighbour.
Mr Nabil had been heading the National Directorate of Security (NDS), for about five years.
He was briefly sacked in 2012 by former President Hamid Karzai before he was reinstated.
However, some are blaming him for recent escalation in Taliban attacks in the country, including the brief seizure of northern city of Kunduz in September.
Correspondents say the attacks in Kandahar and Kunduz have exposed a huge failure by the Afghan security forces. 
Summarize: 
1) Nabil is a former intelligence chief and a close aide of Hamid Karzai. He was sacked by Karzai in 2012, but was reinstated by Ghani.
2) Nabil is blamed for the recent escalation in Taliban attacks in the country.
3) He is a close aide of Hamid Karzai, and is blamed for the recent escalation in Taliban attacks in the country.
4) He is a close aide of Hamid Karzai, and is blamed for the recent escalation in Taliban attacks in the country.
5) He is a close aide of Hamid Karzai, and is blamed
Jones will name his first squad since being appointed England head coach on Wednesday for the upcoming Six Nations.
Injuries to a number of in-form players mean the Australian could call-up some unfamiliar names with Lewington, 24, a potential contender in the back line.
"With a couple of injuries, you never know. It would be amazing if a surprise call came through," he told BBC Sport.
Lewington has scored two tries in his last two games to help London Irish move off the bottom of the Premiership.
But the former Leicester winger, who represented his country against the Barbarians in May, has not spoken with any of the England coaching set-up this season.
"They've got a lot of things to worry about having only been in post since last month," Lewington said. "I'm probably not as high up on the priority list as a lot of other selections they've got to consider.
"But, with the injuries in the last couple of weeks, I would hope I'm in the mix to be an outside chance potentially." 
Summarize: 
Lewington is a former Leicester Tigers player who has represented England at U20 and U21 level. He has also represented England Saxons.
Lewington has played for London Irish since 2014.
Lewington has scored two tries in his last two games to help London Irish move off the bottom of the Premiership.
Lewington has scored two tries in his last two games to help London Irish move off the bottom of the Premiership.
Lewington has scored two tries in his last two games to help London Irish move off the bottom of the Premiership.
Lewington has scored two tries in his last two games to help London
Almost 200 people were injured in the blast in Kunshan, a city in the eastern province of Jiangsu, China's official Xinhua news agency said.
Pictures posted online showed people with burns sitting on the ground outside a factory complex from which black smoke was billowing.
Xinhua said five company employees had been detained.
The factory belonged to the Kunshan Zhongrong Metal Products company.
The company manufactures car parts and employs about 450 workers. Its clients include US giant General Motors, CCTV reported.
State media reports say that explosion took place inside a wheel hub polishing workshop and that 264 workers were at the site at the time of the explosion.
Xinhua said 44 people had died immediately and the total of injured stood at 187.
Initial reports suggested the explosion, which was heard several kilometres away, occurred when a flame was lit in a dust-filled room.
Glass was shattered up to 500 metres away.
Kunshan is about an hour's drive from Shanghai, where some of the injured were taken for treatment. Others were taken to Suzhou.
One doctor on the Weibo microblog account of CCTV said:  "In my 20 years of work, I've never seen so many patients with burns on over 80% of their bodies."
Industrial accidents are relatively common in China, says the BBC's John Sudworth in Shanghai, although figures show safety in some industries has been improving in recent years.
Some 119 people died in a fire at a poultry plant in northern Jilin province in June last year. 
Summarize: 
The explosion occurred at a factory in Kunshan, a city in the eastern province of Jiangsu, China's official Xinhua news agency said.
Pictures posted online showed people with burns sitting on the ground outside a factory complex from which black smoke was billowing.
Xinhua said five company employees had been detained.
The factory belonged to the Kunshan Zhongrong Metal Products company.
The company manufactures car parts and employs about 450 workers. Its clients include US giant General Motors, CCTV reported.
State media reports say that explosion took place inside a wheel hub polishing workshop and that 264
Organiser have been unable to secure the continued use of the site's venue in Ullapool.
The 2017 festival, which will be its 13th year, will be held on the town's pier with support from Ullapool Harbour Trustees.
Organisers said this will mean the event will no longer offer a campsite and tickets will be restricted.
Dates for next year's event are 29 and 30 September.
Over the last 12 years, Loopallu's performers have included Paolo Nutini, Franz Ferdinand, Mumford and Sons and Jake Bugg.
This year's festival's headliners included The Wonder Stuff and The Stranglers. 
Summarize: 
Loopallu Festival is a music festival held in Ullapool, Scotland.
The festival was founded in 2003 by John Macleod and is now run by his son, John Macleod Jr.
The festival takes place on the town's pier and features a mix of local and international acts.
Loopallu Festival has been described as "a small, intimate, family-friendly festival with a focus on quality, not quantity".
The festival is held on the town's pier and is free to attend.
The festival's organisers have said that they are committed to providing a good experience for all attendees
Andrea Lewis, 51, was found dead at a property on Fairyland Road, Tonna, Neath, on 30 January with injuries to her skull and torso.
Rhys Hobbs, 46, of Tonna, was due to stand trial for murder but pleaded guilty to manslaughter last month.
On Thursday, he was jailed at Swansea Crown Court for the "violent and protracted" attack.
The court heard Ms Lewis had been stamped on following a drunken row.
In the weeks running up to her death, she was covered in bruises and had a black eye - but told friends she had fallen.
After Hobbs attacked her in his home, Ms Lewis was dragged outside while half-dressed. She was found dead the next day.
Judge Keith Thomas said: "Andrea Lewis... became dominated by you. She felt unable to break ties with you and there is no doubt that you hit her regularly.
"Her friends and work colleagues saw injuries on her which she tried to disguise.
"The attack on her was violent and protracted... She was vulnerable and effectively defenceless."
After the hearing, Det Insp Rob Cronick said Ms Lewis had been "the victim of domestic abuse which ultimately led to her death". 
Summarize: 
Andrea Lewis, 51, was found dead at a property on Fairyland Road, Tonna, Neath, on 30 January with injuries to her skull and torso.
Rhys Hobbs, 46, of Tonna, was due to stand trial for murder but pleaded guilty to manslaughter last month.
On Thursday, he was jailed at Swansea Crown Court for the "violent and protracted" attack.
The court heard Ms Lewis had been stamped on following a drunken row.
In the weeks running up to her death, she was covered in bruises and had a black eye - but told friends she had fallen.
After
Last week, talks between unions and management from NI Water failed to reach agreement.
Members of Nipsa, Unite and the GMB voted for a work-to-rule and withdrawal of on-call services and overtime, from Monday.
Regional Development Minister Danny Kennedy has warned this could cause "abject misery" to households.
The Labour Relations Agency has been called in to try to broker an 11th-hour resolution to the row.
Joanne McWilliams, from Unite, said all three unions were prepared to continue with further talks.
"All three unions are willing to continue with negotiations in order to attempt to find a solution and avoid disruption to communities," she said.
"We have set out our position to both the minister and NI Water, but unless the pension proposals are taken off the table, our members have no alternative but to commence action."
NI Water's chief executive Sara Venning warned customers they may experience interruptions to supply over Christmas because of the industrial action. 
Summarize: 
1. The unions have called for a meeting with the minister and NI Water to discuss the pension proposals.
2. The unions have called for a meeting with the minister and NI Water to discuss the pension proposals.
3. The unions have called for a meeting with the minister and NI Water to discuss the pension proposals.
4. The unions have called for a meeting with the minister and NI Water to discuss the pension proposals.
5. The unions have called for a meeting with the minister and NI Water to discuss the pension proposals.
6. The unions have called for a meeting with the minister and NI Water to
The 23-year-old started his career at FC Utrecht before moving to Eredivisie rivals Ajax in July 2013.
He was called up to the Netherlands senior squad in 2013, having played for his country at Under-21 level.
Van der Hoorn is Swansea's second signing of the summer after fellow Dutchman Leroy Fer joined from QPR in a permanent deal.
Fer, 26, made nine appearances on loan with the Swans during the 2015-16 season. 
Summarize: 
Swansea City
Ajax
Netherlands U21
Individual
Marc Veyrat illegally destroyed the trees near the La Maison des Bois (House of the Trees) in the Alps.
The court in Annecy also heard Mr Veyrat ordered a large portion of protected wetlands to be dried up.
He was one of five chefs picked to cook for world leaders at the Paris talks.
He was ordered by the court to pay a fine of â‚¬100,000 (Â£73,000; $108,000) and to restore the wetlands within three months.
Mr Veyrat, who has twice obtained three Michelin stars, told the court he acted with the best of intentions, as he built an educational centre for children.
He also built a botanical garden, beehives and greenhouses at the site, near the town of Manigod in the Haute-Savoie region.
After the hearing, Mr Veyrat apologised, saying: " I am not above the law. Anyone can make a mistake, even me."
At the end of the talks in Paris, countries agreed to a firm goal of keeping temperature rises well below 2C, and will strive for 1.5C.
But one study claims that deforestation is the second-largest man-made contributor of C02 into the atmosphere, which is seen as a major contributory factor to temperature rises. 
Summarize: 
1. The French court in Annecy fined the French chef, Yves Veyrat, for illegally destroying the trees near the La Maison des Bois (House of the Trees) in the Alps.
2. The court in Annecy also heard Mr Veyrat ordered a large portion of protected wetlands to be dried up.
3. He was one of five chefs picked to cook for world leaders at the Paris talks.
4. He was ordered by the court to pay a fine of Â£73,000 (Â£108,000; $108,000) and to restore the wetlands within
Media playback is not supported on this device
The Hatters led at the break through Luke Guttridge's stunning 30-yard shot.
Yan Klulowski volleyed an equaliser, but Paul Benson bundled the ball over the line to put Luton back in front.
Aaron O'Connor nodded Newport level again, but substitute Ricky Miller's shot made it 3-2 and Jake Howells sealed victory with a fine low shot.
Luton Town manager John Still told BBC Three Counties Radio:
Media playback is not supported on this device
"We've played well today, moved the ball well, created chances and scored four goals, so I've got to be happy.
"In the FA Cup you've just got to get through and we've done that today.
"As far as I'm concerned, we need to approach this competition as we would a Football League match - absolutely 100%."
Newport County manager Justin Edinburgh told BBC Radio Wales:
"We're bitterly disappointed not to have got something out of the game in the end.
"We went behind from a poor decision, a blatant free-kick. A couple of key decisions have gone against us.
"We got back into the game, I thought we played really, really well at times.
"We'll put in a report, highlight those key incidents that we feel continuously went against us." 
Summarize:  Newport County 0 Luton Town 4 (Guttridge 30, Klulowski 45, Benson 56, Howells 67)
Referee: Darren Drysdale (Kent)
Patrick McLoughlin said ministers were examining work by manufacturers to reduce aircraft emissions and would also look at the economic impact of the decision.
The Airports Commission has recommended expanding Heathrow and not Gatwick.
Prime Minister David Cameron is due to announce a decision by the end of 2015.
Gatwick Airport's chief executive Stewart Wingate said: "Heathrow's poor air quality already breaches legal limits and it is difficult to see how expansion could legally go ahead."
He said an expanded Heathrow would generate millions of extra car journeys.
But a Heathrow spokesman said: "The government's Airports Commission confirmed a third runway at Heathrow can go ahead without breaching air quality legal limits, as long as we continue to implement our mitigation plans."
Heathrow has committed to having no extra airport-related road traffic after expansion by improving rail links, extending the London Low Emission Zone, and replacing local diesel buses with cleaner vehicles.
Sir Howard Davies, Airports Commission chairman, wrote to Mr McLoughlin last month and said appropriate measures could be taken to address air quality at an expanded Heathrow.
He claimed limited weight should be placed on the suggestion that the issue represented a significant obstacle.
Mr McLoughlin said ministers were looking at what companies such as Rolls Royce, who were at the leading edge of improving aircraft emissions, were doing.
He also said ministers had to make sure the UK overall was not put at an economic disadvantage. 
Summarize: 
The Airports Commission has recommended expanding Heathrow and not Gatwick.
The Airports Commission has recommended expanding Heathrow and not Gatwick.
The Airports Commission has recommended expanding Heathrow and not Gatwick.
The Airports Commission has recommended expanding Heathrow and not Gatwick.
The Airports Commission has recommended expanding Heathrow and not Gatwick.
The Airports Commission has recommended expanding Heathrow and not Gatwick.
The Airports Commission has recommended expanding Heathrow and not Gatwick.
The Airports Commission has recommended expanding Heathrow and not Gatwick.
The Airports Commission has recommended expanding
The incident occurred at 19:00 local time in Poddle Park in Kimmage.  The boy was pronounced dead at the scene.
A woman in her 40s is being treated for stab injuries in St James Hospital. Her condition is described as serious.
An investigation by the Garda Síochána (Irish police) is under way. The Garda technical bureau are to examine the scene, which is currently sealed off.
The Irish state pathologist has been notified. 
Summarize: 
The Irish Times reported that the boy was stabbed in the chest and the head.
The Irish Independent reported that the boy was stabbed in the chest and the head.
The Irish Independent reported that the boy was stabbed in the chest and the head.
The Irish Independent reported that the boy was stabbed in the chest and the head.
The Irish Independent reported that the boy was stabbed in the chest and the head.
The Irish Independent reported that the boy was stabbed in the chest and the head.
The Irish Independent reported that the boy was stabbed in the chest and the head.
ScotRail said five platforms at the station had been affected by the problem, which was reported at 07:00.
Many local services, as well as those bound for Aberdeen, Edinburgh and Inverness, were disrupted.
Some services had returned by midday but passengers have been warned to expect ongoing delays.
A spokeswoman for ScotRail said: "There are overhead wire problems which are affecting access to five platforms. Engineers are on site to diagnose and repair. It's not possible to say how long disruption to services will last."
She added: "Customers should retain their tickets as the nature of this disruption means they may be entitled to compensation through our Delay Repay scheme."
The electrical issue affected platforms 3, 4, 5, 6, 7 and 8 at Glasgow Central and caused cancellations on the Cathcart Circle, Newton, Neilston and Kilmarnock lines.
At the height of the disruption, high-level trains to dozens of stations in Glasgow, Lanarkshire, Renfrewshire and Ayrshire were affected.
ScotRail arranged for train tickets to be used on local FirstBus services to these stations and replacement buses were brought in from Perth and Stirling.
By midday, ScotRail said that engineers were still working to repair damage to overhead electric wires at Glasgow Central Station.
Services on the Cathcart Circle, to Glasgow's south side, remained suspended.
Trains between Glasgow and Lanark, via Motherwell, were running as were services to Neilston, Barrhead and Kilmarnock.
The Glasgow to Edinburgh via Shotts service was also running with delays and alterations expected.
ScotRail said other routes were also operating but warned that "short notice alterations/delays" were possible.
Passengers are urged to check their journey details on the ScotRail website. 
Summarize: 
On the morning of Friday, 30 March, ScotRail announced that the overhead wires at Glasgow Central Station had been damaged overnight.
The following services were affected:
ScotRail said that engineers were working to repair the damage.
The following services were affected:
ScotRail said that engineers were working to repair the damage.
The following services were affected:
ScotRail said that engineers were working to repair the damage.
The following services were affected:
ScotRail said that engineers were working to repair the damage.
The following services were affected:
ScotRail said
Jordan Bartliff, from South Yorkshire, put images showing his premature son's red and blistered skin on Facebook.
The father is warning other parents he fears there is a "bad batch" of the Little Angels newborn nappies.
Asda said "our hearts go out to the Bartliff family", adding it had withdrawn the product for tests.
In his first post Mr Bartliff said his child, who he does not name, had been wearing Little Angels newborn nappies for three-weeks "with no problems whatsoever" and that "he's not allergic to them".
But he said that following what appeared to be a "chemical reaction" his son, born five weeks premature, had needed hospital treatment on Saturday morning and was moved on to a ventilator after experiencing breathing difficulties.
"I wouldn't want it happening to any other little soul, so please be vigilant and careful with these nappies as it obviously is a bad batch," he added.
And in a later post he said Asda had "recalled" the nappies and that his son was in the process of being transferred to another hospital in Sheffield.
Asda said the supermarket chain had started investigating and had made a "nationwide call to remove the product on Monday afternoon".
Lizzy Massey, the chain's vice president of own brand, said: "Our hearts go out to the Bartliff family and hope their baby son makes a full recovery soon.
"We're in touch with his dad and have collected the nappies so that we can test them along with others in the batch.
"We take our responsibility to parents seriously and as a precaution we have decided to remove our Little Angels newborn nappies from sale until we know why this happened." 
Summarize: 
The nappies were recalled by Asda after the baby suffered a reaction to them.
The nappies were recalled by Asda after the baby suffered a reaction to them.
The nappies were recalled by Asda after the baby suffered a reaction to them.
The nappies were recalled by Asda after the baby suffered a reaction to them.
The nappies were recalled by Asda after the baby suffered a reaction to them.
The nappies were recalled by Asda after the baby suffered a reaction to them.
The nappies were recalled
Mohammed Raja, of Hudson Crescent, and Raja Sarwar, of Tern Street, both Bradford, were each jailed for four years at Bradford Crown Court for perverting the course of justice.
They helped 21-year-old Wakar Akhtar escape to Italy in November.
West Yorkshire Police said Akhtar could begin a 17-year sentence for rape following an extradition hearing.
Akhtar, of Hudson Avenue, was arrested in northern Italy on 29 November and is due to have the extradition hearing at the High Court in Brescia on Wednesday.
West Yorkshire Police said he was sentenced in his absence for raping a woman at Cousen Road recreation ground in Bradford.
Three other men from Bradford - Tamseel Virk, 43, Azad Raja, 39, and Najim Ul-Saeed - were also given 17-year sentences for their part in the rape conspiracy. 
Summarize: 
The gang of five men, who were all from Bradford, were jailed for a total of 17 years for their part in the rape conspiracy.
They were convicted of conspiracy to commit rape, conspiracy to pervert the course of justice and perverting the course of justice.
The five men were sentenced at Bradford Crown Court.
The court heard that the gang had been involved in a series of sexual assaults on women in the city.
They were convicted of conspiracy to commit rape, conspiracy to pervert the course of justice and perverting the course of justice.
The gang were jailed for a total of 17 years.
"A bluish foreign body" turned out to be a "hard mass" of 17 lenses stuck together with mucus, and 10 more were then found under further examination.
A report in the BMJ said she had worn disposable lenses for 35 years, and had not complained of any irritation.
But after they were removed, she said her eyes felt a lot more comfortable.
Specialist trainee in ophthalmology Rupal Morjaria told Optometry Today: "None of us have ever seen this before.
"It was such a large mass. All the 17 contact lenses were stuck together.
"We were really surprised that the patient didn't notice it because it would cause quite a lot of irritation while it was sitting there.
"She was quite shocked. She thought her previous discomfort was just part of old age and dry eye."
The case report said the patient had poorer vision in her right eye and deep-set eyes, which may have been a factor in the lenses becoming lost.
Association of Optometrists spokeswoman Ceri Smith-Jaynes said losing contact lenses in the eye was a common problem but they usually worked their way out.
"They are normally hiding, folded up under the top lid of the eye," she said.
"They can't go any further up than that because there is a pocket.
"It's the same under the bottom lid - the lens can only be in one of those places."
She said it was important to see an optometrist or optician regularly to avoid any issues when using contact lenses. 
Summarize:  A woman in her 70s was wearing contact lenses for 35 years. She had no problems with them. Then she lost them. She was shocked to find that they had become stuck together in her eye.
Police described the deaths of the men, aged 19 and 23, in Annan as "sudden and unexpected".
Their bodies were found a short time apart on Thursday.
Police Scotland said they were at the early stages of their investigation and appealed for anyone with information about the men to come forward.
Det Insp Scott Young said: "Sadly, I can confirm that two young men have died in Annan.
"For the deaths of these young people to occur in similar circumstances, in a short period of time and in a small geographical area, is unusual.
"We are keeping an open mind at the moment but one of the lines of inquiry is that the deaths may be drugs-related, so we take the opportunity to reiterate that there is no safe way to take drugs." 
Summarize: 
On Thursday, 19-year-old Jamie McQuade was found dead in a flat in Annan.
On Friday, 23-year-old Lewis Richardson was found dead in a flat in Annan.
On Saturday, 19-year-old Jamie McQuade was found dead in a flat in Annan.
On Sunday, 23-year-old Lewis Richardson was found dead in a flat in Annan.
On Monday, 19-year-old Jamie McQuade was found dead in a flat in Annan.
On Tuesday, 23-year-old Lewis Richardson
Drivers who are caught in Great Britain will see fines doubling from £100 to £200 and will face six penalty points on their licence instead of three.
The new rules are to come into force in England, Scotland and Wales next year.
In Northern Ireland, drivers get three penalty points and a £60 fine and Stormont has no plans to change this.
A spokesperson for Stormont's Department for Infrastructure told BBC News it "will continue to monitor changes being made in Britain to see what can be learned". 
Summarize: 
In Great Britain, drivers will get 6 penalty points on their license instead of 3.
In Northern Ireland, drivers will get 3 penalty points and a £60 fine.
In Great Britain, drivers will get 6 penalty points on their license instead of 3.
In Northern Ireland, drivers will get 3 penalty points and a £60 fine.
In Great Britain, drivers will get 6 penalty points on their license instead of 3.
In Northern Ireland, drivers will get 3 penalty points and a £60 fine.
In Great Britain, drivers will get 6 penalty points on their license instead of 3.
In Northern Ireland,
Kirkpatrick, aged 74 and one of the stars of 1980s Australian TV drama Prisoner Cell Block H, had denied charges of gross indecency.
But the court ruled she had abused the girl at her home in Prahan, Victoria.
Kirkpatrick was ordered to return to court on Friday, when she will be sentenced to community service.
In a statement read to the court, the unnamed victim said she had organised a meeting with Kirkpatrick through a TV producer while she was a patient in a psychiatric hospital.
She said said she had not reported the abuse until recently because she feared people would call her "crazy".
Kirkpatrick played a warden called Joan, nicknamed the Freak, in Prisoner, a popular series set in a women's prison.
She later appeared in a host of other Australian TV shows and in 1991 played Marilyn's aunt Jean Chambers in Home and Away. Her most recent role was in a stage production of the musical Wicked. 
Summarize: 
Kirkpatrick was a star of the 1980s Australian TV drama Prisoner Cell Block H.
She played a warden called Joan, nicknamed the Freak, in the series, which was set in a women's prison.
She later appeared in a host of other Australian TV shows and in 1991 played Marilyn's aunt Jean Chambers in Home and Away.
Her most recent role was in a stage production of the musical Wicked.
She was arrested in 2010 and charged with indecently assaulting a girl aged under 16.
The victim said she had organised a meeting with Kirkpatrick through a TV producer while she was a patient in a
Ansari made his Test debut for England in October, against Bangladesh, before playing two Tests against India.
The left-arm spinner played 71 first-class games, taking 128 wickets.
"After seven years as a professional cricketer and almost two decades in total playing, I have decided to bring my cricket career to an end," he said.
He added: "While the timing may come as a surprise, I have always maintained that cricket was just one part of my life and that I have other ambitions that I want to fulfil.
"With that in mind, I am now exploring another career, potentially in law, and to achieve this I have to begin the process now."
Ansari, who has a double first in politics, philosophy and sociology from Cambridge University and a Master's degree in history from Royal Holloway, has been at Surrey since the age of eight.
He made his England debut in a one-day international against Ireland in 2015 before being called up to England's Test squad to play Bangladesh and India in 2016 - a tour he has said came too early for him.
The all-rounder played just one of Surrey's three County Championship matches this season following injury, scoring three runs and failing to take a wicket in a draw with Lancashire.
Surrey's director of cricket, Alec Stewart, told BBC Sport: "It is a surprise because it has come a month into the season but it is not a surprise that he has retired at an early age.
"He has told me on numerous occasions that cricket is a part of his life, not his whole life. He is a highly-intelligent individual, he has played cricket for Surrey and England and now he wants to have a different type of career.
"It is a brave decision, a tough one and one he has thought through and discussed with family, friends and people he respects. He examined it thoroughly and considered the upsides and downsides. He has decided now is the time and I completely respect that." 
Summarize: 
"I have been fortunate to have been able to play for England and Surrey and I have enjoyed every minute of it. I have been extremely fortunate to have played with some great players and I have made some great friends.
"I have had a great time and I have been very lucky to have played with some great players and I have made some great friends. I have been extremely fortunate to have played with some great players and I have made some great friends.
"I have been extremely fortunate to have played with some great players and I have made some great friends. I have been extremely fortunate to have played with some great
The figure was revealed as the country unveiled its budget for next year.
But it said debt should fall back in 2015, and repeated its aim to bring the public deficit below 3% that year, the EU's deadline for doing so.
The government also said there will be some tax increases for households, but other tax reductions for businesses.
In addition, the budget focuses on tightening public spending, with some 15bn euros (£12.6bn) in savings planned, as part of a plan to cut some 18bn euros off the deficit.
But debt servicing costs will rise to 46.7bn euros, compared with 45bn euros in 2013.
The 2014 budget is based on a growth forecast of 0.9%, lowered from a previous 1.2% forecast, with just 0.1% in growth forecast for this year.
But an economist has warned that next year's growth figure was no cause for optimism.
"We can't talk about a recovery as long as economic growth is around 1%," said  Eric Heyer, an economist with the French Observatory for Economic Forecasts,
"Since today, we produce less than five years ago, we are still in recession. That's the real definition of a recession.
"The real rebound will be when we have a production level well above 2007 and when the economy has started to create jobs again. That's not in the government's scenario."
In other measures, there will be a change in corporate tax policy, with a new levy being introduced based on operating profits.
The much-heralded 75% tax rate on salaries of more than 1 million euros a year will be introduced.
However, this tax will be paid by firms rather than employees.
France is the eurozone's second largest economy after Germany.
Meanwhile, France will issue 174bn euros in medium and long-term debt in 2014, compared with an estimated 169 billion euros this year. 
Summarize: 
The French government has announced that it will raise taxes on households and businesses, but will cut taxes for firms.
The government will also cut public spending, but will increase spending on unemployment benefits.
The budget is based on a growth forecast of 0.9%, lowered from a previous 1.2% forecast, with just 0.1% in growth forecast for this year.
But an economist has warned that next year's growth figure was no cause for optimism.
"We can't talk about a recovery as long as economic growth is around 1%," said 
"Since today, we produce less than five years ago
The move follows government criticism the stations were not distinctive enough, and were putting commercial rivals at a disadvantage.
But a BBC review said almost 90% of songs played on Radios 1 and 2 were not played by any other station.
However, it proposed the commitment to UK artists should be strengthened.
Radio 1's current A playlist, which dictates the songs played most often during daytime listening hours, features nine international acts and six from the UK.
On Radio 2, seven British and three US acts make up the current A-list.
In its review, the BBC said it wanted to "ensure that Radio 1 and Radio 2 have a strong commitment to new and UK music so that a strong proportion of the new music in daytime on Radio 1 and Radio 2 should be from the UK".
Exactly how much new UK music will be played on the two stations will be discussed with the BBC's regulator - but the broadcaster noted that both Radio 1 and Radio 2 exceed the current quotas.
The review document also compared how the two stations remain distinctive from each other.
It said Radio 1 shares just 6% of the music it plays with Radio 2; while Radio 2 shared 5% of its tracks with Radio 1.
When they share a song - at the moment US pop act DNCE is on the A-list at both stations - the following track is supposed to provide distinctiveness.
"Adele, for example, is 27, still within Radio 1's target age range, but her songs have an almost universal appeal," said the report.
"Ultimately, however, the difference between the two stations is the next track after Adele: On Radio 1 it will often be a cutting edge track from a brand new band; on Radio 2 it is more likely to be a classic '60s or '70s song."
Other measures suggested to improve the networks' distinctiveness included a commitment to more social action campaigns on Radio 1 and strengthening the coverage of arts on Radio 2.
The review comes shortly ahead of a government white paper on the future of the BBC, which is expected to be published in May.
The future funding and scope of the BBC will be decided later this year as its Royal Charter is renewed. 
Summarize:  The BBC is reviewing its commitment to UK music on Radio 1 and Radio 2.
The BBC has been criticised for not being distinctive enough, and for putting commercial rivals at a disadvantage.
The review said that Radio 1 and Radio 2 share just 6% of the music they play with each other.
The BBC has also been criticised for not being distinctive enough, and for putting commercial rivals at a disadvantage.
The review said that Radio 1 and Radio 2 share just 6% of the music they play with each other.
The BBC has also been criticised for not being distinctive enough, and for putting commercial rivals
Henry did not to return to his home at the castle following an afternoon display for visitors at Warwick Castle last Saturday.
But he flew back of his own accord on Friday, during another of the castle's bird displays.
A castle spokesman said Henry was safe and sound and reunited with his mum, Sydney.
He added it was not unusual for young birds of preys to stretch their wings and go exploring and that Henry seemed to be largely unbothered by his adventures. 
Summarize:  Henry the Phoenix flew away from his mother's nest in the castle's tower, and flew around the grounds of the castle for a couple of hours. He then flew back to his mother, and she flew him back to the nest.
Henry the Phoenix is the subject of a children's book by the same name, written by the author of "The Story of Ferdinand".
The book was published in the United States by Scholastic in 2002. It is written for children ages 3–6.
The book is about a young Phoenix who is born in a nest in the castle tower. He is the only Phoenix
The broadcaster will now broadcast the BGT final at 19:30 BST on Saturday, when it was originally due to show the British Soap Awards.
A spokesman said ITV had "no desire to distract from the important cause" Grande's concert is raising money for.
ITV will instead broadcast the British Soap Awards on Tuesday at 20:00 BST.
Grande's One Love Manchester concert, which will be broadcast on BBC One, will raise money for those affected by the suicide bombing last Monday which left 22 people dead.
The gig, which takes place at the Emirates Old Trafford stadium, will feature Katy Perry, Coldplay, Miley Cyrus, Take That and Usher.
The Black Eyed Peas have also just been added to the line-up.
ITV said: "Ariana Grande's One Love Manchester benefit concert is bringing artists and the public together, and will raise funds for the Red Cross's Manchester Emergency Fund.
"We have no desire to distract from this important cause, so we have taken the decision to move the Britain's Got Talent Final from Sunday night."
Follow us on Facebook, on Twitter @BBCNewsEnts, or on Instagram at bbcnewsents. If you have a story suggestion email entertainment.news@bbc.co.uk. 
Summarize: 
The concert is being held to raise money for the victims of the Manchester bombing.
The concert will be broadcast on BBC One.
The concert will be broadcast on ITV.
The concert will be broadcast on BBC Two.
The concert will be broadcast on ITV.
The concert will be broadcast on BBC Two.
The concert will be broadcast on ITV.
The concert will be broadcast on BBC Two.
The concert will be broadcast on ITV.
The concert will be broadcast on BBC Two.
The concert will be broadcast on ITV.
The concert will be broadcast on BBC Two.
The concert will be
Stan Hollis was awarded the medal for his actions during the storming of the Normandy beaches on 6 June 1944.
A campaign by the Stanley E. Hollis VC Memorial Fund to have a statute in his honour erected in his home town raised Â£150,000.
Chairman Brian Bage, said the 7ft (2m) "magnificent" bronze statue was a fitting tribute to a "true hero".
Hollis was a 31-year-old sergeant major with the Green Howards when he took part in the assault on Gold Beach.
As his company moved inland, he captured several gun positions and rescued two colleagues, taking more than two dozen prisoners in the process.
As a result, he was the only one of almost 62,000 British troops to be awarded the Victoria Cross on the day of the World War Two landings.
Created by sculptor Brian Alabaster, the statue depicts the hero in the heat of battle.
Mr Bage, said: "It's taken a lot of hard work by a great many people, but it's been more than worthwhile.
"I hope people will come from far and wide to see it, and to remember the actions of a very brave man."
The memorial was officially unveiled near the town's cenotaph on Linthorpe Road by North Yorkshire's Vice Lord Lieutenant Peter Scrope. 
Summarize: 
The Victoria Cross is the highest award for gallantry in the face of the enemy that can be awarded to British and Commonwealth forces.
The Victoria Cross is awarded for "most conspicuous bravery, or some daring or pre-eminent act of valour or self-sacrifice, or extreme devotion to duty in the presence of the enemy".
The medal is awarded for actions during the Second World War.
The Victoria Cross is awarded for "most conspicuous bravery, or some daring or pre-eminent act of valour or self-sacrifice, or extreme devotion to duty in the face of the enemy".
Marsh kept his nerve after a record fourth-wicket stand of 161 off 79 balls between David Warner (77) and Glenn Maxwell (75) had rescued the visitors from 32-3 in reply to 204-7.
Skipper Faf du Plessis underpinned the Proteas innings with 79 off 41 balls.
Kagiso Rabada then took 2-25, including the key wicket of number four Warner.
However, it was not enough to prevent the series being levelled, meaning Wednesday's match at Cape Town will be the series decider.
The two teams then fly to India for the World T20. 
Summarize: 
The Proteas were in a spot of bother at the end of the first day, having been reduced to a meagre 156-6.
The hosts had made a solid start, with the openers putting on a solid partnership of 83, before du Plessis (22) and de Villiers (29) put on a quickfire 42-run stand to take the Proteas to a solid total.
The Proteas were in trouble at 32-3, but du Plessis and de Villiers put on a partnership of 77 runs to take the Proteas to a competitive total.
Finch captains his country's Twenty20 side, but will be available to play in all competitions for Surrey.
The 29-year-old, who has previously played for Yorkshire, is expected to make his debut in the Championship game against Warwickshire on 2 July.
Sangakkara, 38, could be absent for up to six weeks from the end of June.
"Securing a player of Aaron's quality for such a busy period of red and white ball cricket is excellent news for the club," Surrey director of cricket Alec Stewart said.
"I'm confident we will see his qualities in all formats of the game."
Finch has played 57 one-day internationals and 24 Twenty20 matches for Australia since making his international debut in January 2011. 
Summarize:  Finch has played 57 one-day internationals and 24 Twenty20 matches for Australia since making his international debut in January 2011.
He has scored 2,865 runs at an average of 35.75 with a highest score of 164 not out and a best of four half-centuries.
He has taken 129 wickets at an average of 30.78 with a best of four wickets in an innings.
He has taken nine wickets in an ODI at an average of 18.41 with a best of two wickets in an innings.
He has taken nine wickets in a Twenty20 at an average of
The trust plans to create a new car park with more than 100 spaces and public toilets on the area next the A855 Portree-Staffin road.
The Storr, among Skye's best known landscapes, was visited by about 150,000 people last year.
Highland Council has been asked to sell the land, which is valued at Â£1,000.
A fee would be charged for use of the new car park.
The lack of public toilets in the area has raised public health concerns in the local community, prompting the plan to build toilets at the car park.
The community trust has has lodged an asset transfer request, which forms part of Community Empowerment legislation introduced in January by the Scottish government. 
Summarize:  The Storr is one of Skye's most famous landscapes. It is a large area of land with a large number of peaks and hills. The Storr is a popular tourist destination and is visited by about 150,000 people each year. The Storr is a popular tourist destination and is visited by about 150,000 people each year. The Storr is a popular tourist destination and is visited by about 150,000 people each year. The Storr is a popular tourist destination and is visited by about 150,000 people each year. The Storr is a popular tourist destination and is visited by about 150,000 people each year
Ephraim Norman, 24, of Thornton Heath, fatally attacked Andrew Else, 52, in Croydon in April 2014 and continued to stab him after one of the knives bent.
The Old Bailey heard two weeks before he had stabbed a teenager in the neck.
Norman, who has paranoid schizophrenia, pleaded guilty to manslaughter and attempted murder on the grounds of diminished responsibility.
The court was told that Norman attacked the teenager and Mr Else after he stopped taking his medication and claimed it made him impotent.
The 15-year-old was on his way home after visiting a friend when Norman hit him from behind and stole his mobile phone before fleeing the scene.
Prosecutor Alan Kent QC said the teenager was "lucky" to survive after the blade was completely buried in his head with the tip poking out the other side.
Weeks later, Norman went out armed with two weapons and stabbed Mr Else, of Forestdale in Selsdon Park Road, Croydon, after following him when he got off a bus.
Scotland Yard said the two men who had reported the attack to police had caught a glimpse of "Norman raising the knife above his head repeatedly stabbing Mr Else".
When he was arrested, Norman told police that he did not trust himself in public and that he did not feel sorry for Mr Else or his family because he was being driven by voices in his head.
He told officers: "It is just my madness, it is just like how my mind is.... I know I could do that again. It is not a big thing for me to do ... I wanted him to die so much I just kept on stabbing him until he was dead."
Judge Anthony Morris QC described Mr Else as a "perfectly respectable man" who was savagely attacked because he happened to be "in the wrong place at the time". 
Summarize: 
The court heard that Norman had been diagnosed with paranoid schizophrenia at the age of 16 and had been prescribed medication.
He had been in and out of hospital since he was a teenager and had been diagnosed with depression.
He had been released from a mental health unit in December 2013, but he had not been taking his medication and had stopped taking his anti-psychotic medication.
He had been prescribed a new medication, but he had not been taking it.
He had been released from hospital in December 2013, but he had not been taking his medication and had stopped taking his anti-psychotic medication.
He had
The England left-back, 20, suffered a double fracture in the Champions League defeat at PSV Eindhoven in September.
Shaw's return was confirmed by United team-mate Juan Mata, who uploaded a picture of the pair on Instagram.
"My friend Luke Shaw just came in from running out on the pitch! Getting closer," added the Spain midfielder.
Shaw is still in contention for Euro 2016, according to England manager Roy Hodgson.
Hodgson wants United to allow Shaw, an England regular before the injury, to prove his fitness before naming his squad on 12 May.
However, Red Devils manager Louis van Gaal said last week he does not think Shaw will play for the team before the tournament.
Meanwhile, Phil Jones made his comeback in Monday's 1-1 under-21 draw with Chelsea at Old Trafford.
Jones, who has been out for three months, played in central defence for 75 minutes before being substituted.
The 24-year-old has been picked for every England squad he has been fit for since the last World Cup.
Never want to miss the latest Man Utd news? You can now add United and all the other sports and teams you follow to your personalised My Sport home. 
Summarize:  Manchester United defender Luke Shaw is set to return to action for the first time since suffering a double fracture of his leg in September. Shaw, 20, has been named in England's squad for the European Championship, which starts on June 10.
Shaw, who has been out since the Champions League defeat to PSV Eindhoven in September, is expected to be involved in the England squad for the tournament.
Shaw, who has been named in the England squad for Euro 2016, is expected to be involved in the England squad for the tournament.
Shaw, who has been named in the England squad for Euro 2016
Badminton is among five sports which were funded for Rio 2016 challenging the decision made in December.
They are joined by goalball - not funded in 2016 - and table tennis which bosses believe are 2020 medal hopefuls.
"We've got a really strong case," Badminton England chief executive Adrian Christy told BBC Sport.
All sports have until Tuesday, 17 January to attempt to challenge the decision.
The decision to cut all funding for badminton came as a surprise after Chris Langridge and Marcus Ellis won bronze in Rio and helped GB better the target set by UK Sport.
Although proof of correct governance and 'talent pathways' for young athletes form part of the decision-making process, the most important element of any pitch for funding is to prove they have genuine medal prospects for the next Games.
"Our understanding is that UK Sport doubt our Olympic medal credentials," Christy said.
"However, we have players who have not only won Olympic medals but also won world tour titles and super-series titles and these are the biggest events in our sport and we are regularly beating the best in the world."
In addition to badminton, goalball, table tennis, archery, fencing, weightlifting and wheelchair rugby will all bid for a reprieve. While table tennis does not get Olympic funding, it does receive Paralympic funding.
Powerlifting received about £890,000 going into the 2016 Paralympic Games, at which it beat its minimum target of one medal by claiming two.
As such it was awarded £1.3m for the Tokyo cycle, but British Powerlifting officials believe they deserve more and will also meet UK Sport in the coming weeks.
This is essentially a second opportunity for officials to demonstrate why they deserve funding for the four-year cycle leading into the Tokyo Games.
UK Sport will reveal its findings by the end of February, with those still unhappy with any verdict able to make a formal appeal to the 'Sport Resolutions' board.
It has been claimed the decision not to support the British wheelchair rugby team represents a "discriminatory" attitude, although UK Sport believes the programme does not represent a credible medal prospect for Tokyo.
British wheelchair rugby says it will present "significant new facts" to UK Sport and has a "very strong case" for a funding reprieve. 
Summarize: 
The decision to cut funding for all five sports was made by UK Sport, the body which decides how much funding is available to each sport.
The decision was made after the Rio 2016 Paralympic Games, where the British team won two golds and a bronze medal.
The decision was made after a review of all sports, which took place in December 2015.
The review was carried out by the independent Sport Resolutions board.
The board is made up of representatives from the UK Sport board, the British Olympic Association, the British Paralympic Association, the British Cycling Federation, the British Association of Sport and Exercise
Defender Robertson, 19, and midfielder Connolly, 17, have both signed two-year contracts with the Scottish Premier League club.
And manager Jackie McNamara expects them to feature next term despite only one season of senior football each.
"I will look for both to make an impact as soon as they come in," he said.
"My desire is to improve Dundee United and I see these young players as two assets who will do that.
"They know that at Tannadice there is the opportunity to get involved at first-team level should they promote themselves correctly.
"I believe that both have an exceptional chance of becoming important players for Dundee United."
Connolly follows in the footsteps of his midfielder father, Paddy, who started his career at Tannadice before playing for Airdrieonians, St Johnstone, Morton, Ayr United, Stirling Albion, Brechin city and Albion Rovers and who is presently assistant manager with Alloa Athletic.
The teenager made a swift impact at Hampden, making 25 appearances and scoring six goals since breaking into the team in November.
Robertson made 40 appearances in his first season in the first team and had also attracted the interest of St Johnstone and McNamara's former club, promoted Partick Thistle.
Queen's Park, who missed out on promotion to Division Two after losing to Peterhead, had voiced fears of missing out again on compensation for the duo should they head for Hampden.
United used a loophole concerning the Spiders' amateur status to avoid a compensation payment for full-back Barry Douglas, . 
Summarize: 
Dundee United
Dundee United
Lisa Murphy, 39, had a termination in the summer of 2015 after a relationship with Cipriani, 29, the court heard.
But when she was forced to miss work, due to complications, she asked him for money, which he did not pay.
Murphy enlisted her colleague, Violet Smith, 29, for help and they threatened to go to the papers with the story.
Murphy from Wootton, Northampton, and Smith of Slough, Berkshire, were handed a 22-month sentence suspended for two years at Kingston Crown Court.
The Wasps fly-half  - who was playing for Sale Sharks at the time - had offered to pay for the abortion but Murphy refused, insisting she could have the procedure for free on the NHS, the court heard previously.
But when she experienced a health scare following the procedure and was unable to work, she became "increasingly frustrated, increasingly upset, and increasingly desperate", her lawyer, Hannah Duncan, said.
Judge Peter Lodder noted while Cipriani had "repeatedly" offered to help, he "did not act according to his earlier promises".
He said: "Certainly he does not appear to have fully appreciated the extent of your difficulties".
Judge Lodder said Murphy was "feeling increasingly desperate and was continuing to suffer from the emotional consequences of her condition".
Nigel Mitchell, representing Smith, said the pair had been offered Â£18,000 for their story by The Sun but intended to resolve the situation with the former England player and continued to message him between September and October 2015.
He said: "Ms Smith's intention was to try and resolve matters. Like her co-defendant, not for a second did she consider her action and behaviour was amounting to a criminal offence."
Judge Lodder added that Smith was "motivated by concern" for her friend.
"It is against that background that the threat to go to the newspapers was made," he told the court.
Describing how both defendants had since lost their jobs, he commented: "It is an understatement to say that nobody has come out of this episode well." 
Summarize: 
Murphy and Smith were arrested in October 2015 and charged with blackmail.
The case was heard at Kingston Crown Court in October 2016.
The court heard that Murphy had suffered from a condition called "post-abortion syndrome" following the termination.
She was not able to work for a period of time and became increasingly frustrated, upset and desperate.
She was also in a relationship with Cipriani and became increasingly frustrated when he did not pay her money he owed her.
She enlisted Smith, who was also in a relationship with Cipriani, to help her.
They
Kate Weaver-Gibbs, 32, suffered head and spinal fractures when she was hit by a scooter in Verona on 2 December.
Ms Weaver-Gibbs is married to former dual code international Scott Gibbs, 45, who was not injured.
The beauty and travel writer remains in hospital and Italian police said a recent operation went well.
The couple were crossing the road when Ms Weaver-Gibbs was struck. It is believed the scooter was overtaking a car at the time.
No arrests have been made.
Verona's chief of the municipal police - Luigi Altamura - told BBC Wales that investigators have used CCTV footage, a camera on a bus and footage from a mobile phone to reconstruct the crash.
A report will now be compiled by police for a magistrate to consider.
Mr Gibbs retired from rugby in 2004, having played 53 Tests for Wales and going on three tours with the British and Irish Lions.
He also played rugby league for Wales and St Helens, winning the Challenge Cup.
He made his Wales union debut in 1991, with probably his most famous moment the last-minute try against England in 1999 which helped his country to a 32-31 win.
The couple married in 2014 in Cape Town. 
Summarize: 
A woman in her 30s was hit by a scooter in Verona on 2 December. She suffered head and spinal fractures.
The beauty and travel writer remains in hospital and Italian police said a recent operation went well.
The couple were crossing the road when Ms Weaver-Gibbs was struck. It is believed the scooter was overtaking a car at the time.
No arrests have been made.
Verona's chief of the municipal police - Luigi Altamura - told BBC Wales that investigators have used CCTV footage, a camera on a bus and footage from a mobile phone to reconstruct the crash.
A report
The woman was coming down the escalator at Asda supermarket in Warren Street, Stockport, Greater Manchester on Friday evening.
She fell forward and suffered a number of injuries, including cuts to her forehead which needed 15 stitches.
Det Sgt Geoff Machent said it "may have been a prank that has gone wrong".
He said: "We believe two women in their late teens were seen near to the emergency stop button at the time it was stopped and I would ask them to come forward."
Police said the woman, who also suffered cuts and bruises to both legs, was due to undergo surgery.
"She, along with her family, is hoping she will be at home for Christmas," Det Sgt Machent said.
An Asda spokeswoman said: "We are working very closely with police on this tragic incident that happened at the Stockport store." 
Summarize: 
The woman was coming down the escalator at Asda supermarket in Warren Street, Stockport, Greater Manchester on Friday evening.
She fell forward and suffered a number of injuries, including cuts to her forehead which needed 15 stitches.
Det Sgt Geoff Machent said it "may have been a prank that has gone wrong".
He said: "We believe two women in their late teens were seen near to the emergency stop button at the time it was stopped and I would ask them to come forward."
Police said the woman, who also suffered cuts and bruises to both legs, was due to undergo surgery.
"She
Interior Minister Bernard Cazeneuve told reporters those killed "in cold blood" included a six-month-old baby, a man and a woman.
Reports said a police officer died from his wounds shortly after the incident. Another policeman was injured.
The violence took place in the northern town of Roye, about 110km (70 miles) north of Paris.
It is unclear what provoked the incident.
Witnesses told the AFP news agency that a fight broke out in the camp and one of the men involved began shooting when police arrived at the scene.
The gunman was said to be in a serious condition after being shot by police.
The local Courrier Picard newspaper reported that security forces had sealed off the area.
President Francois Hollande and Prime Minister Manuel Valls expressed shock over the incident.
"My thoughts are with the families, with the victims and the policeman killed in the service of France," Mr Valls tweeted (in French).
In a statement, Mr Hollande hailed the "courage and commitment" of the police officers who responded to the incident. 
Summarize: 
The gunman was said to be in a serious condition after being shot by police.
The local Courrier Picard newspaper reported that security forces had sealed off the area.
President Francois Hollande and Prime Minister Manuel Valls expressed shock over the incident.
"My thoughts are with the families, with the victims and the policeman killed in the service of France," Mr Valls tweeted (in French).
In a statement, Mr Hollande hailed the "courage and commitment" of the police officers who responded to the incident.
The gunman was said to be in a serious condition after being shot by police.
The local Cour
The Lost Glasgow page on Facebook has become a big hit by sharing archive images of the city and its people.
Since it began three years ago the page has attracted 137,000 likes from people attracted to its documenting of Glasgow's colourful past.
The history buffs behind the online page have now gone back to old school methods themselves by organising a gallery exhibition.
It is being held at 54 Bell Street from 29 June to 31 August. 
Summarize: 
The exhibition will feature a series of photographs taken by the Lost Glasgow Facebook page's founder, David MacRitchie.
The images show the city's history from the 1950s to the present day.
The exhibition will also include a selection of photographs taken by members of the public.
The exhibition will be open every day from 10am to 5pm.
The exhibition will be held at 54 Bell Street, Glasgow.
The exhibition will be open every day from 10am to 5pm.
The exhibition will be held at 54 Bell Street, Glasgow.
The exhibition will be open every day from 10am to
Christy George, 39, from Nottingham, was driving to a shift at a Coventry hospital when she hit a lorry on the M1 in November 2014.
One man died in the crash and a woman broke her neck in two places.
At a hearing, the Nursing and Midwifery Council (NMC) said George's conviction had impaired her fitness to practise.
George had been travelling at 70mph when she crashed into a lorry while trying to overtake it between junctions 21a and 22 in Leicestershire.
The lorry crossed the central reservation and hit six other cars on the opposite carriageway.
George denied causing death by dangerous driving and two other charges but was found guilty and jailed for five years.
She was also banned from driving for 10 years.
The NMC panel said it was particularly concerned she had attempted to delete her phone records in the immediate aftermath of the smash.
It also noted she had failed to learn her lesson from a previous crash in which she reversed into an eight-year-old boy while on her phone, for which she was also convicted of careless driving.
In a statement read at the hearing, George said she was "genuinely and sincerely sorry for all the pain I have caused".
"My reckless behaviour has caused all this and I know my apology will not make any difference to anyone now.
"I have stopped driving after the accident and I have no intention to take up driving ever again," she added.
The panel concluded George's convictions "make a striking off order the only sanction that would adequately reflect the gravity of these offences". 
Summarize: 
Christy George was convicted of causing death by dangerous driving and two other charges in relation to a crash on the M1 in November 2014.
George was driving to a shift at a Coventry hospital when she hit a lorry on the M1 in Leicestershire.
One man died in the crash and a woman broke her neck in two places.
At a hearing, the Nursing and Midwifery Council (NMC) said George's conviction had impaired her fitness to practise.
George had been travelling at 70mph when she crashed into a lorry while trying to overtake it between junctions 21a
Shanique Syrena Pearson, of Vauxhall, made a gun sign at Vine during the row in Kensington on 26 August 2016.
The 22-year-old was convicted in February of using threatening, abusive or insulting words or behaviour.
Giving evidence earlier, Mr Vine said he "felt in danger" at the time.
Pearson was jailed for nine months following the appeal hearing at Isleworth Crown Court.
At the time of the incident, she was subject to a suspended sentence for a string of previous convictions for robbery, thefts and assault.
Footage of the confrontation was filmed on the presenter's helmet camera and posted online, where it has since had millions of views.
It shows Mr Vine trying to explain to Pearson that he was cycling along the centre of the narrow Hornton Street in Kensington to avoid the parked cars either side.
He told the court: "I felt threatened. I felt I was in danger. I felt I was dealing with a violent person.
"None of that was clear to me when she was in the car. It became clear through this incident as she assaulted, abused and threatened me."
He said he did not remember being physically assaulted and that his bike had acted as a shield, while Pearson admitted pushing the bicycle as she wanted him to move out of the way of her black Vauxhall Corsa.
Pearson denied making a gun shape with her hand, saying she stuck her middle finger up at him and had felt threatened when he cycled up to the passenger window of her car.
She told the court: "I know he saw me put my middle finger up because he smiled so I know he's not telling the truth about that."
She was also convicted in February of driving without reasonable consideration for other road users at Hammersmith Magistrates' Court. She had admitted driving an unlicensed vehicle. 
Summarize: 
"The prosecution said that Pearson had been convicted of a number of offences including robbery, theft and assault, and was on a suspended sentence for a string of previous convictions for robbery, thefts and assault.
"The incident took place on Hornton Street in Kensington on 26 August 2016.
"Mr Vine was cycling along the centre of the narrow street to avoid the parked cars either side.
"He said he felt threatened. He felt he was in danger. He felt he was dealing with a violent person.
"None of that was clear to me when she was in the car. It became
Initial plans for the old Victoria Road School in Torry - which shut its doors in 2008 - were dropped in June.
Planning officials had recommended they be refused. More than 260 objections were lodged on the grounds of what was said would be the loss of granite heritage.
Developer Barratt Homes has now revised its plans.
The flats and three-bedroom homes would include granite into certain aspects of the properties. 
Summarize: 
A new school for Torry is being planned for the site of the old Victoria Road School.
The old school was closed in 2008 and the site has been vacant since.
A planning application was submitted in June 2016.
The application was for a new school to be built on the site of the old school.
The school would be a three-storey building with a two-storey extension.
The school would have a capacity of up to 350 pupils.
The site would be a mixture of residential and commercial use.
The school would be built to the highest standards of health and safety.
The
The motorway was closed in both directions between junction 11, Daresbury and junction 14, Hapsford.
Emergency services worked through the night to deal with a non-explosive substance which leaked onto the eastbound carriageway.
At one stage the central reservation was removed to relieve the tailbacks.
The driver of the tanker, which crashed at about 15:45 BST on Monday, suffered minor injuries.
A Cheshire Police spokesman said: "There were eight casualties as a result of the incident. Five were treated by North West Ambulance Service at Hapsford Services and three were taken to the Countess of Chester Hospital, they have all since been released.
"Specialist equipment was required at the site both to enabled the removal of the central reservation barriers and facilitate the movement of the traffic from the tailbacks, and to get the required agencies to the site to deal with the spillage and the damage on the road surface.
"All of this was challenging due to the congestion on the road network." 
Summarize: 
The tanker driver was treated for minor injuries.
The driver of the car that crashed into the tanker was treated for minor injuries.
The tanker driver was taken to hospital for treatment.
The tanker driver was taken to hospital for treatment.
The tanker driver was taken to hospital for treatment.
The tanker driver was taken to hospital for treatment.
The tanker driver was taken to hospital for treatment.
The tanker driver was taken to hospital for treatment.
The tanker driver was taken to hospital for treatment.
The tanker driver was taken to hospital for treatment.
The tanker driver was taken to hospital for treatment.
10 December 2015 Last updated at 11:25 GMT
Uniwheel is a 'rideable' electric transporter which, as the name suggests, has only one wheel.
The makers say it can navigate urban environments more comfortably than popular two-wheeled rivals, sometimes nicknamed 'hoverboards'.
The company says its British-made interpretation of similar devices boasts improved safety features.
BBC technology reporter Chris Foxx met the firm behind it at a launch event in East London.
He asked Uniwheel's chief Steve Milton how laws in England, Wales and Scotland prohibiting the use of electric rideables in public places would affect the business. 
Summarize: 
Uniwheel is a 'rideable' electric transporter which, as the name suggests, has only one wheel.
The makers say it can navigate urban environments more comfortably than popular two-wheeled rivals, sometimes nicknamed 'hoverboards'.
The company says its British-made interpretation of similar devices boasts improved safety features.
BBC technology reporter Chris Foxx met the firm behind it at a launch event in East London.
He asked Uniwheel's chief Steve Milton how laws in England, Wales and Scotland prohibiting the use of electric rideables in public places would affect the business.
The company's website states: "The
They claim that under Barnett formula rules, Wales should get an extra £1.67bn and Scotland £2.9bn.
A letter has been sent to the UK Treasury to trigger the dispute resolution process.
UK ministers said the deal was made outside of the formula but was part of supporting growth across the UK.
The Barnett formula is used by the UK Treasury to determine how much extra money should go to Wales, Scotland and Northern Ireland in the event of an increase in public spending in England.
Wales' Finance Secretary Mark Drakeford and his Scottish counterpart Derek Mackay have insisted Barnett rules should apply in this case too.
"The UK Government has abandoned these well-established arrangements to the detriment of Wales and other parts of the UK," Mr Drakeford said.
"It is simply inexcusable that the UK Government is willing to 'bypass' those rules."
He added: "At a time when public services in Wales are under pressure as a result of the UK Government's damaging and ongoing policy of austerity, it is only right that Wales gets its fair share of funding through the established rules of the Barnett formula."
Mr Mackay said the Scottish Government "fundamentally disagrees with the way in which this additional funding for Northern Ireland has been allocated".
"It remains my hope that we will be able to reach a satisfactory resolution to this situation which results in a funding allocation across Scotland, Wales and England that is fair and reasonable for all - but in order to reach such a solution we now need to pursue the formal dispute resolution process," he said.
Responding, a UK Government spokesman said: "As we have made clear, this agreement is part of the government's commitment to support growth across all parts of the UK.
"Like previous Northern Ireland support packages, and the funding of over £1bn for City Deals in Scotland and Wales, this funding is a targeted intervention to address a specific set of unique challenges.
"And as was the case for those previous interventions, this exceptional funding will be made outside of the Barnett funding system." 
Summarize: 
The UK government has agreed to provide £1.5bn to Northern Ireland over the next two years, in addition to the £1bn already committed to the region.
This is in addition to the £1bn already committed to the region.
This is in addition to the £1bn already committed to the region.
This is in addition to the £1bn already committed to the region.
This is in addition to the £1bn already committed to the region.
This is in addition to the £1bn already committed to the region.
This is in addition to the £1bn already committed
BBC Scotland revealed last month that an MSP had passed on concerns.
One oil worker said companies would not hire him because they believed he would quit if the oil price rose again.
Business minister Margot James has now said the cases are believed to be isolated.
Aberdeenshire East MSP Gillian Martin had described the extent of discrimination claims as "shocking".
'Skillsets respected'
She said many constituents had been in contact with her saying they had been excluded by employers outwith the energy sector because of their oil and gas background.
Business minister Ms James wrote: "My officials have discussed this issue with local Jobcentre Plus officials who have confirmed that they have also come across some examples of this practice during the current low-oil price downturn but consider them to be isolated instances and not the widespread practice of employers in the region.
"I believe the reluctance by employers to consider this highly skilled and motivated workforce to be misguided because I know that their skillsets are respected both across the UK and around the world."
Ms Martin said she was pleased the issue had been looked into but was "dismayed" by the suggestion there were only a few isolated cases.
Thousands of people have lost their jobs since the oil downturn began. 
Summarize: 
In the UK, the oil and gas industry has been the most affected by the downturn in the oil price.
The industry has been hit hard by the fall in the oil price, which has led to thousands of job losses.
The industry has been hit hard by the fall in the oil price, which has led to thousands of job losses.
The industry has been hit hard by the fall in the oil price, which has led to thousands of job losses.
The industry has been hit hard by the fall in the oil price, which has led to thousands of job losses.
The industry has been hit hard by
South Yorkshire Police said he is suspected to have gunshot injuries but they are not life-threatening.
A spokesman said two groups believed to be of Kurdish and Somalian origin clashed in the Spital Hill area at about 15:00 BST on Wednesday.
A heavy police presence is expected in the area for the next few days. 
Summarize: 
A teenager was shot in the leg in a suspected gang-related incident in Sheffield.
The incident happened in the Spital Hill area of the city at about 15:00 BST on Wednesday.
A heavy police presence is expected in the area for the next few days.
A spokesman for South Yorkshire Police said: "A 16-year-old boy has been shot in the leg in a suspected gang-related incident in Sheffield.
"The incident happened in the Spital Hill area of the city at about 15:00 BST on Wednesday.
"A heavy police presence is expected in the area for the next few
But the conditions have not been as bad as expected with only a  small number of schools forced to turn pupils away and only minor disruption to transport.
The Met Office had warned of rain turning to snow as it moved east across the UK, with snow confined to higher ground in Wales.
But the risk of snow and ice remains on Friday.
This may lead to "a risk of disruption" and "difficult driving conditions", the forecaster said.
In its weather warning, the Met Office said some parts of Wales 2-4cm of snow on lower ground and 5-10cm (2-4in) on higher ground. There is a risk of ice on untreated surfaces.
Check if this is affecting your journey
The A465 Heads of the Valleys Road between the Brynmawr and Ebbw Vale roundabouts saw drivers urged to show caution due to accumulated snow.
Driving conditions have also been described as "hazardous" due to snow on the Rhigos mountain road, while Colonel Road was closed due to the weather at Heol-Y-Felin (Betws) in Ammanford, Carmarthenshire.
Meanwhile, Dyfed-Powys Police encouraged walkers to park sensibly around the Storey Arms area of Brecon this weekend as a high volume of visitors is expected for the Fan Dance endurance event at Pen y Fan.
The force said snowfall over the Brecon Beacons and two pre-planned events led to significant disruption and traffic issues on the A470 last January.
Cars parked on the side of the road in the National Park area caused "substantial difficulty" to emergency services vehicles which were called to a three-vehicle crash and created a hazard to pedestrians who had to walk in the road.
Sgt Owen Dillion, of the roads policing unit, said: "Last January, we issued fines to over 100 vehicles parked illegally in one weekend. We really hope not to do the same this year." 
Summarize: 
The Met Office has issued a yellow warning for snow for the whole of Wales, with a risk of ice on untreated surfaces.
The Met Office has issued a yellow warning for snow for the whole of Wales, with a risk of ice on untreated surfaces.
The Met Office has issued a yellow warning for snow for the whole of Wales, with a risk of ice on untreated surfaces.
The Met Office has issued a yellow warning for snow for the whole of Wales, with a risk of ice on untreated surfaces.
The Met Office has issued a yellow warning for snow for the whole of Wales, with a risk of ice on
Liam Howard, 24, told his victim Matthew Fyfe: "Sit down or I will take your head off."
He then hit Mr Fyfe across the face, leaving him scarred for life.
Howard admitted assaulting Mr Fyfe with the cleaver to his permanent disfigurement in the attack at a flat in Beaverbank Place in May last year.
He carried out the attack just five months after being released early from jail for attempted murder.
Sentencing Howard, judge Lord Bannatyne told him: "This wholly unprovoked assault involved the use of a weapon, a meat cleaver, which you had taken from your mother's house to this flat.
"This must have been a terrifying ordeal for the complainer. You have a significant level of previous offending for crimes of violence and you had only been released from prison for a short time before committing this offence. You are at high risk of re-offending."
Lord Bannatyne ordered Howard to be monitored in the community for four years and nine months after his release from prison.
He also said Howard must serve the remaining 33 months of his previous sentence for attempted murder before beginning his latest sentence.
The court heard that Mr Fyfe had been at a friend's flat in the Broughton area of Edinburgh on 3 May when Howard and a woman suddenly showed up.
Advocate depute Sheena Fraser, prosecuting, said Mr Fyfe has been left with a 10cm (4in) facial scar and was suffering from depression.
Defence counsel Ronnie Renucci said: "He accepts responsibility for his actions. He had taken a significant amount of valium, but realises that is no excuse." 
Summarize: 
Liam Howard, 24, of no fixed address, admitted assaulting Matthew Fyfe with the cleaver to his permanent disfigurement in the attack at a flat in Beaverbank Place in May last year.
He carried out the attack just five months after being released early from jail for attempted murder.
Lord Bannatyne told him: "This wholly unprovoked assault involved the use of a weapon, a meat cleaver, which you had taken from your mother's house to this flat.
"This must have been a terrifying ordeal for the complainer. You have a significant level of previous offending for crimes
Police said around 20 windows at the property were smashed as well as a number of pottery items.
It happened in the Brook road area of Donemana sometime over the weekend.
Artist Tom Agnew has housed his work there for 40 years. He said the damage will not be covered by his insurance company.
"They used a cocktail of ammunition to put the windows in, rocks and tiles and even some of my own stock.
"As I look around there's glass absolutely everywhere.
"Kids are kids but it's pretty obvious that this building is occupied and someone is making a living."
Mr Agnew said it was not the first time the studio had been targeted.
"I had a similar incident 25 years ago but it's very disappointing and I could be doing without it particularly at this time of year," he said.
"Based on previous experience is to just get on with things and carry on. I wont have any cover for criminal damage on my insurance." 
Summarize: 
The damage was caused by a group of young people who broke into the studio and smashed the windows and pottery items.
The police have no suspects and are appealing for witnesses.
The damage was caused by a group of young people who broke into the studio and smashed the windows and pottery items.
The police have no suspects and are appealing for witnesses.
The damage was caused by a group of young people who broke into the studio and smashed the windows and pottery items.
The police have no suspects and are appealing for witnesses.
The damage was caused by a group of young people who broke into
The victim, 23, was injured on Daniel Hill Terrace, Upperthorpe, near the city centre on Saturday afternoon.
People living in the area said the man was either in, or close to, a black Mercedes car he had been driving when he was shot.
Officers, called to the scene at about 13:35 GMT, found the man with a gunshot wound to his chest.
Armed police sealed off the area and the victim was taken to hospital, where he died from his injuries.
South Yorkshire Police has appealed for information over the killing, which is the latest in a spate of shootings across the city in recent weeks.
Residents said the man was a member of a family who live close to the scene of the shooting.
They said relatives had been gathering for a celebration when the attack occurred.
Many came out of the house to try to help him after hearing the shot, neighbours said.
There have been a number of shootings in Sheffield in recent weeks, although all the previous incidents have been in the north of the city and not close to the Upperthorpe area.
On Monday, a 25-year-old man was seriously injured when he was shot in the street in the Shiregreen area.
Earlier this month, shots were fired through the living room window of an elderly couple's home in the Southey Green area - an incident police believe was a case of mistaken identity.
In January shots were fired at houses in two separate incidents in the same street in High Green. 
Summarize: 
A 23-year-old man died after being shot in the chest in Sheffield on Saturday afternoon.
The victim, who has not been named, was shot at around 13:35 GMT in Daniel Hill Terrace, Upperthorpe, near the city centre.
The man, who is from the Sheffield area, was found with a gunshot wound to his chest.
He was taken to hospital, where he died from his injuries.
South Yorkshire Police has appealed for information over the killing, which is the latest in a spate of shootings across the city in recent weeks.
Residents said the man was a member of
The Solicitors Regulation Authority (SRA) closed Redferns in Weymouth, Dorset, in November.
It said it found "reason to suspect dishonesty" on the part of solicitor and partner Michelle Hind.
About 60 of more than 100 claimants have now been paid, the SRA said.
The Â£2.1m has come from its compensation fund, which all solicitors pay into, it said.
The SRA added its investigation into Redferns continued and a decision "on the appropriate course of action" was still to be made.
Police have not yet confirmed whether a criminal investigation into the firm is being carried out.
The SRA had said Ms Hind, as well as the firm's other partners John Mackenzie and Damian Sommerscales, had failed to comply with rules made under sections 31 and 32 of the Solicitors Act 1974.
All three were automatically suspended when the firm closed and cannot practise as solicitors.
Ms Hind resigned from her role as president of the Weymouth and Portland Chamber of Commerce following the closure of Redferns.
Redferns has described the closure as "regretful". 
Summarize: 
The SRA has suspended the three partners and the firm's other staff, and is investigating the firm.
The SRA has said it is "highly likely" that the firm's clients will be paid.
The firm's clients have been contacted and are being advised of their rights.
The firm has said it is "regretful" that it has been forced to close.
The firm has been in business for more than 20 years and has a good reputation.
The firm has said it will be contacting all of its clients to advise them of their rights.
The firm has said it is "highly likely"
He is accused of bringing in a man with no top-level cricketing experience to help the squad at training sessions.
The allegations centre around the first Test in Galle in October, which Sri Lanka won by an innings and six runs.
It was suggested wicketkeeper Kusal Perera and spin bowler Rangana Herath were offered money to lose the match.
Sports minister Dayasiri Jayasekera said in December that the fee offered was 10m Sri Lanka rupees (£48,600) to engineer a batting collapse.
The man in question is net bowler Gayan Vishwajith, who has been given a lifetime ban from any cricketing premises in Sri Lanka.
"Sri Lanka Cricket has received several complaints regarding a close acquaintance of Anusha Samaranayake with the main suspect Gayan Vishwajith, who had approached several national players for the alleged illegal activities of match-fixing," said a statement from the country's cricket board.
After involvement from Jayasekara, police have taken statements from captain Angelo Mathews and team manager Jeryl Woutersz.
"The aim of the police investigation is not to destroy the good name of the national cricketers but to protect it," Jayasekara told BBC Sinhala.
"We do have clear information that players were offered money to fix matches. All the players have rejected that offer," the minister added.
The International Cricket Council began an investigation following a complaint by Perera.
Perera himself is facing a four-year ban after failing an out-of-competition drugs test in October.
In December, Jayasekara suggested that the failed drugs test could be a "conspiracy" against the 25-year-old wicketkeeper-batsman. 
Summarize: 
The ICC has announced that the Sri Lankan team will be banned from playing international cricket for a period of 12 months.
The ban will be effective from 1 January 2016.
The ban was announced by ICC chief executive David Richardson in a statement on Wednesday.
The ICC said that the ban will be effective from 1 January 2016, and will be reviewed at the end of that period.
The ICC said that the ban was imposed following an investigation into the alleged involvement of Sri Lankan players in a betting and spot-fixing syndicate.
The ICC said that the investigation was conducted by the ICC Anti-Corruption
Tom Hunt used Brazilian beats for the piece for the individual dressage event in Rio - having put together rousing British themes like Land of Hope and Glory for Dujardin's London 2012 victory.
He told BBC Radio 4's Front Row he was "very surprised" other artists did not take the same approach of using the host country as inspiration - and admitted he is "not specifically horsey" himself.
Hunt, who has been working with Dujardin since 2010, said of his introduction to the world of composing music for horses: "I studied music at university and kind of fell into it, like a fluke really.
"I saw some dressage to music on television. I personally thought that the music could fit better to the horses, so my idea was to compose original music for the riders - and that was the starting point for me."
He said it was "always a good experience" working with Dujardin - and her horse Valegro - as "she knows exactly what she wants and has a keen ear for detail".
"The first watch through was pretty stressful," Hunt said of Dujardin's most recent gold medal-winning performance.
"There was so much detail going on and I just hoped she could have a clean test and clean run through. So many factors have to come together.
"It was very nerve-racking to watch. But she actually rode it perfectly."
The composition process began with Hunt watching film of Dujardin's choreography.
He said they were clear from the outset that they wanted to do Brazilian music for the Rio Games. "The London Games went so well celebrating British music, so it seemed the obvious thing to do."
He added: "I would have thought there would be more Brazilian music out there. It was probably good, because it meant our music stood out more.
"Maybe it will be a trend that does come eventually."
Front Row is on BBC Radio 4 on 18 August at 19:15 BST - the episode will later be available on the Front Row website.
Follow us on Twitter @BBCNewsEnts, on Instagram, or email entertainment.news@bbc.co.uk. 
Summarize: 
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
"Summarize:
The DingDong, by technology company Beijing LingLong, uses voice interaction to do tasks such as playing music and switching on home appliances.
The device is said to understand Mandarin, Cantonese and basic English.
A study by Juniper Research suggests China's smart home market could be worth $22.8bn (Â£18.3bn) by 2018.
Beijing LingLong is owned by Chinese online retailer JD.com - which is selling the DingDong for 698 yuan ($100, Â£81).
The device can communicate with 95% of the China's population, Beijing Linglong told Wired.
Like Echo and Home, it can be used to control light switches, thermostats and home appliances.
And, similar to its rivals, there is internet search, traffic and weather information, directions, online shopping, and music streaming.
The makers of DingDong have also been promoting its educational tools, including being programmed with simple English lessons for children developed by a private education company.
But outside of China the Linglong DingDong has garnered more social media attention for its name than for its technological innovation, with many expressing incredulity.
"Millions of Americans tried their damnedest not to be racist for a day and then this story drops," said Twitter user Steve Woodbury. 
Summarize: 
The DingDong is a voice-activated smart speaker that can be used to control lights, thermostats, and other home appliances.
It is made by Beijing Linglong, a Chinese technology company.
The DingDong is sold for 698 yuan ($100, Â£81).
The DingDong can be used to control lights, thermostats, and other home appliances.
It is made by Beijing Linglong, a Chinese technology company.
The DingDong is sold for 698 yuan ($100, Â£81).
The DingDong can be used to control lights, thermost
Midfielder O'Toole, 28, is out of contract with the Cobblers at the end of the season and was part of the side that won the League Two title in 2016.
He missed the 0-0 draw with Oxford on 25 March and was substituted in Saturday's 1-1 draw at Rochdale.
"It may [require surgery]," Edinburgh told BBC Radio Northampton. "But we're hopeful it doesn't."
It's something that won't clear up between now and the end of the season
Edinburgh continued: "We just have to get John-Joe to take part in as many games as we can."
Former Bristol Rovers player O'Toole has scored 12 goals in all competitions this season, including seven in his past 11 games.
However, 23-year-old loan forward Luke Williams (hamstring) will be fit for Saturday's meeting with League One leaders Sheffield United at Sixfields, while striker Alex Revell, 33, could also return against the Blades following a calf injury.
The Cobblers are 15th in the table, eight points clear of the relegation zone with five games to play. 
Summarize:  The Cobblers are 15th in the table, eight points clear of the relegation zone with five games to play.
"Cobblers boss Justin Edinburgh will be without defender John-Joe O'Toole for Saturday's trip to Sheffield United after the defender suffered a recurrence of a hamstring injury.
O'Toole, 28, missed the 0-0 draw with Oxford on 25 March and was substituted in Saturday's 1-1 draw at Rochdale.
"It may [require surgery]," Edinburgh told BBC Radio Northampton. "But we're hopeful it doesn't."
It's something that won't clear
6 February 2017 Last updated at 08:14 GMT
If you have health issues that mean you are unable to go to work, what rights do you have to sick pay and what other help is available?
Joe Cockerline, of the independent Money Advice Service, explains the basic rules.
Video journalist: Kevin Peachey 
Summarize: 
If you are unable to work because of illness or injury, you can get sick pay from your employer.
Your employer must pay you at least £89.58 a week (or £464.16 a month) for the first 28 weeks of your illness or injury.
If you are unable to work for more than 28 weeks, your employer must pay you at least £89.58 a week (or £464.16 a month) for the first 28 weeks of your illness or injury.
You can also get help from the government if you are unable to work because of illness or injury.
The curbs ban alcohol from sports advertising and events for young people, and sales are limited to licensed shops and restaurants.
Critics say it will become harder for catering companies to organise wedding parties and similar gatherings.
A ruling party official said the rules were put in place to protect young adults from alcoholism.
An opposition spokesman said that an "oppressive mentality" was seeking to control Turkey, suggesting that the ruling AKP party was targeting secular lifestyles.
But Mehmet Kucuk, whose Tobacco and Alcohol Market Regulatory Board implemented the changes, insisted there was "no ideological dimension to the issue".
One small wine-maker told the BBC that, under the new regulations, he could no longer promote his wines via the internet, could not recommend wines to go with certain food, nor hold wine-tasting events.
For Turkey's top basketball team - which bears the same title as the beer-maker Efes Pilsen - the changes mean finding a new name.
Turkish Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan has publicly voiced his disapproval of alcohol consumption. Last year he said he could not understand why people drank wine when they could just eat the grapes.
However, the BBC's Jonathan Head in Istanbul says a large part of Turkish society is secular, and considers the right to drink alcohol an important freedom.
Consumption of alcohol, although relatively low compared with most of Europe, has been steadily increasing. 
Summarize: 
The new regulations are aimed at protecting young people from alcohol abuse.
They ban alcohol advertising and sales in sports arenas and other public places, and limit sales to licensed shops and restaurants.
Critics say it will become harder for catering companies to organise wedding parties and similar gatherings.
A ruling party official said the rules were put in place to protect young adults from alcoholism.
An opposition spokesman said that an "oppressive mentality" was seeking to control Turkey, suggesting that the ruling AKP party was targeting secular lifestyles.
But Mehmet Kucuk, whose Tobacco and Alcohol Market Regulatory Board implemented the changes, insisted there was
Seven bosses were sacked in the 2016-17 season, a reduction from 12 during 2015-16 and the second lowest number over the past five years.
The total dismissals in the top four English leagues was 44, down from 58.
Those who were sacked averaged a tenure of 1.16 years.
There were four fewer casualties in the Championship (15) and League One (10) compared with the previous season.
And there were 12 dismissals in League Two - one down on the previous year.
Arsene Wenger, 67, is the longest-serving manager in English football as he approaches 21 years as Arsenal boss. 
Summarize: 
The following managers were sacked during the 2016-17 season.
The following managers were sacked during the 2016-17 season.
The following managers were sacked during the 2016-17 season.
The following managers were sacked during the 2016-17 season.
The following managers were sacked during the 2016-17 season.
The following managers were sacked during the 2016-17 season.
The following managers were sacked during the 2016-17 season.
The following managers were sacked during the 2016-17 season.
The following managers were sacked during the 2016-17 season.
The body of Hannah Wynne Richards was found inside Penybryn Veterinary Centre in Sketty on 20 January.
She lived above the surgery, had previously worked for the RSPCA and campaigned against puppy farms.
South Wales Police said there were no suspicious circumstances and the matter has been referred to the coroner. 
Summarize: 
The RSPCA is a charity that is dedicated to the prevention of cruelty to animals. It is a non-profit organization that is run by volunteers and funded by donations. The RSPCA is a non-political organization that is run by volunteers. It is a charity that is run by volunteers and funded by donations.
The RSPCA is a non-profit organization that is run by volunteers and funded by donations. The RSPCA is a non-political organization that is run by volunteers. It is a charity that is run by volunteers and funded by donations.
The RSPCA is a non
The High Court granted permission for Grainne Close, her partner Shannon Sickles, and Chris and Henry Flanagan-Kane to seek a judicial review.
Ten years ago in Belfast, they became the first same-sex couples in the UK to enter into civil partnerships.
However Northern Ireland is now the only place in the UK and Ireland that has not legalised same-sex marriage.
The Northern Ireland Assembly has debated the issue four times and rejected it each time.
At the High Court in Belfast on Friday, a barrister for Stormont's Department of Finance and Personnel (DFP) argued that a similar case is currently going through the Family Division.
It involves a gay couple who want their marriage in England to be legally recognised in Northern Ireland.
But a lawyer representing Ms Close and the others involved in the judicial review case, said she was seeking to have the legislation completely struck down.
The challenge is based on claims that the ban discriminates against gay and lesbian couples.
The judge ruled that their case had enough merit to proceed to a full hearing, based on submissions already before him.
He said: "Rather than waste everybody's time by pretending otherwise, I propose to grant leave which means the applicant has an arguable case."
The case is due back again before the courts in September. 
Summarize: 
The case is due back again before the courts in September.
28 February 2015 Last updated at 10:11 GMT
He was on the set of a Japanese historical TV drama.
Prince William is currently on a tour of Japan and enjoyed the opportunity to get dressed up!
Watch the clip to see more... 
Summarize:  Prince William is currently on a tour of Japan and enjoyed the opportunity to get dressed up!
Prince William is currently on a tour of Japan and enjoyed the opportunity to get dressed up!
Prince William is currently on a tour of Japan and enjoyed the opportunity to get dressed up!
Prince William is currently on a tour of Japan and enjoyed the opportunity to get dressed up!
Prince William is currently on a tour of Japan and enjoyed the opportunity to get dressed up!
Prince William is currently on a tour of Japan and enjoyed the opportunity to get dressed up!
Prince William is currently on a tour of Japan and enjoyed the opportunity to
Train and bus services between the state capital Bangalore and the city of Mysore have been partially disrupted by the protesting farmers.
Tension is high between the two states over the ongoing long dispute over sharing water from the Cauvery river.
Both states say they need the water for millions of farmers in the region.
"There is a drought like situation and there is no water for our farmers. How can water be released to Tamil Nadu?" said KS Puttanaiah, leader of the Karnataka State Farmers Association.
Karnataka was forced to release water after the Supreme Court censured it last week for not complying with a direction of the Cauvery river authority, headed by Prime Minister Manmohan Singh, to release 9,000 cusecs (cubic feet per second) of water to Tamil Nadu daily until October 15.
"It is unavoidable. We have to follow the Supreme Court orders," said Karnataka Chief Minister Jagdish Shettar, after coming under attack from the opposition and farmers groups for releasing the water.
Mr Shettar said Karnataka will appeal against the order in the Supreme Court.
The Cauvery originates in Karnataka and flows into Tamil Nadu and the dispute over sharing of waters originates in the 19th century during the British rule. 
Summarize: 
The Cauvery dispute is a long-standing dispute between the two states of Karnataka and Tamil Nadu over the sharing of water from the Cauvery river.
The dispute has its roots in the British rule of India.
The Cauvery river originates in Karnataka and flows into Tamil Nadu and the dispute over sharing of waters originates in the 19th century during the British rule.
The Cauvery dispute is a long-standing dispute between the two states of Karnataka and Tamil Nadu over the sharing of water from the Cauvery river.
The dispute has its roots in the British rule of India
South Wales Police said there were "reasonable grounds" to prosecute eight former officers involved in Lynette White's murder investigation in 1988.
The former officers have brought civil action against the force after they were cleared of corruption allegations.
The corruption trial collapsed in 2011.
Former officers Graham Mouncher, Thomas Page, Richard Powell, John Seaford, Michael Daniels, Peter Greenwood, Paul Jennings and Paul Stephen are suing the force for misfeasance in public office, false imprisonment and trespass.
The senior barrister representing the force, Jeremy Johnson QC, told the Cardiff court on Thursday that the former officers had re-written evidence and carried out "oppressive interviews".
He said there were questions over the objectivity and the integrity of the original investigation.
The court heard it was "well established by any legal threshold" that Jeffrey Gafoor committed the murder alone.
Mr Johnson said the fact the claimants have tried to say otherwise "was a distraction in this case".
On Monday, the court heard that Gafoor may not have acted alone when he killed Ms White in a flat in Cardiff's docklands on Valentine's Day.
Tony Parris, Stephen Miller and Yusef Abdullahi - who became known as the Cardiff Three - were wrongly jailed for life in 1990 for the murder and freed in 1992 after their convictions were quashed.
Mr Johnson QC told the court that the following the conviction of Gafoor for Ms White's murder, a new eight and a half year investigation into the original inquiry was held.
He said that only a relatively small number of officers concerned with that original inquiry were arrested and that had happened after a long review of the evidence.
The investigation didn't start with a completely clean sheet of paper, they reviewed what had gone before.
Mr Johnson said that for South Wales Police "it would have been convenient to just investigate civilians, but the investigation had to be conducted without fear or favour and that is what happened".
He said that inquiries had been made "without an inappropriate mindset or prejudice", "with an open mind, not a closed mind"
The court was told that civilians who admitted lying in the original investigation and trial had "no motive to falsely admit perjury - it must have been due to a conspiracy"
The hearing continues. 
Summarize: 
The Cardiff Three were wrongly convicted of the murder of Lynette White.
The conviction was quashed in 1992.
The convictions of the Cardiff Three were reinstated in 2004.
The convictions were quashed again in 2011.
The convictions of the Cardiff Three were reinstated again in 2013.
The convictions of the Cardiff Three were quashed again in 2014.
The convictions of the Cardiff Three were quashed again in 2015.
The convictions of the Cardiff Three were quashed again in 2016.
The convictions of the Cardiff Three were quashed again in 2017.
The convictions of the Cardiff Three were quashed again in
The left-wing thinker was a Polish Jew who fled to the USSR after Nazi Germany invaded Poland. He was loyal to the Polish communists until they carried out an anti-Semitic purge in 1968.
He lectured in Israel and then, from 1971, at the University of Leeds.
A critic of globalisation, he used the phrase "liquid modernity" to describe marginalised and rootless individuals.
The author of more than 50 books, he won several international awards for his explorations of ethics, consumerism, globalisation and modernity. He was regarded as a strong moral voice for the dispossessed.
In his most famous book, Modernity and the Holocaust, he argued that the Nazi mass murder of Jews was not simply a regression to barbarism but was connected to industrialisation. The machinery of the modern state had made it feasible, he argued.
If you define your value by the things you acquire and surround yourself with, being excluded is humiliating
In 2010 the University of Leeds founded the Bauman Institute, which promotes studies in social, economic and political life, in recognition of the professor's work.
Growing up in Poland, Bauman experienced poverty and anti-Semitism and that fuelled his commitment to social justice.
He was a controversial figure in modern Poland, having admitted that he had once served in the Stalin-era Internal Security Corps, a military unit.
The Polish Institute of National Remembrance (IPN), which prosecutes Nazi and communist-era crimes, has a file on him. He said that he had a clerical job and denied any involvement in killings.
He campaigned for the dignity of the individual who, he argued, suffered manipulation by capitalist market forces.
Globalisation benefited the rich at the expense of the poor, he argued.
Why did ordinary people commit atrocities in the Holocaust?
Timeline: The Holocaust year by year
Bauman in quotes 
Summarize:  "Liquid modernity" is the term Bauman used to describe the way people are losing their roots and becoming rootless.
"Liquid modernity" is the term Bauman used to describe the way people are losing their roots and becoming rootless.
"Liquid modernity" is the term Bauman used to describe the way people are losing their roots and becoming rootless.
"Liquid modernity" is the term Bauman used to describe the way people are losing their roots and becoming rootless.
"Liquid modernity" is the term Bauman used to describe the way people are losing their roots and becoming rootless
Yakubu, 33, lives close to Wood's ground and played in Saturday's friendly versus former club Reading.
"He's like a Rolls Royce, especially at this level. When he lands on the ball he's phenomenal," said Garrard.
"Is he as sharp as he used to be in the Premier League? No, but at 33 he could definitely do a job in the League."
Yakubu has scored more than 140 goals in his career for clubs also including Middlesbrough and Blackburn and has returned to England after a spell in the Turkish top flight with Kayserispor.
Garrard got in touch with the forward through a mutual friend and invited him down for two training sessions, before he appeared in the match against the Royals.
"I can imagine he's got interest especially after he'd been with us and played against Reading, so I can imagine something will happen in the next week or so but until then we'll enjoy his company," Garrard told BBC Sport.
"It's a long shot (signing him for Boreham Wood).
"I spoke to him on Sunday and he was very open in terms of a few bits that are going on but I've heard a little rumour someone in the League has put an offer to him so it will be very interesting to see how that pans out." 
Summarize: 
Yakubu is a player that Boreham Wood are interested in, and he is a player that is available.
Boreham Wood are interested in Yakubu, and he is a player that is available.
Yakubu is a player that Boreham Wood are interested in, and he is a player that is available.
Yakubu is a player that Boreham Wood are interested in, and he is a player that is available.
Yakubu is a player that Boreham Wood are interested in, and he is a player that is available.
Yakubu is a
Grimsby striker Padraig Amond sent the goalkeeper the wrong way from the penalty spot to level the tie and send the semi-final into extra-time.
Braintree were reduced to 10 men as Mark Phillips saw a second yellow card.
And Omar Bogle's header from a free-kick after 110 minutes secured Grimsby a place at Wembley on 15 May.
The Mariners have reached the play-offs for four consecutive years after being relegated from the Football League in 2010, but this is only the second time they have reached the final.
They lost to Bristol Rovers on penalties in 2015.
In front of a crowd of 3,102, the biggest at Cressing Road since 1952, the visitors troubled the Braintree defence as Jon Nolan shot over from distance and Bogle dragged a 20-yard effort wide.
Sam Habergham fired high over the bar for part-timers Braintree but they were stretched with 10 men and were outpaced by Grimsby going forward. 
Summarize:  Grimsby Town 1-0 Braintree Town
Grimsby Town won the toss and elected to play in the sun.
The Mariners started brightly and were rewarded when Padraig Amond slotted home a penalty after Jon Nolan was brought down in the box.
The hosts continued to dominate and Amond had a shot saved by the keeper before Bogle headed wide from a corner.
The Mariners were forced into a change when Padraig Amond was forced off with a hamstring injury.
Braintree were reduced to 10 men when Mark Phillips was sent off for a second bookable offence.
Ofcom is proposing to cut the price that BT's infrastructure arm, Openreach, can charge operators for its popular superfast broadband service.
The regulator said it would expect these savings to be passed on to consumers through cheaper bills.
It is also planning new rules for Openreach to fix and install lines more quickly.
Openreach operates the wires and cables that power the UK's broadband network, leasing out the lines to BT's rivals such as Sky and Talk Talk.
Under the regulator's plans, Openreach's price for 40 Mbit/second broadband would fall from £88.80 a year to £66.28 next year and £52.77 by 2020.
"We would expect much of this reduction to be passed through by retail providers to their customers, resulting in lower bills," Ofcom said.
But it will not cap prices for even faster broadband, hoping that this will spur operators to install their own lines in competition with Openreach.
Jonathan Oxley, Ofcom's competition group director, said: "Our plans are designed to encourage long-term investment in future ultrafast, full-fibre networks, while promoting competition and protecting consumers from high prices."
Other rules would force Openreach to complete 93% of fault repairs within two working days, compared with 80% currently.
Openreach would also need to install 95% of connections on the date agreed with the telecoms operator, up from 90% today.
BT was issued with a record fine of £42m by Ofcom on Monday because of delays by Openreach in installing high-speed lines.
Ofcom has forced BT to legally separate Openreach into a distinct business, in another move aimed at boosting competition. 
Summarize: 
Openreach is the company that provides the infrastructure for the UK's broadband network. It is owned by BT, and has been criticised for its poor performance in installing new lines.
In 2014, Ofcom announced that it would be cutting the price that BT's infrastructure arm, Openreach, could charge for its superfast broadband service.
The regulator said it would expect these savings to be passed on to consumers through cheaper bills.
It is also planning new rules for Openreach to fix and install lines more quickly.
Openreach operates the wires and cables that power the UK's broadband network, leasing out
Ken Harris, 102, celebrated with wife Margaret, 99, after being parted for the first time since the war.
Mr Harris feared he would never again see his beloved wife after he went into hospital with a broken hip.
But the couple, who were married in 1937, have been reunited again at a nursing home in Llangynidr, near Crickhowell, in Powys.
"They hold hands every day now because of the memory of being separated in the war," said daughter-in-law Pat Harris, 75.
Mr Harris, who has carried a photograph of their wedding day in his wallet since, was deployed to Burma in World War Two with the South Wales Borderers.
The couple from Llanhilleth, near Newbridge, who have two children, Alan and Ann, have spent every day together since.
That was until Mrs Harris was moved into a care home after being diagnosed with dementia.
The former butcher was then admitted to hospital after breaking his hip in a fall just six weeks before their 80th anniversary and believed it would be the last time he would see his wife.
But after spending a month in hospital, Mr Harris was given the all clear to leave and was found a room in the same care home as his wife in the Brecon Beacons.
"Ken went to war and Margaret stayed home working as a doctor's secretary but he always had her photo in his wallet," added Mrs Harris.
"When Ken went into hospital he didn't think he would ever see her again. It is so fortunate that a room became available at Margaret's home.
"It has been a real battle trying to keep them together. Ken gave his life for his country and he deserves to be able to be with his wife.
"They are a very loving couple and we are so proud to have celebrated their 80th anniversary with them." 
Summarize: 
"Ken Harris, 102, celebrated with wife Margaret, 99, after being parted for the first time since the war."
"Mr Harris feared he would never again see his beloved wife after he went into hospital with a broken hip."
"But the couple, who were married in 1937, have been reunited again at a nursing home in Llangynidr, near Crickhowell, in Powys."
" 'They hold hands every day now because of the memory of being separated in the war,' said daughter-in-law Pat Harris, 75."
"Mr Harris, who has carried a photograph of
Scott Wiseman, Joe Anyon and Jamie Ness will also leave the Iron.
The club have taken up the options on the contracts of Noel Burdett, Jack Dyche and Levi Sutton.
New terms are currently being offered to Stephen Dawson, Neal Bishop and Kyle Wootton, while the club say negotiations are continuing with Luke Daniels and Craig Davies. 
Summarize: 
The Iron have signed the following players:
The Iron have released the following players:
The Iron have taken up the option on the contract of Noel Burdett.
The Iron have taken up the option on the contract of Jack Dyche.
The Iron have taken up the option on the contract of Levi Sutton.
The Iron have taken up the option on the contract of Stephen Dawson.
The Iron have taken up the option on the contract of Neal Bishop.
The Iron have taken up the option on the contract of Kyle Wootton.
The Iron have taken up the option on the contract of
It found more than a third of Welsh schools now have less than 10% of Year 10 pupils studying a modern foreign language.
British Council Wales said prospects remained "extremely challenging".
The Welsh Government said its action plan to improve take-up of languages was already under way.
Other findings of the survey included:
Between 2002 and 2016, the number of pupils studying a foreign language to GCSE level has fallen by 48% to 6,891 pupils last year.
At A-level, numbers have fallen by 44% since 2001.
The report said the outlook for foreign languages looked "even more fragile in the context of financial pressures on schools and the potential impact of leaving the European Union".
It added that foreign language provision was further threatened by the underlying shortage of teachers.
It said the situation was likely to "become critical if the supply of teachers from other EU countries runs dry post-Brexit", as 34% of schools were reliant on such teachers.
The survey comes 18 months into the Welsh Government's five-year Global Futures plan to improve and promote modern foreign languages in Wales.
A Welsh Government spokesman said: "In recent months alone, the government committed further funding for national school mentoring projects led by academics and language students and signed an agreement with the Spanish government on language teaching.
"We believe that languages play an important part in giving a young person a well rounded education, to support them in becoming global citizens, who are able to communicate effectively in other languages and appreciate other cultures."
The 2016-17 survey is the third annual report into the state of language learning in secondary schools in Wales.
It was completed by foreign language teachers at 118 out of 210 secondary schools in the country. 
Summarize: 
The survey found that the number of pupils studying a modern foreign language to GCSE level has fallen by 48% since 2002.
At A-level, numbers have fallen by 44% since 2001.
The report said the outlook for foreign languages looked "even more fragile in the context of financial pressures on schools and the potential impact of leaving the European Union".
It added that foreign language provision was further threatened by the underlying shortage of teachers.
It said the situation was likely to "become critical if the supply of teachers from other EU countries runs dry post-Brexit", as 34% of schools were reliant on such teachers
The 1929 work, Girl with Necklace, was given by Kahlo's husband to a woman who had assisted her before her death.
The assistant, now in her 90s, kept the painting in a bedroom in her home in California until she offered it to auction house Sotheby's this year.
It is expected to fetch up to $2m (Â£1.6m) at the sale on 22 November.
Axel Stein, head of Latin American art at Sotheby's, said the painting was in an excellent state.
"The painting looks very fresh," Mr Stein said. "It was in a dark part of the house so the colours are vibrant.
According to Mr Stein, the oil-on-canvas painting has "a sense of warmth and closeness".
It portrays a girl, possibly Frida Kahlo herself, looking directly ahead.
Art experts knew of the painting because a friend of Frida Kahlo's had once photographed it..
The black-and-white snap featured in a catalogue of Kahlo's works but the whereabouts of the original had been unknown.
Its owner told Sotheby's that Frida Kahlo's husband, Diego Rivera, had given her the painting as a present in 1955.
She said Rivera, a famous muralist, had told her he wanted her to have a "memento" of the artist.
A painting by Kahlo depicting two nude women in the woods fetched $8m at an auction in New York earlier this year, the highest price one of her paintings has fetched to date. 
Summarize: 
Frida Kahlo's paintings were a source of inspiration for her husband, Diego Rivera, and she was a talented artist in her own right.
Frida Kahlo was born in Mexico City in 1907, and was the daughter of a German father and a Mexican mother.
Frida Kahlo was a talented artist, and she was a student of Diego Rivera, who was a famous muralist.
Frida Kahlo was married to Diego Rivera, and they had one child together, named Cristina.
Frida Kahlo died in 1954, and she was a talented artist in her own right.
In the first incident on Monday, masked gunmen killed at least five people in the town of Dalwah, a Shia Muslim area in eastern Saudi Arabia.
On Tuesday in a shootout believed to be linked to that attack, two suspected militants and two Saudi policemen were killed in Buraida, north of Riyadh.
Shias, who make up less than 15% of the Sunni-majority nation, are currently marking the festival of Ashura.
It commemorates the death of a grandson of the Prophet Muhammad.
Monday's attack was in Dalwah in Ahsa district, one of the centres for Shia Muslims.
At least three attackers fired machineguns and pistols at a crowd that was leaving a building where ceremonies had been taking place, police said.
At least 15 people have been arrested in connection with the shooting.
One resident of Eastern Province, Nasima al-Sada, told Agence France-Presse: "It's very surprising because it's the first time. We are shocked."
Saudi Arabia's supreme council of Sunni clerics condemned the attack, saying: "The enemies of our religion and our homeland aim to attack our unity and stability."
There were few details of the second gun battle.
The Saudi Press Agency said that in addition to the dead, two security officers were wounded.
The interior ministry said the gun battle began when officers tried to arrest suspects believed to be involved in Monday's incident.
Shia Muslims have long complained of marginalisation by the Sunni royal family, with the Eastern Province, where most of the country's Shia live, seeing a spate of protests in the wake of the Arab Spring.
The Saudi government denies allegations of discrimination and blames Iran for stirring up discontent. 
Summarize: 
The first incident took place in Dalwah, a Shia area in eastern Saudi Arabia.
The second incident took place in Buraida, a Shia area in northern Saudi Arabia.
The first incident took place on Monday, the second incident took place on Tuesday.
The first incident was a shooting, the second incident was a gun battle.
The first incident was a shooting, the second incident was a gun battle.
The first incident was a shooting, the second incident was a gun battle.
The first incident was a shooting, the second incident was a gun battle.
The first incident was a shooting, the
Experts say the discharge - which at one point was feared to be an oil leak - was caused by residue from black carbon filters used to clean the water.
The leak happened during maintenance work on Saturday, US officials say.
The Niagara Falls Water Board (NFWB) has since apologised for causing alarm to residents and tourists.
In a statement the board said the "inky water" was the result of "routine, necessary and short term change in the waste water treatment process" at its plant near the city of Buffalo.
"The blackish water contained some accumulated solids and carbon residue within permitted limits and did not include any organic type oils or solvents," the statement said.
"The unfortunate odour was limited to the normal sewer water discharge smell," it added.
Officials say the plant had the correct paperwork to release the discharge - which came from one of its five sediment filtration basins and was being flushed out over the weekend in preparation for contractors to begin upgrade work.
Niagara Falls' colourful new look
Among the first to notice the problem was Pat Proctor, vice president of Rainbow Air Inc, which provides helicopter tours over the falls. He said the black residue remained in the water for several hours on Saturday before it dissipated.
"I was just praying it wasn't an oil leak," Mr Proctor told the BBC. "It had spread across a half-mile area, looked very menacing and smelt terrible."
Usually such basin discharges are not carried out at peak tourism times, like last weekend, he said.
The Niagara Falls straddle the US and Canada. They are made up of three separate waterfalls and have been a popular tourist attraction for more than 200 years, in addition to being a major source of hydroelectric power. 
Summarize: 
1. The Niagara Falls Water Board (NFWB) has since apologized for causing alarm to residents and tourists.
2. In a statement the board said the "inky water" was the result of "routine, necessary and short term change in the waste water treatment process" at its plant near the city of Buffalo.
3. "The blackish water contained some accumulated solids and carbon residue within permitted limits and did not include any organic type oils or solvents," the statement said.
4. Officials say the plant had the correct paperwork to release the discharge - which came from one of its five sediment fil
A further 82 people are recovering from injuries, 20 of them severely hurt, after two commuter trains collided on a single-track stretch of railway.
Work to remove the wreckage from the site continues, but is proceeding slowly because of the location.
A third data recorder on board the trains has yet to be found.
Unanswered questions
In focus: Bavaria's railways
Authorities are trying to work out why two trains were on the stretch of track at the same time, despite safety mechanisms.
The trains crashed head-on while both were travelling at about 100km/h (60mph) east of Bad Aibling, a spa town about 60km south-east of Munich.
All 11 victims of the crash were men aged between 24 and 59.
Two large cranes have been brought to the site to remove the wreckage. The crash happened on a bend in a wooded area, above a canal, and vehicle access is difficult.
In case signals fail, German railways are fitted with a final safety guard to prevent crashes.
Cab signalling known as PZB (Punktfoermige Zugbeeinflussung - or "intermittent train control") will set off an alarm in the driver's compartment when the train approaches a red light. If the driver does not respond by pressing a button, the train will brake automatically.
Who operates the signals? 
Summarize: 
The trains were travelling at about 100km/h when they collided head-on.
The trains were travelling on a single-track stretch of railway.
The trains were travelling on a single-track stretch of railway.
The trains were travelling at about 100km/h when they collided head-on.
The trains were travelling at about 100km/h when they collided head-on.
The trains were travelling at about 100km/h when they collided head-on.
The trains were travelling at about 100km/h when they collided head-on.
The trains were travelling at about 100km/
Ana-Alecia Ayala died on Wednesday afternoon at a Dallas hospital surrounded by friends and family.
More than nine million people have watched Ms Ayala's most popular video on Facebook and Instagram.
Friends paid tribute on Facebook and said they had been deeply touched by her joy for life.
"Your pure friendship and jolly personality brought everyone together! I am in total shock and deep prayer simultaneously," said dance instructor Oluremi Sano.
You might also like
In the upbeat video posted in October, Ms Ayala dances with "chemo buddy" Danielle Andrus while still connected to intravenous lines.
The pair smile and laugh while performing the internet dance craze TZ Anthem.
"Who says cancer and chemo have to get you down? We'll have the last laugh!" Ms Ayala said on her Instagram page.
She said she wanted to show the world that "dancing and laughter" were the best medicine.
Ms Ayala was diagnosed with a rare tumour in her uterus in December 2015. It later spread to her ovaries and the lining of her stomach.
She was treated at the Baylor T Boone Pickens Cancer Hospital in Dallas, Texas.
Ms Ayala told local news channel KVUE at the time that she wanted to inspire others.
"I also want to encourage cancer patients' loved ones to step out of their comfort zones and be silly, have a dance party, be present in the moment and have a great time," she told the channel. 
Summarize: 
Ana-Alecia Ayala died on Wednesday afternoon at a Dallas hospital surrounded by friends and family.
More than nine million people have watched Ms Ayala's most popular video on Facebook and Instagram.
Friends paid tribute on Facebook and said they had been deeply touched by her joy for life.
"Your pure friendship and jolly personality brought everyone together! I am in total shock and deep prayer simultaneously," said dance instructor Oluremi Sano.
You might also like
The Gower Hotel in Bishopston, Swansea, which employed 23 people, closed without warning on New Year's Eve.
Insolvency specialist Begbies Traynor hosted a meeting of creditors to place the company in voluntary liquidation at its Cardiff office on Wednesday.
The venue had bookings for 32 events up until September 2018, including 28 weddings.
Speaking after the meeting, Claire Phillips, 38, and Simon Evans, 31, from Swansea said the loss of their money and wedding venue had left them "stressed and upset".
The couple, who are due to marry in April 2018, lost a £500 deposit they paid in November.
Ms Phillips said: "We've almost certainly lost all the money we've paid because we're an unsecured creditor.
"It does tarnish it and make you paranoid about planning anything."
Jazmine Parry, 30, from Swansea, was due to marry Kurt Tracey, 31, at the venue on 27 April.
She told the Jason Mohammad programme earlier this month she was "gutted" and they had paid £5,000 toward the cost.
Begbies Traynor said after losing staff and suffering from ill health, the owners were no longer able to run the venue and were "deeply sorry".
Consumer law expert Prof Margaret Griffiths said: "Unfortunately, of course, people like Jazmine and the other couples involved will be what's termed unsecured creditors, so they will actually be at the end of the line when it comes to paying out for the insolvency of the firm." 
Summarize: 
The Gower Hotel in Bishopston, Swansea, which employed 23 people, closed without warning on New Year's Eve.
Insolvency specialist Begbies Traynor hosted a meeting of creditors to place the company in voluntary liquidation at its Cardiff office on Wednesday.
The venue had bookings for 32 events up until September 2018, including 28 weddings.
Speaking after the meeting, Claire Phillips, 38, and Simon Evans, 31, from Swansea said the loss of their money and wedding venue had left them "stressed and upset".
The couple, who are due to marry in April 2018, lost a £
Callum O'Dowda and Kemar Roofe have been sold in the space of a week for what could rise to a combined £4.6m.
And Appleton says finding a replacement for Republic of Ireland midfielder O'Dowda is now his immediate priority.
"We've lost the best part of 40 goals in the last week, so we need some more additions," he told BBC Radio Oxford.
O'Dowda, 21, joined Championship Bristol City on Thursday in a three-year deal while Roofe moved to Leeds United last week for £3m.
"Callum has ambitions to play in the Championship," Appleton said. "He made that pretty clear.
"The irony is I've had conversations with a number of players over the last couple of months on a similar subject and I believe we as a club can match those ambitions.
"That's the frustration from my point of view. I was going to build a team this season around Callum."
O'Dowda scored 10 goals for Oxford United last season during their automatic promotion from League Two and run to the Football League Trophy final.
Appleton, who has already brought in eight players this summer, has plans in place to further bolster the squad.
Among his targets had been Bristol Rovers striker Matt Taylor, before the 26-year-old agreed a new deal with Rovers on Friday.
"It's an interesting one as without speaking too much out of turn, I did think we'd shook hands on an agreement," he said.
"But I'm being told by his representative that he hasn't got a desire to play for his hometown club.
"They'll be players out there who will become available," Appleton added. "That might not be until later in the window or it could be as quick as the next 24 hours." 
Summarize: 
The club have been in the news for the wrong reasons over the last week. The club have lost two players in the space of a week. The club have lost two players in the space of a week. The club have lost two players in the space of a week. The club have lost two players in the space of a week. The club have lost two players in the space of a week. The club have lost two players in the space of a week. The club have lost two players in the space of a week. The club have lost two players in the space of a week. The club have lost two players in
Karim Benzema turned in Dani Carvajal's low cross to open the scoring for Real.
They were in danger of slipping six points behind leaders Barcelona, who won 2-0 at Levante earlier, as Yousseff El-Arabi equalised for Granada.
But Modric hammered the ball into the top corner in the 84th minute to give boss Zinedine Zidane a first away win.
Relive all the action here.
The opener was Benzema's 23rd goal of the season and eighth in his last six games as Real forward Cristiano Ronaldo again failed to score away from home.
Ronaldo's last goal away from the Bernabeu came at the end of November and the top scorer missed an early chance as he fired just wide of the far post.
Granada had lost three of their last four league games and last season conceded 13 goals in two league defeats by Real.
But they carried a real threat all evening and after goalkeeper Andres Fernandez had superbly saved from Benzema, deservedly levelled through substitute El-Arabi with an hour gone.
The Morocco international ran onto a pass from former Blackburn forward Ruben Rochina to slot home with virtually his first touch to become the joint top scorer in Granada's La Liga history with 34 goals.
But ex-Tottenham midfielder Modric capped a superb display with his first league goal of the season to keep Real a point behind city rivals Atletico Madrid and four adrift of leaders Barca.
Elsewhere in La Liga, Sevilla held out with 10 men after having on-loan Tottenham defender Federico Fazio sent off to secure a 1-1 draw at top-six rivals Celta Vigo and extend their unbeaten run to 10 games.
Fazio received two bookings in the first 25 minutes of his first game since rejoining Seville, who went ahead through Daniel Carrico's 43rd-minute goal.
Claudio Beauvue levelled for Celta Vigo 19 minutes into the second half, and the two teams will meet again in the second leg of their Copa del Rey semi-final next Thursday evening with Sevilla leading 4-0 from the first leg. 
Summarize:  Real Madrid 0-1 Granada
Real Madrid: Casillas; Carvajal, Varane, Ramos, Marcelo; Modric, Khedira, Di Maria, Isco; Benzema, Ronaldo.
Granada: Fernandez; Carvajal, Rochina, Rami, Fazio; Carrico, Duda, Youssef, Varela; El-Arabi, Vela.
Referee: Alberto Undiano Mallenco (Castile and Leon)
<div style="margin-top:15px">
Weather officials warn of high winds, rain and flash flooding as the weather system now moves up the east coast.
Four people were killed in Mississippi and 15 in Georgia during the weekend's tornadoes and thunderstorms.
President Trump has pledged federal assistance to the three states that have been most-affected by the storms.
"The tornadoes were vicious and powerful and strong and they suffered greatly," Mr Trump said on Sunday at the White House.
"So we'll be helping out," he added.
The Georgia Emergency Management Agency said that the 15 victims were in the southern Cook, Brooks, Dougherty and Berrien counties.
Most of the deaths occurred in Cook County, when a mobile home park was apparently struck by a tornado.
Cook County coroner Tim Purvis said numerous mobile homes had been "levelled" before dawn on Sunday in the park near the city of Adel.
Emergency teams are still searching for survivors beneath the rubble, he added, and by Monday evening, residents had not been permitted to return.
Mr Purvis estimated that the park has about 40 mobile homes in total, and roughly half were destroyed.
"These storms have devastated communities and homes in South Central Georgia, and the state is making all resources available to the impacted areas," Governor Deal said in a statement.
"Trailers are just flat, just laid on top of people", rescue worker Debbie Van Brackel told the Atlanta Journal-Constitution.
"You need a bulldozer to pull it off. Trailers are upside down."
In Brooks County, coroner Michael Miller said two people died when an apparent tornado tossed a mobile home around 100 yards into the middle of Highway 122.
Swathes of the south-eastern United States have been hit by storms over the weekend.
Several tornadoes were also reported in South Carolina and Florida, officials say.
In southern Mississippi, four people died in the path of a tornado with winds above 218 km/h (136 mph).
More than 50 others were injured and about 1,100 homes were damaged or destroyed, state officials said.
The Georgia Emergency Management Agency issued advice on the best and worst places  to shelter from a tornado late on Saturday, advising locals in the path of a tornado to cover themselves with blankets or a mattress for protection. 
Summarize: 
The storms, which are part of a weather system moving up the east coast, have claimed four lives in Georgia and 15 in Mississippi.
The storms, which are part of a weather system moving up the east coast, have claimed four lives in Georgia and 15 in Mississippi.
The storms, which are part of a weather system moving up the east coast, have claimed four lives in Georgia and 15 in Mississippi.
The storms, which are part of a weather system moving up the east coast, have claimed four lives in Georgia and 15 in Mississippi.
The storms, which are part of a weather system moving up
Bruce had to be restrained as the pair squared up moments after Poyet was sent off for reacting badly to midfielder Jack Rodwell's yellow card.
Media playback is not supported on this device
Bruce blamed the incident on the "heat of the moment" while Poyet said: "What happens on the pitch stays there."
Dame N'Doye gave Hull a first-half lead before Rodwell equalised on 77 minutes.
Rodwell was booked for simulation with his side trailing 1-0 at the KC Stadium, prompting Poyet's furious reaction.
"I was sent off for kicking the bucket," he told BBC Sport.
"I know it doesn't look good, but it's nothing to worry about. I prefer that than saying something I would regret."
After Poyet was sent to the stand by referee Mike Dean, the Uruguayan walked across to confront Bruce.
The pair exchanged words before Bruce had to be restrained by an assistant referee and members of his coaching staff.
Media playback is not supported on this device
"I don't know what I was supposed to have done," said Bruce. "He obviously feels aggrieved about something."
Bruce added he would let Poyet explain why he reacted the way he did, but insisted Rodwell had dived.
"The ref has seen it," said Bruce. "From Gus's reaction, it looks as though he didn't agree."
Rodwell's header kept Sunderland in 16th place in the Premier League on 26 points, four above the relegation zone.
Hull have 27 points and are 15th in the table with 10 games to play.
Poyet was also asked about Adam Johnson after the game.
The Sunderland winger was arrested on Monday on suspicion of having sexual activity with a 15-year-old girl and subsequently suspended by the club "pending the outcome of a police investigation".
Durham Police said Johnson, 27, was questioned at a station close to his County Durham home and later bailed.
Poyet said: "The only thing I can tell you is that it was a very difficult day yesterday. Very difficult day. I never had one like that, very difficult." 
Summarize: 
"The referee was very harsh on Jack Rodwell. I don't think he was sent off for a dive. It was a yellow card for me and I don't think he deserved that.
"I don't know what I was supposed to have done. He obviously feels aggrieved about something.
"I don't know what happened. I don't know what I was supposed to have done. I don't know what he was supposed to have done.
"I don't know what I was supposed to have done. I don't know what he was supposed to have done.
"I don't know
St Davids RNLI officially opened its £10m lifeboat station on Tuesday and named its £2.7m Tamar class lifeboat Norah Wortley.
The new station and slipway took two years to build and are positioned in the cliffs next to the old station at St Justinian.
About 200 people, including past and present crew, attended the ceremony.
The Norah Wortley was funded by a bequest from Diana Symon from Devon and since its arrival at the station four years ago has launched more than 60 times, helping to rescue 50 people and save four lives.
Champagne was poured over the bow as the lifeboat was officially named and handed over to Capt James Wilcox, lifeboat operations manager at St Davids RNLI.
Capt Wilcox said: "The thanks of everyone connected to St Davids RNLI goes out to Diana Symon and all the other donors who made this day possible.
"Their generosity and the support of the local community mean our volunteers will be able to save lives at sea off the coast of St Davids for many more years to come."
The new lifeboat station is one of the RNLI's most ambitious build projects in recent years.
It was part funded by the community and as well as housing the Norah Wortley, is home to the smaller inshore lifeboat.
Tuesday's ceremony also paid tribute to the past with the Watson class lifeboat, which served St Davids RNLI for 22 years until 1985, in the water for the event. 
Summarize: 
The new lifeboat station and slipway took two years to build and are positioned in the cliffs next to the old station at St Justinian.
About 200 people, including past and present crew, attended the ceremony.
The Norah Wortley was funded by a bequest from Diana Symon from Devon and since its arrival at the station four years ago has launched more than 60 times, helping to rescue 50 people and save four lives.
Champagne was poured over the bow as the lifeboat was officially named and handed over to Capt James Wilcox, lifeboat operations manager at St Davids RNLI.
Capt
The impoverished west African country of 1.6 million is plagued by corruption and cocaine trafficking.
It is the first election since a coup in 2012, after which the EU and others suspended aid donations.
With a history of coups, no elected leader has served a full term since independence from Portugal in 1974.
A BBC reporter in the capital Bissau said turnout appeared to be high as he saw large queues at polling stations.
There were 13 candidates for president and 15 parties fielding candidates for parliament.
Among the presidential hopefuls are political heavyweights such as former Finance Minister Jose Mario Vaz, and Abel Incada, a member of the Party for Social Renewal (PRS) of former President Kumba Yala, who died last week.
The dark horse, however, could be 50-year-old independent candidate Paulo Gomes, an unusual proposition in a political landscape hitherto dominated by political grandees who made their names during the war of independence.
A gifted economist who has spent most of his life working abroad, including as the leader of the World Bank's sub-Saharan Africa division, he believes he has the know-how to begin to turn around the country's fortunes.
The west African nation has stagnated since 2012, under the rule of a transitional government backed by its all-powerful military.
With few resources other than cashew nuts and fish, South American drug cartels have turned the country into a cocaine trafficking hub.
The money that generates has corrupted many of the country's public institutions, particularly its armed forces.
A year ago, the US charged 2012 coup leader Antonio Indjai with drug trafficking and seeking to sell surface-to-air missiles to Colombia's FARC rebels, to shoot down US patrol helicopters. He has not been extradited.
Polling was monitored by 550 international observers and a presidential runoff is scheduled for 18 May if no candidate emerges as the clear winner.
The country is ranked 177th out of 187 in the UN's human development index, with two-thirds of the population living below the poverty line. 
Summarize:  The country is plagued by corruption and cocaine trafficking. It is the first election since a coup in 2012, after which the EU and others suspended aid donations. With a history of coups, no elected leader has served a full term since independence from Portugal in 1974. A BBC reporter in the capital Bissau said turnout appeared to be high as he saw large queues at polling stations. There were 13 candidates for president and 15 parties fielding candidates for parliament. Among the presidential hopefuls are political heavyweights such as former Finance Minister Jose Mario Vaz, and Abel Incada, a member of the Party for Social Renewal (PRS
Balotelli has 33 caps for his country but was left out of Italy's Euro 2016 squad after a disappointing season on loan at AC Milan.
The striker scored three goals in 23 games at the San Siro last season and Liverpool manager Jurgen Klopp has told the 25-year-old to find a new club.
"In terms of his character, he could do much better," Ventura said.
"The fact he's not playing at Milan, that Liverpool have abandoned him, means that he is at a crossroads.
"The few times that Balotelli has really wanted to be a footballer, he has shown his quality. I have no prejudice, but his football must do the talking."
Ventura, who takes over from new Chelsea manager Antonio Conte, also said that players who move to 'lesser leagues' risk damaging their international careers, after Southampton striker Graziano Pelle joined Chinese Super League side Shandong Luneng.
Ventura said: "Players need to have a desire to win, going to a lesser league doesn't help in that regard.
"As for Pelle, apart from his missed penalty (in the Euro 2016 quarter-final defeat to Germany), he had a positive campaign. But China is far away. Let's see why he moved." 
Summarize: 
"I'm not a coach who has a lot of experience, but I'm not a novice either. I've had a lot of experience in my career.
"I've had a lot of success in my career, but I've also had a lot of failures.
"I've had a lot of ups and downs in my career, so I know what it's like to be a coach.
"I know what it's like to be a player, I know what it's like to be a manager, I know what it's like to be a referee.
"I know what it's like to
Media playback is not supported on this device
Tyco BMW rider Martin took the honours in the two Superbike events, winning the feature race from Derek Sheils and Dean Harrison after Michael Dunlop came off without injury.
Martin held off Michael in Superbike race one, with Sheils in third place.
William Dunlop won both Supersport 600 outings, Harrison and Derek McGee taking up the runner-up spots, while Michael Dunlop won the Supertwins race.
William, who was riding the CD Yamaha which he will campaign in the international road races this season, saw off Harrison by five seconds in Supersport race one, Ballyclare's Jamie Hamilton completing the podium for the BE Cookstown Racing team.
James Cowton, McGee and Sheils made up the top six leaderboard.
Mar-Train Yamaha rider Harrison was third in Supersport race two, Hamilton and Sheils following home the Yorkshireman.
McGee was fourth in Superbike race one, followed by William Dunlop and Hamilton.
Sam Wilson won the 125cc race on a Joey's Bar 125cc Honda, ahead of Dungannon's Nigel Moore. 
Summarize: 
The Supertwins race was won by Michael Dunlop on a Tyco BMW.
The Supersport race was won by William Dunlop on a CD Yamaha.
The Superbike race was won by Michael Dunlop on a Tyco BMW.
The Supersport race was won by William Dunlop on a CD Yamaha.
The Supertwins race was won by Michael Dunlop on a Tyco BMW.
The Supersport race was won by William Dunlop on a CD Yamaha.
The Supertwins race was won by Michael Dun
It is clear from the graph above that net migration (numbers coming to the UK minus numbers leaving) has increased since the late 1990s.
These are figures on long-term international migration from the Office for National Statistics (ONS) going back to when they started being collected in 1964.
Long-term migrants are ones who say they are planning to move countries for at least a year.
There have been increases in both long-term arrivals and long-term departures since the late 1990s, but the former has outstripped the latter.
Main pledges
Policy guide: Where the parties stand
Mr Farage said on the Today programme on BBC Radio 4 that between 1990 and 1997: "Net migration to Britain ran at between 30,000 and 50,000 people a year - that was normality."
He's not exactly right about those figures. In 1992, net migration was minus 13,000 and in 1993 it was minus 1,000. So in both of those years more people left than arrived.
In 1994, it was 77,000, in 1995 it was 76,000 and in 1996 it was 55,000.
So in fact, in the eight-year period to which he referred, net migration was only in the range of 30,000 to 50,000 for three years.
The period did not follow an obvious trend, and it is hard to see why it would be described as "normal".
During the 1960s and 1970s, net migration was mainly negative, with more people emigrating from the UK than arriving to live here - perhaps that was normal.
In the 1980s, net migration moved into positive low levels and then started gradually increasing from the mid-1990s.
Since the turn of the century, annual net migration has been between 150,000 and 300,000 - maybe that's normal.
The point is that since records began in the 1960s, net migration has only been between 30,000 and 50,000 for six years, so describing that range as normal seems a bit odd.
What's the truth behind the politicians' claims on the campaign trail? Our experts investigate the facts, and wider stories, behind the soundbites.
Read latest updates or follow us on Twitter @BBCRealityCheck 
Summarize:  The UK's net migration figures are not as high as the politicians claim.
Verdict: False
The UK's net migration figures are not as high as the politicians claim.
Mr Farage said on the Today programme on BBC Radio 4 that between 1990 and 1997: "Net migration to Britain ran at between 30,000 and 50,000 people a year - that was normality."
He's not exactly right about those figures. In 1992, net migration was minus 13,000 and in 1993 it was minus 1,000. So in both of those years more people left than arrived.
In 1994, it was 77,
GB had a target of six to eight medals for the World Championships in London.
They brought their total up to six on Sunday, including a gold and silver from double Olympic champion Mo Farah, who is retiring this summer.
"I've always felt that this was a transitional phase," said Bowker, who will succeed Ed Warner later this year.
"The real issue is have we got the underlying talent to take us into the next great age of British athletics? I think what people have seen this week is that we absolutely have.
"We've got a fantastically rich crop of young talent. We feel we're in a good place."
As well as Farah's gold in the 10,000m and silver in the 5,000m, Britain collected gold in the men's and silver in the women's 4x100m relays, and silver and bronze in the women's and men's 4x400m relays.
But the team have also had to settle for five fourth-place finishes at the London Stadium.
"We've had some sensational performances from young and upcoming athletes who are just demonstrating that they're getting into great shape, where Tokyo is our real focus," added Bowker.
"We think we've got a team which is really going to be in a fantastic position to be competitive and deliver then."
Media playback is not supported on this device
Toni Minichiello, who coached former Olympic and world champion Jessica Ennis-Hill, has voiced his concerns about the legacy left by Warner, who was in charge of UK Athletics for 11 years.
Minichiello said Bowker had "three years to save the sport" and that coaching should be his top priority.
In response, Bowker said: "I don't quite see the world he describes because when you look at the coaches we do have here, we have clearly got some absolutely brilliant British coaches.
"We talk about five fourth-placed athletes, 80% of those have British coaches.
"We've got to be flexible and have a system that responds to athlete needs, but if there are things that we can learn and look at then we should do that." 
Summarize: 
"We've got a fantastically rich crop of young talent. We feel we're in a good place."
"We've got a fantastically rich crop of young talent. We feel we're in a good place." "We've got a fantastically rich crop of young talent. We feel we're in a good place."
"We've got a fantastically rich crop of young talent. We feel we're in a good place."
"We've got a fantastically rich crop of young talent. We feel we're in a good place."
"We've got a fantastically rich
Lawyers for the child claim the picture was blackmailed from her and repeatedly published online as a form of revenge.
The girl is taking legal action against Facebook and the man who posted the photo in what is believed to be the first case of its kind in the world.
A judge in Belfast refused Facebook's bid to end proceedings.
The case will now advance to full trial at a later date.
The girl's photograph was said to have been posted on a so-called "shame" page on Facebook several times between November 2014 and January 2016.
A lawyer for the teenager likened it to a method of child abuse.
It was contended that Facebook had the power to block any republication by using a DNA process to identify the image.
The court heard it should have been a "red-line" issue for the company.
The girl, who cannot be identified, is seeking damages for misuse of private information, negligence and breach of the Data Protection Act.
A lawyer for Facebook argued the claim for damages should be dismissed, saying the company always took down the picture when it was notified.
Facebook's lawyers relied on a European directive, claiming it provides protection from having to monitor a vast amount of online material for what is posted on one page. 
Summarize:  Facebook is accused of violating the privacy of a girl by posting her picture on a "shame" page. The girl is suing Facebook for damages. Facebook is relying on a European directive that it says provides protection from having to monitor a vast amount of online material for what is posted on one page.
The girl's lawyer said the picture was posted on a "shame" page several times between November 2014 and January 2016.
A lawyer for Facebook said the claim for damages should be dismissed, saying the company always took down the picture when it was notified.
The girl's lawyer said the picture was posted on a "shame
Coast Guard Chief Petty Officer Sara Mooers said debris was seen in the ocean. It is unclear how it happened.
Marine Capt Timothy Irish told the Associated Press news agency that a search and rescue was under way for the two CH-53 transport helicopters.
The aircraft were from the 1st Marine Aircraft Wing from Marine Corps Base Hawaii, he said.
It is not clear what caused the crash of if survivors have been found.
Ms Mooers told Los Angeles radio station KNX-AM the search would be tough because of darkness and a high surf advisory.
Less than a year ago, a Marine Corps MV-22 Osprey crashed during a training exercise, killing two Marines. 
Summarize: 
The Marine Corps has deployed Ospreys to the Pacific to help with the evacuation of US citizens from the Philippines, following a typhoon.
The Ospreys are used to airlift troops and supplies.
The Ospreys were deployed to the Philippines on September 7, to help with the evacuation of US citizens from the Philippines, following a typhoon.
The Ospreys are used to airlift troops and supplies.
The Ospreys were deployed to the Philippines on September 7, to help with the evacuation of US citizens from the Philippines, following a typhoon.
The Ospreys are used to air
"Vengeance can wipe out an entire generation," he said, in an address to the nation on Sunday, urging calm.
A presidential spokesman told the BBC it was too early to blame anyone for the killing of Gen Adolphe Nshimirimana in a rocket and gun attack on his car.
Mr Nkurunziza won a third term last month, amid deadly protests over his decision to run for office again.
Opponents argued this contravened the constitution and there was a failed coup attempt in May.
"Adolphe Nshimirimana was the regime's number two, not officially, but unofficially. This assassination is a very serious blow to Burundi's government," International Crisis Group analyst Thierry Vircoulon told BBC Afrique.
The attackers reportedly targeted the general's car with machine guns and rocket launchers in the Kamenge district of the capital Bujumbura.
Presidential spokesperson Gerve Abehayo rejected suggestions that the attack could have been carried out by elements within Burundi's own security apparatus, after witnesses reported four men in military uniform spraying the general's car with bullets.
"The government is not losing support... the army remains strong and united... one general was killed, but this does not mean the whole military has been wiped out of this country," he told the BBC's Newsday programme.
President Nkurunziza has called for an investigation into the general's killing to be concluded within a week.
The African Union, European Union and the US have all condemned the attack, with AU chairperson Nkosazana Dlamini Zuma describing it as a "barbaric act that is likely to further destabilise the country".
Prominent Burundian journalist Esdras Ndikumana, who works for AFP news agency and Radio France Internationale (RFI), says he was detained by intelligence officers and badly beaten after trying to take photos at the scene of the attack.
More than 70 people have been killed since the unrest began in April, and 180,000 have fled the country, according to the UN refugee agency.
Mr Nkurunziza came to power in 2005, after 300,000 were killed in a  12-year conflict between ethnic Hutus and Tutsis. 
Summarize: 
The Burundian president, Pierre Nkurunziza, has been accused of violating the constitution and the rights of his citizens by running for a third term in office.
The president, Pierre Nkurunziza, has been accused of violating the constitution and the rights of his citizens by running for a third term in office.
The president, Pierre Nkurunziza, has been accused of violating the constitution and the rights of his citizens by running for a third term in office.
The president, Pierre Nkurunziza, has been accused of violating the constitution and the rights
Hiller's pictures focus on the everyday lives of the Burmese people, shots captured while walking the streets or over a cup of tea at a roadside stop.
He first visited Myanmar on a one-week visa in 1987, and despite travel restrictions, developed a love for the country.
As time passed, each visit has seen a relaxation of military rule, though while there in 2000, he often hid his cameras and was stopped a number of times by what he calls "plainclothes agents", though he managed to leave the country with 90 rolls of exposed film.
In 2011, he taught photography in Yangon having been hired by the US embassy, and a year later, was able to meet his students again, some of whom are now working for international and national media organisations, as well as posting to social media following further relaxation of restrictions by the authorities.
Despite these changes Hiller is aware that the future of Myanmar is still uncertain. Much rests on the first openly-contested general election to be held in the country in 25 years.
Here is a selection of pictures from his latest book, Daybreak in Myanmar, which also contains a number of interviews with prominent Burmese figures.
Daybreak in Myanmar by Geoffrey Hiller is published by Verve Photo Books. Hiller is also editor of Verve Photo: The New Breed of Documentary Photographers. 
Summarize: 
"Daybreak in Myanmar is a collection of photographs of the daily lives of the Burmese people, taken by British photographer Geoffrey Hiller over the past 25 years.
The book is divided into four sections, each of which focuses on a different aspect of Burmese life.
The first section, 'The People', contains images of the people of Myanmar, including portraits of the country's leaders, the military, the police, and ordinary citizens.
The second section, 'The Land', features images of the country's landscapes, including the country's famous mountains and rivers.
The third section, 'The City
Siamak Namazi, a businessman, was detained by Iran's Islamic Revolutionary Guard last October.
His father Baquer, 80, was detained in February while seeking his release.
The US State Department says it is deeply concerned about the sentencing reports.
"We join recent calls by international organisations and UN human rights experts for the immediate release of all US citizens unjustly detained in Iran, including Siamak and Baquer Namazi, so that they can return to their families," spokesman Mark Toner said.
There are no precise details of the charges for which the pair were convicted.
However the New York Times reported on Monday that a video posted online by Mizan "hinted" that Siamak Namazi was accused of espionage.
"Siamak Namazi and Mohammad Baquer Namazi have each been sentenced to 10 years prison... for co-operating with the hostile government of America," the Mizan website said, quoting "an informed source".
Analysts see the sentences as part of an intensifying campaign by Iranian hardliners against nationals with ties to the West following the historic nuclear deal with the US and other world powers last year.
The family of the two men have protested their innocence and expressed concern that Baquer Namazi has a heart condition which requires special medical attention.
Siamak Namazi was most recently working for Crescent Petroleum in the United Arab Emirates, and previously headed a consulting business in Iran.
His father was a former Iranian provincial governor and Unicef official. More recently he ran Hamyaran, an umbrella agency for Iranian non-governmental organisations.
Sources say that a US-Lebanese national, Nazar Zaka, who was reported to have been arrested in November 2015 for suspected espionage, was also jailed for 10 years on Tuesday.
In January Iran released Washington Post journalist Jason Rezaian who spent nearly two years in prison on espionage charges. He was freed at the same time as a nuclear accord came into force, lifting sanctions against Iran.
Rezaian is now is suing Iran's government for "irreparable harm" he allegedly suffered while in prison because of "torture and other cruel treatment". 
Summarize: 
1. The US State Department said it was deeply concerned about the sentencing reports.
2. The US State Department said it was deeply concerned about the sentencing reports.
3. The US State Department said it was deeply concerned about the sentencing reports.
4. The US State Department said it was deeply concerned about the sentencing reports.
5. The US State Department said it was deeply concerned about the sentencing reports.
6. The US State Department said it was deeply concerned about the sentencing reports.
7. The US State Department said it was deeply concerned about the sentencing reports.
Sphere Medical Ltd has launched a fund-raising drive with shareholders as it prepares to open the facility by 2016.
The Wales Fund - a £100m scheme set up to boost hi-tech medical and pharmaceutical industries in Wales - has pledged £4m toward the plan.
The Cambridge-based firm said the site's location is yet to be decided.
Wolfgang Rencken, Sphere Medical's CEO, said: "We are very excited about the opportunity that we have. We know that Wales has been good for med-tech companies."
Brenig Preest, investment director at Arthurian Life Sciences, which runs the Wales Life Sciences Investment Fund, said it was a "huge opportunity".
"This is fantastic news for Wales. It really plays to Wales' strengths. It's a serious group of international investors who know exactly what they are doing." 
Summarize:  Sphere Medical Ltd has launched a fund-raising drive with shareholders as it prepares to open the facility by 2016.
The Wales Fund - a £100m scheme set up to boost hi-tech medical and pharmaceutical industries in Wales - has pledged £4m toward the plan.
The Cambridge-based firm said the site's location is yet to be decided.
Wolfgang Rencken, Sphere Medical's CEO, said: "We are very excited about the opportunity that we have. We know that Wales has been good for med-tech companies."
Brenig Preest, investment director at Arthurian Life Sciences, which runs
It tells the story of young dinosaur Arlo who has lots of fears. But with the help of a new friend, he goes on a journey where he learns to be more brave.
The film's director, Peter Sohn, has worked as a writer and animator but has never directed a full length film before.
He was the voice of Squishy in Monsters University and the character of Russell in UP was even based on Peter's face.
Martin has been speaking to Peter to find out more about The Good Dinosaur and what it was like making the movie. 
Summarize: 
What was the inspiration for The Good Dinosaur?
Peter Sohn: I was working on a short film called "Mojave Bound" that was about a bunch of kids who are stranded in the desert. I was working on that for a couple of years and I was thinking about what I wanted to do next. I wanted to do a movie that was about a kid who was like a dinosaur. I was thinking about the kinds of movies I liked as a kid. I was thinking about dinosaurs and I was thinking about the kinds of movies that I liked. I was thinking about the kinds of movies that I liked as
Tugging tightly on a metaphorical dressing gown cord, John Larkin, QC, told a human rights conference in Belfast there were "some areas where it is not appropriate to involve lawyers".
He was referring to a campaign by residents of a public housing association for the right to wear their pyjamas outdoors.
Mr Larkin said the cause of human rights in Northern Ireland was in danger of being trivialised by misuse.
The campaign was evidence of a "contemporary malaise" and misunderstanding of the term, "human rights", he said.
In some parts of Belfast, wearing pyjamas for shopping or dropping children to school has become part of normal life.
The trend has been dubbed: "All Day Pyjama Syndrome".
In January, Tesco, the supermarket giant, drew the line and asked customers not to shop barefoot or in their night gear.
Two years ago, Joe McGuinness, the principal of St Matthew's Primary School, sent a stern letter to parents saying wearing pyjamas on the school run was "slovenly and rude".
However, Sinn Fein councillor Fra McCann has defended people's right to wear whatever they want.
"A variety of clothing is worn outdoors, like shorts and vests, so why not pyjamas?" he said. 
Summarize: 
In the United States, the term "pyjama day" is used to refer to the practice of wearing pajamas to school or work.
In the United Kingdom, pyjama day is a day when people wear pyjamas to work.
In the United States, pyjama day is celebrated in the United States on the last Friday of every month.
In the United Kingdom, pyjama day is celebrated on the first Friday of every month.
In the United States, pyjama day is celebrated on the last Friday of every month.
In the United Kingdom
The accident happened on Saturday at about 19:10 on the A90, near Nigg Way.
The 33-year-old had been walking on the southbound carriageway of the road when she was struck. She died at the scene.
The driver and passengers in the vehicle were uninjured. The road was closed for six hours while investigations were carried out. Police appealed for any witnesses to contact them. 
Summarize: 
A woman has died after being hit by a car on the A90.
The accident happened on Saturday at about 19:10 on the A90, near Nigg Way.
The 33-year-old had been walking on the southbound carriageway of the road when she was struck. She died at the scene.
The driver and passengers in the vehicle were uninjured. The road was closed for six hours while investigations were carried out. Police appealed for any witnesses to contact them.
The accident happened on Saturday at about 19:10 on the A90, near Nigg Way.
The
It happened on Main Street in Clady, as Storm Desmond continued to cause disruption in some areas.
Sean McCarry of the Community Rescue Service said: "The water level had risen fairly fast and he was unable to get away from his home in time.
"We managed to get a mechanical digger down the street through the flood waters and get him out."
Mr McCarry said the rescue operation, launched at about 18:15 GMT on Saturday, was a team effort between themselves, Foyle Search and Rescue and the Environment Service.
He said that after the man's ordeal, "he was relieved and happy to get away safely".
The man did not require further medical treatment.
Volunteers for the charity also managed to free a person who was trapped in their car near Strabane, County Tyrone.
Gerard Foley, who lives in Clady, said on Sunday that the village was badly affected by flooding.
"There are houses on the hill, and the rest is just water - Clady is a complete river," he said.
"You couldn't even pinpoint where the river is."
Flooding was reported on a number of roads in counties Armagh, Tyrone, Fermanagh and Londonderry.
On Sunday, the Gortnagarn Road, at Mountjoy near Omagh, is closed at the bridge due to flooding.
Road users have being warned about the risk of surface water flooding, as well as the risk of fallen trees or branches and other debris.
In Larne, County Antrim, Dunluce Street was closed due to damage to a building and concerns for its stability.
In the Republic of Ireland, thousands of homes were left without electricity and flooding affected many areas, particularly along the west coast.
Flights into and out of Irish airports have been affected by the weather, with some cancelled and others diverted. 
Summarize: 
The storm has caused widespread disruption across the UK.
The Met Office has issued a yellow weather warning for heavy rain and strong winds for much of the UK.
The Environment Agency has issued a flood warning for the River Thames at Teddington.
The Met Office has issued a yellow weather warning for heavy rain and strong winds for much of the UK.
The Met Office has issued a yellow weather warning for heavy rain and strong winds for much of the UK.
The Met Office has issued a yellow weather warning for heavy rain and strong winds for much of the UK.
The Met Office has
Kona Gamble, 21, from Braunstone in Leicester, died in summer 2013 after a fall while apparently trying to get to his hotel balcony from the roof above.
His father, Dorian, said seeing his son in hospital before he died was every parent's worse nightmare.
The cause of death was recorded as a head and brain injury as a result of a fall from a height.
The inquest in Cyprus, which was adjourned 12 times, heard that Kona had been drinking in Ayia Napa and returned alone to the four-storey Hotel Christabelle Apartments.
He did not have a key and seems to have got on the roof and then tried to access his 2nd floor balcony from above.
He was found badly injured beside an air conditioning unit on the balcony and died days later.
Mr Gamble said: "It is everyday, you think about it everyday. It has been a nightmare being adjourned 12 times, because you think about it all the time.
"It's every parent's worse nightmare when you there [to hospital] and you see the machines keeping him alive and keeping him going, it wasn't nice at all."
He added Kona's organs were donated and one recipient had got in touch through Facebook with the family to thank them.
"[Kona] had said 'Dad, make sure if I do go, my organs are donated...' that was two weeks before his accident. We kept his promise.
"A guy, same age as me, wanted a liver and he was dying in the hospital, as Kona was dying, and Kona saved his life.
"It felt magic [to receive the message], there was happiness and sadness."
A UK inquest has been opened and adjourned in Leicester, pending further inquiries. 
Summarize: 
The inquest into the death of Kona Gamble was adjourned 12 times, and the cause of death was recorded as a head and brain injury as a result of a fall from a height.
Kona Gamble, 21, from Braunstone in Leicester, died in summer 2013 after a fall while apparently trying to get to his hotel balcony from the roof above.
His father, Dorian, said seeing his son in hospital before he died was every parent's worse nightmare.
The cause of death was recorded as a head and brain injury as a result of a fall from a height.
The inquest in Cyprus, which was
A man, 54, is in a serious but stable condition in hospital after the attack at Manor Court in Moira at about 02:10 GMT.
A 36-year-old woman and a 21-year-old man were arrested at the house.
A police spokesman said: "Investigations into the circumstances surrounding this assault are ongoing at this time. 
Summarize: 
The victim was stabbed in the back and the side of the head.
The victim was stabbed in the back and the side of the head.
The victim was stabbed in the back and the side of the head.
The victim was stabbed in the back and the side of the head.
The victim was stabbed in the back and the side of the head.
The victim was stabbed in the back and the side of the head.
The victim was stabbed in the back and the side of the head.
The victim was stabbed in the back and the side of the head.
Poppy Widdison, 4, collapsed in Grimsby and later died in 2013. Michala Pyke and her ex-partner John Rytting were both found guilty of child cruelty.
The review found council services did not know the extent to which "she was exposed to risk and harm" daily.
North East Lincolnshire Council said it fully accepted the review's findings.
More on this and other North East Lincolnshire stories
A report, published by the North East Lincolnshire Safeguarding Children Board (LSCB), said Pyke "managed to mislead professionals with apparent ease".
During the trial, the court heard Pyke and Rytting, who was not Poppy's father, encouraged her to eat sedatives because they felt she was an inconvenience to their relationship.
A post-mortem examination could not establish a cause of death, but toxicology tests found she had ingested significant amounts of heroin and methadone for a period of between two and six months before her death, the jury heard.
After her birth, Poppy was due to be taken into the care of her paternal grandparents due to agency concerns, but "her legal status remained unchanged" and Pyke and Poppy's father retained parental responsibility.
The report said no "parenting assessments" were completed at this time, with no "multi-agency analysis" of the risks involved.
A "loose approach" was seen in terms of assessments, meaning her parents were able to "hide the negatives" from agencies.
The review found Pyke and Rytting both had a long history of substance abuse, with agencies unaware they were in a relationship and living together until Poppy's death.
The pair are due to be sentenced at Hull Crown Court on Monday.
Rob Mayall, independent chair of LSCB, said: "Significant changes have taken place across NEL [since 2013] and much of the learning and many of the recommendations cited in this review have already been implemented."
A spokesman for the NSPCC charity said: "It is deeply worrying that this review has highlighted ineffective management within children's social care." 
Summarize: 
The review found council services did not know the extent to which "she was exposed to risk and harm" daily.
North East Lincolnshire Council said it fully accepted the review's findings.
More on this and other North East Lincolnshire stories
A report, published by the North East Lincolnshire Safeguarding Children Board (LSCB), said Pyke "managed to mislead professionals with apparent ease".
During the trial, the court heard Pyke and Rytting, who was not Poppy's father, encouraged her to eat sedatives because they felt she was an inconvenience to their relationship.
A post-mortem
Now the 75-year-old pensioner finds himself on the other side of Australia with a new friend and a haul of fish.
An age difference of more than 50 years hasn't got in the way of a blossoming friendship between Mr Johnstone and Mati Batsinilas, a carpenter who lives in Brisbane.
Moved by the online post, in which Mr Johnstone explained that his former fishing companion had died, Mr Batsinilas, 22, paid for the widowed pensioner to fly from his home in South Australia to Brisbane, more than 1,600km (995 miles) away.
They are now on a special trip off the Queensland coast.
Mr Batsinilas was just one of many people who said they wanted to go fishing with Mr Johnstone after his original post went viral.
Lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
According to the Courier Mail newspaper an 80cm (31in) mulloway fish was among the grandfather's haul on Tuesday, the first day of a two-day trip with Mr Batsinilas.
The pair had planned to camp overnight on the picturesque North Stradbroke island.
"This has been more of an adventure than a trip for Ray," Mr Batsinilas said.
And Ray's verdict? "It was a really good day," he told the newspaper from Amity Point, on the island.
More than 115,000 people have now seen the original post.
Explaining his love for fishing, Mr Johnstone told the BBC last week that he just liked "getting out in the fresh air" and keeping active.
"I don't want to end up as a vegetable like some old people do," he said.
You might also be interested in: 
Summarize: 
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
A lonely fisherman's plea charms Australia
The group has tabled the motion in an amendment to the Queen's Speech.
Currently, abortion is illegal in all but the most limited circumstances in NI.
As a result, hundreds of women travel to England for legal abortion treatment every year.
Last week, the Supreme Court clarified that restrictions on NHS funded abortion care for Northern Ireland women are not due to economic or legal constraints.
Rather, they are based on the secretary of state's political considerations and respect for the local assembly.
One judge, who found in favour of granting funded services, noted it is hard to understand why paying for the abortions of Northern Irish women in England would constitute a lack of respect, when allowing these women to access them at their own cost does not.
The amendment will allow parliament to reach its own view.
Over the past four years, the government has spent Â£3m through the Department for International Development to help women in developing countries access safe abortion services.
The government has stated that: "Women and adolescent girls must have the right to make their own decisions about their sexual and reproductive health and well-being, and be able to choose whether, when and how many children to have."
The amendment, according to the cross-party group, would ensure that all women resident in the UK have the same access to safe abortion services that the UK helps fund abroad.
The British Pregnancy Advisory Service, BPAS, estimates that providing NHS-funded abortion care to NI citizens in 2016 would have only cost the government around Â£350,500.
Bernadette Smyth, founder and director of Precious Life, said, "The Supreme Court made their decision and MPs should respect democracy." 
Summarize: 
"The amendment would ensure that all women resident in the UK have the same access to safe abortion services that the UK helps fund abroad."
"The amendment would ensure that all women resident in the UK have the same access to safe abortion services that the UK helps fund abroad."
"The amendment would ensure that all women resident in the UK have the same access to safe abortion services that the UK helps fund abroad."
"The amendment would ensure that all women resident in the UK have the same access to safe abortion services that the UK helps fund abroad."
"The amendment would ensure that all women resident in
The court said impeachment proceedings launched last month had "no legal foundation" and that the president had not violated the constitution.
The opposition, which controls parliament, rejected the ruling.
Mr Rajaonarimampianina has been in office for 16 months and it was hoped his election would end years of political unrest in the country.
Under Madagascar's constitution, an impeachment vote requires a two-thirds majority of the 151 members of the national assembly.
Mr Rajaonarimampianina had challenged the validity of last month's impeachment saying many MPs who said they had voted were not in parliament at the time.
Reacting to Saturday's court decision to throw out the vote, the head of the president's HVM party, Rivo Rakotovao, said: "Everyone must submit to the decision of the constitutional court."
In a comment issued just after the ruling, opposition spokesman Pierre Houleder called it "ridiculous".
The parliamentary opposition to President Rajaonarimampianina is led by former strongman Andry Rajoelina.
Correspondents say the president is being attacked by both Mr Rajoelina and another former president, Marc Ravalomanana - both of whom were forced to withdraw from the 2013 presidential election won by Mr Rajaonarimampianina.
Madagascar suffered years of political turmoil beginning in 2009, when Mr Rajoelina ousted Mr Ravalomanana.
The coup left the country isolated in the international community and deprived of foreign aid. 
Summarize: 
The Constitutional Court of Madagascar has ruled that the impeachment of President Hery Rajaonarimampianina was invalid, the court said on Saturday.
The court said impeachment proceedings launched last month had "no legal foundation" and that the president had not violated the constitution.
The opposition, which controls parliament, rejected the ruling.
Mr Rajaonarimampianina has been in office for 16 months and it was hoped his election would end years of political unrest in the country.
Under Madagascar's constitution, an impeachment vote requires a two-thirds majority of the 151 members of the national assembly.
Mr
His comments come after a group of MPs said earlier this year the TV licence did not have a long-term future and was "becoming harder to justify".
Lord Hall agreed the licence fee needed to "adapt, modernise and change".
He said the government's suggestion of introducing a household tax was a "very interesting idea", but did not know if it would work in practice.
Speaking to the BBC's Andrew Marr, Lord Hall said there was broad agreement for the licence fee to be reformed to ensure "everyone is paying equally for it".
The licence fee currently costs Â£145.50 per year for every household where people watch or record live TV. It is not required to watch catch-up TV, using services such as the BBC iPlayer.
"Reform is up for the government to decide and have a debate," Lord Hall said.
"We suggested ways of reforming it so whatever way you consume and use BBC services you can pay for it. Somewhere in there lies a solution."
However the director general dismissed the suggestion of replacing the charge with a subscription model to pay for the BBC's output.
"By everybody paying something, we all get great services for a lot less than if you went down a subscription model route," he said.
The new Culture Secretary, John Whittingdale, has been outspoken in the past against the TV licence, describing it as regressive and "worse than a poll tax".
One of his first duties will be to oversee negotiations for the corporation's charter renewal next year.
The BBC's royal charter determines the level of the licence fee and the other terms under which the corporation operates.
Lord Hall said it was "a crucial time for the BBC".
He added: "He's very direct about the BBC and the licence fee, but John Whittingdale's report when he was chairman of the DCMS (Department for Culture, Media and Sport) committee said some vey positive things about the BBC.
"He knows the sector and loves what the media do - and the arts - and it's a positive way to start." 
Summarize: 
The BBC is a public service broadcaster funded by a TV licence fee paid by all UK households with a TV. The licence fee is collected by the BBC and is used to fund the BBC's TV and radio services. The licence fee is not a tax and is not used to fund the government.
The licence fee is collected by the BBC and is used to fund the BBC's TV and radio services. The licence fee is not a tax and is not used to fund the government.
The BBC is a public service broadcaster funded by a TV licence fee paid by all UK households with a TV. The licence fee is
Both sides of the busy Pershore Road in Birmingham were sealed off following the incident near First Avenue just after 07:00 BST, said West Midlands Police.
A man and woman were checked by paramedics but nobody was seriously injured.
Street bollards were damaged and the shop front window was smashed.
More on this and other Birmingham stories 
Summarize: 
The police are investigating after a man was stabbed in the leg in Birmingham.
The incident happened at around 07:00 BST on Pershore Road, near First Avenue.
A man and a woman were checked by paramedics but nobody was seriously injured.
Street bollards were damaged and the shop front window was smashed.
More on this and other Birmingham stories
Summarize:
The police are investigating after a man was stabbed in the leg in Birmingham.
The incident happened at around 07:00 BST on Pershore Road, near First Avenue.
A man and a woman were checked by
Despite losing Terry Campese to injury, Lunt's brace on his return from a calf strain put Rovers 10-0 at half-time.
Kieran Dixon and Ben Cockayne then went in for the visitors before Jamie Jones-Buchanan and Carl Ablett responded.
Further tries from Mitch Allgood and Robbie Mulhern ensured Rovers moved above Leeds to 10th in the table.
Victory is Hull KR's second of the season following James Webster's appointment as interim head coach last month.
The defeat is Leeds' third in a row and leaves them second from bottom.
Media playback is not supported on this device
Brian McDermott's treble-winning side looked to have got off to a good start, but Kallum Watkins was adjudged to have knocked on when he went over inside five minutes.
While Danny McGuire gave Leeds an air of surety, Rovers hooker Lunt was clinical for his two first-half scores against his former team.
Dixon ran in from 80 metres to add to Rhinos' woes after the break before Lunt put Cockayne over.
Leeds' mounted a fightback with the next two tries, but Rovers ran away with it to secure a comfortable victory.
Leeds Rhinos: Hardaker; Handley, Watkins, Moon, Sutcliffe; McGuire, Burrow; Galloway, Falloon, Cuthbertson, Ablett, Achurch, Jones-Buchanan.
Replacements: Singleton, Mullally, Walters, Garbutt.
Hull KR: Cockayne; Sio, Horne, Thornley, Dixon; Campese, Marsh; Tilse, Clarkson, Mulhern, Blair, reenwood, Allgood.
Replacements: Moran, Walker, Green, Lunt.
Attendance: 15,384
Referee: Richard Silverwood (RFL) 
Summarize: 
The game was played at the KC Stadium, the home of Hull Kingston Rovers.
The game was played at the KC Stadium, the home of Hull Kingston Rovers.
The game was played at the KC Stadium, the home of Hull Kingston Rovers.
The game was played at the KC Stadium, the home of Hull Kingston Rovers.
The game was played at the KC Stadium, the home of Hull Kingston Rovers.
The game was played at the KC Stadium, the home of Hull Kingston Rovers.
The game was played at the KC Stadium, the home of Hull Kingston Rovers.
Miller clipped the ball over keeper Graham Stack and soon added another from the penalty spot after he was brought down by the Bees' goalkeeper.
Alex Kenyon sneaked in unmarked to head a third before Barnet hit back through substitute Michael Gash's low strike.
Cole Stockton's fine finish made it 4-1 before Gash added a stoppage-time consolation, his ninth of the season.
Barnet manager Martin Allen told BBC Radio London:
Media playback is not supported on this device
"Within five minutes we could have been 2-0 down, which is a real surprise after the whole squad had done us proud over the Easter period with four points away at Exeter and at home to Luton.
"We looked too open and to be fair to them, they played well.
"When we stepped up in the second half, we probably had four good chances where we could have got back in the game.
"It didn't really work for us today." 
Summarize: 
Barnet: Stack, Kenyon, McKeown, Gash, O'Brien, Stockton, O'Connor, Cisak, Miller, Johnson, Kenyon
Subs: Lee, Gorman, Gash, Thompson, Fenton, Cerny, Cisak
Goals: Stockton (pen), Miller (pen), Kenyon (pen), Gash (pen)
Booked: McKeown, Gash
Subs not used: Whiteman, O'Connor, Cerny, O'Brien, Gorman, Thompson
Attend
Media reports had linked the pair with a move to the side battling Celtic's city rivals, Rangers, for the Scottish Championship title and promotion.
Striker Stokes is out of favour, while midfielder Allan is on the fringes.
"I don't talk about this in the media, but we want to keep our players," Deila said when asked of any approach.
Stokes has not featured for Celtic since August, while Allan has made one start and seven substitute appearances since his summer transfer from Hibs.
Deila said last week that Stokes had indicated his determination to stay at Celtic to fight for his place after a two-week suspension by the Glasgow club following disciplinary problems.
"We will see in the future what happens, but my task is to have Anthony Stokes as good as possible and that's what I want," the manager said of the 27-year-old Republic of Ireland striker whose contract expires in the summer.
Of the possibility of 24-year-old Scotman Allan returning to Easter Road, Deila said: "No chance. He is here in the squad, so why should he go to another club? It is nothing to think about."
Speaking prior to Saturday's visit by Motherwell, Deila also expressed his delight at Leigh Griffiths signing a five-year contract extension last week.
The 25-year-old Scotland striker missed the 2-1 defeat - his third game in a row through injury - and Deila said: "His form has gone very well in the last year, he's a young player still and he has a big part to play at Celtic in the future.
"He has a lot to improve as well, but he is an important player for us and I am very happy to have him on a longer contract." 
Summarize: 
Celtic are unbeaten in their last six games in all competitions, winning four and drawing two.
Celtic have won their last six games in all competitions, scoring 22 goals in the process.
Celtic have scored in each of their last six games in all competitions, netting 22 goals in the process.
Celtic have won their last six games in all competitions, scoring 22 goals in the process.
Celtic have won their last six games in all competitions, scoring 22 goals in the process.
Celtic have won their last six games in all competitions
European champion Steadman was top in the PTS5 category, while Paralympic hand-cycling champion Darke was victorious in the wheelchair category.
"After seven months out, training has picked up and I am really pleased," Steadman said.
In the men's PTS4 category, Britain's George Peasgood won a silver medal, but said he had struggled with the heat.
Alison Patrick, guided by Nicole Walters (PTS5), and Ryan Taylor (PTS3) failed to finish their races in Iseo-Franciacorta. 
Summarize: 
The IPC European Championships took place in Iseo-Franciacorta, Italy.
The IPC World Para-Cycling Championships took place in Assen, Netherlands.
The IPC World Para-Cycling Championships took place in Assen, Netherlands.
The IPC World Para-Cycling Championships took place in Assen, Netherlands.
The IPC World Para-Cycling Championships took place in Assen, Netherlands.
The IPC World Para-Cycling Championships took place in Assen, Netherlands.
The IPC World
The new rates will range between 5% and 28% depending on the product, with 12% and 18% as the standard.
The long-awaited changes aim to streamline the country's fragmented tax system and transform it into a single market.
Currently, everything sold in India is subject to a multitude of taxes varying from state to state.
Indian businesses have been lobbying for the countrywide tax rates as the reform is expected to reduce costs, particularly for shipping goods across state borders.
The country's finance minister Arun Jaitley described the tax reform as "transformative", telling the BBC it would increase efficiency and tax compliance as well as bringing in additional revenue.
It would also allow a "seamless transfer of goods and services across the country," Mr Jaitley said.
The changes mark a "significant development", said Santosh Dalvi of KPMG in India.
There has been no announcement yet, though, of which products fall into which of the tax categories.
"While one can have some guesswork around the GST rate for some of the products, the devil is in the detail when the final classification list will be released which is the most challenging task for the policy makers," said Mr Dalvi.
According to Mr Jaitley, half of the items in the consumer price index would not be taxed at all to protect the poor.
The index is a basket of consumer goods and services used to measure changing prices and inflation.
A central plank of Prime Minister Narendra Modi's economic agenda, the centralised tax is intended to cut through the red tape and corruption generated by the swathe of state taxes currently in force.
Currently, goods brought for example from the northern city of Haryana to Chennai are taxed in six different states.
With every state deciding its own taxes, it also encourages local protectionism.
Optimistic estimates suggest the changes could bring more than 2% of added economic growth.
India already has overtaken China as the world's fastest growing economy. 
Summarize: 
The GST is a single-stage tax reform that will replace the current state-level indirect taxes with a single national tax.
The GST will be levied on goods and services at a uniform rate across the country.
The GST will be administered by the Central Board of Excise and Customs (CBEC) and will be implemented by the states.
The GST will be levied on the supply of goods and services at the central level.
The GST will be levied on the supply of goods and services at the central level.
The GST will be levied on the supply of goods and services at the central level.
The GST
The 27-year-old, who has 11 tries in 12 internationals for Australia, has been named in the running back rotation.
He told www.49ers.com: "I am over the moon, I've never felt so alive."
Former British discus thrower Lawrence Okoye was one of the players the 49ers cut from their roster.
The British discus record holder swapped the track for gridiron after the 2012 Olympics in London and has spent the past two seasons with the five-time Super Bowl winners.
Parramatta Eels full-back Hayne was voted Australia National Rugby League's best player last year.
He added: "I'm blessed and honoured to be a part of the 49ers franchise."
San Francisco coach Jim Tomsula said: "Making an NFL roster is an outstanding accomplishment, period. But obviously his situation is unique.
"The odds of an American who grows up in this game playing in the NFL is astronomical. Now you're talking about a guy who wasn't raised in this game and has made it.
"He's by no means a finished product but the type of person he is and the approach that he takes, he's a guy that we want here.
"It should be a celebration in Australia. I do understand the magnitude and that it's huge."
On the subject of Okoye's release, Tomsula said: "Lawrence hasn't played a lot of football.
"When you have a guy in that situation, it gives him a better opportunity [to find a team]. I will say what he's done in two-and-a-half years is remarkable."
Second-year pro Carlos Hyde is likely to start at running back for the 49ers, while Reggie Bush is expected to feature heavily on passing downs, with Hayne and fellow rookie Mike Davis competing for carries in relief. 
Summarize: 
The 49ers have released their first official depth chart of the 2014 season.
The San Francisco 49ers have released their first official depth chart of the 2014 season.
The San Francisco 49ers have released their first official depth chart of the 2014 season.
The San Francisco 49ers have released their first official depth chart of the 2014 season.
The San Francisco 49ers have released their first official depth chart of the 2014 season.
The San Francisco 49ers have released their first official depth chart of the 2014 season.
The San Francisco 49ers have released their first official depth chart of the
She told Newsbeat she was feeling better than she thought she would - and that she got to keep her nipples.
Speaking from her bed at Guy's Hospital in London earlier, she said: "My operation finished 45 minutes ago (12:16 GMT). I'm currently in recovery.
"I've got a cannula thing up my nose because I was talking so much they had to take the oxygen mask off me.
"I think they got a bit annoyed with me, too many questions!
"I've got two chest drains on either side of me right now. The operation went well as far as I know.
"I've seen my surgeon and I got to keep my nipples.
"If they survive the next 36 hours, then they are here to stay, which is good news. I'm happy about that."
Her sister and mother both died from breast cancer and tests showed there was an 85% chance that Claira would develop the disease.
Processed animal tissue was used to support Claira's new implants.
"I'm actually not feeling half as bad as I thought I would be," she admitted.
"I just feel thirsty. I spoke to the anaesthetist about the pressure sensation I feel on my chest where they've lifted the muscle off my chest wall.
"It feels like when you've done a big legs day at the gym and you can't really walk properly the next day. So it feels like that on my chest but I am used to that. I will be OK with that.
"I've looked down and there are still bumps there.
"I'm just happy and blessed and still feeling incredibly positive and I've still got a smile on my face.
"I don't think things could be much better than that."
Claira has been told that she can expect to be back to normal within six weeks.
Read more about Claira's story
Follow @BBCNewsbeat on Twitter, BBCNewsbeat on Instagram and Radio1Newsbeat on YouTube 
Summarize:  Claira has had a breast implant made from pig's tissue. She is recovering from the surgery.
It comes after trainer Saeed bin Suroor spoke of the deteriorating relationship in the Godolphin stable.
Chief executive Ferguson, who was appointed in 2015, said in a statement that given recent media articles it was clear his position was "untenable".
"The course of action is best for everyone," Ferguson added.
Ferguson was appointed chief executive and racing manager in a reshaped and streamlined Godolphin when the global racing and breeding empires of Sheikh Mohammed were merged into one operation.
He had previously been bloodstock adviser to Sheikh Mohammed, but was at that time enjoying a successful career as a jumps trainer.
However, he handed in his licence at the end of April 2016 in order to devote more time to Godolphin, who have horses in training in Dubai, Australia, Ireland, France and the USA as well as in the UK.
Joe Osborne, the current managing director of Godolphin in Ireland, will take up the position of interim chief executive of Godolphin's global operation.
BBC horse racing correspondent Cornelius Lysaght
Racing is full of whispers, quite a lot of them about Godolphin because, considering the Sheikh's vast investment, it's something of an underachiever compared with arch-rival Coolmore.
Nothing was spoken about any internal strife, however, until Saeed bin Suroor gave this newspaper interview in which he laid his unhappiness bare.
There's no way he'd have said what he did if he thought it would upset his boss, so maybe from that moment the writing was on the wall for Ferguson.
As well as trying to improve fortunes for Godolphin, the new CEO will have a few feathers to smooth as well. 
Summarize: 
Ferguson was appointed chief executive and racing manager in a reshaped and streamlined Godolphin when the global racing and breeding empires of Sheikh Mohammed were merged into one operation.
He had previously been bloodstock adviser to Sheikh Mohammed, but was at that time enjoying a successful career as a jumps trainer.
However, he handed in his licence at the end of April 2016 in order to devote more time to Godolphin, who have horses in training in Dubai, Australia, Ireland, France and the USA as well as in the UK.
Joe Osborne, the current managing director of Godolphin in Ireland, will take up the position of
Fire crews were called to Station Road shortly after 04:00 on Sunday. As a result of the blaze, the nearby Dyce Railway Station is closed.
Five fire vehicles were involved in tackling the flames.
Nobody was injured in the incident and Police Scotland, along with the Scottish Fire and Rescue Service, is carrying out an investigation.
ScotRail said train services between Aberdeen, Edinburgh and Glasgow to Inverness will not stop at Dyce station until around 16:00 on Sunday.
Station Road and Victoria Street were closed for a time while emergency services dealt with the incident but have now reopened. 
Summarize: 
The fire took place at a house in Station Road, Dyce, Aberdeen, on Sunday, June 11, 2014, at around 04:00.
The fire took hold in the ground floor of the house, and fire crews were called to the scene shortly after 04:00.
As a result of the blaze, the nearby Dyce Railway Station is closed.
Five fire vehicles were involved in tackling the flames.
Nobody was injured in the incident and Police Scotland, along with the Scottish Fire and Rescue Service, is carrying out an investigation.
ScotRail said train services between Aberdeen, Edinburgh
It will be invested in a new national network which will see pupils work with universities and other experts.
In a major study, Welsh students were below the average of 72 countries in science, reading and maths.
Education Secretary Kirsty Williams said: "This new network of excellence is part of our national mission of education reform to raise standards."
The Pisa results in December marked the fourth time Wales has done worse than the other UK nations.
This planned network will pull together teaching practices for three to 18-year-olds, look at how other countries teach the subjects and allow schools to work together to develop courses and teaching.
Ms Williams said the investment was not a "knee jerk" reaction to the Pisa results but a "carefully considered response".
"An understanding of science is crucial for our young people, from the technology they use, the way they communicate, through to the energy they use in a rapidly changing world," she said.
"The science Pisa results chimed with our own understanding that we are not where we wish to be.
"This new network of excellence is part of our national mission of education reform to raise standards."
The announcement has been welcomed by academics.
Prof Tom Crick, who teaches computer science and public policy at Cardiff Metropolitan University, told BBC Radio Wales' Good Morning Wales programme it would help improve teaching standards.
"You don't want to have to look at this £4m and divide it by the number of schools and the number of teachers," he said.
"I think we are looking at a wider national picture but still addressing regional and local issues.
"Ultimately the biggest impact will be spent on professional development of teachers... that is where we will give the biggest bang for the buck from the investment, directly addressing teachers' competencies." 
Summarize: 
The Welsh government has announced a £4m investment in a new network of excellence to improve teaching standards in Wales.
The investment will be spent on a new national network of teachers, academics and universities to improve standards in science, reading and maths.
The network will be funded by the Welsh government and will be based at the University of Wales Trinity Saint David.
The investment is part of a wider mission to raise standards in Wales.
The Welsh government has also announced a new £5m fund for schools to improve the quality of teaching.
The funding will be available to schools in Wales and will be used to improve the
The Repsol Honda rider, 31, was injured in a huge crash during practice for the Japanese Grand Prix.
He said: "These past three weeks haven't been easy because of the pain.
"We're still not sure about how I'll feel on the bike, but I'm happy to be able to get back to racing."
The MotoGP championship was secured by fellow Spaniard and Repsol Honda team-mate Marc Marquez in Japan.
Pedrosa has only won one race all season and is sixth overall. 
Summarize: 
Pedrosa was the first rider to be injured in the first practice session of the Japanese Grand Prix.
He crashed into the back of the Red Bull of Dani Pedrosa, causing a huge crash.
Pedrosa was taken to the hospital and was diagnosed with a fractured right collarbone and a fractured left wrist.
He was released from the hospital on the same day.
Summarize:
Pedrosa was the first rider to be injured in the second practice session of the Japanese Grand Prix.
He crashed into the back of the Red Bull of Dani Pedrosa, causing a huge
The profiles are being used as part of a social media campaign on Facebook and Twitter to raise awareness of abuse in relationships and stalking.
There are around 10 reports of domestic abuse a week in the county.
Det Chief Insp Julia Potts, from Northamptonshire Police, said they were using social media as it was now part of "everyday life".
Images of mock dating profiles outlining potential suitors' real personalities are being hosted on the force's social media accounts in an effort to unmask abusers' behaviour.
Videos and questions to stimulate online conversation are also being hosted, alongside useful links and numbers.
DCI Potts said: "It's a way of getting our message out to those that may be affected by domestic abuse and abusive relationships, or those who may know someone who is being affected by abuse and it's a good way of reaching out to people.
"People will see some advice on what domestic abuse is, how to recognise it, things around controlling behaviour from partners.
"It's a case of getting in early and getting that prevention done so people don't then become victims."
The county's force has more than 27,000 members on Facebook and around 13,000 followers on its main Twitter account.
It hopes through messages getting shared and re-tweeted, the campaign will touch far more people than those just signed up to its sites.
A domestic violence victim, from Northamptonshire who does not want to be named, believes she could have benefitted from the campaign's effort to pinpoint aggressive behaviour.
She said her partner "wanted to be with me all the time, wanted to know who I was talking to, what I was doing... and at the time I thought it was flattering.
"He started being quite controlling, not letting me have friends, not letting me talk to people.
"He started drinking a lot and encouraging me to drink a lot and it was then when the violence started.
"I wasn't allowed to have my own bank card, that again made me very vulnerable.
"If this campaign had been about maybe I'd have been a bit more aware and got out earlier." 
Summarize: 
The campaign is being run by the Northamptonshire police force, and is aimed at raising awareness of domestic abuse and stalking.
The campaign is being run by the Northamptonshire police force, and is aimed at raising awareness of domestic abuse and stalking.
The campaign is being run by the Northamptonshire police force, and is aimed at raising awareness of domestic abuse and stalking.
The campaign is being run by the Northamptonshire police force, and is aimed at raising awareness of domestic abuse and stalking.
The campaign is being run by the Northamptonshire police force
The benchmark index finished 1.1% up at 17,004.30.
On Friday, the US said it had added 151,000 jobs to its economy in January, pushing the country's unemployment rate down to 4.9%.
The numbers were lower than expected, however, marking a big slowdown from December's addition of 292,000 jobs.
The world's best-selling car marker, Toyota, saw its shares down by 1.2% on the Nikkei.
On Friday, Toyota reported a 4.7% rise in net income for the three months to December. However, the firm's operating profit for the quarter fell by 5.3%, missing forecasts.
Elsewhere, Australia's market was one of the only other exchanges open on Monday. China's mainland markets are shut all week for Lunar New Year celebrations. Hong Kong and South Korea are closed for three days.
"Lunar New Year [means] there is an eerie quiet, with only Japan and Australia open for business for most of the week," said IG Markets' Evan Lucas.
"Volumes will be well below average and there tends to be a build-up of global leads that is released once Asian investors return to their desk - expect 'release valve' trading late in the week," he added.
Australia's S&P/ASX 200 closed flat at 4,975.40 points. 
Summarize: 
The Australian dollar was steady at $0.7999.
The US dollar was steady at $1.0339.
The euro was steady at $1.1207.
The pound was steady at $1.2981.
Oil was steady at $63.50 a barrel.
Gold was steady at $1,285.50 an ounce.
The yield on 10-year Australian government bonds was steady at 3.07%.
The yield on three-month Australian government bonds was steady at 1.89%.
The yield on six-month Australian government bonds
Police are hunting for Ryan Byrne, 34, who was released in error from Wandsworth Prison.
The Prison Service informed the Met Police Byrne had been released on Friday, and said an investigation had been launched.
A spokesperson said: "Releases in error are very rare but regrettable occurrences.
"The number of incidents have fallen significantly in recent years with figures down by a quarter compared to 2009/10, but every incident is taken extremely seriously and we are not complacent.
"The recapture of this prisoner is now a matter for the police."
Byrne was sentenced in 2008 to a total of nine years' imprisonment for burglary, robbery and theft.
Officers in Hammersmith and Fulham, west London, have appealed for anyone with information about Byrne's whereabouts to get in touch.
Byrne is described as white and of medium build, with blue eyes and a goatee beard. 
Summarize: 
On May 20, 2009, Byrne was released from Wandsworth Prison, London, after serving nine years of a 12-year sentence for burglary, robbery and theft.
On May 21, 2009, Byrne was arrested by police in Hammersmith, west London, and charged with burglary, robbery and theft.
On May 22, 2009, Byrne was charged with burglary, robbery and theft.
On May 23, 2009, Byrne was charged with burglary, robbery and theft.
On May 24, 2009, Byrne was charged with burglary, robbery and theft.
On May 25, 2009,
South Wales Fire Service said they were called to Roath Park Lake at 02:07 GMT on Sunday where they found one person trapped while a second had managed to release themselves.
Specialist rope and boat rescue crews assisted with the rescue which took more than an hour.
The person's injuries were minor, the fire service added. 
Summarize: 
On Sunday, September 2, 2017, at approximately 2:00am, the Fire Service was called to Roath Park Lake in Cardiff to assist with a rescue.
The first rescue team arrived on scene at approximately 2:07am and found two people trapped in the water.
A second rescue team arrived on scene at approximately 2:15am and found one person trapped in the water.
The first rescue team were able to free the first person from the water at approximately 2:30am.
The second rescue team were able to free the second person from the water at approximately 2:45am
In assessments, 88.6% of pupils aged 11 and 85.9% of 14-year-olds achieved expectations in subjects like English.
But the percentage of seven-year-old boys reaching expected outcomes has fallen slightly in Wales.
This is the first drop since a measure for the Foundation Phase for young learners was introduced in 2012.
The statutory curriculum for all three to seven-year olds in Wales aims to encourage children to be creative and imaginative and learn through play.
Overall, 87% of seven-year-olds achieved the target measure but the rate of increase has slowed to 0.2% since 2015.
The new figures show 91.2% of girls at the age of seven have reached the expected outcome measure, compared to 83% of boys.
The gender gap for this age group has widened slightly compared to the year before.
Conservative shadow secretary for skills, Mohammad Ashgar AM, called the gender attainment gap "frightening" and "unacceptable".
He added: "More research needs to be done to explain why boys are consistently being outperformed by their female classmates."
However, the figures also show the performance gap between girls and boys has narrowed for the older pupils in most subjects.
The findings come in Statistics Wales' annual report into how pupils are doing in classroom assessments in English or Welsh, maths and science.
The biggest improvements since 1999 have been with 14-year-old pupils - apart from a wobble between 2005 and 2007.
Education Secretary Kirsty Williams said she was "really encouraged" by the figures, adding: "I want to make sure we build on this and continue to support young people through early years to ensure they have the best start in life."
Standard Assessment Tests (Sats) for 11-year-olds were abolished in Wales in 2004. 
Summarize: 
In Wales, the proportion of pupils achieving the expected outcomes in the three key subjects of English, maths and science has fallen since the last report in 2015.
The proportion of pupils achieving the expected outcomes in the three key subjects of English, maths and science has fallen since the last report in 2015.
The proportion of pupils achieving the expected outcomes in the three key subjects of English, maths and science has fallen since the last report in 2015.
The proportion of pupils achieving the expected outcomes in the three key subjects of English, maths and science has fallen since the last report in 2015.
The proportion of pupils achieving the expected
Borthwick, 26, has established himself as a heavy-scoring number three batsman, but his bowling impact has been limited at the Riverside.
The move to a more spin-friendly Oval track could improve his opportunities.
"Playing at the Oval will suit my game as a leg-spinner/batter," Borthwick told BBC Newcastle.
"It's just for purely cricketing reasons, it came down to a massive decision.
"I'm a Sunderland lad, a north-east lad and played here since I was 10 or 11. That's why it's taken as long as it did."
With economic circumstances forcing Durham to be prudent in the recruitment of players, the county's academy set-up has been crucial to keeping Durham competitive.
As such locally and regionally-born players such as Borthwick, Graham Onions, Mark Wood, Ben Stokes, Paul Coughlin and more recently Jack Burnham and Graham Clark have all come through to the first-team picture.
"Durham have been fantastic to me since I was a kid, back from John Windows and Geoff Cook, I'd like to thank them," Borthwick added.
"Then there's Jon Lewis, Alan Walker and Nigel Kent, and Paul Collingwood who have been a massive help to me in my career." 
Summarize: 
Borthwick was born in Sunderland, Tyne and Wear, and attended St. Cuthbert's RC High School. He is the son of former Durham and England player, David Borthwick.
Borthwick made his first-class debut for Durham in the 2009 County Championship against Lancashire at Old Trafford. He scored a century in his first innings, and followed it up with a second-innings fifty.
Borthwick was selected for the England Under-19 cricket team in the 2009 Under-19 Cricket World Cup. He scored a century in the semi-final against India, and
Monalisa Perez, 19, was booked into county jail after shooting at Pedro Ruiz as he held a book to his chest, believing it would stop the bullet.
The couple's three-year-old child and nearly 30 onlookers watched as she fired the fatal bullet into his chest.
Ruiz's aunt said they did it to increase their social media following.
Claudia Ruiz told WDAY-TV that her nephew had told her he wanted to do the stunt "because we want more viewers, we want to get famous".
"He had told me about that idea and I said, 'Don't do it. Don't do it. Why are you going to use a gun? Why?'" Claudia Ruiz told the news channel.
"They were in love, they loved each other," she said. "It was just a prank gone wrong."
Ms Perez, who is pregnant, is facing charges of second degree manslaughter. She faces her first court appearance on Wednesday.
County Attorney James Brue described the book as a hardcover encyclopaedia, and said the weapon used was a .50-calibre Desert Eagle handgun.
Police have seized two cameras, which are said to have recorded Monday's incident.
The single gunshot was fired from about one foot (30cm) away as neighbours gathered to watch outside their Minnesota home.
She told deputies that the stunt had been Ruiz's idea, and that he had to convince her to do it.
Earlier that day she tweeted about her reservations.
"Everyone was crying. I was standing behind that tree over there. And that was it. I just couldn't take it anymore so I had to go back home," neighbour Wayne Cameron told WDAY-TV.
The couple had started a YouTube channel in March, aiming to show the "the real life of a young couple who happen to be teen parents".
Their most recently uploaded video, on the day that Ruiz died, was titled: "Doing scary stunts at the fair".
Last week Ms Perez told her viewers that it was a "blessing" to have her husband home for the forthcoming birth of their son, who is due in September. 
Summarize:  A young couple who had a child together, and were trying to make a name for themselves on YouTube, decided to kill their baby, and then themselves.
The couple, who were both 19, were arrested and charged with second degree manslaughter.
The couple's three-year-old child and nearly 30 onlookers watched as she fired the fatal bullet into his chest.
The couple's YouTube channel, which they started in March, was titled "The real life of a young couple who happen to be teen parents".
The couple's most recently uploaded video, on the day that Ruiz died, was titled: "Doing
The body of the man, in his 40s, was found just after 06:30 GMT on Monday at the One-Stop convenience store in Ditton Lane, Cambridge.
Police confirmed he had allegedly been involved in an "altercation with a man and his dog" earlier. They were told the man had bitten the animal.
Four men arrested on suspicion of manslaughter have been bailed.
A police spokesman said the man had been involved in an "alleged altercation" with a 45-year-old man and his dog.
A man, aged 45, initially arrested on suspicion of causing grievous bodily harm was released without further action on Tuesday.
Officers said the dead man, who has not yet been named, was from Cambridge.
A post-mortem examination carried out on Tuesday proved "inconclusive".
The man's death is currently being treated as unexplained. 
Summarize: 
A 45-year-old man was arrested on suspicion of causing grievous bodily harm on Monday.
He was later released without further action.
A post-mortem examination on Tuesday proved "inconclusive".
The man's death is currently being treated as unexplained.
The BBC looked into the music people search for on their phones.
Data was provided by Shazam, a company that helps its 100 million users to identify any song they hear by playing an excerpt into their phone.
Tech house group Format: B was most searched for in Aberdeen and R&B rap collective WSTRN in Glasgow.
Tropical house DJ Sigala was top choice in Inverness, Dundee and Edinburgh.
The BBC has used the data to discover musical "twin towns" - far-flung places with similar tastes in music.
Inverness and Aberdeen's "twin" was Queenstown in New Zealand, Dundee matched up with Dunedin also in New Zealand, and Glasgow and Edinburgh's listening choices were similar to Melbourne in Australia. 
Summarize: 
The BBC looked at the top 100 artists in the UK, and found that the top three most searched for artists in Scotland were:
1. Sigala
2. Format: B
3. WSTRN
The top three most searched for artists in Aberdeen were:
1. Sigala
2. Format: B
3. WSTRN
The top three most searched for artists in Inverness were:
1. Sigala
2. Format: B
3. WSTRN
The top three most searched for artists in Dundee were:
1. Sigala
2.
John Kelpie, Chief Executive of Derry and Strabane District Council, told BBC Radio Foyle that discussions on the funds are at an "advanced stage."
The funding would establish a route development fund at the Derry airport.
On Tuesday, City of Derry airport confirmed Ryanair was to drop a number of services from its 2017 schedule.
Both the Stansted and Faro routes are being axed, while the flight to Liverpool is being reduced to twice a week.
Mr Kelpie said the Stormont funding had received the backing "at the highest level" and enjoyed cross-party support.
"We are talking days rather than months for an announcement," he said
The airport is currently also exploring the option of operating government funded public service obligation (PSO) flights to London.
Mr Kelpie said the PSO application was being treated "very favourably" by the Department of Transport in London.
He said that if all "the pieces line up" a new airline will be offering a twice or three times daily flight to London as of April 2017 when Ryanair cease its service.
The Derry airport is currently running at a Â£2.145m loss per year, paid for by local ratepayers. 
Summarize: 
The Derry Airport is currently running at a Â£2.145m loss per year, paid for by local ratepayers.
The airport is currently exploring the option of operating government funded public service obligation (PSO) flights to London.
The Derry airport is currently running at a Â£2.145m loss per year, paid for by local ratepayers.
The airport is currently running at a Â£2.145m loss per year, paid for by local ratepayers.
The airport is currently running at a Â£2.145m loss per year
The 25-year-old Victoria and Melbourne Stars player will be available to play in all three formats of the game.
He made his Test debut in November 2016 and scored 105 as Australia beat Pakistan this month.
"We are getting a guy who is on the up. He is young and wants to prove himself on the biggest stage," said Yorkshire head coach Andrew Gale.
He also scored 54 in Australia's second Test win over Pakistan. 
Summarize: 
Born: 18 April 1992
Height: 6 ft 2 in
Weight: 160 lbs
Batting: Right-hand bat
Bowling: Right-arm medium-fast
Fielding: Right-hand batsman
Born in Sydney, Australia, he moved to England at the age of 12 to join the Yorkshire academy.
He made his first-class debut for Yorkshire in 2009, and made his List A debut for the county in the 2011 Friends Life t20 against Northamptonshire.
In the 2012 season, he made his Twenty20 debut for Yorkshire against
It is selling the stake to Go Scale Capital, a technology fund which plans to sell more car lighting systems and LED lamps.
Philips will focus on consumer goods and medical technology.
Lumileds, as the new business will be known, will have 8,300 employees worldwide and had sales in 2014 of more than €2bn (£1.45bn).
"We expect to see significant growth and unparalleled inroads into new opportunities such as electric vehicles," said Go Scale chairman Sonny Wu.
ABN Amro analyst Marc Hesselink said the sale price was "considerably above market expectations".
The sale is being seen as the beginning of Philips' break from the lighting industry. It has been making light bulbs since the 1890s.
Philips said in September last year that it planned to split itself in two, separating its lighting business from its healthcare division.
It said at the time that both companies would continue to be based in the Netherlands and use the Philips name.
It also said it would consider "various options for alternative ownership structures'' for the lighting arm, meaning it could potentially be sold or listed separately on the stock market.
Philips has been streamlining its business by selling off underperforming parts of the business in recent years.
The move by Philips follows the sale by rival Siemens of their Osram lighting business in 2013. 
Summarize:  
Philips Lighting is the world's largest manufacturer of lighting products.
Philips Lighting is a global company with more than 8,300 employees in over 50 countries.
Philips Lighting is a global company with more than 8,300 employees in over 50 countries.
Philips Lighting is a global company with more than 8,300 employees in over 50 countries.
Philips Lighting is a global company with more than 8,300 employees in over 50 countries.
Philips Lighting is a global company with more than 8,300 employees in over 50 countries.
Philips Lighting is a global
The injured white and brown Cob-type yearling, called Widget, was discovered in a field in Abbots Langley, Hertfordshire on Saturday evening.
The arrow was found in a wound close to its eye.
The RSPCA believes it will survive the injuries, although a spokeswoman said it had a "lucky escape". Police are hunting the attacker.
A Â£1,000 reward has been put up by the owner of the yard where the horse was kept for information leading to a conviction.
The horse is currently at the Royal Veterinary College, near Hatfield, for treatment.
Updates on this story and more from Hertfordshire
RSPCA deputy chief inspector Mel Fisher said: "It seems this poor boy has had a very lucky escape, though the next 48 hours will be crucial.
"The arrow has gone through his eye socket and into his nasal cavity, miraculously without hitting anything vital. It's hoped he won't lose his eye but it's too early to know for sure.
"This was a wicked attack on a friendly and sociable little chap."
Det Sgt Dan Stoddart from Hertfordshire Police said: "This appears to be senseless, cruel crime and we are doing all we can to find the person responsible." 
Summarize: 
The horse was found in a field in Abbots Langley, Hertfordshire, on Saturday evening.
The arrow was found in a wound close to its eye.
The RSPCA believes it will survive the injuries, although a spokeswoman said it had a "lucky escape".
Police are hunting the attacker.
A £1,000 reward has been put up by the owner of the yard where the horse was kept for information leading to a conviction.
The horse is currently at the Royal Veterinary College, near Hatfield, for treatment.
Updates on this story and more from Hertfordshire
R
The Office for National Statistics found prices north of the border rose by 0.4% in the year to November, compared with a UK figure of 7.7%.
House price annual inflation was 8.3% in England, 1.3% in Wales and 4.6% in Northern Ireland.
Scottish prices are now 0.8% below their pre-economic downturn peak of June 2008.
Excluding London and the south east, UK house prices increased by 5.8% in the 12 months to November.
Scotland shared the lowest increase in the UK with the north east of England.
Average house prices in Scotland stood at £195,000 in November.
This compared with £302,000 in England, £173,000 in Wales and £158,000 in Northern Ireland. 
Summarize: 
The average price of a home in Scotland was £195,000 in November, 0.8% lower than the peak of £195,000 in June 2008.
The average price of a home in Scotland was £195,000 in November, 0.8% lower than the peak of £195,000 in June 2008.
The average price of a home in Scotland was £195,000 in November, 0.8% lower than the peak of £195,000 in June 2008.
The average price of a home in Scotland was £195,000 in November, 0.8% lower than the peak
It said it was not impossible the two Himars launchers  being set up in al-Tanf would be used against troops fighting so-called Islamic State.
The launchers were reportedly brought in from Jordan to Tanf, which is used by rebels and Western special forces.
US aircraft bombed a government convoy in the area last month.
Syrian- and Iranian-backed militiamen had reportedly been moving towards the base, located in a sparsely populated desert region.
Russia is the Syrian government's main military ally.
"It's not impossible that similar attacks on Syrian forces will be continued in the future - this time, using Himars," the Russian defence ministry said.
The Syrian government said this week it had regained territory in the Tanf area. 
Summarize: 
The US-led coalition has been conducting airstrikes against the Syrian government forces in the vicinity of the US-led coalition base in al-Tanf, which is located in the Syrian desert near the border with Jordan.
The US-led coalition has been conducting airstrikes against the Syrian government forces in the vicinity of the US-led coalition base in al-Tanf, which is located in the Syrian desert near the border with Jordan.
The US-led coalition has been conducting airstrikes against the Syrian government forces in the vicinity of the US-led coalition base in al-Tanf, which is located in the Syrian desert near
The new rules make it illegal for children to buy tobacco and nicotine vapour products (NVPs).
However, campaign group Action on Smoking and Health (ASH) Scotland gave the new laws only a cautious welcome.
Chief executive Sheila Duffy said the priority should be to target retailers who sell traditional cigarettes to children.
Under the new laws, anyone buying NVPs for those underage will be breaking the law.
And shops selling the products will be required to have an age verification policy and to be registered.
Public health minister Aileen Campbell said: "We know e-cigarettes are almost certainly safer than cigarettes and have a role to help people quit smoking, but we don't believe children should have access to them - that's why these age restrictions are so important."
She added: "We are working closely with the Scottish Grocers' Federation to make retailers aware of these changes and what they mean for their daily business.
"A campaign is already under way across Scotland and will continue to run throughout the summer to ensure everyone is aware of these changes to the law."
Ms Duffy, of ASH Scotland, said: "Nicotine is addictive and as there is some level of health risk associated with using these products, it is right that we keep them out of the hands of children.
"With the regulatory framework for e-cigarettes falling into place, now is the time to remind people that smoking tobacco is by far the more harmful activity."
She added: "There are still 30 to 40 young people in Scotland taking up smoking every day and the priority must be for further action against those retailers who sell to children and to challenge the attitudes amongst adults who buy cigarettes on heir behalf."
The changes were brought in by the Health Act 2016, which also set out restrictions on e-cigarette advertising and a ban on vending machines selling the products.
Both measures are due to be introduced later this year. 
Summarize:  The new rules make it illegal for children to buy tobacco and nicotine vapour products (NVPs).
However, campaign group Action on Smoking and Health (ASH) Scotland gave the new laws only a cautious welcome.
Chief executive Sheila Duffy said the priority should be to target retailers who sell traditional cigarettes to children.
Under the new laws, anyone buying NVPs for those underage will be breaking the law.
And shops selling the products will be required to have an age verification policy and to be registered.
Public health minister Aileen Campbell said: "We know e-cigarettes are almost certainly safer than cigarettes and have a
"They did consider me but, to be perfectly blunt, the American public haven't got a clue who I am," he said.
The job became available earlier this year, when host Donald Trump plumped for the 2016 presidential election campaign over another series.
"I would have done it but the producers wanted someone the US public knew."
Trump's replacement is Hollywood star and former Governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger.
Lord Sugar joked: "They've got Arnie now - I can't wait to see what a cock-up he's going to make of it!"
The eleventh series of the UK Apprentice kicks off next Wednesday with 18 new candidates competing for the chance to go into business with Lord Sugar.
They include two former Naval officers who served in the Gulf War, a Kosovan refugee and a former Miss Jamaica.
This year sees a change to the panel chaired by Lord Sugar following the departure of his long-term confidante, Nick Hewer.
Claude Littner, who has worked with Lord Sugar for the past 25 years, has replaced Hewer as one of his advisers alongside Karren Brady.
Littner gained a fierce reputation on the show previously, having appeared as a tough interviewer towards the end of the selection process.
He chairs a number of Lord Sugar's companies and has been part of the interview episode for 10 years.
Littner said he may still be involved at the interview stage but would "see how it works out".
He said his new role, which involves giving feedback to Lord Sugar on how the candidates perform on weekly tasks, was "a completely different role. You can't compare one with the other".
"I'm acting as an observer and trying not to show any emotion at all," he added.
Lord Sugar said The Apprentice was still a success because it didn't rely on gimmicks.
"If it's not broke, don't try to fix it. (It has) consistency with slight tweaks. With respect to The X Factor, gimmicks don't work.
"I'm the same, a bit older 11 years on. What's not the same is the candidates, they make compelling viewing." 
Summarize: 
The Apprentice is a British reality television series, based on the American series of the same name, which was created by Mark Burnett and is produced by Burnett's production company, One Three Media.
The series is broadcast on BBC One and is shown in the United Kingdom and Ireland.
The series is also broadcast in Australia on the Nine Network, in the United States on NBC, in Canada on the CBC, in New Zealand on TV3, in the United Kingdom on BBC One, in India on Star World, in South Africa on SABC 3, in the Middle East on OSN, in Israel on HOT,
The Gabon international, 23, made 42 appearances for Juve in two seasons, moving on loan from Marseille in 2015 before a £7.5m move last summer.
The Saints will pay an initial £15.4m with the rest depending on his success at the club.
He becomes Mauricio Pellegrino's second signing of the summer.
Saints vice-chairman Les Reed said Lemina's signing was a "significant statement of intent from the club".
Their previous record signing was Moroccan attacking midfielder Sofiane Boufal, who joined from French side Lille for £16m in August 2016.
Stoke, Watford and Leicester had all been linked with Lemina, who was left out of Juve's squad for their friendly against Tottenham at Wembley on Saturday.
Lemina, who began his career with Lorient, joined Juventus on a season-long loan in 2015 and his move was made permanent as he signed a four-year deal in April 2016.
In his time with the Bianconeri, he won both the Serie A title and the Coppa Italia twice, and featured in last season's Champions League final against Real Madrid.
Reed described Lemina as an "outstanding" talent, adding: "In a volatile market with some extraordinary and inexplicable transfers taking place, we are determined to go about our work in a diligent and correct way.
"This is a player who has won trophies and played in the Champions League final less than three months ago and he has signed for Saints amid a host of suitors."
Saints signed Poland Under-21 defender Jan Bednarek for £5m last month,
Find all the latest football transfers on our dedicated page. 
Summarize:  Lemina is a quick, creative midfielder who can play in a number of positions. He's a very good passer, and has a good eye for goal. He's a very good dribbler, and he's good at making runs in behind the defense. He's also very good at taking set pieces.
Lemina has been compared to former Saints midfielder Morgan Schneiderlin, who left the club for Everton in the summer.
He's also been compared to former Saints midfielder Morgan Schneiderlin, who left the club for Everton in the summer.
Lemina has been compared to former Saints midfielder Morgan Schneiderlin, who left
Pictures of police in Zimbabwe clashing with demonstrators protesting against President Robert Mugabe's handling of the economy. 
Summarize: 
The protests were sparked by the government's decision to increase the price of fuel and other commodities.
The government has blamed the protests on "criminals" and "terrorists."
The protests have been violent, with police firing tear gas and live ammunition.
Schools have been closed and businesses have been looted.
The government has declared a state of emergency.
The protests are the biggest since the end of white-minority rule in 1980.
The protests have been condemned by the United States and the European Union.
The protests were triggered by the government's decision to increase
Thelma Bishop from Gatley in Stockport bought the ceramic jug for a few dollars while on holiday in the 1960s.
Its history was discovered by auctioneers after Ms Bishop decided to sell it.
She was told she could have been prosecuted for removing it. Turkish officials are said to be "delighted".
Ceramics expert Jason Wood at Adam Partridge Auctioneers said: "It is being returned to the Turkish authorities because it would have exposed the owner to legal proceedings if (Ms Bishop) had gone ahead and made a sale.
"That is because when she took it out of the country, inadvertently it was breaking a Turkish law which dates back to the 1880s.
"It is an early bronze age ceramic vessel, made specifically to be a grave good, so it was buried in cemeteries. (It was) commonly found in Western Anatolia in Turkey."
Mr Wood said the item was "fairly rare".
He said: "Its archaeological value is why it is important. There are a few examples; there is one in the British Museum, one in the Metropolitan Museum in New York and they crop up periodically, a few in Turkey as well, but to have one turn up in Stockport of all places and in such remarkable condition is quite unusual."
Ms Bishop has been offered a free museum pass in Istanbul for returning the jug to the Turkish authorities who are said to be "delighted".
The ceramic vessel will go on display at The Museum of Anatolian Civilizations in Ankara. 
Summarize: 
Thelma Bishop from Gatley in Stockport bought the ceramic jug for a few dollars while on holiday in the 1960s.
Its history was discovered by auctioneers after Ms Bishop decided to sell it.
She was told she could have been prosecuted for removing it. Turkish officials are said to be "delighted".
Ceramics expert Jason Wood at Adam Partridge Auctioneers said: "It is being returned to the Turkish authorities because it would have exposed the owner to legal proceedings if (Ms Bishop) had gone ahead and made a sale.
"That is because when she took it out of the country
The pitches produced for the first two Tests, at Cardiff and Lord's, have been criticised for being too slow.
Australia levelled the series at 1-1 with a 405-run win at Lord's.
"I'm trying to produce a good-quality Test pitch with plenty for the bowlers and the batsmen: good carry and good bounce," said Barwell.
"I've had no directives from the ECB on what kind of pitch to prepare."
England skipper Alastair Cook denied requesting a slow pitch at Lord's after Australia outbowled England on a benign surface.
He is hoping the rest of the series will be played on pitches that assist England's seamers.
"We want to play on English wickets and that probably wasn't too English, but that's nowhere near an excuse," he said on Sunday.
Edgbaston, which will be hosting its first Test since 2012, has offered assistance to the bowlers in recent years.
Of England's last five Tests held there, the average first-innings score is 243 - Pakistan being bowled out for 72 in 2010.
Ian Bell will be playing on his home ground at Edgbaston with doubts over his form.
The 33-year-old has been moved up to number three for the match, in place of Gary Ballance, and ex-England batsman Geoffrey Boycott says the Warwickshire man could be facing "the end" if he doesn't perform.
The right-hander has never scored a century in five Tests at his county home, averaging 43 there, but all-rounder Chris Woakes is hoping for a big score from his county team-mate.
"He's got it all," Woakes, who has just returned from injury, told BBC Sport. "I've played with Bell for a long time - he's a world-class batsman.
"He's not in the best form at the moment but with the next Test at Edgbaston, his home ground, hopefully he'll produce the goods.
"Being promoted to number three will be a good thing for him." 
Summarize: 
England will be looking to win the series and level the series at 1-1. The series is very important for England as they are looking to win the series and level the series at 1-1. The series is very important for England as they are looking to win the series and level the series at 1-1. The series is very important for England as they are looking to win the series and level the series at 1-1. The series is very important for England as they are looking to win the series and level the series at 1-1. The series is very important for England as they are looking to win
Five directors, including chief executive Kevin Hart, were removed at a meeting of shareholders called by Monaco-based private equity firm Crown Ocean Capital (COC).
A resolution calling for the removal of chairman Billy Allan was defeated.
Mr Allan and chief operating officer David Clarkson will keep their posts.
Two nominees put forward by COC - Christopher Ashworth and Eli Chahin - were appointed to the board with immediate effect.
Africa-focused Bowleven said all resolutions proposed at the general meeting would have been defeated "by a significant margin" without votes cast by COC and its nominees.
The board had urged shareholders to vote against the resolutions, arguing they were "not in the interests of all shareholders".
COC had been calling for a change in direction by the company. Among other things, it demanded that Bowleven focus on maximising value from its Etinde interest in Cameroon and not devote any resources to new projects or acquisitions.
Mr Hart joined the Bowleven board in November 2006, having been finance director at Cairn Energy for more than eight years.
Before that, he was a senior associate director with Deutsche Morgan Grenfell Group, specialising in oil and gas sector mergers and acquisitions. 
Summarize: 
Bowleven is a Cameroonian oil and gas company.
It is listed on the London Stock Exchange and is a constituent of the FTSE 250 Index.
It is a subsidiary of Bowleven Holdings, which is listed on the London Stock Exchange.
The company was formed in 2003 as a 50:50 joint venture between Bowleven and the government of Cameroon.
The company has a 50% interest in the Etinde oil field in the South-West of Cameroon, which is operated by Bowleven.
The Etinde field has estimated reserves of 1.5 billion barrels of oil.
Services were disrupted after the Ben-my-Chree, which sailed from Heysham, Lancashire, struck the pier on Sunday. No passengers or crew were injured.
The ferry returned to action earlier and four trips across the Irish Sea are scheduled.
A number of crossings were cancelled following the the collision.
The Isle of Man Steam Packet Company's chief executive Mark Woodward apologised to passengers and said it had been an "unfortunate incident". 
Summarize: 
On Sunday, the Ben-my-Chree, which was sailing from Heysham, Lancashire, struck the pier at Douglas, Isle of Man.
The Isle of Man Steam Packet Company's chief executive Mark Woodward said the vessel was sailing at full speed when it hit the pier.
"The Ben-my-Chree is a very safe vessel," he said.
"It is a very well-built vessel. It has been in service for over 30 years. It is not a new vessel.
"It is a very well-run vessel. It is a very
The pilot scheme will use travel operators' crime data to target "hotspots" and support transport staff.
The move, led by Transport for Greater Manchester (TFGM) and Greater Manchester Police, will see officers using body cameras while on patrol.
TFGM said the partnership will seek to ban offenders from public transport.
It said officers will also visit schools to educate pupils about the impacts and consequences of crime and antisocial behaviour on the region's travel networks. 
Summarize: 
The pilot scheme will use travel operators' crime data to target "hotspots" and support transport staff.
The move, led by Transport for Greater Manchester (TFGM) and Greater Manchester Police, will see officers using body cameras while on patrol.
TFGM said the partnership will seek to ban offenders from public transport.
It said officers will also visit schools to educate pupils about the impacts and consequences of crime and antisocial behaviour on the region's travel networks.
The scheme is being run in partnership with Greater Manchester Police and Transport for Greater Manchester (TFGM).
It will use body-worn cameras to record
The US Justice Department said the deal would cover 17 "violations" by the company, now called Academi LLC.
The offences include illegal possession of arms and unauthorised sales of training and equipment abroad.
The deal ends a case against the firm, which held US security contracts worth billions in Iraq and Afghanistan.
The case covers possession of unregistered automatic weapons in the US, unauthorised sales of satellite phones in Sudan and illegal export of body armour, among other things.
The move means that Academi will not face prosecution over the violations as long as it meets auditing requirements and complies with export restrictions.
The firm was a target of intense international scrutiny over its activities in Iraq.
In 2004, four of its security guards were ambushed, shot, beaten and burned to death in the flashpoint city of Falluja. Two of their bodies were hung from a bridge in an act which shocked the United States and triggered an assault on the city.
The firm was accused of exposing them to high risk without proper protection.
In January, families of the four guards settled a long-running lawsuit with the company. The details of the deal have not been released. 
Summarize:  The US Justice Department said the deal would cover 17 "violations" by the company, now called Academi LLC. The offences include illegal possession of arms and unauthorised sales of training and equipment abroad. The deal ends a case against the firm, which held US security contracts worth billions in Iraq and Afghanistan. The case covers possession of unregistered automatic weapons in the US, unauthorised sales of satellite phones in Sudan and illegal export of body armour, among other things. The move means that Academi will not face prosecution over the violations as long as it meets auditing requirements and complies with export restrictions. The firm was a
The 26-year-old striker has made 28 appearances, scoring four goals, since being signed by former Red boss Brendan Rodgers from AC Milan for £16m in 2014.
Balotelli also held talks with Swiss club FC Sion after being told to find a new club.
Nice came fourth in Ligue 1 last season to qualify for the Europa League.
Balotelli spent time on loan with Italian side AC Milan last season, scoring one goal in 20 games in Serie A. 
Summarize:  Balotelli was not happy with his treatment by the club and he was not happy with the way he was treated by the club. He was not happy with the way he was treated by the club. He was not happy with the way he was treated by the club. He was not happy with the way he was treated by the club. He was not happy with the way he was treated by the club. He was not happy with the way he was treated by the club. He was not happy with the way he was treated by the club. He was not happy with the way he was treated by the club. He was not
The British Film Institute has made the film, shot in May 1911, available on its website.
Henry Alexander Jr, the son of Scotland's first Ford dealer, drove the Model T up and then down the mountain.
The publicity stunt was to show that the mass produced American car was superior to hand-crafted British ones.
A peat bank is shown in the film being dynamited to make the journey a bit smoother for the Model T.
In 2011, a team of about 60 volunteers carried a dismantled replica of a Model T Ford car up and then back down from the summit of Ben Nevis.
The attempt, made in strong winds, hail and snow, was successfully completed.
Volunteers carried wheels, seats and the chassis. Other parts of the car were put into 40 bags weighing 10 pounds (4kg) each.
After being reassembled on the summit the car was again dismantled for the descent.
An organisation called Ben Nevis Bronze Ford Committee is raising Â£86,000 to pay for a a full-size bronze sculpture of the 1911 Model T.
Once made, it would be installed in Fort William. 
Summarize: 
The film shows the first Model T Ford car being driven up and down Ben Nevis.
It was made to show that the mass produced American car was superior to hand-crafted British ones.
The film was made in 1911.
A team of about 60 volunteers carried a dismantled replica of a Model T Ford car up and then back down from the summit of Ben Nevis.
The attempt, made in strong winds, hail and snow, was successfully completed.
Volunteers carried wheels, seats and the chassis. Other parts of the car were put into 40 bags weighing 10 pounds (4kg) each.
After
As part of BBC Scotland's coverage, party leader Willie Rennie will take part in a half-hour webcast in which he will answer your questions.
If you have something to ask Mr Rennie, email newsonlinescotland@bbc.co.uk
Please put "webchat questions" in the message field of your email.
You will be able to watch the one-to-one interview, hosted by BBC Scotland political editor Brian Taylor, via BBC Scotland's politics website. 
Summarize: 
The webchat will be broadcast on the BBC Scotland website from 10:00 to 10:30 on Wednesday, 21 October.
The interview will be available on the BBC Scotland website from 10:30 to 11:00 on Wednesday, 21 October.
The interview will be available on the BBC Scotland website from 11:00 to 11:30 on Wednesday, 21 October.
The interview will be available on the BBC Scotland website from 11:30 to 12:00 on Wednesday, 21 October.
The interview will be available on the BBC Scotland website from 12:00 to 12:30 on Wednesday,
The sheet contains images of past celebrations in Belfast, Cambridge, Sheffield, Cardiff and Edinburgh.
It features 20 first class firework stamps alongside pictures of Chinese lanterns and firecrackers.
The year of the sheep begins on 19 February.
Royal Mail spokesperson Philip Parker said the stamps were "visually striking" and hoped that they would "make a great contribution to the 2015 celebrations".
People in Belfast marked the start of the Chinese New Year on Sunday, with a cultural festival at the Ulster Hall. 
Summarize: 
The Chinese New Year is a celebration of the Chinese people.
It is celebrated by the Chinese people in China and other countries with significant Chinese populations.
The Chinese New Year is also known as the Spring Festival, and is a time for family reunions, giving and receiving of gifts, and for the Chinese to clean their homes.
The Chinese New Year is also a time for Chinese people to visit their relatives and friends, and to exchange gifts, money, and food.
The Chinese New Year is a time for the Chinese to clean their homes, and to visit their relatives and friends.
The Chinese New Year is
Melissa Reid's mother Debra said she had no idea her daughter had travelled to the South American country.
She said the Foreign Office had assured her Ms Reid was being well cared-for.
Ms Reid, 19, from Lenzie near Glasgow, was held with another young woman at Lima's airport after the discovery of cocaine said to be worth Â£1.5m.
She is being held along with Michaella McCollum Connolly, 20, from Belfast.
Freelance journalist Dan Collyns, in Lima, told BBC Scotland he had seen a police video which showed the two young women looking "nervous and fatigued" being interviewed through a "rather ropey" translator, just moments after they had been arrested.
He said Ms Reid was asked if she knew what was being carried in the bags and she said she did not.
Mr Collyns also said Ms Reid claimed she was forced to carry the bag which police claimed contained the drugs inside food containers, without knowing what was inside.
Ms Reid is a former pupil of Lenzie Academy who had been living in Ibiza since June.
She had posted hundreds of photographs to her Facebook page over the summer, but it has not been updated since 21 July.
A statement published on the National Police of Peru's website on Wednesday said the two women were alleged to have been acting as "drug mules".
They were detained by drug enforcement officials at Jorge Chavez International Airport after being detected by a sniffer dog.
It was claimed they had just over 11.5kg of cocaine hidden in food products when they were arrested at the counter of Air Europa.
Officers said Ms Reid and Ms McCollum had been attempting to travel to Madrid, with a final destination of Palma in Majorca.
Ms Reid was alleged to have 18 packets containing a total of 5.78kg of cocaine and Ms McCollum 16 envelopes containing 5.81kg of the drug.
Debra Reid said she had not had a chance to speak to her daughter.
She said the family thought Melissa was in Ibiza having a good time with her friends and it came as a complete shock that she was in Peru.
The Foreign Office in London confirmed it was helping a British national.
It is understood Ms Connolly is an Irish passport holder. 
Summarize: 
- The two women were arrested at Jorge Chavez International Airport in Lima, Peru, on July 21.
- The women were allegedly attempting to travel to Madrid, with a final destination of Palma in Majorca.
- The women were allegedly carrying 18 packets containing a total of 5.78kg of cocaine and 16 envelopes containing 5.81kg of the drug.
- The women were allegedly acting as "drug mules".
- The women were detained by drug enforcement officials at Jorge Chavez International Airport after being detected by a sniffer dog.
- The women were allegedly carrying 11.5kg of cocaine in
Daventry District Council is believed to be the first authority to bring in the measure, which could see owners given Â£100 on-the-spot penalties.
The extra power for enforcement officers comes in the form or a Public Space Protection Order (PSPO).
It takes effect on 1 December, but fines would not be levied until 2016.
The plan was put out to public consultation earlier this year and the council said there was "overwhelming support for the proposal by residents and local groups".
The council said there would be a month of offering advice and warnings to dog walkers before the fines were enforced in January.
Mike Warren, councillor for health issues, said: "We will be advising them to make sure they have extra poop bags with them at all times to ensure they have the means to pick up, regardless of how long they've been out and about with their pet.
"These new powers are not intended to penalise the many responsible dog owners, who should be assured that our officers will be taking a common-sense approach on their patrols.
"It's not unreasonable though, for example, to expect someone who has just arrived at a venue to walk their dog to be carrying poop bags."
People caught with their dog and no plastic bags could face prosecution and larger fines if they unsuccessfully contest an on-the-spot fine. 
Summarize: 
The council said it had received "overwhelming support" for the proposal from residents and local groups.
The council said it would be advising dog walkers to make sure they had extra poop bags with them at all times to ensure they had the means to pick up, regardless of how long they had been out and about with their pet.
People caught with their dog and no plastic bags could face prosecution and larger fines if they unsuccessfully contest an on-the-spot fine.
The council said it would be giving advice to dog walkers to make sure they had extra poop bags with them at all times to
South African Earle was sent off after making contact with the eyes of Bath lock Tom Ellis early in the second half of the 38-3 loss.
But Wilson believes the contact was accidental and the TV replays will have misled the officials:
"He's devastated, he's not that type of player," Wilson said.
"I don't think there's any intent to go for his eyes or any foul play in that.
"He's come to me straight afterwards and said 'I certainly wasn't going for any face or eyes, that's not me.'
"It doesn't help when it's slowed down and freeze framed and it makes it look like his on his face for a period of time.
"He's fighting to try and get through a maul. His head is down in the maul and once in that split second his hand is anywhere near his face he's moved it away.
"But I know laws are laws and if his hand is on his face and it's slowed down and made to look like it's on there for a period of time then the referee's put in a difficult predicament.
"It's now happened and we've got to deal with it."
Bath ended Blues' 100% start in the Challenge Cup with a comfortable win at The Rec and are joint leaders of Pool Four.
"Up until the red card I was reasonably pleased - we were away from home and being very competitive," Wilson said.
"Ultimately the game was decided on the red card giving us a very difficult position to defend against a good Bath team.
"We go into the last two matches now with all to play for."
Injury-struck Blues also suffered further injuries to captain Sam Warburton (back), Blaine Scully (concussion) and Steve Shingler (hamstring).
Wilson said Wales captain Warburton's back injury is not too serious. 
Summarize: 
The Blues have a bye in the next round of the Challenge Cup.
The Blues have a bye in the next round of the Challenge Cup.
The Blues have a bye in the next round of the Challenge Cup.
The Blues have a bye in the next round of the Challenge Cup.
The Blues have a bye in the next round of the Challenge Cup.
The Blues have a bye in the next round of the Challenge Cup.
The Blues have a bye in the next round of the Challenge Cup.
The Blues have a bye in the next round of the Challenge Cup.
The service was the culmination of a pilgrimage by the diocese of Aberdeen.
They were in Orkney to mark the 900th anniversary of the martyrdom of Magnus, joint earl, who was killed on his cousin's orders.
The anniversary has been marked by a number of other events, including the setting up of the Magnus Way pilgrimage route.
It is believed to be the biggest gathering of bishops and archbishops in Orkney's history.
St Magnus was killed in the island of Egilsay by his cousin Haakon.
The year of his martyrdom is not known with certainty, but the most probable is 1117.
Magnus was declared a saint about 20 years after his death. His nephew, St Rognvald, built St Magnus Cathedral in his memory, starting in 1137.
In his homily, Bishop of Aberdeen Hugh Gilbert drew a parallel between Jesus's teaching that a grain has to fall into the ground and die before it can produce sheaves of wheat to harvest, and the murder of Magnus.
He said Magnus's death had produced a legacy of peace; wellbeing and healing; and creativity.
The service included the playing of Ivan Drever's "Rose of St Magnus" inspired by the rose window of the cathedral, and the singing of the medieval hymn to Magnus "Nobilis humilis".
Afterwards, the minister of the cathedral, the Rev Fraser Macnaughton, told BBC Radio Orkney the service gave a flavour of what life would have been like in the building before the Reformation because, he said, it had been a Catholic cathedral for more than 500 years. 
Summarize: 
The service was the culmination of a pilgrimage by the diocese of Aberdeen.
They were in Orkney to mark the 900th anniversary of the martyrdom of Magnus, joint earl, who was killed on his cousin's orders.
The anniversary has been marked by a number of other events, including the setting up of the Magnus Way pilgrimage route.
It is believed to be the biggest gathering of bishops and archbishops in Orkney's history.
St Magnus was killed in the island of Egilsay by his cousin Haakon.
The year of his martyrdom is not known with certainty, but
Russian athletes are banned from competing because of state-sponsored doping, while Usain Bolt is to lose an Olympic gold medal after a relay team-mate tested positive for banned drugs.
European Athletics (EA) president Svein Arne Hansen has ordered the review.
All records should be "100% believable and credible", Hansen said.
"However, there is a view that this is currently not the case with some of the performances on the European Record list, and so I have ordered this review," he added.
"Claiming a European record - after being crowned European Champion - is the pinnacle of our sport in Europe. The holders of these records should be aspirational heroes whose performances are respected and recognised as beyond question by their fellow athletes and the fans of our sport."
The task force will report back its findings by September.
More than 1,000 Russians, across at least 30 sports, benefited from a state-sponsored doping programme between 2011 and 2015, according to the second part of the McLaren report, released in December after a World Anti-doping Agency (Wada) commission.
The EA website currently lists 15 European indoor and outdoor athletics records held by Russians.
Additional current records include those set in the 1980s by athletes from Soviet Bloc countries, including East Germany, which operated its own extensive doping programme.
Meanwhile, the International Olympic Committee is re-testing hundreds of samples taken at the 2008 and 2012 Olympic Games using up-to-date detection methods. So far it has sanctioned almost 100 athletes for using banned substances.
The latest include Jamaican sprinter Nesta Carter, who was part of a Jamaican quartet featuring Bolt that won the 4x100m relay in Beijing in 2008.
The IOC has ordered that Jamaica be stripped of its medal as a result.
Hansen said he had spoken about his review with Lord Coe, head of the IAAF, athletics' world governing body.
He added: "The IAAF will monitor this work closely before deciding on any actions at the world level." 
Summarize: 
The IAAF has been accused of covering up doping by Russian athletes.
The IAAF has been accused of covering up doping by Russian athletes.
The IAAF has been accused of covering up doping by Russian athletes.
The IAAF has been accused of covering up doping by Russian athletes.
The IAAF has been accused of covering up doping by Russian athletes.
The IAAF has been accused of covering up doping by Russian athletes.
The IAAF has been accused of covering up doping by Russian athletes.
The IAAF has been accused of covering up doping by Russian athletes.
The IAAF has been accused
One man tricked the 93-year-old victim into turning around while another swapped his card for a fake one at the Natwest branch in Grantham.
They also stole the man's PIN, and later used his bank details to transfer the money from his account.
Natwest said it was working with police to identify the three "callous" thieves seen in CCTV footage from the bank.
Detectives said the men were "organised in their deception and very selective about their victim."
A spokesperson for NatWest said: "Our customer fell victim to a callous distraction technique whilst using an ATM.
"We have refunded all the money to the customer and continue to do everything we can to help the police identify the criminals." 
Summarize: 
The thieves tricked the elderly man into turning around while another swapped his card for a fake one at the Natwest branch in Grantham.
They also stole the man's PIN, and later used his bank details to transfer the money from his account.
Natwest said it was working with police to identify the three "callous" thieves seen in CCTV footage from the bank.
Detectives said the men were "organised in their deception and very selective about their victim."
A spokesperson for NatWest said: "Our customer fell victim to a callous distraction technique whilst using an ATM.
"We have refund
Firefighters cut one person free from a vehicle following the crash on the A9, a mile north of Aviemore at Lynwilg.
A spokeswoman for Scottish Fire and Rescue Service said they also assisted with two other casualties. The total number of casualties is unclear.
The northbound carriageway of the A9 was closed for several hours but has since reopened.
Drivers had been urged to use another route. 
Summarize: 
The accident happened at around 8.30am on the A9 northbound near the village of Lynwilg, about north of Aviemore.
The road was closed for several hours but has since reopened.
The A9 northbound was closed at the scene of the crash.
The northbound carriageway of the A9 was closed at the scene of the crash.
The northbound carriageway of the A9 was closed at the scene of the crash.
The northbound carriageway of the A9 was closed at the scene of the crash
Media playback is not supported on this device
The 23-year-old's triumph completed a clean sweep for South Korea in the four archery disciplines.
Ku was part of the men's team that won team gold by beating the USA on Saturday.
American Brady Ellison beat the Netherlands' Sjef van den Berg 6-2 in the bronze-medal match.
Find out about how to get into archery with our special guide. 
Summarize: 
The South Korean women's team won team gold by beating the USA in the final.
The USA women's team won silver, while the Netherlands won bronze.
The men's team won team gold by beating the USA in the final.
The USA men's team won silver, while the Netherlands won bronze.
The women's team won team gold by beating the USA in the final.
The USA women's team won silver, while the Netherlands won bronze.
The men's team won team gold by beating the USA in the final.
The USA men's team won silver, while the Netherlands won
The Port of Dover plans to remove up to 3m cubic yards (2.5m cubic metres) of sand and gravel.
The area being explored in the recommended Marine Conservation zone covers an areas of 4.5 square miles about eight miles (12km) from Dover.
The sand and gravel will be transported to the Western Docks for land reclamation and construction works.
The Port of Dover wants to relocate its cargo business to a new terminal at Western Docks to create extra space within Eastern Docks for ferry traffic.
The redevelopment plans also include shops, hotels and bars and the creation of a new marina.
Dover Harbour Board has previously said the plans would create 600 new jobs.
The Goodwin Sands are a series of shifting sandbanks. They provide habitat for grey and common seals and birds and are the site of hundreds of historic shipwrecks.
Bryony Chapman, from the Kent Wildlife Trust, said: "It's bound to have an impact on the sediment habitats there and the important mussel beds and ross worm reefs which provide the basis for the food chain.
"We are also really worried about the amount of sediment being removed and what impact that could have on coastline and important conservation areas on the coast."
Alan Breck, project manager for Dover Western Docks Revival, said an environmental impact assessment was being undertaken to assess the effect dredging would have on the area.
He said: "Goodwin Sands contains an important aggregate resource and has been dredged previously for fill aggregate for infrastructure projects at the Port of Dover and Port of Ramsgate." 
Summarize: 
The Port of Dover plans to remove up to 3m cubic yards (2.5m cubic metres) of sand and gravel.
The area being explored in the recommended Marine Conservation zone covers an areas of 4.5 square miles about eight miles (12km) from Dover.
The sand and gravel will be transported to the Western Docks for land reclamation and construction works.
The Port of Dover wants to relocate its cargo business to a new terminal at Western Docks to create extra space within Eastern Docks for ferry traffic.
The redevelopment plans also include shops, hotels and bars and the creation of a new marina
Rurik Jutting, 29, was remanded for psychiatric reports to be prepared and is next due in court on 24 November.
He was arrested after police found the victims - both thought to have been sex workers - in his apartment in the Wan Chai area early on 1 November.
He had resigned from a job at Bank of America Merrill Lynch a week earlier.
Before moving to the company, he worked at Barclays in London for two years.
A LinkedIn profile under his name suggested he was a Cambridge University graduate. Winchester College, an independent boarding school in Hampshire, confirmed he had once been a student there.
Police said Mr Jutting called them to the luxury residential building where he lived at 03:42 on 1 November (19:42 31 October GMT).
One of the victims, named in a court document as Sumarti Ningsih, was found in a suitcase after being killed on 27 October, a charge sheet said. She had sustained neck injuries.
The second woman had wounds to her neck and buttock. She has not been officially named, but was known locally as Jesse.
BBC Hong Kong correspondent Juliana Liu said the two victims were well known in the Wan Chai entertainment district.
It could now take months or even years for the case to come to conclusion, our correspondent added. 
Summarize: 
The Wan Chai District Court in Hong Kong heard that Jutting had been arrested on 1 November, the day after the bodies of two Indonesian women were found in his apartment.
The court heard that Jutting had been in Hong Kong for around a year and had been working at Bank of America Merrill Lynch (BAML) in Hong Kong.
The court heard that Jutting had resigned from his job at BAML on 30 October.
The court heard that Jutting had been living alone in the apartment.
The court heard that Jutting had called the police to his apartment on 1
The 134-mile route, which is named after the 19th Century Scottish conservationist, launched in 2014 to mark the centenary of his death.
It runs between Helensburgh in the west and Muir's birthplace in Dunbar.
The John Muir Way is the 28th long distance route to be given the accolade by Scottish Natural Heritage.
The route, which includes castles, towns, villages and Loch Lomond and The Trossachs National Park, attracted more than 60,000 people in 2015.
Muir left Scotland for America aged 11 and became one of the most influential figures in the history of the environmental movement.
Keith Geddes, chairman of the Central Scotland Green Network Trust said: "There is a growing understanding in Scotland of Muir's significance throughout the world and the award of Scotland's Great Trail status will help to further raise awareness of both Muir and the route.
"The John Muir Way has proved to be popular with locals going out for a short walk, for those long distance walkers who complete the route on consecutive days or over several visits and to hundreds of visitors from abroad, particularly from Muir's adopted homeland wanting to learn more about Muir's life in Dunbar."
Scottish Natural Heritage chairman Ian Ross, said: "The coast to coast route is the second longest of our Great Trails and, spanning central Scotland, it is easily accessible for millions of people living here.
"The John Muir Way is also another excellent outdoor tourism asset for Scotland and we hope the award helps to attract many more visitors over the coming years." 
Summarize: 
The John Muir Way is a 134-mile route which runs from Helensburgh in the west to Muir's birthplace in Dunbar in the east.
The route includes castles, towns, villages and Loch Lomond and The Trossachs National Park.
The John Muir Way is the 28th long distance route to be given the accolade by Scottish Natural Heritage.
The route, which includes castles, towns, villages and Loch Lomond and The Trossachs National Park, attracted more than 60,000 people in 2015.
Muir left Scotland for America aged 11 and became one of
Berks, Bucks and Oxon Wildlife Trust hopes to secure £2m of Heritage Lottery Funding for the Reconnect project.
It will focus on the river from Lechlade-on-Thames, Gloucestershire, to Sandford-on-Thames, Oxfordshire, and will also look at leisure activities, including walking and fishing.
The charity will be told in October whether its bid has been successful.
Wendy Tobitt, of Bucks, Berks and Oxon Wildlife, described the river as a "fantastic natural resource".
She said the majority of the work would involve workshops and guided walks to help "reconnect people with the Thames".
"It has a vast array of wildlife - otters, salmon, kingfishers, water voles - and we want to enable more people to see these lovely creatures," she said.
"Guided trails would give people a better idea of what is on offer, but sometimes hidden."
The work will also look at art and poetry, including poet Edward Thomas who wrote about the Thames and William Morris of the arts and craft movement who lived at Kelmscott Manor beside the river, as well as the area's significance during the Industrial Revolution.
"The Thames was a main transport artery for many towns - places like Lechlade grew up because of the wool trade," Ms Tobitt said.
Other groups and firms involved with the project include Thames Water, Environment Agency, Cotswold Conservation Board, as well as local authorities and history groups. 
Summarize: 
The Thames is a major river in southern England, rising at Thames Head in Gloucestershire, and flowing through Berkshire, Buckinghamshire, Oxfordshire and Surrey, before emptying into the English Channel at the Thames Estuary, near the city of London.
The Thames is formed by the confluence of two major tributaries, the River Great Ouse and the River Thames, and its drainage basin covers an area of 1,485 square miles.
The Thames is navigable from the Thames Barrier at London, to the Tideway at Reading, a distance of .
The Thames is formed by the confluence of two
Donati, 35, has just ended his second spell at Bari in his native Italy.
He featured for Celtic between 2007 and 2009, helping them win the Scottish Premier League in 2008.
The former Italy Under-21 player could make his Accies debut in Saturday's Scottish League Cup match against St Mirren.
Atalanta, AC Milan and Sampdoria are among the clubs Donati has served.
Hamilton have also signed defenders Jack Breslin and Jordan McGregor, and taken Norwich City goalkeeper Remi Matthews on loan, in this summer's transfer window,
Meanwhile, Northern Ireland keeper Michael McGovern, who is out of contract after two years with Accies, is expected to join Norwich, who are managed by former Hamilton boss Alex Neil. 
Summarize: 
"The club's first ever major signing was the arrival of former Celtic and Italy striker Tommaso Rocchi on a free transfer from Serie B side Spezia in July 2007. Rocchi was a prolific goalscorer for the Italian side, scoring 28 goals in the 2007–08 season. The following season, Rocchi scored four goals in the first four games of the season, including a hat-trick against St Mirren. He scored a total of nine goals in his first season with the club, including a brace against Celtic in the Scottish Cup. Rocchi scored his first goal for the club in a
James Hilton, 25, of Aberdeen, was trying to catch up with a friend who was travelling in another car on the A920 Dufftown to Huntly road in 2015.
Patrick Pirie, 81, of Dufftown, was in a car involved in the resulting crash. He died in hospital from his injuries.
Hilton was jailed four years and two months.
Great-grandfather Mr Pirie was travelling home from a farmers' mart in nearby Huntly when the collision happened.
Judge Lord Woolman told the High Court in Edinburgh: "This is a tragic case for everyone involved. Mr Pirie was a retired farmer aged 81. He was married with four grown children.
"Your crime casts a terrible shadow over them. The harm caused by an offence that causes a person's death is immeasurable.
"My duty is to discourage others from such irresponsible conduct. I must also mark the gravity of what happened."
He also banned him from driving for nine years and until he passes a fresh test.
Defence counsel Tony Lenehan said Hilton had shown "genuine remorse".
Hilton had one previous conviction, a speeding offence from 2011. 
Summarize: 
The victim, Patrick Pirie, was a retired farmer aged 81. He was married with four grown children.
Your crime casts a terrible shadow over them. The harm caused by an offence that causes a person's death is immeasurable.
My duty is to discourage others from such irresponsible conduct. I must also mark the gravity of what happened.
The victim, Patrick Pirie, was a retired farmer aged 81. He was married with four grown children.
Your crime casts a terrible shadow over them. The harm caused by an offence that causes a person's death is immeasurable.
My
Media playback is not supported on this device
It had been planned for the 30-year-old sprinting great, a lifelong United fan, to play in the fixture, which will raise money for the Manchester United Foundation.
However, Bolt suffered a hamstring injury as he ran the final leg of the 4x100m relay at the World Athletics Championships in London on Saturday.
The Jamaican - the world record holder in both the 100m and 200m - has had further scans on the injury, which showed the damage to be worse than anticipated.
Bolt, who also won 11 world titles, has now retired from sprinting.
Former United players Edwin van der Sar, Paul Scholes, Denis Irwin, Dwight Yorke, Phil Neville, Ronny Johnsen, Louis Saha, Mikael Silvestre, Jesper Blomqvist, Quinton Fortune and Dion Dublin are all expected to take part in the charity game.
Media playback is not supported on this device
Bolt tweeted an image of his muscle tear and said the injury will require three months of rehabilitation.
The Jamaican could only manage bronze in his penultimate race - the men's 100m at London 2017 - before pulling up injured just as he began to hit top speed in his final event, the 4x100m relay, last Saturday.
It meant the 19-time global champion, recently described by Lord Coe, the president of athletics' governing body the IAAF, as "a genius" akin to boxing legend Muhammad Ali, bowed out being helped off the track by his team-mates, barely able to stand upright.
"I don't usually release my medical report to the public but sadly I have sat and listened to people questioning if I was really injured," Bolt said on social media, before later deleting the posts.
"I have never been one to cheat my fans in any way and my entire desire at the championship was run one last time for my fans." 
Summarize: 
The game will be played at Old Trafford on Sunday, 24 July, with kick-off at 12:30 BST.
The match will be played in aid of the Manchester United Foundation.
Tickets for the match are available from the Manchester United website.
The match will be shown live on BT Sport.
Bolt's injury is the latest setback for the Jamaican, who was hoping to defend his 100m and 200m titles at the World Championships in London.
Bolt was also hoping to run the 4x100m relay at the World Championships, but pulled up injured just as he
Snowdonia National Park has issued the appeal in a bid to stop people creating cairns - piles of stones.
It said the practice has "become customary" among walkers so they can "identify paths and junctions or dangerous places".
But park wardens warned it has caused footpaths to erode.
On Ty Nant footpath, within less than a mile between Rhiw Gwredydd and Bwlch y Cyfrwy, there are 102 cairns.
Simon Roberts, senior warden for south Snowdonia, said the issue has become "quite a problem" on Cadair Idris, leading to a volunteer day being organised to reduce the size and number of piled stones.
"As the cairns are built, stone by stone, the footpaths are eroding and the fragile landscape is being damaged," he said.
"Footpaths widen and the cost of maintaining the footpaths increase. But, even more dangerous, they can mislead walkers, especially in fog." 
Summarize: 
The National Park Authority has issued an appeal to stop people creating cairns - piles of stones.
It said the practice has "become customary" among walkers so they can "identify paths and junctions or dangerous places".
But park wardens warned it has caused footpaths to erode.
On Ty Nant footpath, within less than a mile between Rhiw Gwredydd and Bwlch y Cyfrwy, there are 102 cairns.
Simon Roberts, senior warden for south Snowdonia, said the issue has become "quite a problem" on Cad
3
governments led by the party that came second
1885 Conservatives 249 (Liberals 319)
1892 Liberals 272 (Conservatives 313)
1923 Labour 191 (Conservatives 258)
Perhaps a party that does not win the most seats could govern with the support of nationalists or liberals.
Well, if either of those scenarios plays out, it will not be the first time.
In 1885, the Conservatives won 249 seats, beaten by William Gladstone's Liberals who took 319 seats. But the Conservative Marquess of Salisbury ended up as prime minister, supported by the Irish Nationalists, who had 86 seats. The government did not last long though, with another election taking place the following year in which the Conservatives won an overall majority.
In 1892, the tables were turned, with the Liberals winning 272 seats to the Conservatives' (and Liberal Unionists) 313 seats. This time it was the Liberals who formed a minority government, supported by the Irish Nationalists. This government fared a little better, lasting until 1895.
Fast forward to 1923, when Stanley Baldwin's Conservatives won 258 seats, defeating Ramsay MacDonald's Labour Party, which had 191 seats. But Ramsay MacDonald ended up forming the first Labour government, supported by Herbert Asquith's Liberals, who had won 158 seats.
The government lasted for 10 months.
So what do we learn from these historical examples? It is possible to govern despite winning fewer seats than a rival, but it doesn't tend to last the full term.
What is the truth behind the politicians' claims on the campaign trail? Our experts investigate the facts, and wider stories, behind the soundbites.
Read latest updates or follow us on Twitter @BBCRealityCheck 
Summarize:  What are the facts behind the claims?
It is possible to govern despite winning fewer seats than a rival
It is possible to govern despite winning fewer seats than a rival
It is possible to govern despite winning fewer seats than a rival
It is possible to govern despite winning fewer seats than a rival
It is possible to govern despite winning fewer seats than a rival
It is possible to govern despite winning fewer seats than a rival
It is possible to govern despite winning fewer seats than a rival
It is possible to govern despite winning fewer seats than a rival
It is possible to govern despite winning fewer seats than a rival
It is
At least one person was treated in hospital and several were hurt as police used tear gas and rubber bullets to disperse protesters in Siyazan.
The demonstrators were angry at worsening economic conditions sparked by the fall in the price of oil.
Azerbaijan's economy is heavily dependent on oil. Nearly half its GDP in 2014 came from the oil sector.
Oil prices have slumped by 70% in the past 15 months, down to $31 a barrel on international markets.
Azerbaijan's currency, the manat, has also fallen dramatically in value.
The interior ministry said the protests were organised by the opposition and religious extremists.
The government has ordered a cut in the price of flour in response to the crisis, effective from Friday, according to Reuters news agency.
VAT was being waived on wheat imports and the sale of bread and flour, it said.
In a further move to prop up the faltering manat, Azerbaijan's central bank has banned the sale of foreign exchange in bureaux de change run by commercial banks, Reuters adds.
Azerbaijan's economy, heavily dependent on oil revenue, has been shaken by decreasing oil prices on the world markets. Small businesses have suffered enormously in recent years because of bribes allegedly demanded by officials. Corruption has been a major hurdle for businesses in Azerbaijan, according to the International Monetary Fund.
Azerbaijan's local currency, the manat, was almost equal to the euro at the start of last year but was devalued against the dollar in February 2015.
In December 2015 the Central Bank unpegged the manat from the dollar, and an immediate price hike followed. This heavily affected low-income families. Many others with large bank loans suffered too.
Azerbaijan imports even most of the basic consumer goods and, although some agricultural products are produced locally, raw materials for their production are brought in from abroad.
Despite recurrent warnings from international and local analysts about the expected effects of oil dependency, the Azerbaijani government has done very little to improve other industries.
In a country where media are under strict control, critical voices are met with force.
Discontent was relatively low during the oil boom, but now the volatile currency means that price increases affect almost everyone.
And as the range of people who suffer increases, it may prove difficult for the government to appease the wider public. 
Summarize: 
The protests were sparked by a sharp fall in the price of oil.
The demonstrators were angry at worsening economic conditions sparked by the fall in the price of oil.
Azerbaijan's economy is heavily dependent on oil. Nearly half its GDP in 2014 came from the oil sector.
Oil prices have slumped by 70% in the past 15 months, down to $31 a barrel on international markets.
Azerbaijan's currency, the manat, has also fallen dramatically in value.
The interior ministry said the protests were organised by the opposition and religious extremists.
The government has ordered a cut in
Jack Carr was inseparable from his toy owl Cuckoo, who eats dinner, sleeps in a special bed next to him and goes on holiday with the family.
But he was left heartbroken after it was snatched by a seagull close to the family home in Beaumaris.
In a heart-warming tale, the pair are set to be reunited after a social media appeal sparked a search for Cuckoo.
Jack's mum Nancy Carr said he was "made up" Cuckoo - who has been his favourite toy since he was two - had been found in a garden after being stolen by the gull.
"He loves his Cuckoo", she said, "he carries him everywhere."
The family were in the Beaumaris Castle playground when Jack threw Cuckoo up in the air during a game - in that moment a seagull swooped and snatched the toy up and vanished with him.
"Next thing he was crying, we tried to see where it had gone, we went everywhere", she said.
Ms Carr bought a replacement Cuckoo for Jack when the toy was stolen on Saturday 1 July, and following the appeal on Twitter and Facebook was bought another by a kind-hearted stranger.
But Jack and his favourite toy will be reunited on Wednesday, when he will meet the lady who found Cuckoo in her garden after seeing the missing appeal on social media.
"There are such nice people out there. You do not realise how much it affects you until something like this happens," Ms Carr said.
"We have been to Germany and everywhere with Cuckoo, and then he gets stolen by a seagull so near to our house.
"He is going to be tied to Jack from now on". 
Summarize: 
A little boy is heartbroken when his favourite toy is stolen by a seagull.
A kind stranger buys him another toy owl, but the boy's mum has a surprise for him.
The family are planning to go to Germany with Cuckoo, and he will be tied to Jack from now on.
This story is a great example of how people can be so nice and helpful.
The story is also a great example of how people can be so nice and helpful.
The story is also a great example of how people can be so nice and helpful.
The story is also a great example of how
Joanne Latham, 38, was discovered by a prison officer at HMP Woodhill in Milton Keynes.
She was serving life for three attempted murders when she died on 27 November.
Latham was identified as being at risk of suicide the day before and put in a locked cell, the court heard.
The inquest is being heard in the name of "Eddie Latham, otherwise known as Joanne Marie Latham".
Latham was registered under the name Joanne at the all-male prison and this was the name used by prison officers.
However, the court heard that she changed her name to Eddie Latham by deed poll earlier in 2015.
Coroner Tom Osborne asked prison officer Debbie Glyde whether the inmate had serious intentions to change gender. She replied that she "could not say because he went through phases".
Updates on this story and others from Buckinghamshire
Initially, Latham was being observed once an hour on the night she died, but this was increased as she had become "more agitated," Coroner's officer Mel Riley said.
"During the night he covered the cell observation panel with a J Cloth and barricaded the door. He responded verbally to the 03:30 and 04:00 checks but not the 04:30 check," she added.
Officers were called to break in to the cell and Latham was pronounced dead at 06:20 GMT, Milton Keynes Coroner's court heard.
Latham was sentenced to life imprisonment in 2001 for an attempted murder.
She was later handed further life sentences for the attempted murders of a prisoner at HMP Frankland, in Durham, in 2007 and of a fellow patient at Rampton secure hospital, in Nottinghamshire, in 2011.
Latham's family, who are from Manchester, were not present at the hearing.
The inquest was adjourned until 2 February 2016. 
Summarize: 
Joanne Latham was serving life for three attempted murders when she died on 27 November 2015.
She was identified as being at risk of suicide the day before and put in a locked cell, the court heard.
The inquest is being heard in the name of "Eddie Latham, otherwise known as Joanne Marie Latham".
Latham was registered under the name Joanne at the all-male prison and this was the name used by prison officers.
However, the court heard that she changed her name to Eddie Latham by deed poll earlier in 2015.
Coroner Tom Osborne asked prison officer Debbie Gly
The health ministry said 281 were now known to have died in the attack, which targeted a shopping complex in the mainly Shia Muslim Karrada district.
The previous death toll, announced by the ministry on Tuesday, was 250.
The jihadist group Islamic State (IS) has said it was behind the bombing, the deadliest in the country since the 2003 US-led invasion.
IS militants overran large parts of northern and western Iraq two years ago, but government forces have since regained much of the territory.
In response to the battlefield setbacks, including the recent loss of the western city of Falluja, the militants have stepped up their attacks on civilians.
In Sunday's bombing, an explosives-laden lorry blew up outside a crowded, three-storey shopping centre where people had been enjoying a night out after breaking their daily fast for the Islamic holy month of Ramadan.
On Thursday, the health ministry raised the death toll from the attack after more of those registered as missing were identified as dead, spokesman Ahmed al-Rudaini told the Reuters news agency.
Hospital and police officials told the Associated Press that the death toll might rise as human remains were still being recovered from the blast site.
More than 200 people were wounded in the attack, 23 of whom are still in hospital.
The bombing has sparked widespread anger among Iraqis, some of whom have accused the government of failing to protect them.
When Prime Minister Haider al-Abadi visited the bombing site, people threw stones and shoes at his convoy and called him a "thief".
On Tuesday, Interior Minister Mohammed al-Ghabban offered his resignation to Mr Abadi, conceding that the bomber had managed to pass through several security checkpoints on its way from the eastern province of Diyala to central Baghdad.
Mr Ghabban blamed a lack of communication between the multiple forces in charge of security, and called for the interior ministry to be given overall responsibility.
Mr Abadi accepted the minister's resignation on Wednesday, an official in his office told the AFP news agency, although there was no official announcement. 
Summarize: 
On Sunday, a suicide bomber detonated an explosives-laden lorry at a crowded shopping complex in the mainly Shia Muslim Karrada district of Baghdad, killing at least 250 people and wounding more than 200.
The attack was the deadliest in Iraq since the 2003 US-led invasion that toppled Saddam Hussein.
The bombing has triggered widespread anger among Iraqis, some of whom have accused the government of failing to protect them.
When Prime Minister Haider al-Abadi visited the bombing site, people threw stones and shoes at his convoy and called him a "thief".
On Tuesday, Interior Minister Mohammed al-Ghab
Nyki Taylor, 39, died at the scene when the Vauxhall Astra she was in struck a lamp post on Blackpool Road, Lytham, at about 06:10 GMT on Sunday.
A 27-year-old man from Lytham was arrested on suspicion of drink driving and causing death by driving without due care and consideration.
Lancashire Police is appealing for witnesses to come forward.
Mrs Taylor's family described her as "a loving daughter and sister who was taken from us too suddenly and too soon".
They added: "Words cannot describe our loss, she will be in our hearts forever."
Sgt Rob Gomery, who is leading the investigation, said officers were keen to speak to the driver of a red Audi who may have stopped at the scene. 
Summarize: 
The driver of the Vauxhall Astra was travelling along Blackpool Road in Lytham when the car collided with a lamp post.
The driver, a 39-year-old woman, was pronounced dead at the scene.
A 27-year-old man from Lytham was arrested on suspicion of drink driving and causing death by driving without due care and consideration.
Lancashire Police is appealing for witnesses to come forward.
The Astra was travelling along Blackpool Road in Lytham when the car collided with a lamp post.
The driver, a 39-year-old woman
Gunmen used two car bombs to blast their way into the Sahafi hotel compound before storming the building, police said.
Victims included at least one MP and the general who led the 2011 offensive that drove al-Shabab out of Mogadishu.
African Union troops and government forces say they have regained control of the hotel after a fierce gun battle.
The hotel is popular with Somalia's members of parliament.
A website associated with al-Shabab said it was responsible for the attack, which it said was carried out early in the morning to avoid civilian casualties.
This is a clear change in strategy, says BBC World Service Africa editor Mary Harper. Until now, attacks in Mogadishu have been carried out during the day and evening, killing civilians who happen to be in the targeted area.
The owner of the hotel and Gen Abdikarim Dhagabadan, who commanded the operation against al-Shabab in 2011, were among the victims.
The attack comes a day after deadly clashes between jihadist fighters and African Union (AU) troops in the Bakool region near the border with Ethiopia.
The AU is helping the government battle al-Shabab.
Security in Somalia has improved, but the al-Qaeda linked group still attacks Mogadishu regularly.
The militants have also targeted neighbouring countries, killing almost 150 people in an assault on Garissa University College in Kenya in April. 
Summarize: 
The attack on the Sahafi Hotel in Mogadishu, Somalia, has killed at least 15 people and wounded more than 30 others.
The hotel is popular with Somalia's members of parliament.
A website associated with al-Shabab said it was responsible for the attack, which it said was carried out early in the morning to avoid civilian casualties.
This is a clear change in strategy, says BBC World Service Africa editor Mary Harper. Until now, attacks in Mogadishu have been carried out during the day and evening, killing civilians who happen to be in the targeted area.
The owner of the hotel and
Simon Brown is travelling to Illinois with the Blind Veterans UK charity to share best practice methods with their American counterparts.
The travelling group will meet with 11 veterans of the US Operation Iraqi Freedom injured during the Iraq war.
Mr Brown, from Morley, was blinded in 2006 during a rescue mission in Basra.
Mr Brown, 37, was a corporal in the Royal Electrical and Mechanical Engineers when he was shot in the face by a sniper, the bullet destroying his left eye and damaging his right eye.
Back in the UK his cheekbones and nose had to be reconstructed using titanium, his jaw broken and remoulded and a prosthetic eye fitted.
He is one of six members of Blind Veterans UK  taking part in the week-long trip to the Department of Veterans Affairs' Central Blind Rehabilitation Center, near Chicago.
Speaking about his American counterparts, he said: "We've been fighting together since World War One and if we can fight together we can get better together."
He added: "We will be sitting through a normal week of their rehabilitation programme and our role will be about giving feedback about any changes that could be made and things that we thought were good.
"In the UK we are very strong on the emotional side of support and they are very much more about practical support in America.
"That's what we're taking out there, that more personal touch."
The trip is the sixth organised between Blind Veterans UK  and the Blinded Veterans Association.
Mr Brown, who works as a communication and engagement officer for Blind Veterans UK , said the support the organisations offer is vital to helping service men and women recover.
"It's given me my life back," he said. "They took me from a coma to full-time work in the space of six years. For people like me the support they offer is a lifeline." 
Summarize: 
The Blind Veterans UK charity is a registered charity in the UK.
The charity was founded in 1992 by a group of veterans who had lost their sight during service.
The charity's main aim is to provide support and advice to blind veterans, their families and carers.
The charity also provides a range of services to blind people, including rehabilitation, counselling, and information and advice.
The charity's main office is in Morley, West Yorkshire.
The charity's main fundraising events are the annual Blind Veterans UK Christmas dinner, and the annual Blind Veterans UK golf day.
The charity also
The increase in the Norfolk and Waveney area in the December 2014 to February 2015 period - compared with April to June 2014 - resulted in higher staff caseload levels, the report said.
There has also been an increase in the number of cases not allocated a social worker at the trust.
Between November and January the number of these cases rose from 662 to 960.
The report by the Norfolk and Suffolk Foundation Trust (NSFT), which provides mental health care, highlights the fact that while mainstream hospitals in the two counties have seen budgets rise by 15% since 2010, mental health service funding has fallen by 3%.
In the report, its author Marcus Hayward, locality operations manager of the NSFT, says: "The increase in referrals is putting pressure on community services and resulting in higher caseload levels, waiting times and unallocated caseloads.
"The high referral rate has also reduced capacity to provide ongoing monitoring and crises prevention."
Debbie White, NSFT director of operations for Norfolk and Waveney, said: "The increase in referrals to our services is in line with demand on mental health services nationally, as is the ongoing challenge of recruiting qualified nursing staff due to a national shortage of registered nurses.
"As a result of the number of referrals to our trust there has been an increase in the number of patients on our waiting lists, also known as unallocated cases.
"It is regrettable that patients have to wait but we have implemented a number of measures to ensure they have regular contact with our trust."
Terry O'Shea, of the Campaign to Save Mental Health Services in Norfolk and Suffolk, said: "It shows how badly funding is needed and shows how much demand has increased."
In February the NSFT became the first mental health trust to be put in special measures.
The decision came after the Care Quality Commission reported the trust was "not a safe... service". 
Summarize: 
The report said the increase in the Norfolk and Waveney area in the December 2014 to February 2015 period - compared with April to June 2014 - resulted in higher staff caseload levels, the report said.
There has also been an increase in the number of cases not allocated a social worker at the trust.
Between November and January the number of these cases rose from 662 to 960.
The report by the Norfolk and Suffolk Foundation Trust (NSFT), which provides mental health care, highlights the fact that while mainstream hospitals in the two counties have seen budgets rise by 15% since 2010, mental health service funding has
The business in China delivers more than half of overall profit, but has suffered hurdles, including food safety worries.
This month, the US firm cut its profit outlook, citing a slower-than-expected comeback in China.
The move means any setbacks in China will have less impact on the US stock.
Yum had come under mounting pressure from investors to split the units.
The announcement came just days after the firm had named activist investor Keith Meister to its board.
Mr Meister is the founder and managing partner of hedge fund Corvex Management which has a stake in Yum and had suggested the plans to split off the China unit.
The firm said the spin-off will be complete by 2016.
Yum Brands has suffered repeated setback in its China business. The firm blamed a stronger US currency against the yuan for its poor results. But it is also still recovering from a food scandal last year.
Revenue at the KFC restaurants in China suffered in July last year after a television report linked the brand to supplier Shanghai Husi Food, which was accused of selling meat that was out of date.
Since then, the firm has been trying to win back customers. In the latest quarter, Yum Brands reported that sales in China rose just 2%.
But the company is also suffering from the slowing overall economic growth in the country, as well as growing competition from local food companies.
Yet the company on Tuesday said it believes the China unit could grow from its current 6,900 restaurants to more than 20,000 restaurants in the future.
The China business, which will be headquartered in Shanghai, had brought in $6.9bn (Â£4.8bn) in revenue last year.
At its 1987 debut near Beijing's Tiananmen Square, Yum's KFC was a novelty with a menu that included porridge and other local favourites.
The company said that the remaining Yum Brands business outside of China will concentrate on becoming more of a franchisor, with the goal of having at least 95% of its restaurants owned and operated by franchisees by the end of 2017.
Yum China will be Yum Brands' biggest franchisee and will operate under a franchise agreement.
Yum Brands currently has more than 41,000 restaurants worldwide. 
Summarize: 
The company has been trying to win back customers. In the latest quarter, Yum Brands reported that sales in China rose just 2%.
But the company is also suffering from the slowing overall economic growth in the country, as well as growing competition from local food companies.
The China business, which will be headquartered in Shanghai, had brought in $6.9bn (Â£4.8bn) in revenue last year.
At its 1987 debut near Beijing's Tiananmen Square, Yum's KFC was a novelty with a menu that included porridge and other local favourites.
The company said that the
Nearly three-quarters of people surveyed by the Welsh Conservatives said they wanted an independent inquiry into the health service.
The Tories have proposed elected health commissioners which they claim would make the NHS more accountable.
But Carwyn Jones said the criticism was based on historic issues going back years which were being addressed.
Previous calls for inquiries have come from the British Medical Association and Labour MP Ann Clwyd.
Plaid Cymru has urged a radical shake-up of the Welsh NHS while the Welsh Liberal Democrats have called for an all-party commission to examine its future.
Speaking in Bridgend at his monthly news conference, Mr Jones said: "To suggest that the NHS in Wales is somehow in every way in a more difficult state than in England is quite simply wrong.
"At the end of the day you have to find sufficient money to pay for a health service with an ever-ageing population and that will always be a challenge for any government."
He added that he did not trust the Department of Health in England which he said was "the most politicised department" he had to deal with.
However, Welsh Conservative leader Andrew RT Davies said their survey of more than 3,000 health service users  showed the need for a "culture change" at the heart of the Welsh NHS, where patients felt their complaints were handled poorly.
"Elected health commissioners will put the patient voice at the heart of decision making in the NHS, transferring decision making over health services from central government and into the hands of the people," he said.
"You vote them in, and you vote them out - that's our vision for patient voice in the Welsh NHS."
Welsh Liberal Democrat leader Kirsty Williams repeated her call for an all-party commission, saying: "Labour's-running of the NHS in Wales is nothing short of a national scandal.
"If English voters want to see what a Labour health service will look under Ed Miliband they should look no further than Wales." 
Summarize: 
The Welsh Conservatives have proposed elected health commissioners which they claim would make the NHS more accountable.
But Carwyn Jones said the criticism was based on historic issues going back years which were being addressed.
Previous calls for inquiries have come from the British Medical Association and Labour MP Ann Clwyd.
Plaid Cymru has urged a radical shake-up of the Welsh NHS while the Welsh Liberal Democrats have called for an all-party commission to examine its future.
Speaking in Bridgend at his monthly news conference, Mr Jones said: "To suggest that the NHS in Wales is somehow in every way in a more
Cancer researchers in Europe analysed blood from 265 men with the disease.
They found those with multiple copies of a particular gene did not respond to abiraterone and enzalutamide - drugs commonly used to treat advanced cases.
More trials are needed but the team hope the test could prevent thousands of men undergoing unnecessary treatment and allow more personalised care.
The drugs abiraterone and enzalutamide are given to men whose cancer is no longer responding to traditional hormone therapy and has started to spread.
Costing less than Â£50, the test is a quick and relatively cheap way of preventing men from undergoing the side effects of therapy that will fail.
Lead researcher Dr Gerhardt Attard, from the Centre for Evolution and Cancer at the Institute of Cancer Research in London, said: "Abiraterone and enzalutamide are excellent treatments for advanced prostate cancer and some men can take these drugs for years without seeing a return of their cancer.
"But in other men, these drugs do not work well and the disease rapidly returns. Currently, there is no approved test to help doctors choose whether these are the best treatments for an individual.
"We have developed a robust test that can be used in the clinic to pick out which men with advanced prostate cancer are likely to respond to abiraterone and enzalutamide, and which men might need alternative treatments."
For the study, published in the journal Annals of Oncology, scientists took blood samples from patients taking part in three different clinical trials.
Dr Iain Frame, director of research at Prostate Cancer UK, said the test could be a significant step towards moving away from a "one-size-fits-all" approach to treatment.
About 46,000 men are diagnosed with prostate cancer in the UK every year, one in four of them at an advanced stage. 
Summarize: 
1. Prostate cancer is the most common cancer among men in the United States.
2. Prostate cancer is the second leading cause of cancer death in American men.
3. The incidence of prostate cancer has been increasing since the 1950s.
4. The incidence of prostate cancer has been increasing since the 1950s.
5. The incidence of prostate cancer has been increasing since the 1950s.
6. The incidence of prostate cancer has been increasing since the 1950s.
7. The incidence of prostate cancer has been increasing since the 1950s.
8. The
The government approved plans for horizontal fracking in Little Plumpton, Lancashire, this month in a landmark ruling for the UK's shale gas industry.
The county council rejected Cuadrilla's fracking application but it was overruled by the communities secretary.
Preston New Road Action Group has written to the government saying the decision was unlawful.
The Department for Communities and Local Government (DCLG) said the decision followed "extensive consideration".
The group argued the decision was "fundamentally flawed in its misapplication of planning laws and policy" and urged the government to reconsider.
If it refuses, campaigners will consider bringing a statutory legal challenge through the courts.
In a statement, the group said: "The dismantling of local democracy to facilitate this industry is a travesty of justice and... troubling on a number of fronts.
"Lancashire said 'no' loudly and clearly and in line with local planning policies, that decision should stand."
Cuadrilla chief executive Francis Egan said a legal challenge was "not unexpected" but the plan was approved after "an extensive public inquiry and lengthy and detailed subsequent consideration by the planning inspector and communities secretary".
He added: "We are confident all due processes have been followed and DCLG can and will demonstrate this as necessary."
Communities Secretary Savid Javid previously said the shale gas industry would support thousands of jobs and reduce the UK's reliance on energy imports.
The DCLG said in a statement: "The decision followed extensive consideration of all the evidence, including an independent planning inspector's report and evidence submitted during a two week public inquiry."
It is not the first time fracking has been approved since a ban was lifted in 2012.
It is however the first to involve horizontal drilling, which is seen as more productive than vertical drilling.
In May, North Yorkshire County Council approved an application by Third Energy to vertically extract shale gas at a site near Kirby Misperton in Ryedale. 
Summarize: 
1. The government approved plans for horizontal fracking in Little Plumpton, Lancashire, this month in a landmark ruling for the UK's shale gas industry.
2. The county council rejected Cuadrilla's fracking application but it was overruled by the communities secretary.
3. Preston New Road Action Group has written to the government saying the decision was unlawful.
4. The Department for Communities and Local Government (DCLG) said the decision followed "extensive consideration".
5. The group argued the decision was "fundamentally flawed in its misapplication of planning laws and policy" and urged the government to
Butler began his career with Portsmouth and made 48 appearances before moving to Torquay in July 2015.
The 21-year-old started all but one of Torquay's league games last season but turned down an offer of a new deal.
"I'm happy to have signed and I'm looking forward to the future and the start of pre-season," he said.
Butler continued, "I've had a taste of League football with Portsmouth and last season I had to drop down to the Conference.
"I've benefited from that and played a lot of games and I'm ready to get back into League Two and hopefully play well for Newport." 
Summarize: 
Butler made his debut for Newport County on the opening day of the 2017-18 season, in a 1-0 defeat to Hartlepool United.
He scored his first goal for Newport in a 2-2 draw with Chesterfield.
The waiter in Sherbrooke was arrested after the diner was rushed to hospital and spent two days in a coma.
A police spokesman said they were recommending the charge because of the seriousness of the incident.
Prosecutors are expected to make a decision within the next few weeks.
According to the official complaint, Simon-Pierre Canuel informed the waiter about his allergies to seafood when he arrived at the tapas bar Le Tapageur in Sherbrooke in May.
He placed an order for beef tartare and again reminded the waiter of his allergies. Police say the waiter did not write down the order.
The dish that arrived was salmon tartare, Sherbrooke Police Constable Martin Carrier said, but because of low lighting in the bar, Mr Canuel did not notice it until he had taken a bite.
Within minutes he was taken ill and lost consciousness, PC Carrier said.
"When you don't do something that is supposed to be your duty, and you show recklessness for the life or security of someone, that's a crime," he was quoted by the Globe and Mail as saying.
Mr Canuel told the newspaper: "The server [waiter] had almost killed me. I know it [was] an error, but that error had almost taken my life."
He filed a formal complaint with police on 21 July and the waiter, a 22-year-old man, was later arrested. He was released but told he would appear in court if charges were brought.
Mr Canuel says he is also considering civil action.
Le Tapageur restaurant declined to comment when contacted by the BBC. 
Summarize: 
A waiter in Sherbrooke, Quebec was arrested after a diner was rushed to hospital and spent two days in a coma.
The waiter was arrested after the diner was rushed to hospital and spent two days in a coma.
The waiter was arrested after the diner was rushed to hospital and spent two days in a coma.
A waiter in Sherbrooke, Quebec was arrested after a diner was rushed to hospital and spent two days in a coma.
A waiter in Sherbrooke, Quebec was arrested after a diner was rushed to hospital and spent two days in a coma.
A waiter in Sherbrooke, Quebec
Officers were called to the motorway near the Second Severn Crossing at about 14:10 GMT on Monday.
All eleven have been held on suspicion of immigration offences and checks are being carried out to establish their immigration status.
The driver of the vehicle has been arrested by Avon and Somerset Police. 
Summarize: 
On Sunday, a man was arrested in Bristol on suspicion of terrorism offences.
He was arrested on suspicion of preparing acts of terrorism and is currently in custody.
On Monday, a man was arrested in Bristol on suspicion of terrorism offences.
He was arrested on suspicion of preparing acts of terrorism and is currently in custody.
On Tuesday, a man was arrested in Bristol on suspicion of terrorism offences.
He was arrested on suspicion of preparing acts of terrorism and is currently in custody.
On Wednesday, a man was arrested in Bristol on suspicion of terrorism offences.
He was arrested on suspicion of preparing acts
An inquest into the death of seven-year-old Zane Gbangbola, who died in February 2014 at his home in Chertsey, is due to take place in June.
His parents have been refused legal aid on the grounds the hearing is not in "the public interest".
Green Party leader Natalie Bennett said David Cameron should assist the family.
She said Kye Gbangbola and Nicole Lawler should be treated "fairly and justly".
Tests have suggested carbon monoxide poisoning was the cause of Zane's death, but his parents believe he was killed by floodwater contaminated by cyanide gas leaked from a former landfill site.
Ms Bennett said: "I am in awe of the family's determination to find out what happened that night and I'll do all that I can to support them."
She urged Mr Cameron "to make the necessary moves" to ensure they were given legal aid.
"That is within his gift, he is able to do it, just like in 2014 when he intervened to guarantee legal aid for a family whose two children were tragically killed by fumes whilst sleeping in their hotel room in Corfu," she said.
Mr Gbangbola, who was left paralysed by the same incident that killed his son, said without legal aid he and his partner would have to represent themselves.
A Ministry of Justice spokesman said: "Inquests are aimed at helping families find out the circumstances behind the death of their loved one.
"They are specifically designed so people without legal knowledge can easily participate and understand what is happening... legal aid remains available to help families prepare for an inquest and pay for representation, subject to means and merits tests." 
Summarize: 
In February 2014, Zane Gbangbola, 7, died after inhaling carbon monoxide poisoning while sleeping in his parents' home in Chertsey, Surrey.
The inquest was due to take place in June 2014, but the hearing was delayed until November 2014.
The family's lawyers had applied for legal aid, but the Ministry of Justice denied the request, citing the case as not in the public interest.
The family's lawyers said the family would have to represent themselves at the inquest.
The coroner ruled that the hearing would be delayed until November 2015.
The family's
The 28-year-old joined Gloucester from Cornish Pirates in 2009.
He has made 17 appearances so far this season for David Humphreys' side, who are eighth in the table.
"To sign on again was a really easy decision," Dawidiuk told the club website. "The challenge for me now is to keep working hard, pushing on and being a key part of the team." 
Summarize: 
Dawidiuk was born in the United States and has represented the USA at Under-19 and Under-20 level.
Bydd y chwe chadeirlan Gymreig - Tyddewi, Bangor, Llandaf, Llanelwy, Aberhonddu a Chasnewydd - yn cynnal gwasanaethau er mwyn dathlu'r garreg filltir.
Yn 1997 cafodd 60 o fenywod eu hordeinio yn dilyn ymgyrch hir i sicrhau cydraddoldeb o fewn yr eglwys.
Cyn diwedd mis Ionawr bydd yr eglwys yn cymryd cam arall i'r un cyfeiriad pan fydd y fenyw gyntaf i gael ei phenodi yn esgob, y Canon Joanna Penberthy, yn cael ei chysegru yn esgob Tyddewi ar 21 Ionawr.
Roedd y Canon Enid Morgan ymhlith y gwragedd cyntaf i gael eu hordeinio yn 1997.
Dywedodd: "Ugain mlynedd yn ddiweddarach mae gennym bob rheswm dros ddathlu ac edrych ymlaen.
"Mae cenhedlaeth gyfan wedi tyfu lan yn gweld menywod fel offeiriaid a'u gweinidogaeth fel bod yn normal, a gallwn ddechrau cymryd rhai pethau'n ganiataol."
Ychwanegodd: "Yn wir, pan welwch luniau neu ffilm o grwpiau o glerigwyr heb unrhyw fenywod yn bresennol, mae'n edrych yn rhyfedd a hyd yn oed braidd yn hurt. Creiriau o'r oes o'r blaen." 
Summarize:  "The church is in a good condition, but it needs a lot of work.
The church is in a good condition, but it needs a lot of work.
The church is in a good condition, but it needs a lot of work.
The church is in a good condition, but it needs a lot of work.
The church is in a good condition, but it needs a lot of work.
The church is in a good condition, but it needs a lot of work.
The church is in a good condition, but it needs a lot of work.
The church is in a good condition,
The hospital is cancelling about 15 planned operations a day to deal with the problem.
Bosses have apologised to patients affected and appealed for staff to work overtime.
"Derriford Hospital is extremely busy, operating on red alert," Plymouth Hospitals NHS Trust said.
Read more on this story as it develops throughout the day on Devon's Local Live pages
"We have opened 41 escalation beds - every extra bed in every extra space we have.
"However, these beds are not planned for and therefore we did not have rostered staff to care for patients in these beds."
'Extremely difficult'
It admitted that as an acute care hospital, it was "extremely difficult" to deal with the increased demand from people who are living longer but suffering more illness and disability.
"This is a national phenomenon but felt particularly in the south-west due to the age profile of our population," the trust continued.
"We cannot turn away patients who are medical emergencies but the demand for beds means we are having to cancel around 15 planned operations and procedures per day.
"Our staff are working extremely hard, often giving over and above beyond what we would expect."
The NHS uses a national internal alert system based on the colours green, amber, red and black to rank how busy a local health and social care system is.
The Royal Cornwall Hospital in Treliske and the Royal Devon and Exeter Hospital are also both on red alert. 
Summarize: 
The hospital is cancelling about 15 planned operations a day to deal with the problem.
Bosses have apologised to patients affected and appealed for staff to work overtime.
"Derriford Hospital is extremely busy, operating on red alert," Plymouth Hospitals NHS Trust said.
Read more on this story as it develops throughout the day on Devon's Local Live pages
The Treasury bailed out the bank by buying a 72% stake for £45bn, at 502p a share, at the height of the financial crisis in 2008.
Shares in the loss-making lender are now trading at less than half that price at 223p.
Philip Hammond told MPs on Tuesday: "We have to live in the real world."
He added: "Our policy remains to return the bank to private hands as soon as we can achieve fair value for the shares, recognising that fair value could well be below what the previous government paid for them.
"We have to live in the real world and make decisions on the future of our holding in RBS in the best interests of taxpayers."
Simon Jack: Why is RBS still losing money?
Mr Hammond has previously said the government did not expect to offload its stake in RBS until after 2020.
He added: "We are making real progress in realising our holdings in the banking sector.
"We continue the programme sale of our shareholding in Lloyds, which is now down from 43% to less than 2%, and just last month we sold £12bn worth of Bradford & Bingley mortgages in a highly competitive process."
It is understood that the Treasury will only start to sell its shares in RBS when "legacy" issues have been resolved.
Those issues include a potentially huge fine by the US Department of Justice, which is pursuing the bank over the sale of mortgage-backed securities before the financial crisis.
In February, RBS posted its ninth consecutive annual loss, with much of the £7bn accounted for by setting aside £5.9bn for fines and legal costs.
The bank has racked up losses of more than £50bn since the government bailout.
Chief executive Ross McEwan said in Feburary he expected RBS to return to profit by the end of 2018.
When one-off charges were stripped out, the core business of the bank was making money, he added.
The European Commission is examining government proposals that aim to spare RBS from being forced to sell off the Williams & Glyn branch network. 
Summarize: 
RBS is the second largest bank in the United Kingdom, and the largest in Scotland.
It was formed in the wake of the financial crisis of 2007–08, when the UK government nationalised the bank.
The bank was renamed Royal Bank of Scotland plc.
The bank was renamed RBS in 2013.
The bank is a major provider of financial services in the UK, and is the second largest bank in the UK.
It is also the largest bank in Scotland.
The bank is a major provider of financial services in the UK, and is the second largest bank in the UK.
It is also
The 38-year-old woman was found dead with a serious head injury at Gainslea Court in Derby Road on Friday evening.
Police have named the woman as Hayley Dean but formal identification is yet to take place.
James D'Arcy, 50, from Bournemouth, has been charged with murder and is due before the town's magistrates on Monday.
A post-mortem examination on Saturday found that Ms Dean died as a result of "blunt force trauma" to her head.
A cordon remains in place at the flat while crime scene investigators continue to examine the scene.
Det Insp Neil Phillips, of Dorset Police's major crime investigation team, said: "Family liaison officers have updated Hayley's family with this development and our thoughts are with them at this difficult time.
He added: "I would like to hear from anyone who heard anything suspicious in or around Gainslea Court between 14:00 on Thursday 15 September and 18:30 BST on Friday 16 September.
"I am particularly keen to speak with any members of the public who saw or spoke with Hayley Dean or James D'Arcy between these times." 
Summarize: 
Hayley Dean, 38, was found dead with a serious head injury at Gainslea Court in Derby Road on Friday evening.
Police have named the woman as Hayley Dean but formal identification is yet to take place.
James D'Arcy, 50, from Bournemouth, has been charged with murder and is due before the town's magistrates on Monday.
A post-mortem examination on Saturday found that Ms Dean died as a result of "blunt force trauma" to her head.
A cordon remains in place at the flat while crime scene investigators continue to examine the scene.
Det
Police found the man after responding to a call for help from St Georges Avenue, near to St Georges Park, in Hulme at about 22:50 GMT on Monday.
He died in hospital on Tuesday. A post-mortem examination is due to take place to establish the cause of his death.
Det Insp Geoff Machent said the death is being treated as suspicious and asked anyone with information about what had happened to get in touch. 
Summarize: 
A man in his 20s was found dead in a park in Hulme on Monday night.
He was pronounced dead at the scene.
Police were called to St Georges Avenue, near St Georges Park, at about 22:50 GMT on Monday.
The man was found dead in the park.
A post-mortem examination is due to take place to establish the cause of his death.
Det Insp Geoff Machent said the death is being treated as suspicious and asked anyone with information about what had happened to get in touch.
The death of the man in Hulme has been linked to
The 24-year-old's deal with the Spanish champions expires in June 2018 and the club are in talks to extend it.
Paris St-Germain, one of several clubs linked with Neymar, are reportedly ready to double his salary, but Barcelona are confident of keeping him.
"We have not studied the impact of hypothetically losing Neymar. We don't contemplate it," Monje said.
Neymar scored 31 goals in 49 appearances for his club last season as the club won La Liga and Copa del Ray, as well as reaching the quarter-finals of the Champions League.
Barcelona were forced to pay a £4.3m fine in June because of mistakes in Neymar's transfer from Santos in 2013. 
Summarize: 
The Brazilian forward is one of the best players in the world and he is one of the most expensive players in the world. He is a very good player and he is very good at dribbling. He is very good at scoring goals and he is very good at passing the ball. He is very good at dribbling and he is very good at scoring goals. He is very good at dribbling and he is very good at scoring goals. He is very good at dribbling and he is very good at scoring goals. He is very good at dribbling and he is very good at scoring goals. He is very good at drib
David Clarke, who had learning difficulties, was beaten to death in his flat at Forthriver Road in the north of the city on 6 June 2001.
At the time, police said it was one of the most savage and brutal killings they had ever dealt with.
The arrested man, who is 34, was bailed pending further inquiries.
He had been detained in north Belfast on Monday morning.
The day before, police announced that they had re-opened the murder investigation after detectives received new information.
They also revealed that the victim had been bullied in the weeks leading up to his murder.
Mr Clarke's body was found in his flat by friends who were concerned for him.
Former Assistant Chief Constable Allan McQuillan was involved in the original 2001 inquiry.
He said Mr Clarke's killing was not Troubles-related and was "quite simply that he had some issue with someone and they murdered him".
Mr McQuillan described the 26-year-old's death as a "mystery" and was "one of the cases you really wanted to solve and we weren't able to do it".
Det Ch Insp Alan Dickson described Mr Clarke as an "inoffensive and vulnerable" man who died after an "increasingly frenzied" assault. 
Summarize: 
The murder of Mr Clarke was one of the most brutal and savage killings in the history of the Police Service of Northern Ireland.
The murder of Mr Clarke was one of the most brutal and savage killings in the history of the Police Service of Northern Ireland.
The murder of Mr Clarke was one of the most brutal and savage killings in the history of the Police Service of Northern Ireland.
The murder of Mr Clarke was one of the most brutal and savage killings in the history of the Police Service of Northern Ireland.
The murder of Mr Clarke was one of the most brutal and savage killings in the history of
Investigators allege private firms paid corrupt officials in order to get lucrative Petrobras contracts.
Among the 54 people accused of taking bribes are a former president and the speakers of both chambers of Congress.
Most politicians under investigation belong to the governing coalition.
But President Dilma Rousseff has been completely cleared of any involvement in the scheme.
She chaired the board of Petrobras for seven years when much of the corruption is believed to have taken place.
Brazil's Attorney General Rodrigo Janot has accused many senior politicians of taking bribes.
The list includes Senate President Renan Calheiros, President of the Chamber of Deputies Eduardo Cunha, former Energy Minister Edison Lobao and former President Fernando Collor de Mello.
The BBC's Daniel Gallas in Sao Paulo says that these investigations are likely to put even more pressure on Ms Rousseff's government, at a time when she needs the support of Congress to implement austerity measures.
Under Brazilian law, politicians and cabinet members can only be tried by the Supreme Court.
Last month, the treasurer of the ruling Workers Party (PT), Joao Vaccari Neto, was questioned over the alleged scheme and then released.
This followed an accusation by a former Petrobras executive that Mr Neto had diverted money from the company into the coffers of the party and its allies.
This has been strongly denied by the party.
The scandal has meant Petrobras, one of the largest oil businesses in the world, has lost much of its market value since September.
Analysts say because Petrobras has not yet been able to say exactly how much money it has lost to corruption, no-one knows for sure how much its assets are really worth.
In December, prosecutors charged executives from six of the country's largest construction firms for allegedly channelling kickbacks into a Petrobras scheme to pay politicians. 
Summarize:  Petrobras, the Brazilian state-run oil company, has been accused of paying bribes to politicians in order to secure contracts.
The scandal has led to the resignation of President Dilma Rousseff and the suspension of the company's chief executive.
It has also led to investigations into the country's largest construction firms.
The scandal is the biggest corruption scandal in Brazil's history.
With 300,000 bricks required to complete the project, the 200,000th piece was added by South Korean student Chang Soo Lee.
In honour of the occasion, he was awarded a commemorative medal.
The project was launched in July 2013, with people invited to donate Â£1 for each brick
Chang Soo Lee, who was visiting the cathedral with fellow classmates as part of a international collaborative venture organised by Northumbria University, said he was really surprised to discover his brick was so significant.
"I think the Lego cathedral is awesome," he said.
"It's great to be involved in such a great project, and I can't wait to see the finished model."
All donations will go towards Open Treasure, a project to improve public access to some of the collections the cathedral has acquired over the centuries.
Durham Cathedral's head of development, Gaye Kirby, said: "With only 100,000 bricks left to build, we invite everyone to help us complete the model and celebrate the opening of the cathedral's new exhibition spaces later this year."
The competed model will be 12ft 6in (3.84m) long, 5ft (1.53m) wide and 5ft 6in (1.7m) high. 
Summarize: 
The Lego model of Durham Cathedral is a replica of the original building, which was built in the 12th century. The model is made of over 200,000 Lego bricks. The bricks are made from a special plastic which is not affected by water or sunlight. The model was built by a team of students from Northumbria University. The students were given a set of Lego bricks and asked to build the model of the cathedral. The students were given a set of Lego bricks and asked to build the model of the cathedral. The model was built by a team of students from Northumbria University. The students were given a set
The Battle of Messines Ridge in Belgium was the first occasion that soldiers from the 36th Ulster Division and 16th Irish Division were in battle together.
Both had fought at the Battle of the Somme but at different stages.
The ceremony will take place in Messines on 7 June.
The Northern Ireland Office said the ceremony would take place at the Island of Ireland Peace Park.
The battle was a notable victory for the Allies and involved the deployment of 19 huge mines which exploded beneath the ridge, killing as many as 10,000 soldiers.
Secretary of State James Brokenshire said: "We have seen all too well how history can divide, but our ambitious goal throughout this decade of centenaries is to seek to use history to bring us together, and to build on the political progress that has been made throughout these islands.
"This shared ceremony is an opportunity to remember the service and sacrifice of those who fought at Messines Ridge, as well as to further strengthen the important relationships that exists between the United Kingdom and Ireland."
Irish Foreign Minister Charlie Flanagan said: "Those from the island of Ireland were brought together by diverse motivations but they shared a common purpose as soldiers and, caught up in the grim realities of war, no doubt a common desire: to survive and return home."
The event will be ticketed. Those interested in attending should visit the UK government website or the website for the Department of Foreign Affairs in the Republic.
More than 200,000 Irishmen fought on behalf of Britain in World War One, including both unionists who wanted Ireland to remain a part of Britain and nationalists who wanted to protect Home Rule, in which Britain had agreed to devolve some parliamentary powers to Dublin. 
Summarize: 
The Battle of Messines Ridge in Belgium was the first occasion that soldiers from the 36th Ulster Division and 16th Irish Division were in battle together.
Both had fought at the Battle of the Somme but at different stages.
The ceremony will take place in Messines on 7 June.
The Northern Ireland Office said the ceremony would take place at the Island of Ireland Peace Park.
The battle was a notable victory for the Allies and involved the deployment of 19 huge mines which exploded beneath the ridge, killing as many as 10,000 soldiers.
Secretary of State James Brokenshire said: "We have seen all
The Independent Police Complains Commission (IPCC) said it would examine the use of force by Kent Police officers who arrested Denby Collins.
Mr Collins, 38, was held as a suspected burglar by police called to a house in Gillingham on 15 December.
The IPCC said he was unresponsive and was taken to Medway Maritime Hospital.
He was being restrained by at least one resident of the house when officers arrived.
Mr Collins' parents instructed lawyers earlier this year because they were unhappy with the information they received from police about what happened to their son.
"Our investigation will examine the use of force, including handcuffs, by the officers who attended the scene, the intelligence and information provided to the two initial attending officers and whether the arrest of Mr Collins was justifiable," said IPCC commissioner Mary Cunneen.
"We will also look at the first aid provided by the officers prior to the arrival of the ambulance service."
The family fear police failed to investigate adequately what happened between when they last spoke to their son at 20:00 GMT on 14 December and the early hours of the next day, when he was arrested.
The IPCC said complaints about the alleged failures of police to investigate the injuries Mr Collins had sustained, the information they provided after the arrest and their actions after he was taken to hospital were being investigated by Kent Police themselves.
Mr Collins was transferred to the Royal Hospital for neuro-disability in Putney last month, where he remains in a hypoxic coma.
His parents have said he has little chance of recovery. 
Summarize: 
1. The IPCC will investigate the use of force by Kent Police officers who arrested Denby Collins.
2. The IPCC will also investigate the first aid provided by the officers who attended the scene, the intelligence and information provided to the two initial attending officers and whether the arrest of Mr Collins was justifiable.
3. The IPCC will also look at the first aid provided by the officers who attended the scene, the intelligence and information provided to the two initial attending officers and whether the arrest of Mr Collins was justifiable.
4. The IPCC will also look at the first aid provided by the officers who attended the scene,
Lord Rank's birthplace, in Holderness Road, Hull, was taken on by a social housing company which converted the property into apartments.
Many of the Victorian home's original features were preserved during the work, carried out by local apprentices.
The reopening was marked by the sounding of a giant golden gong, as seen at the start of every Rank film.
A campaign to save the house was started by BBC Radio Humberside presenter David Burns, who received an email from a listener complaining about the rundown state of the property.
It was opened by Lord Rank's grandson Joey Newton, who praised the community campaign to restore it.
"I really hope it will be a living memory to my grandfather," he said.
Rank was born into a family of Methodist flour millers in 1888.
He moved into film production as a way of promoting the Christian message.
The Rank Organisation grew to dominate British film production in the 1940s and 50s, operating the Odeon cinema chain and building Pinewood Studios.
He became Lord Rank in 1957 and set up a charitable foundation before his death in 1973. 
Summarize: 
Rank's films were often based on the Bible, and he was a strong supporter of the Christian faith.
He was a member of the Church of England, and his films were often promoted by the Church.
He was a close friend of the Archbishop of Canterbury, Geoffrey Fisher, and was a member of the Church's General Synod.
He was also a member of the National Council of the Boy Scouts Association.
He was a member of the National Association of Evangelicals, and was a member of the National Council of the Evangelical Alliance.
He was also a member of the National Council of the YM
The call came as she launched her party's "programme for opposition", at Treorchy in the south Wales valleys.
Ms Wood said she would ensure the Welsh government delivered for the whole of Wales, not just the M4 corridor.
She said help should be given first to places most likely to lose EU funding in the wake of Brexit.
The Plaid leader said the priority areas were the south Wales valleys, and rural and west Wales.
"Regional Development Agencies will have sole focus on areas that have continued to be neglected by successive governments on both ends of the M4," said Ms Wood.
"We know that with the uncertainties arising from the decision to leave the EU, the Welsh Government now needs to look at alternative ways of improving the economies of areas in Wales that have been left behind by successive UK and Welsh Governments.
"We propose that this work is started in the areas that are set to lose out the most from the changes to the structural funds that will occur as a result of the decision leave the EU.
"In places like the Rhondda, almost 9% of people are unemployed and more than a quarter of people are economically inactive.
"That's why we need specific targeted and focused measures if we are to improve prosperity levels."
Ms Wood said Plaid had "agreed in principle" several policies with Labour, including extra free childcare and a national development bank.
She said funding for the policies would be set during negotiations over the assembly budget.
Welsh Conservative leader Andrew RT Davies dismissed the announcement as "richly steeped in irony", in light of the deal between Plaid Cymru and Labour to re-instate Carwyn Jones as first minister.
"Leanne Wood lost the moral right to call herself an opposition leader when she signed up to put Labour back in office in May," he said.
A Welsh Government spokesman said the administration was "open, confident and willing to work with others for the good of the country".
"We will shortly publish our programme for government, which will set out how we aim to deliver our commitments to the people of Wales," the spokesperson added. 
Summarize: 
The Welsh Government's programme for government will set out how it intends to deliver its commitments to the people of Wales.
The Welsh Government will set out how it intends to deliver its commitments to the people of Wales.
The Welsh Government will set out how it intends to deliver its commitments to the people of Wales.
The Welsh Government will set out how it intends to deliver its commitments to the people of Wales.
The Welsh Government will set out how it intends to deliver its commitments to the people of Wales.
The Welsh Government will set out how it intends to deliver its commitments to the people of
Jordan Baldwinson gave the visitors the lead before Weller Hauraki kicked off a comfortable first half for Salford.
Junior Sa'u, Daniel Vidot, Josh Jones, Niall Evalds, Ben Murdoch-Masila and Logan Tompkins went over, while Jack Ormondroyd scored for the visitors.
Josh Walters scored the visitors' third but Olsi Krasniqi and Michael Dobson capped Salford's victory.
Gareth O'Brien kicked nine goals for Salford, who moved above London Broncos - beaten 58-18 by Hull KR on Sunday - into fifth place in the Qualifiers table, while Featherstone are yet to win.
Salford: Evalds, Vidot, Jones, Sa'u, J Griffin, O'Brien, Dobson, Burgess, Tomkins, G Griffin, Murdoch-Masila, Hauraki, Flanagan.
Replacements: Lui, Kopczak, Walne, Krasniqi.
Featherstone: Craven, Duckworth, Hardman, Taulapapa, Briscoe, Briggs, Thackery, Griffin, Ellis, Baldwinson, Walters, Ormondroyd, Davies.
Replacements: Day, Cooper, Snitch, Foster.
Attendance: 1,759.
Referee: Chris Campbell. 
Summarize:  Featherstone Rovers were beaten at home by Salford.
Gareth O'Brien kicked nine goals for Salford, who moved above London Broncos - beaten 58-18 by Hull KR on Sunday - into fifth place in the Qualifiers table, while Featherstone are yet to win.
Salford: Evalds, Vidot, Jones, Sa'u, J Griffin, O'Brien, Dobson, Burgess, Tomkins, G Griffin, Murdoch-Masila, Hauraki, Flanagan.
Replacements: Lui, Kopczak, Walne, Krasniqi.
DNA tests were carried out on the remains - found close to The Mall, Cribbs Causeway - after a post-mortem examination proved inconclusive.
Avon and Somerset Police said they were not treating his death as suspicious.
The 73-year-old went missing in July, sparking a high-profile campaign to find him.
Decomposed remains were found in undergrowth by a member of the public on 10 March.
DJ Derek, a former accountant, was known to thousands of music fans and played hundreds of sets at local clubs and pubs, as well as at the Glastonbury festival.
He was a resident of St Pauls in Bristol since 1978 and appeared at gigs across the UK, including the Big Chill.
He also worked with Massive Attack and appeared in a Dizzee Rascal video. 
Summarize:  DJ Derek, a former accountant, was known to thousands of music fans and played hundreds of sets at local clubs and pubs, as well as at the Glastonbury festival.
He was a resident of St Pauls in Bristol since 1978 and appeared at gigs across the UK, including the Big Chill.
He also worked with Massive Attack and appeared in a Dizzee Rascal video.
Derek was found dead in a wooded area near The Mall, Cribbs Causeway, Bristol, on 10 March 2010.
A post-mortem examination was carried out on the remains but the cause of death was incon
The Prado said it did not realise its significance until a recent restoration revealed hidden layers.
The artwork features the same female figure, but had been covered over with black paint and varnish.
The painting is thought to have been created by one of Leonardo's students alongside the 16th century original.
There are dozens of surviving Mona Lisa replicas from the 16th and 17th centuries - when, as a new US exhibition illustrates, copying famous artworks was a thriving business.
The Art Newspaper, which reported the discovery, said the "sensational find will transform our understanding of the world's most famous picture".
The original painting, which currently hangs at the Louvre in Paris, is obscured by several layers of old, cracked varnish.
However, cleaning and restoration is thought to be too risky because the painting is fragile.
The Art Newspaper said the removal of the black paint on the replica had revealed "the fine details of the delicate Tuscan landscape", which mirrors the background of Leonardo's masterpiece.
Martin Bailey, who reported on the discovery for the paper, told the BBC: "You see Lisa's eyes, which are quite enticing, and her enigmatic smile. It actually makes her look much younger."
In fact, the new painting has led experts to speculate that the woman who sat for the Renaissance Masterpiece was in her early 20s - much younger than the Louvre's original appears to show.
As the replica remained hidden for so long under the overpaint, experts had believed it was painted long after Leonardo's death.
But after using x-rays to analyse the original drawings underneath, conservators have concluded the work was carried out at the same time as Leonardo's original.
The museum presented its findings at a conference on Leonardo da Vinci at London's National Gallery.
There is still some restoration to complete on the painting but, once it is finished, it will be exhibited at the Louvre in March, allowing visitors to compare the two works. 
Summarize:  The Mona Lisa is a portrait of Lisa Gherardini, the wife of Francesco del Giocondo, a wealthy silk merchant. It is believed to have been painted by Leonardo da Vinci around 1503.
The painting is one of the most famous in the world and is the most visited attraction in the Louvre.
The painting is a portrait of Lisa Gherardini, the wife of Francesco del Giocondo, a wealthy silk merchant.
It is believed to have been painted by Leonardo da Vinci around 1503.
The painting is one of the most famous in the world and is the
Five Daughters looked at the family relationships and lifestyles of the five victims of Steve Wright, who was convicted of their murders in 2008.
The three-part programme won the Drama Serial award.
Philippa Lowthorpe, director, said: "We would like to dedicate this award to the women who lost their lives."
The judges gave this verdict on Five Daughters:
"This sensitive, skilfully acted dramatisation of an appalling true story made for ground-breaking television.
"By concentrating on the victims of this terrible crime, the drama succeeded in giving the five women back some dignity and humanity.
"Powerful and important, this is TV drama at its very best."
Writer Stephen Butchard was also nominated in the Writer-Drama category which was won by Jack Thorne and Shane Meadows for This Is England '86.
Gemma Adams, Tania Nicol, Anneli Alderton, Annette Nicholls and Paula Clennell had been working as prostitutes in the Ipswich area when they were murdered.
The writers, actors and producers spent a year researching the story with some of the victims' relatives, Suffolk police and the Ipswich drugs rehabilitation charity the Iceni Project.
Liz Harsant, the leader of Ipswich Borough Council and a trustee of the Somebody's Daughter Memorial Fund, said: "We met the actors and producers and all of them were touched by the stories the parents had told them.
"I can't say how pleased I am that they've won the award.
"It's not something you want to relive every day of your life, but I think people had to know about it."
Ms Lowthorpe added: "Our hope is that the drama continues to spark a debate about drug addiction and girls on the street, and for drug charities, like Iceni, to be supported to continue to do the tremendous work they do." 
Summarize: 
A drama about the murder of five young women in Ipswich, Suffolk, in 2008.
The five women were murdered by Steve Wright, who was convicted of their murders in 2008.
The programme was written by Stephen Butchard and directed by Philippa Lowthorpe.
The drama was nominated for a BAFTA award for best drama serial.
A house was raided in the northern suburb of Greenvale on Friday.
Five men were detained last month, also in Melbourne, for allegedly planning an attack on an Anzac Day ceremony.
Last September saw the country's biggest counter-terrorism operation, with  15 people arrested.
The arrested youth has not been named, but is due to appear in court on Monday.
The charges include "preparation for a terrorist act" and possessing "things connected with a terrorist act".
Police detonated three devices found during Friday's raid in Greenvale.
Heavily armed officers made the raid after a tip-off to a security hotline.
"There is evidence of a bomb plot that was in a reasonably advanced state of preparation," said Prime Minister Tony Abbott on Saturday.
Police said they were unable to confirm what the target for the alleged attack was.
"But let me tell you, something was going to happen," Australian Federal Police (AFP) Deputy Commissioner Mike Phelan told a press conference in Melbourne.
"As a result of Victoria police and AFP interception yesterday, some Victorians are going to be alive," he added.
Last month, the authorities in Melbourne said they had uncovered a plot to behead a police officer.
Two teenagers were charged with conspiring to plan a terrorist attack 
Summarize: 
1. The police raided a house in Greenvale, Melbourne, and arrested 5 men.
2. The men were allegedly planning an attack on an Anzac Day ceremony.
3. Last September saw the country's biggest counter-terrorism operation, with 15 people arrested.
4. The arrested youth has not been named, but is due to appear in court on Monday.
5. The charges include "preparation for a terrorist act" and possessing "things connected with a terrorist act".
6. Police detonated three devices found during Friday's raid in Greenvale.
7. Heavily armed officers made
Around 200 people, including David Cameron's aunt, had gathered outside County Hall to protest Oxfordshire County Council budget for 2016-17.
Elderly day centres and children's centres had been in line for £2m cuts under the plans.
Members voted in favour of an amended budget.
The decision came after a private meeting between the Conservative, Labour and Liberal Democrat groups.
Councillors voted 60 in favour and two against the new budget.
Political reporter Bethan Philips said: "In the previous budget they said they had £11m still to find, but now they are saying they have £15m to find.
"They may have just kicked the decision down the road."
Updates on this story and more from Oxfordshire
At the protest before the meeting Clare Currie, the prime minister's aunt, called the services, including children's centres, "really vital for people's wellbeing".
She said she had written to the prime minister about her opposition to the cuts.
She added: "I think if they're cut an awful lot of families and old people and homeless… their lives will be diminished.
"[David Cameron] is against the children's centres cutting... it's central government who are cutting the money and I think they're making a great error."
The county council has said it has been forced to find £361m in savings between 2010 and 2020.
Members of the Unite union employed in early intervention at the council are currently staging a 24-hour strike in protest at the plans.
Dave Ricketts, who works at the Abingdon early intervention hub, said: "It's going to be pretty depressing for people to go out there every day committed to working with our families and young people, and feeling that energy to do a good job knowing the cloud of redundancy is hanging over them, so it's pretty dire." 
Summarize: 
The council has been forced to find £361m in savings between 2010 and 2020.
The Conservative, Labour and Liberal Democrat groups have agreed to a budget of £15m.
The council has said it has been forced to find £361m in savings between 2010 and 2020.
Members of the Unite union employed in early intervention at the council are currently staging a 24-hour strike in protest at the plans.
Dave Ricketts, who works at the Abingdon early intervention hub, said: "It's going to be pretty depressing for people to go out there every day committed to working with
Prosecution lawyers have been delivering their closing submissions to the jury at Londonderry Crown Court in the trial of Eamon Bradley.
The 28-year-old Muslim convert, originally from Melmore Gardens in Creggan, denies six charges.
They include attending a rebel training camp in Syria and receiving training in guns and grenades.
Mr Bradley is alleged to have committed the offences between 31 March and 29 October 2014.
A prosecution barrister said the defendant told the truth about the events in question during police interviews.
"There's no evidence that he's a fantasist or that he makes things up," he added.
Mr Bradley was arrested and interviewed by police on his return to Derry in November 2014.
However,  Mr Bradley's defence told the jury of eight women and four men that there was not a single shred of evidence to show that Bradley was in Syria.
He described the case as a "threadbare piece of nonsense" which was "not worth wasting the public purse on".
Referring to a photograph of Eamon Bradley, which was shown to the jury during the trial, a defence barrister said that he was not Derry's answer to Lawrence of Arabia, but just "a guy on holiday, sitting on a donkey".
He added that the period since Mr Bradley's arrest in 2014 had been a very "worrying time" and "a nightmare" for the defendant and his family.
The jury is expected to be sent out to deliberate verdicts on Wednesday. 
Summarize:  The prosecution case is that Eamon Bradley was a member of the Irish Republican Army (IRA) and was involved in the murder of a British soldier, Pte James Dunsby, in Londonderry in March 2009.
The prosecution case is that Eamon Bradley was a member of the Irish Republican Army (IRA) and was involved in the murder of a British soldier, Pte James Dunsby, in Londonderry in March 2009.
The prosecution case is that Eamon Bradley was a member of the Irish Republican Army (IRA) and was involved in the murder of a British soldier, P
Pascal Mazurier, who was a consular official in the southern city of Bangalore, was arrested in June after complaints from his Indian wife.
The court has ordered Mr Mazurier to surrender his passport and pay 100,000 rupees ($1,895; £1,175) for his bail.
The envoy has made no comment on the charges yet.
Mr Mazurier was held in the crowded Parapanna Agrahara jail, on the outskirts of Bangalore, which houses more than 4,000 convicts and under trials.
His wife Suja Jones Mazurier, who accused him of sexually abusing their daughter, has appealed to the French ambassador in India and the Indian government to not allow her husband to leave the country until all legal proceedings are complete.
She has also asked the French embassy for financial support for herself and her three children, who are French citizens. 
Summarize: 
The French consul in Bangalore, Pascal Mazurier, was arrested in June after complaints from his Indian wife.
The court has ordered Mr Mazurier to surrender his passport and pay 100,000 rupees ($1,895; £1,175) for his bail.
The envoy has made no comment on the charges yet.
Mr Mazurier was held in the crowded Parapanna Agrahara jail, on the outskirts of Bangalore, which houses more than 4,000 convicts and under trials.
His wife Suja Jones Mazurier, who accused him of sexually abusing their daughter, has
Rob Frazer, from St Albans, Hertfordshire, agreed they could have a kitten, however, when it came back with a live baby bird, he had a dilemma.
"The cat I didn't particularly want brought a baby bird home with it, so now we are looking after that too."
Mr Frazer is hoping he will be able to release the bird when it is stronger.
Kitten Theodore joined the family eight weeks ago. This was the first time he had brought home any "prey", Mr Frazer said.
"He just turned up at the door with this chick in his mouth and all the kids started shouting, but we managed to get it out of its mouth fast and looked up what kind of bird it was - a house martin."
At first they considered putting it back in the garden, but were afraid the cat would find it.
"I decided to nurse it back to health as the kids would have asked incessant questions about what would happen to the bird all alone in the garden without its mummy and daddy, so it was actually the only option.
"And they are really enjoying seeing it get bigger and starting to flap its wings," Mr Frazer said.
The bird, now named Flappy, is being fed worms and is given water through a small syringe from a children's medicine bottle.
"It should be able to survive from what I have researched," he said. 
Summarize:  A cat brought home a baby bird, and the family decided to raise it as their own.
Theodore is a character in the children's novel "The Borrowers", by Mary Norton. He is a small, furry creature who lives in the walls of the home of the Borrowers, who are tiny people who live in the walls of the home of the Borrowers.
Theodore is a character in the children's novel "The Borrowers", by Mary Norton. He is a small, furry creature who lives in the walls of the home of the Borrowers, who are tiny people who
Authorities in Ferguson have called a state of emergency because of the protests, which means normal rules are temporarily changed, so that the police can get control of the situation.
It comes a year after an 18-year-old called Michael Brown was shot dead by a white police officer.
The officer was not punished and that sparked major protests across America by people who said it showed black people's lives mattered less than those of white people.
Since then, a number of other unarmed black men have also been killed by police, and lots of people have claimed that black people are treated badly by the police.
The anniversary demonstration began peacefully. Crowds held a four-and-a-half-minute silence at the spot where Michael Brown died.
But the demonstrations became violent, and another black teenager was injured when guns were fired in a battle with police.
Violent protests took place in Ferguson, Missouri, and in other parts of America.
The riots started after it was announced a white police officer would not be charged for shooting dead a black teenager, called Michael Brown, back in August.
Shops were robbed, cars and buildings were set on fire, and bottles and stones were thrown.
US President Barack Obama called for the protests to stay peaceful.
He was echoing the views of Michael Brown's parents who also appealed for clam despite saying they were "profoundly disappointed" by the jury's decision.
They added: "Let's not just make noise, let's make a difference."
Many people in Ferguson, in the US state of Missouri, were angry because they feel black Americans are treated badly by the police.
Protests also took place in other parts of America, including in New York.
Click here for advice if you're upset by anything you see or hear in the news. 
Summarize:  The anniversary of the death of Michael Brown, a black teenager, who was shot dead by a white police officer, has sparked violent protests across America.
The protests started after it was announced a white police officer would not be charged for shooting dead a black teenager, called Michael Brown, back in August.
Shops were robbed, cars and buildings were set on fire, and bottles and stones were thrown.
US President Barack Obama called for the protests to stay peaceful.
He was echoing the views of Michael Brown's parents who also appealed for calm despite saying they were "profoundly disappointed" by the jury's decision.
The stadium and training facilities would be built at Kingsford, close to the Aberdeen bypass, near Westhill.
Although the planning application is a matter for Aberdeen City Council, Aberdeenshire is a statutory consultee.
A report to councillors next week says there are a number of issues which have not been fully addressed.
However, it says the stadium development could bring significant benefits to the area.
The ground would have a capacity of 20,000. The club believes the new stadium is vital if it is to achieve a sustainable future.
There has been some local protest to the plans. 
Summarize: 
The club has been in a financial crisis for the last few years.
The club is currently in administration and is expected to go into liquidation.
The club has been unable to pay its players and staff.
The club has been unable to pay its players and staff.
The club has been unable to pay its players and staff.
The club has been unable to pay its players and staff.
The club has been unable to pay its players and staff.
The club has been unable to pay its players and staff.
The club has been unable to pay its players and staff.
The club has been unable
Gomez scored 28 goals in 41 games for the Istanbul club, while on loan from Serie A side Fiorentina, and won the Turkish league title.
On Friday, an attempted army coup took place in Turkey with 161 civilians and police killed.
"There are no sporting or any other reasons that have made me make this decision," Gomez, 31, said on Facebook.
Gomez had agreed a season-long loan last year, which included an option to make the deal permanent.
But the former Bayern Munich player has decided to leave following the unrest in the country.
"It was a difficult decision that I had to think about a lot," he said. "I have to tell you Besiktas fans personally that it is very heavy for me that I will not be playing for this great club in front of you wonderful fans in this unique stadium anymore.
"It is purely down to the terrible events that happened in the last few days. I hope you can understand that.
"A huge thanks to the club, to you fans and to all the people with whom my family and I had a lot of wonderful times.
"It was a fantastic year with the championship providing the absolute highlight. I hope that these political problems can be solved in a peaceful manner soon."
Gomez represented Germany at Euro 2016, scoring twice as they went out at the semi-final stage to hosts France.
Media playback is not supported on this device 
Summarize:  Gomez, 31, has been a big hit at Besiktas since joining from Bayern Munich in 2015, scoring 28 goals in 41 games.
He has been a key player for the Turkish side, who are currently top of the Super Lig.
He has also won the Turkish league title with Besiktas.
He has been a key player for the Turkish side, who are currently top of the Super Lig.
He has also won the Turkish league title with Besiktas.
He has been a key player for the Turkish side, who are currently top of the Super Lig.
He has
Ten authors were chosen from hundreds of entries to compete for a publishing deal and a Â£5,000 cash prize.
The competition is now in its 12th year and the winner will be announced at a gala dinner in October.
Last year's competition was won by Swedish author Martin Cathcart Froden's 'Devil Take the Hindmost'.
Peggy Hughes, manager of Literary Dundee, said, "The Dundee International Book Prize is a vital part of our work, and a key way in which we celebrate and champion new voices.
"This year's shortlist is a stellar mix of international talent and genres, and we're deeply excited to see which one will win."
Will Dawson, convener of Dundee City Council's city development committee, said: "Each year the quantity and quality of entrants for the book prize goes from strength to strength.
"I never envy the judges the difficult task they have of choosing just one winner from such a strong field, but every time they manage to select a deserving book to take the title."
The full 2016 shortlist is:
Not to be Reproduced by Kristina Gorcheva-Newberry (US)
The Margins by Jessica Thummel (US)
In Borderlands by Richard Strachan (Scotland)
London Clay by Amy Spencer (England)
Reading Through Binoculars by James Cole (England)
Shadow Jumping by Margaret Ries (Scotland)
The Life of De'Ath by Majella Cullinane (New Zealand)
The Shadow of Pure Light by Emile Cassen (England)
Ghost of a Writer by Helen Dann (England)
The Great Edge by George Gunn (Scotland) 
Summarize:  A Novel by Martin Cathcart Froden (Sweden)
Devil Take the Hindmost by Martin Cathcart Froden (Sweden)
The Last of the Red Hot Lovers by Amy Spencer (England)
The Last of the Red Hot Lovers by Amy Spencer (England)
The Last of the Red Hot Lovers by Amy Spencer (England)
The Last of the Red Hot Lovers by Amy Spencer (England)
The Last of the Red Hot Lovers by Amy Spencer (England)
The Last of the Red Hot Lovers by Amy Spencer (England)
The Last of the Red Hot Lovers
On Tuesday evening a window was smashed when a piece of concrete was thrown at their house.
Police are treating the attack as a hate crime.
The family have been living in Moneymore for two years and say they have been the targets of 13 separate incidents of harassment.
The Polish couple, who do not speak much English, have five children aged from 12 years to five months.
Their 12-year-old daughter who has grown up in Northern Ireland spoke for the family.
"People have been damaging our car and last night someone damaged our window," she said.
"We want to be moved, we are very scared for the younger children.
"The police can't really do anything because they don't know who is doing it.
"We don't want to leave Northern Ireland though, we are happy here."
SDLP councillor Christine McFlynn said the attacks on the family had been happening since June.
"It is completely unacceptable that a family should be putting up with this.
"Last night a stone was thrown through the window of the house where there were two adults and two very small children.
"The family are very frightened. I totally condemn what has happened." 
Summarize: 
The family have been living in Moneymore for two years and say they have been the targets of 13 separate incidents of harassment.
The Polish couple, who do not speak much English, have five children aged from 12 years to five months.
Their 12-year-old daughter who has grown up in Northern Ireland spoke for the family.
"People have been damaging our car and last night someone damaged our window," she said.
"We want to be moved, we are very scared for the younger children.
"The police can't really do anything because they don't know who is doing it.
"We
Gabe Olaseni led the scoring for GB with 13 points, Dan Clark added 12 and Kavell Bigby-Williams 11 as they showed tenacity to stay in the game.
Greece established a double-digit lead at the end of the first quarter and then held a spirited GB team at bay.
After trailing 66-51 at the end of three quarters, GB scored 13 points in a messy final quarter in Patras.
Greece are one of the strongest teams in Europe, even without their NBA star Giannis Antetokounmpo, whose knee injury kept him out of the tournament.
The hosts scored 15 of the first 20 points in the game, but GB trailed 17-21 at the end of the first quarter as newcomers Bigby-Williams and Jules Dang Akodo combined for six consecutive points.
Greece took control of the game in the second quarter with a 16-5 run before Clark's shooting brought GB back from 26 points adrift to 51-34 down at the interval.
The deficit at the end of the third quarter was similar (66-51) but any thought of a comeback ended when Greece scored the first nine points of the fourth period and cruised to a slightly flattering victory as GB ran out of steam.
GB's next game comes on Sunday, 13 August when they play Israel in Tel-Aviv, before facing Greece again in London in a friendly at the Copper Box in London on Saturday, 19 August.
GB head coach Joe Prunty said: "I think we had our opportunities where we got the lead down to maybe 14. I thought we competed. [The young players] are coming in and proving they want to be part of it, and there's a lot of people who do, so you have to give the people who are getting their first caps a lot of credit."
GB top scorer Olaseni added: "It's just development and progression -the effort was there, we just need to execute a little better. My team-mates do a great job of getting me open, I just have to be able to finish." 
Summarize: 
The USA women's national basketball team beat the Dominican Republic women's national basketball team, 82-58, in the final game of the 2015 Pan American Games women's basketball tournament.
The USA women's national basketball team beat the Dominican Republic women's national basketball team, 82-58, in the final game of the 2015 Pan American Games women's basketball tournament.
The USA women's national basketball team beat the Dominican Republic women's national basketball team, 82-58, in the final game of the 2015 Pan American Games women's basketball tournament.
The USA women's national basketball team beat the Dominican Republic women
Govan-born union leader Mr Reid attracted international recognition for leading a "work-in" of thousands of Clyde shipbuilders in the 1970s.
The Upper Clyde Shipbuilders' (UCS) forced the government to rethink closing the yards.
Mr Corbyn will give the lecture in October in Govan Old Parish Church.
Left wing think tank The Jimmy Reid Foundation has held an annual memorial lecture since Mr Reid's death in 2010 and speakers have included Alex Salmond, Nicola Sturgeon and Len McCluskey.
Mr Corbyn will give this year's address on the topic of industrial strategy and credited Mr Reid for saving Scotland's shipbuilding industry.
He said: "Jimmy Reid was one of the most outstanding trade unionists and socialist fighters that Scotland has ever produced. He led the UCS work-in whose legacy is that we still have shipbuilding on the Clyde today."
When the lecture takes place on 6 October, the battle between Owen Smith and Mr Corbyn for the leadership of the Labour Party will have been decided. 
Summarize: 
"The Jimmy Reid Foundation is a left-wing think tank based in Glasgow, Scotland. It was founded in 2010 by Jimmy Reid's widow, Mary. The foundation's stated aim is to promote a "socialist, democratic, internationalist and anti-racist world view".
The Jimmy Reid Foundation has held an annual memorial lecture since Mr Reid's death in 2010 and speakers have included Alex Salmond, Nicola Sturgeon and Len McCluskey.
The Jimmy Reid Foundation has also hosted a number of events with the Scottish Socialist Party.
In 2015, the Jimmy Reid Foundation hosted a debate on the future of the
Derbyshire, resuming on 332-9, were bowled out for 368 as Billy Godleman (98) and Gurjit Sandhu (46 not out) took their 10th-wicket stand to 102.
Led by Michael Richardson's 121-ball 64, Durham eased to 119-1 in reply.
After slipping to 137-5, Paul Coughlin (62 not out) led the recovery, but Tahir took two wickets in two balls as Durham closed 94 behind on 274-8.
Barry McCarthy (32 not out) has so far put on 69 with Coughlin for the ninth wicket - a partnership which helped Durham avoid the follow-on. 
Summarize: 
Durham's first-innings total of 431 was built on a partnership of 124 between Paul Coughlin (62) and Barry McCarthy (32).
The second-innings collapse was led by Michael Richardson (64), who hit six sixes and four fours in his innings of 121.
Durham's total of 119 was built on a partnership of 64 between Billy Godleman (98) and Gurjit Sandhu (46 not out).
Durham's first-innings total of 431 was built on a partnership of 124 between Paul Coughlin (62) and Barry McCarthy (
The Highways Agency has proposed new flyovers and underpasses at the Markeaton, Little Eaton and Kingsway roundabouts along the A38.
Consultation on the plans ended on Friday with more than 1,000 people attending sessions since February.
Assistant project manager, Kenny Guihen, said they had received more views than normally expected.
"It was very successful. Way more than what you normally expect with these things," he said.
"There is a lot to go through, but there is a recognition for the need of something to be done."
He said the next stage was now to go through the responses and work on a design for the scheme.
"Everything they said in the consultation will be considered in the future designs and proposals because nothing has been decided on yet," said Mr Guihen.
"We will take the comments on board and give people the scheme they want."
Similar plans for the A38 were originally suggested in the 1970s, but flyovers were rejected because of their visual impact on nearby park land.
The Highways Agency said the £4m roadworks carried out at the Little Eaton roundabout last year were "an interim solution" to keep traffic flowing through Derby until the proposed scheme was in place. 
Summarize: 
The Highways Agency has proposed new flyovers and underpasses at the Markeaton, Little Eaton and Kingsway roundabouts along the A38.
Consultation on the plans ended on Friday with more than 1,000 people attending sessions since February.
Assistant project manager, Kenny Guihen, said they had received more views than normally expected.
"It was very successful. Way more than what you normally expect with these things," he said.
"There is a lot to go through, but there is a recognition for the need of something to be done."
He said the next stage was now to
The 23-year-old, capped once by South Africa, joined Boro after leaving Peterborough United last summer.
Ntlhe made 24 appearances for Darren Sarll's side as they just missed out on the fourth-tier play-offs last term.
The announcement of his departure comes after Stevenage confirmed the signing of former Millwall left-back Joe Martin on Tuesday. 
Summarize: 
Ntlhe was born in Johannesburg, South Africa. He started his career at Peterborough United, making his first-team debut in a League Cup tie against Leeds United in August 2010.
He joined Stevenage on a free transfer in June 2012, and made his debut in a 2–1 defeat at home to Swindon Town on the opening day of the 2012–13 season. He scored his first goal for the club in a 2–2 draw at home to Shrewsbury Town on 13 August 2012.
On 18 January 2013, Ntlhe signed for League One side Barnsley
Brooks Newmark told the BBC: "I have no-one to blame but myself. I have hurt those I care about most."
The MP for Braintree in Essex is reported to have sent an explicit image of himself to an undercover reporter from the Sunday Mirror.
In a resignation statement, he asked for his privacy to be respected.
In his comments to BBC political correspondent Chris Mason, Mr Newmark added: "I am so, so sorry. But I just need time with my family".
The Sunday Mirror said its reporter had been posing as a young female activist.
Mr Newmark's announcement on Saturday came on the eve of the Conservative party conference and hours after fellow Tory MP Mark Reckless said he was quitting the party to join UKIP.
In his resignation statement, the 56-year-old said: "I have decided to resign as minister for civil society having been notified of a story to be published in a Sunday newspaper.
"I would like to appeal for the privacy of my family to be respected at this time.
"I remain a loyal supporter of this government as its long-term economic plan continues to deliver for the British people."
Mr Newmark, who has been the MP for Braintree since 2005 and became minister for civil society in July, is married and has five children.
Rob Wilson, Conservative MP for Reading East, has been appointed as Mr Newmark's replacement at the Cabinet Office.
Speaking on Sky News, Defence Secretary Michael Fallon said Mr Newmark had "done the right thing" in resigning from ministerial office.
Asked whether he thought Mr Newmark had been entrapped, Mr Fallon said he was unable to comment as he "hadn't seen the details".
Another MP, Nadine Dorries, told Sky his resignation was only a "distraction" to the start of the Conservative Party conference.
She said Mr Newmark had been "stupid... he's let himself down and his family down, but I don't think it's that big a deal". 
Summarize: 
The Sunday Mirror said its reporter had been posing as a young female activist.
Mr Newmark's announcement on Saturday came on the eve of the Conservative party conference and hours after fellow Tory MP Mark Reckless said he was quitting the party to join UKIP.
In his resignation statement, the 56-year-old said: "I have decided to resign as minister for civil society having been notified of a story to be published in a Sunday newspaper.
"I would like to appeal for the privacy of my family to be respected at this time.
"I remain a loyal supporter of this government as its long-term economic
He was suspended from office in December pending a probe into his alleged ties with the former governor of the rich mining province of Ancash.
Ex-governor Cesar Alvarez is in jail while on trial for alleged corruption.
Mr Ramos is accused of covering up for Mr Alvarez while he was head of an auditing department.
Mr Ramos said the allegations were part of "a plot and conspiracy against me". He has five days to appeal against the decision.
A commission which oversees the judiciary voted five to one to fire Mr Ramos.
It said it had found links between Mr Ramos and Mr Alvarez, who is on trial for allegedly granting public work contracts in exchange for bribes.
Investigators said Mr Ramos had arranged to have prosecutors investigating Mr Alvarez fired.
Pablo Sanchez, who has been acting as interim attorney general since Mr Ramos was suspended, is expected to take over the post.
The sacking of the attorney general comes just six weeks after the prime minister was forced to step down over allegations that the country's intelligence services had spied on politicians, journalists and businesspeople.
Analysts say the scandals have hurt President Ollanta Humala, whose approval rating has plummeted to 24%, according to a poll conducted last month. 
Summarize: 
The president of Peru has sacked the country's attorney general, who was accused of covering up for a former governor facing corruption charges.
Ollanta Humala said he had taken the decision to fire Carlos Ramos because he had failed to act against the former governor of the rich mining province of Ancash, Cesar Alvarez.
Mr Alvarez is in jail while on trial for alleged corruption.
Mr Ramos is accused of covering up for Mr Alvarez while he was head of an auditing department.
Mr Ramos said the allegations were part of "a plot and conspiracy against me". He has five days to appeal against the decision.
"Vera" joined the only other airworthy Lancaster, operated by the RAF, for a series of events and is now flying home via Iceland and Greenland.
Taking off from RAF Coningsby in Lincolnshire, the two bombers were joined by Spitfires and Hurricanes.
Vera still has a UK engine after one of its own developed a fault and an appeal has been launched to fund repairs.
The aircraft passed over RAF Cranwell, RAF Waddington, Lincoln Cathedral and RAF Scampton, before leaving the area.
It is estimated each of the Lancasters has flown about 6,000 miles attending dozens of shows and events.
These included a flypast of the Derwent dams where the Dambusters practised. 
Summarize:  The Lancaster was a four-engined heavy bomber developed by Handley Page. It was the mainstay of the RAF's bomber force during the Second World War.
The Lancaster was the most produced bomber of the war, with over 7,000 built.
The Lancaster was the first bomber to be equipped with a fully retractable undercarriage.
The Lancaster was the first bomber to be equipped with a fully retractable undercarriage.
The Lancaster was the first bomber to be equipped with a fully retractable undercarriage.
The Lancaster was the first bomber to be equipped with a fully retract
Ethan Brady-Rainey, from Trefor, near Llangollen, Denbighshire, was looking for conkers with friends when they found the swing on the banks of the River Dee in September 2015.
The Ruthin inquest gave the cause of death as a head injury sustained due to a fall from height.
A verdict of accidental death was recorded.
One of Ethan's friends told the inquest that he first of all thought he was playing a prank.
"We had been collecting conkers for about three or four minutes when we heard a scream," he said in a statement read to the court.
"He was lying face-down in the water. All his body was in the water and he was floating face-down,"
Two boys dragged his body out of the river and they tried to resuscitate him, but he was already "pale and blue".
A post mortem examination found Ethan suffered a severe head injury and a fractured skull, consistent with hitting a hard object such as a rock.
His brain was bruised and he would have died instantly, knowing "nothing at all", the inquest heard.
Coroner John Gittins said Ethan "was doing something with his mates that he loved doing... having a bit of fun and doing things boys do".
Mr Gittins added he was "incredibly impressed" by the actions of his friends.
"They showed huge bravery," the coroner said, adding there was nothing they could have done to save him. 
Summarize: 
Ethan Brady-Rainey, from Trefor, near Llangollen, Denbighshire, was looking for conkers with friends when they found the swing on the banks of the River Dee in September 2015.
The Ruthin inquest gave the cause of death as a head injury sustained due to a fall from height.
A verdict of accidental death was recorded.
One of Ethan's friends told the inquest that he first of all thought he was playing a prank.
"We had been collecting conkers for about three or four minutes when we heard a scream," he said in a statement read to the court.
Josh Charnley, Oliver Gildart and John Bateman scored two tries each for the record 19-times Challenge Cup winners.
George Williams, Dan Sarginson, Ryan Sutton and Lewis Tierney also crossed, with Charnley adding seven conversions for a 22-point individual haul.
The Rams' only points came from a first-half try by stand-off Paul Sykes.
A year on from going out at the same sixth-round stage 16-12 at home to Hull KR, Wigan made sure there were no such mistakes this time.
Against a Dewsbury side currently ninth in the Championship, they were back a lot nearer full strength with the return of skipper Sean O'Loughlin, Dom Crosby and winger Dom Manfredi, although returning full-back Sam Tomkins was still at least a week away from being considered for selection.
Dewsbury coach Glenn Morrison: "They showed respect by putting out probably their strongest side this year and were just too good in the first half.
"We got some line breaks and came close to scoring a couple of times and we have some things to work on next week."
Wigan coach Shaun Wane: "This is not the easiest place to come. I'm happy with that score.
"We protected a lot of players in the second half with Friday's game against Hull in mind.
"We went a bit sloppy in the last quarter and could have been a bit smarter."
Dewsbury: Guzdek; Kudangirana, Crookes, Grady, Grant; Sykes, Kain; L Adamson, Speakman, Teanby, Hale, Trout, Farrell.
Replacements: Conroy, Brown, Muranka, Walker.
Wigan: Sarginson; Manfredi, Gelling, Gildart, Charnley; Williams, Smith; Crosby, Powell, Mossop, Bateman, Isa, O'Loughlin.
Replacements: Tautai, Sutton, Tierney, Burke.
Referee: Chris Campbell 
Summarize: 
Dewsbury: Guzdek; Kudangirana, Crookes, Grady, Grant; Sykes, Kain; L Adamson, Speakman, Teanby, Hale, Trout, Farrell.
Replacements: Conroy, Brown, Muranka, Walker.
Wigan: Sarginson; Manfredi, Gelling, Gildart, Charnley; Williams, Smith; Crosby, Powell, Mossop, Bateman, Isa, O'Loughlin.
Replacements: Tautai, Sutton, Tierney, Burke.
Referee
The tower was opened in 1965 by then Prime Minister Harold Wilson and the restaurant opened the following year.
The tower was closed to the public in 1971, with the restaurant shutting in 1980.
BT will hold a ballot for members of the public to eat at the restaurant while overlooking London's skyline.
Gavin Patterson, BT Group chief executive, said: "I'm delighted we're able to re-open the restaurant to the public.
"The BT Tower was a unique feat of engineering when it was first built and it remains an important and much-loved building today." 
Summarize: 
The BT Tower was the first building in the world to have a public viewing gallery.
The restaurant was opened in 1965 by then Prime Minister Harold Wilson and the restaurant opened the following year.
The tower was closed to the public in 1971, with the restaurant shutting in 1980.
BT will hold a ballot for members of the public to eat at the restaurant while overlooking London's skyline.
Gavin Patterson, BT Group chief executive, said: "I'm delighted we're able to re-open the restaurant to the public.
"The BT Tower was a unique feat of engineering when it was first built and it remains an
Candidates standing in South Yorkshire Constabulary are listed below.
Candidates are listed alphabetically by surname. BBC News App users: tap here to see the candidates.
More information is available on the Choose my PCC website. 
Summarize: 
The following candidates have been selected by the local Labour Party to stand in the election.
Candidates standing in Sheffield City Council are listed below.
Candidates are listed alphabetically by surname. BBC News App users: tap here to see the candidates.
More information is available on the Choose my PCC website.
Summarize:
The following candidates have been selected by the local Labour Party to stand in the election.
Candidates standing in Sheffield City Council are listed below.
Candidates are listed alphabetically by surname. BBC News App users: tap here to see the candidates.
The 31-year-old was a free agent after leaving Shrewsbury this summer, having scored 16 goals in 95 outings during two years with Town.
Akpa Akpro began his career at Toulouse and has had spells at Grimsby, Rochdale, Tranmere Rovers and Bury since moving to England in 2008.
The Bees have not disclosed the length of the Frenchman's deal at The Hive.
Find all the latest football transfers on our dedicated page. 
Summarize: 
"We are delighted to welcome Akpa Akpro to the club," said Bees boss Paul Sturrock. "He is a player with a lot of experience and has played in the Championship before. He is a player who will bring a lot of quality to the squad and I am sure he will be a big asset to us."
"I am delighted to be joining the club," said Akpa Akpro. "I have heard a lot about the club and I am looking forward to playing in the Championship. I have played in the Championship before and I know what it is like. I am looking forward to playing in
Last year a total of 36 people died from fires in the capital compared with 47 fatalities five years ago.
The fire brigade said the improvement was largely down to better fire education among the public.
There were 20,770 fires in London last year down 25% on 2011/12, but eight more deaths from deliberate fires.
Deaths from deliberate fires stand at 11 so far this year compared with three in 2014/15.
London Fire Commissioner Ron Dobson said: "The downward trend in fires and fire deaths is a testament to the incredible hard work of our fire fighters in carrying out almost 87,000 home fire safety visits last year."
Mr Dobson cautioned against complacency and said: "Far too many old and vulnerable people are dying unnecessarily in avoidable fires either because they have mobility issues and may struggle to raise the alarm or their home lacks appropriate fire detection."
In nearly half of fire deaths in the capital there was a delay in calling 999. He said this made fire safety systems such as automatic sprinklers, a monitoring alarm system called Telecare and flame retardant bedding extremely important.
50%
of victims were aged over 70
66%
of those who died lived alone
33% of victims had mental health issues or were in receipt of care
13 of fatal fires were caused by smoking
As part of the additional savings from last year's budget the London Fire and Emergency Planning Authority approved a one-off Â£1m investment to install those fire safety systems in the homes of London's most vulnerable, to help reduce the number of fires and fire deaths.
Five year trend figures show that accidental fire deaths in the home are down 36% and accidental house fires are down 15% compared to 2011/12 figures.
Deaths from deliberate fires including suicide attempts have increased and although the brigade works with partner agencies to help prevent these, deaths from deliberate fires are much harder for the fire brigade to influence. 
Summarize: 
The London Fire Brigade is a fire brigade in the United Kingdom. It is the largest fire service in the United Kingdom, and is responsible for the fire and rescue service in Greater London.
The brigade was formed by the Metropolitan Fire Brigade Act 1866, and was originally known as the Metropolitan Fire Brigade. The brigade is based at Fire Headquarters in Southwark, London.
The brigade is the second largest in the United Kingdom, after the Scottish Fire and Rescue Service, and is the fourth largest in Europe.
The London Fire Brigade is a highly visible public organisation, and has a large presence on television, in the
City were accused of playing midfielder Keira Walsh in their Continental Cup match against Sunderland on 15 August.
The club were cleared  - but it has now been revealed the FA could not find and failed to process the paperwork.
However, the FA had earlier emailed the club to confirm it had received the documents.
In a statement on the FA website, the FA WSL management committee said: "Having considered all the evidence and on the basis of written and oral submissions, the FA Women's Super League Management Committee was not able to satisfy itself that the registration form had not been received in the offices of the Football Association.
"It was significant in the opinion of the management committee, that whilst the registration form could not be located and had not been processed, that written confirmation from The FA, in the form of email, had been received by Manchester City Women FC."
City's Continental Cup quarter-final at Arsenal Ladies on 13 September had to be postponed because of the proceedings.
The fixture is set to be played on Thursday evening. 
Summarize: 
The FA WSL Management Committee has decided that Manchester City FC will be fined £5,000 for failing to submit the required registration form.
The club has been charged with failing to submit the registration form on time and the FA has also decided to take disciplinary action against the club for failing to provide the required documentation.
The club has been given a deadline of 15 October to submit the registration form.
The club has been charged with failing to submit the registration form on time and the FA has also decided to take disciplinary action against the club for failing to provide the required documentation.
The club has been given a deadline of
It was the 33-year-old's 16th consecutive win in the tournament, although the Serb gave her a stiff test in this latest encounter in Singapore.
Ivanovic, 26, fought back in the opening set from 4-1 to level at 4-4, before Williams broke again.
The world number one broke once more at 5-4 in the second to seal victory.
"I'm really excited with how I played. I couldn't be happier to be playing here in Singapore. I was fighting really hard," said Williams.
The end-of-season competition features the top eight ranked players in the world. Two sets of four players face each other in round-robin matches, before the top two in each group advance to the semi-finals.
Both Williams and Ivanovic are in the Red group alongside Simona Halep, who defeated Wimbledon finalist Eugenie Bouchard 6-2 6-3.
The first matches in the White group take place on Tuesday, with world number two Maria Sharapova up against Caroline Wozniacki and Wimbledon champion Petra Kvitova taking on Agnieszka Radwanska. 
Summarize: 
The first match of the day was between Petra Kvitova and Agnieszka Radwanska. The match started off with Radwanska breaking Kvitova in the first game. The Czech player broke back in the second game, but Kvitova broke back in the third game. Radwanska broke again in the fourth game, but Kvitova broke back in the fifth game. Radwanska broke again in the sixth game, but Kvitova broke back in the seventh game. Radwanska broke again in the eighth game, but Kvit
The collision happened shortly before 18:45 BST on Saturday in London Road.
Kent Police said a car - believed to be a black Vauxhall Astra - hit the man but failed to stop. It was later found abandoned in Grange Road.
The man suffered serious injuries and was taken to a London Hospital where he remains in a "critical but stable" condition.
Police have appealed for witnesses. 
Summarize: 
A man was hit by a car in London Road, Maidstone, Kent, at about 18:45 BST on Saturday. The car failed to stop and was later found abandoned in Grange Road. The man suffered serious injuries and was taken to a London Hospital where he remains in a "critical but stable" condition.
The driver of the car was described as a black man, aged in his 30s, with a medium build. He was wearing a black hooded top with the hood up and a black baseball cap.
The car was described as a black Vauxhall Astra, with a black bon
In the coveted 18-49 age group, it was the top rated show across all US TV programming on Sunday, according to initial Nielsen data.
The third series finale in March was watched by 12.4 million viewers.
The AMC show follows deputy sheriff Rick Grimes as he tries to survive zombies in a post-apocalyptic world.
The Walking Dead started in 2010 with an initial six episode run and was inspired by the comic book series by Robert Kirkman, Tony Moore and Charlie Adlard.
Andrew Lincoln stars in the lead role as Grimes, while fellow British actor David Morrissey joined the cast in season three as villain Philip 'The Governor' Blake.
AMC recently announced it was developing a spin-off show of the zombie drama following a different set of characters created by Kirkman.
The "companion" series is expected to air in 2015. 
Summarize:  The Walking Dead is a TV series based on the comic book of the same name. It is a horror/drama series that follows a group of survivors in a post-apocalyptic world.
The Walking Dead is a TV series based on the comic book of the same name. It is a horror/drama series that follows a group of survivors in a post-apocalyptic world.
The Walking Dead is a TV series based on the comic book of the same name. It is a horror/drama series that follows a group of survivors in a post-apocalyptic world.
The Walking Dead is a TV series based
She was found after emergency services were called to a flat on Dixon Avenue at about 07:00 on Saturday.
Police said the woman was pronounced dead at the scene and that they were following a definite line of inquiry in the case.
A post-mortem examination is due to take place to establish the exact cause of the woman's death. 
Summarize: 
"The woman, believed to be in her 20s, was found in a flat in Dixon Avenue, near to the junction with St John's Road, at about 07:00 on Saturday.
She was pronounced dead at the scene and police are following a definite line of inquiry in the case.
A post-mortem examination is due to take place to establish the exact cause of death."
The woman was found in a flat on Dixon Avenue, near to the junction with St John's Road, at about 07:00 on Saturday.
She was pronounced dead at the scene and police are following a definite line of
What started as a pilot in 2013 has grown into a database "without any public debate or oversight", said the American Civil Liberties Union.
It amounted to "runaway surveillance", director of technology Nicole Ozer tweeted.
The FBI said it was developing "best practices" for iris image capture.
The project was launched in September 2013 and has seen the FBI collaborate with agencies in Texas, Missouri and California.
The iris data, taken from people who have been arrested, can be scanned in a fraction of a second.
Privacy International told the BBC: "It is deeply concerning that hundreds of thousands of people's iris scans are being added to a biometric database without public debate, proper safeguards, or even awareness that such data has been taken and is being stored.
"If our biometric data is to be collected at all, such systems should not be introduced or continued before a public debate, strong legal frameworks, and strict safeguards are in place."
The scan takes a detailed image of the ridges in the coloured part of the eye, which are as detailed and distinctive as a fingerprint.
An average of 189 iris scans were collected every day in California at the start of 2016, according to documents obtained by The Verge.
The programme was started to "evaluate technology, address key challenges and develop a system capable of performing iris image recognition services", according to the FBI's website.
Such technology is necessary in order to easily track criminals and quickly catch repeat offenders and suspects who try to hide their identities, the FBI argued.
The project falls under its $1bn (Â£750m) next-generation identification system that aims to expand the bureau's old fingerprinting database to other identifiers such as facial recognition and palm prints. 
Summarize: 
The FBI has been collecting iris scans from people arrested in the US without any public debate or oversight.
The FBI says it is developing "best practices" for iris image capture.
Privacy International told the BBC: "It is deeply concerning that hundreds of thousands of people's iris scans are being added to a biometric database without public debate, proper safeguards, or even awareness that such data has been taken and is being stored."
The FBI said it was developing "best practices" for iris image capture.
The project was launched in September 2013 and has seen the FBI collaborate with agencies in Texas, Missouri and
An SPFL commission found the club guilty of offences relating to a lack of crowd control.
The governing body has, however, delayed punishment for 18 months.
Within that time, the Fir Park club must provide evidence of how they plan to address the charges against them.
Fans invaded the pitch in the aftermath of Motherwell's 3-1 second-leg win over Rangers at Fir Park, which sealed a 6-1 aggregate win and secured the Steelmen's Premiership status.
The repercussions of that misconduct from the home fans are being felt long after the event.
The commission found the Fir Park club guilty of ticketing failures, which led to problems segregating the two sets of supporters, and inadequate stewarding as Motherwell fans invaded the pitch at full time.
A failure to take action to identify those fans and one who threw a flare has led to a further charge. It will be 18 months before any punishment is handed out. 
Summarize: 
The club was fined £20,000 and ordered to pay £7,000 costs.
The club was also warned as to its future conduct.
The club was also warned as to its future conduct.
The club was also warned as to its future conduct.
The club was also warned as to its future conduct.
The club was also warned as to its future conduct.
The club was also warned as to its future conduct.
The club was also warned as to its future conduct.
The club was also warned as to its future conduct.
The club was also warned as to its future conduct.
The 36-year-old man was driving a Honda Jazz on Constitution Street at about 12:30 when it collided with a lamp post. No other vehicle was involved.
The man, who has not been named, was freed from the wreckage before being taken to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary.
Officers investigating the crash have made an appeal for any witnesses to contact them.
Sgt Rob Warnock said: "Inquiries into the circumstances of the incident are at an early stage and I am appealing to anyone who witnessed the incident, or saw the blue Honda Jazz prior to the collision to contact Police Scotland on 101.'' 
Summarize:  The man was driving a Honda Jazz and it collided with a lamp post. No other vehicle was involved. The man was freed from the wreckage before being taken to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary.
The man was driving a Honda Jazz and it collided with a lamp post. No other vehicle was involved. The man was freed from the wreckage before being taken to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary.
The man was driving a Honda Jazz and it collided with a lamp post. No other vehicle was involved. The man was freed from the wreckage before being taken to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary.
The man was driving a Honda Jazz and
"Bup stop" was painted in large yellow lettering after a worn road surface was repaired.
The mistake was made as part of work expected to last up to four weeks in the Old Market area of the city centre.
The howler prompted mocking tweets, with Mark Gullick saying: "Thanks. I've been waiting at a bus stop. That will be why my bup hasn't turned up. Gah!"
A Bristol City Council spokesman said: "It is not often we see our roadworks hitting the headlines worldwide, but we understand why this rare mistake has captured people's imaginations.
"While it became something of a temporary tourist attraction, the contractor has now corrected the error at no cost to the local taxpayer." 
Summarize: 
Bup stop is a bus stop in Bristol, England. It is located at the junction of Stokes Croft and Park Street, in the city centre.
The bus stop is painted in large yellow lettering, and is one of the most prominent bus stops in Bristol.
The word "Bup" is a Bristolian slang term for a bus. The word is also used as a verb, meaning to catch a bus.
The name of the bus stop is a pun on the word "bup", meaning "to stop".
The bus stop is located at the junction of Stokes Croft
Barnes made his first-team debut as a substitute in the Foxes' 5-0 Champions League defeat by Porto in November.
The 19-year-old also made four appearances for Leicester's Under-21 team in the EFL Trophy this season.
"He carries the ball really well from a central-midfield position and he's really hungry and energetic," Dons boss Robbie Neilson said.
Find all the latest football transfers on our dedicated page or visit our Premier League tracker here. 
Summarize: 
Barnes was born in Leicester and began his career with the club's youth academy.
He was promoted to the first team in the summer of 2013, and made his debut in a League Cup tie against Northampton Town.
Barnes made his Premier League debut as a substitute in a 2-0 win over West Ham United on 20 November 2013.
Barnes was loaned to League One side Barnsley on 31 January 2014, for the remainder of the 2013–14 season.
Barnes was recalled by Leicester City on 31 January 2014, having made only two appearances for Barnsley.
They have an illuminated sign that lights up to alert anyone travelling towards a lorry when it is turning left and a speaker announcing the manoeuvre.
After a trial on eight trucks, the city council has rolled out the 'Cyclear' technology, to a further 17 vehicles.
It is set to be installed in all future Large Goods Vehicles council vehicles.
Sensors on the side of the vehicle also detect when a cyclist travels alongside it, alerting the cyclist with an audible message, and sounding a warning buzzer to the driver.
Five cameras are installed on the new vehicles with screens in the cab giving drivers optimum views of their surroundings.
Lesley Hinds, Edinburgh city council's transport and environment convener, unveiled the new fleet earlier.
She said: "Cycle safety is of utmost importance to the council. To equip our vehicles with technology that minimises risk for all road users is a step we can't afford not to take.
"The council is determined to make Edinburgh's roads as safe as possible for all road users, including cyclists. A significant rise in cycling has occurred in the city, while the rate of collisions involving cyclists continues to fall.
"Edinburgh is bucking the trend with more people cycling, walking or using public transport to get to work than anywhere else in Scotland and these newly equipped vehicles are an important step in increasing safety and raising awareness."
A driver of one of the refuse collection vehicles said: "I really like the new system, the sensors trigger an alarm so I'm made immediately aware of the cyclists when they are not in my vision." 
Summarize: 
Cycle safety is of utmost importance to the city council. To equip our vehicles with technology that minimises risk for all road users is a step we can't afford not to take.
The council is determined to make Edinburgh's roads as safe as possible for all road users, including cyclists. A significant rise in cycling has occurred in the city, while the rate of collisions involving cyclists continues to fall.
Edinburgh is bucking the trend with more people cycling, walking or using public transport to get to work than anywhere else in Scotland and these newly equipped vehicles are an important step in increasing safety and raising awareness.
Cy
Police were called to the Parkway Sports and Social Club in Plymouth on Sunday after about 15 people were reported to be fighting in a bar.
"A number of people suffered minor injuries following the brawl," police said.
Two men, aged 23 and 29, and 24-year-old woman were arrested for affray and have been bailed to 23 May.
Club managing director Chris Carwithen said the fracas started in the bar after the event.
"There was an altercation that escalated out of control," he said.
"We are holding our own investigation and anyone involved will be banned for life. We don't tolerate that kind of behaviour."
Police said the fight broke out at 19:55 BST at the club in Ernesettle Lane. They are appealing for witnesses. 
Summarize: 
A fight broke out in a bar in Plymouth on Sunday night, resulting in two men being arrested.
The fight started in the bar after the event, and escalated out of control.
The fight broke out at 19:55 BST at the club in Ernesettle Lane.
Police are appealing for witnesses.
The Plymouth Herald has an article about the brawl.
A fight broke out in a bar in Plymouth on Sunday night, resulting in two men being arrested.
The fight started in the bar after the event, and escalated out of control.
The fight broke out at 19:55 BST at the
Cerys Yemm, 22, was attacked by Matthew Williams at the Sirhowy Arms Hotel in Argoed on 6 November 2014.
Police officers stunned Williams, 34, with a Taser but he later died.
An inquest jury ruled Miss Yemm was unlawfully killed, while Williams died as a result of taking drugs and struggling against police restraint.
Cerys' sister Shannon Yemm told BBC's Victoria Derbyshire programme: "I had people messaging me. I'd already seen in a [Facebook] post there'd been a murder in Argoed.
"And then I had people messaging me via Facebook message saying 'please don't tell me it's true, it's not your sister is it?'.
"Mum was obviously crying and couldn't tell me, couldn't speak on the phone."
She then had to make the drive from Cardiff to Argoed without knowing what had happened to her sister.
Cerys' mother Paula Yemm said she first learned the death was being described a "cannibal killing" when she saw the news headlines on TV.
She said: "I woke up at four or five in the morning, walked into the living room and just saw Cerys' picture and those headlines.
"You can't describe as a parentâ€¦ seeing those headlines about your child. I still can't comprehend that today."
The hostel owner Mandy Miles had told the 999 operator at the time of the attack that she believed Williams was cannibalising Miss Yemm.
But a Home Office pathologist later told the inquest into her death there was no evidence to support that claim.
"For the last two and a half years that's been over us as a family, not knowing the circumstances, just very much in the dark about my childâ€¦ and what they went through", Mrs Yemm added.
Gwent Police said the circumstances of the death were given to Paula Yemm in a "sensitive way" after the family requested that limited information was given to them regarding her injuries. 
Summarize: 
The inquest heard that Williams had been drinking heavily at the hotel and had taken cocaine and cannabis.
He had also taken a cocktail of drugs including diazepam, temazepam, alprazolam, diazepam, temazepam, lorazepam, diazepam, temazepam, lorazepam, diazepam, temazepam, lorazepam, diazepam, temazepam, lorazepam, diazepam, temazepam, lorazepam, diazepam, temazep
The 24-year-old centre-back had surgery on cartilage damage in February, but had another operation last week.
He has not played for the Shakers since the 0-0 draw at Coventry on 16 August.
Cameron recently signed a two-year contract extension with the League One side after reaching 100 appearances for the club at the end of last season. 
Summarize: 
Cameron has been a regular for the Shakers since joining the club from non-league side Tamworth in January 2011.
He has made over 100 appearances for the club, scoring three goals.
He has also been a regular for the England under-21 side.
He has been capped by the England U21 side on four occasions.
He is a regular for the England U21 side.
He has also been capped by the England U20 side on three occasions.
He has been capped by the England U19 side on two occasions.
He has also been capped by the England U18 side on two
In 1979, former Liberal party leader Thorpe was tried and acquitted of conspiring to murder his ex-lover Norman Scott.
Newspapers at the time described it as "the trial of the century".
A Very English Scandal is based on the bestselling book by author and former journalist John Preston.
Thorpe was the first British politician to stand trial for conspiracy and incitement to murder.
In the mid-70s, stories circulated about Thorpe's relationship with a former male model, Norman Scott.
The relationship was alleged to have started in 1961, when male homosexual acts were illegal.
The story broke when Scott was appearing at a court in Barnstaple on a minor social security charge.
During the hearing, Scott shouted out, "I am being hounded because of my sexual relationship with Jeremy Thorpe."
Thorpe issued an immediate denial but when an affectionate letter between them appeared in the press, Thorpe resigned as leader.
But worse was to come when Thorpe was accused of plotting to kill Scott.
Thorpe was arrested, charged and later acquitted, but his career was in tatters.
Grant, star of films such as Four Weddings and a Funeral and Notting Hill, recently collaborated with Frears in the critically-acclaimed Florence Foster Jenkins for which he earned Golden Globe, Bafta and Screen Actors Guild nominations.
Piers Wenger, controller of BBC Drama, said: "Hugh Grant is an extraordinary actor and a worldwide star. I'm delighted that he is joining the BBC One family and I can't wait to see how he applies his unique talent bringing to life this mercurial role."
Follow us on Facebook, on Twitter @BBCNewsEnts, or on Instagram at bbcnewsents. If you have a story suggestion email entertainment.news@bbc.co.uk. 
Summarize:  Hugh Grant is starring in a new BBC drama.
The agreement to halt fighting and withdraw heavy weapons from the front line came into force on Monday, after it was brokered over the weekend.
Ukrainian forces and Russian-backed rebels have been fighting since 2014.
This latest ceasefire began as Russia defended its decision to recognise rebel-issued passports as a "humanitarian" gesture.
A peace deal for eastern Ukraine was signed in the Belarusian capital of Minsk in February 2015 but since then previously agreed ceasefires have not held for long, with both Ukrainian government forces and the rebels repeatedly accused of breaking them.
However, the newly agreed truce was said to be largely holding, despite the Ukrainian army reporting one soldier being killed and another injured in the past 24 hours.
Rebel commanders said there had been very little fighting.
The ceasefire was agreed after an upsurge in violence last month. More than 9,800 people have died since the conflict began in 2014.
Meanwhile, President Vladimir Putin's spokesman Dmitry Peskov told reporters the passports move was to help struggling rebel regions in the east, which have faced a transportation blockade imposed by Ukrainian nationalists.
He also dismissed the Ukrainian government's belief that the move violated the Minsk accord, saying: "These aren't the documents of an officially recognised state. They are de facto issued on the territory of the region."
Germany and France have both condemned the decision as "contradicting" the Minsk agreement.
Separately, Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov brushed aside a suggestion Russia could lease Crimea from Ukraine.
Kremlin-backed forces took control of Crimea in 2014, after which the mainly-Russian speaking area voted to join Russia. Neither the West nor Ukraine recognise the outcome of the referendum.
However, Russia now considers Crimea part of its territory and Mr Lavrov shrugged off the latest rumoured peace plan, reported by US newspapers.
"It is hard for me to comment on this because it is impossible to lease something from yourself. I cannot even add anything to that," Mr Lavrov said during a news conference in Moscow. 
Summarize: 
The Ukrainian government and Russia agreed to a ceasefire in the east of the country.
The ceasefire came into effect at midnight on Monday.
Ukrainian forces and Russian-backed rebels have been fighting since 2014.
This latest ceasefire began as Russia defended its decision to recognise rebel-issued passports as a "humanitarian" gesture.
A peace deal for eastern Ukraine was signed in the Belarusian capital of Minsk in February 2015 but since then previously agreed ceasefires have not held for long, with both Ukrainian government forces and the rebels repeatedly accused of breaking them.
However, the newly agreed truce was said to be largely
The maximum size of main carry-on bags will remain unchanged, but smaller second bags such as handbags will be capped at 40x30x15cm, the airline said.
It said there had been "an increase in customers travelling with hand baggage that exceeds their allowance" in recent months.
The change will come into force "in the coming weeks", the airline added.
Currently, passengers can board flights carrying one bag of up to 56x45x25cm, weighing up to 23kg, plus another bag up to 45x36x20cm.
A spokesman said the new guidelines - which apply to all customers - meant the latter changing "ever so slightly".
He said overloading of hand baggage caused delays as staff removed bags from the cabin.
Last month, a teenager from Scotland collapsed with heat exhaustion after wearing 12 layers of clothing to avoid paying a Â£45 extra baggage fee.
James McElvar vomited and was given oxygen during the Easyjet flight from Stansted to Glasgow. 
Summarize:  Easyjet is banning the use of hand luggage on short haul flights.
Easyjet has banned passengers from taking hand luggage on short-haul flights.
The airline said the new rules would come into force "in the coming weeks" and would apply to all passengers.
It said overloading of hand baggage caused delays as staff removed bags from the cabin.
Last month, a teenager from Scotland collapsed with heat exhaustion after wearing 12 layers of clothing to avoid paying a Â£45 extra baggage fee.
James McElvar vomited and was given oxygen during the Easyjet flight from Stansted to
The 680m (2,230 ft) bridge links the city centre with southern neighbourhoods across the Indian Ocean.
Tanzania's leader John Magufuli hailed it as a "liberation" for residents in the city of more than four million.
The Chinese firm which built the $140m (£98m) structure says it is East Africa's longest cable-stayed bridge.
It is also the first toll road in Tanzania. The prices have yet to be set - vehicles and motorcycles will have to pay, pedestrians and bicycle will have free passage.
Correspondents say until now commuters' only option to cross over the creek to the Kigamboni suburbs was in badly maintained ferries. - and they are often held up for hours because of breakdowns.
Motorists also take their cars on to the ferries, and some have fallen into the sea as the vessels leave as they are not always properly loaded.
The bridge links to an area earmarked in 2010 for an ambitious plan to build a satellite city, known as the Kigamboni New City development.
The government also hopes that it will boost tourism, making it easier for people to go to beaches on the other side of the city.
At a ceremony to open the bridge, Mr Magufuli described the seven-lane cable-stayed bridge as the only one of its kind in central and East Africa.
"It has never been built before. Even if you go to Uganda, Democratic Republic of Congo [and] Kenya, there is no bridge like this," he added.
He said it should be named Nyerere Bridge after Tanzania's first President Julius Nyerere, saying the idea was first mooted by him.
Mr Nyerere led Tanzania, or what was then known as Tanganyika, to independence from the UK in 1960.
He governed the country until his retirement in 1985, and died in 1999. 
Summarize:  The bridge is the first toll bridge in Tanzania, and the first bridge in East Africa, linking the city of Dar es Salaam with the Kigamboni New City development across the Indian Ocean.
The bridge is also the first cable-stayed bridge in East Africa.
The bridge is also the longest cable-stayed bridge in East Africa.
The bridge has seven lanes.
The bridge is also the first bridge in East Africa that is built with a cable-stayed design.
The bridge is also the first bridge in East Africa that is built with a cable-stayed design.
The bridge is
UN envoy Maman Sidikou said threats to the 18,000-strong peacekeeping mission there outstripped its capabilities.
Violent protests have broken out over the postponement of presidential polls.
The opposition accuses President Joseph Kabila of trying to cling to power beyond the end of his term, which is due to expire in December.
Dozens of people died in anti-government violence in the capital Kinshasa last month after the electoral commission said it could not hold polls in November.
The headquarters of three opposition parties were also attacked and burned down.
"Actors on all sides appear more and more willing to resort to violence to achieve their ends," Mr Sidikou, head of the UN peacekeeping mission known as Monusco, told the UN Security Council on Tuesday.
"While Monusco will do everything it can within its mandate to protect civilians, the scope of the threats dramatically outstrip the mission's capabilities."
He added: "The Democratic Republic of Congo has entered a period of extreme risk to its stability. The coming period will certainly be extremely difficult, the tipping point in the serious violence could be reached very quickly."
DR Congo has never had a smooth transfer of power since independence more than 55 years ago.
Mr Kabila took power in 2001 following the assassination of his father, Laurent Kabila, and the constitution bars him from running for office again.
Last month, the US imposed sanctions on two senior security officials allied to President Kabila.
It accused army Gen Gabriel Amisi Kumba and John Numbi, a former police chief, of threatening the country's stability by suppressing the opposition.
A government-backed effort to work out a solution to the political crisis, called a "national dialogue", has been boycotted by most opposition parties. 
Summarize: 
The Democratic Republic of Congo has entered a period of extreme risk to its stability. The coming period will certainly be extremely difficult, the tipping point in the serious violence could be reached very quickly.
The Democratic Republic of Congo has entered a period of extreme risk to its stability. The coming period will certainly be extremely difficult, the tipping point in the serious violence could be reached very quickly.
The Democratic Republic of Congo has entered a period of extreme risk to its stability. The coming period will certainly be extremely difficult, the tipping point in the serious violence could be reached very quickly.
The Democratic Republic of Congo has entered a period of
In an Instagram post, Mr Navalny said "sadly, I've been told I will only recover my sight in several months".
A photo he posted shows his right eye looking bloodshot, and skin damage.
Last month green antiseptic was thrown at Mr Navalny, an outspoken critic of Russian President Vladimir Putin.
He is recovering at an eye clinic in Barcelona, a city he described as "a European centre for ophthalmology".
Commenting on his vision now, he said that his right eye could only make out the largest letters on the optician's test card.
But he said he was happy to dispense with "pirate accessories" like an eye patch.
He said the liquid had contained a caustic substance that caused him to lose 85% of his sight in that eye.
He had also been attacked in March with the dye called zelyonka ("brilliant green" in English).
Presidential ambitions
He intends to challenge Mr Putin in next year's presidential elections. He campaigns against what he calls systematic government corruption, vowing to rid Russia of its powerful "thieves".
This month a Russian court upheld a five-year suspended sentence imposed on Mr Navalny.
The ruling by a court in Kirov related to his conviction for embezzlement in a timber deal. He was convicted again in February after a retrial.
He condemned the case as political, designed to prevent him standing in next year's presidential election. 
Summarize:  The Russian opposition leader, Alexei Navalny, has been attacked with a green antiseptic liquid. The substance was thrown at him by a man who was later arrested.
The substance caused him to lose 85% of his sight in one eye.
He is recovering at an eye clinic in Barcelona, a city he described as "a European centre for ophthalmology".
Commenting on his vision now, he said that his right eye could only make out the largest letters on the optician's test card.
But he said he was happy to dispense with "pirate accessories" like an eye patch.
He
Directed by Maren Ade, Toni Erdmann premiered at the Cannes Film Festival and is Germany's official candidate for next year's foreign film Oscar.
American coming-of-age story Moonlight and adult drama Elle came next in Sight & Sound's Films of the Year poll.
Last year's winner was The Assassin, by Taiwanese director Hou Hsiao-Hsien.
Toni Erdmann, which will be released in the UK on 3 February, is one of three films with female directors to make this year's top five.
The others are Certain Women, a triptych of tales from US director Kelly Reichardt, and Andrea Arnold's road movie American Honey.
Nick James, Sight & Sound's editor, expressed delight that the poll "recognises the talent of women directors at the top of the art form".
Ken Loach's I, Daniel Blake, which won the veteran British film-maker his second Palme d'Or at Cannes, came sixth in the poll.
Oscar-tipped Manchester by the Sea - named the National Board of Review's best film of 2016 earlier this week - is ranked seventh.
According to the British Film Institute (BFI), publisher of Sight & Sound, the results represent "a small triumph for diversity".
Follow us on Facebook, on Twitter @BBCNewsEnts, or on Instagram at bbcnewsents. If you have a story suggestion email entertainment.news@bbc.co.uk. 
Summarize:  The top five films of 2016 according to Sight & Sound are Moonlight, Elle, Toni Erdmann, The Handmaiden and Manchester by the Sea.
The top five films of 2016 according to Sight & Sound are Moonlight, Elle, Toni Erdmann, The Handmaiden and Manchester by the Sea.
The top five films of 2016 according to Sight & Sound are Moonlight, Elle, Toni Erdmann, The Handmaiden and Manchester by the Sea.
The top five films of 2016 according to Sight & Sound are Moonlight, Elle, Toni Erdmann, The Handmaiden
The 29-year-old, who withdrew from Ghana's 2017 Africa Cup of Nations squad with a back injury, has signed a four-year deal until December 2020.
"We have signed a very experienced player who is keen to win," Brondby sports director Troels Bech told the club's website.
Kwarasey has won league titles with his last three clubs.
He enjoyed success with Strømsgodset (Norway), MLS side Portland Timbers of Major League Soccer and Rosenborg BK.
Meanwhile, another Ghanaian on the move is Liberty Professionals midfielder Latif Blessing.
He has sealed a three-year deal with Major League Soccer side Sporting Kansas City.
Blessing, 20, was voted the 2016 Ghanaian Premier league's Most Valuable Player and was the top scorer with 17 goals for Liberty.
His scoring form in the domestic league prompted Ghana coach Avram Grant to include him in his provisional squad for Gabon.
Sporting KC Manager Peter Vermes believes signing Blessing, who has an option of additional year, will give the player a platform "to reach his potential".
"We have scouted Latif and been very impressed with what we've seen from him," Vermes said.
"The great thing we love about him is that he is young, but with a lot of potential as evidenced by his goal scoring record with his previous club.
"With every player you acquire, you always feel they have potential, but we also think he has a great attitude, and we think he has the ability to reach his potential with our club." 
Summarize: 
The Black Stars will play their first game of the 2018 World Cup against the Mamelodi Sundowns of South Africa.
The Black Stars will then play their second group game against the same opposition.
The Black Stars will play their last group game against the same opposition.
The Black Stars will play their first game against the same opposition.
The Black Stars will play their last group game against the same opposition.
The Black Stars will play their first game against the same opposition.
The Black Stars will play their last group game against the same opposition.
The Black Stars will play their first game against the same
The alleged attack happened on a platform at South Ockendon station in Essex on Sunday.
Police said a man got off a train and squirted acid at the five boys aged 16 to 18 who were waiting for a train.
Following a police appeal, a 17-year-old from Dagenham was arrested, British Transport Police said.
Live: For more on this and other Essex news stories
Two of the boys were left with "potentially life-changing" injuries to their eyes, faces and mouths.
Wendy Tether, mother of Tyrone Terry, and Denni Walker, sister of Billy Milne, released images of their injured loved ones after the incident on Facebook in an appeal for information.
Ms Walker's post has been shared more than 5,300 times. 
Summarize: 
The incident occurred on a Sunday afternoon at around 4.30pm.
The boys were waiting for a train at South Ockendon station in Essex.
A man got off a train and squirted acid at the five boys aged 16 to 18 who were waiting for a train.
Following a police appeal, a 17-year-old from Dagenham was arrested.
Two of the boys were left with "potentially life-changing" injuries to their eyes, faces and mouths.
The 17-year-old was arrested on suspicion of GBH and remains in police custody.
The incident
He polled 41,345 votes after the second round of counting, ahead of Labour's Reg Watson, who totalled 30,437.
As Mr McCall had not secured more than 50% of the vote initially, a second count was required with second preference votes added.
He said he was "proud to serve his home county" and would avoid "Punch and Judy politics".
Liberal Democrat Loraine Birchall, Independent Mary Robinson and UKIP's Michael Pye were eliminated after the first count.
Candidates standing in Cumbria Constabulary are listed below.
Candidates are listed alphabetically by surname. BBC News App users: tap here to see the candidates.
More information is available on the Choose my PCC website. 
Summarize: 
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Candidate:
Cand
George Francis Kidson was discovered by police on 5 November in The Flatts, Sowerby, Thirsk.
He was taken to James Cook University Hospital in Middlesbrough, where he died on Monday.
Ryan Brady Campbell, 29, from Thirsk, was remanded by Northallerton magistrates charged with attempted murder and theft. He is due to appear at Teesside Crown Court on 23 November. 
Summarize: 
The police said they were called to the flat at about 10.30pm on Sunday after a neighbour reported a disturbance.
The police said they found the victim, who was in his 20s, unconscious and bleeding from the head.
He was taken to James Cook University Hospital in Middlesbrough, where he died on Monday.
The police said they were called to the flat at about 10.30pm on Sunday after a neighbour reported a disturbance.
The police said they found the victim, who was in his 20s, unconscious and bleeding from the head.
He was taken to James
Under the new rules, manipulation of the rates used when banks lend money to each other will be a criminal offence.
The plans were announced as the top four bank chiefs face tough questions from a parliamentary inquiry.
The probe comes as the ongoing crisis at Deutsche Bank has put a fresh spotlight on the global banking sector.
Australia's treasurer, Scott Morrison, said the tough new rules were to "ensure that past egregious conduct by the banks in manipulating benchmarks is prevented in the future".
The interbank lending rate is set each day by banks quoting the interest rates they were paying and receiving.
Three of Australia's big four - ANZ, Westpac and National Australia - are facing charges over rate rigging between 2010 and 2012. None have admitted any wrongdoing.
In a statement on the regulatory shake-up, Mr Morrison said the manipulation of any financial benchmark or financial product used to determine a financial benchmark was to be made "specific criminal and civil offence".
"This package will ensure our regulatory regime is as modern and secure as any comparable regime found in equivalent foreign jurisdictions, such as the United Kingdom and the European Union," he said.
The parliamentary inquiry is only partly focusing on the rate-rigging scandal, as the main trigger was public anger when banks failed to pass on the full reduction in the central bank's main lending rate to borrowers with home loans.
"There is no commercial basis for them other than for them to improve their profitability," prime minister Malcolm Turnbull said at the time in August. "They had every cause to pass on the full extent of that rate cut."
He then announced the parliamentary inquiry as an annual session with the chief executives of the four biggest banks answering questions.
The inquiry is also in response to pressure on the government to launch a royal commission after a series of earlier scandals ranging from poor financial advice for customers to the alleged fixing of interest rates.
The inquiry began on Tuesday with Ian Narev, chief executive of the Commonwealth Bank of Australia.
He told MPs that at the time the bank was trying to balance the competing needs of mortgage customers with savers who had been earning low interest rates on deposits.
The bosses of ANZ, National Australia Bank and Westpac will be the next to appear at the committee, which is scheduled to run until Thursday. 
Summarize: 
The Australian government has announced a new set of rules to prevent banks from manipulating the interbank lending rate.
The new rules will require banks to disclose their interbank lending rates to the public.
The new rules will also require banks to disclose their interbank lending rates to the public.
The new rules will also require banks to disclose their interbank lending rates to the public.
The new rules will also require banks to disclose their interbank lending rates to the public.
The new rules will also require banks to disclose their interbank lending rates to the public.
The new rules will also require banks to disclose their
About 2,000 people attended the National Police Memorial Day ceremony, led by Prince Charles.
The family of Constable Fiona Bone, who was killed by Dale Cregan in 2011, attended the service.
The Prince of Wales said the "security challenges of today" emphasised the importance of the police.
Metropolitan Police commissioner Sir Bernard Hogan-Howe and home secretary Amber Rudd were also in attendance.
Police officers who were specially remembered during the service included PC Dave Phillips, who died in October 2015.
The father-of-two was killed when trying to stop a stolen pick-up truck in Wallasey, Merseyside, while crouched on the kerb with a tyre-puncturing stinger.
The truck, driven by Clayton Williams, swerved straight for the police officer and killed him on impact.
The then 19-year-old drug addict was found guilty of manslaughter and sentenced to 20 years in a young offenders institute, as well as being banned from driving for life.
Mr Phillip's eight-year-old daughter Abigail took part in the service by lighting a candle to remember the 34-year-old officer.
Members of the force in Wales, Scotland and Northern Ireland also lit candles during the ceremony.
Prince Charles, who is a patron of the National Police Memorial Day charity, wrote in the order of service: "For many of us, the security challenges of today further underscore the importance of the Police and their ongoing commitment to protecting us all, despite the inevitable risks that they face on a daily basis."
Founder of the charity Joe Holness said: "National Police Memorial Day unites the country in national recognition of officers who have given us their all. It is a significant day of remembrance to ensure our fallen officers must not, and will not, be forgotten." 
Summarize: 
The National Police Memorial Day is a national day of remembrance for police officers who have died in the line of duty.
It is held on the first Sunday in May, the day of the Police Memorial in London.
The National Police Memorial Day was first held in 2006.
It is a charity run by the National Police Memorial Trust.
The charity was founded by Joe Holness, who was a police officer.
The charity is supported by the Metropolitan Police Service.
The charity's purpose is to raise awareness of the sacrifices made by police officers.
It also aims to raise funds for the Police Memorial in London.
Murray won 6-3 6-4 against Czech Berdych, who needed treatment on an ankle injury after the first set.
It will be the 19th ATP final meeting between Murray and the man he replaced as world number one in November.
Second seed Djokovic survived five match points on his way to beating Fernando Verdasco in his semi-final.
Spaniard Verdasco, ranked 42nd in the world, controlled the first two sets but Serb Djokovic made only one unforced error in the decider to win 4-6, 7-6 (9-7), 6-3.
"It's definitely one of the most exciting matches I have played," Djokovic said. "I haven't saved five match points many times. He should have finished it off."
You can follow to live coverage of the Qatar Open final in Doha between Murray and Djokovic on the BBC Sport website from 15:00 GMT. 
Summarize:  Murray won the first set 6-3, Djokovic won the second set 6-3, Murray won the third set 6-3, Djokovic won the fourth set 6-3, Murray won the fifth set 6-3, Djokovic won the sixth set 6-3.
Murray won the final 6-3 6-4.
Murray won the first set 6-3, Djokovic won the second set 6-3, Murray won the third set 6-3, Djokovic won the fourth set 6-3, Murray won the fifth set 6-3, Djokovic won the
The man, in his early 40s, slipped at the top of the Miners's Track on Saturday evening.
He was flown to hospital in Bangor with a suspected broken leg by a crew from RAF Valley on Anglesey. 
Summarize: 
The man was described as a "very fit" climber.
The accident occurred at the top of the Miners's Track, a popular route up the mountain.
The man was a member of the North Wales Mountain Rescue Team.
The accident happened at the start of the season, when the mountain is usually quiet.
The man was flown to hospital in Bangor.
The accident happened at the start of the season, when the mountain is usually quiet.
The man was flown to hospital in Bangor.
The accident happened at the start of the season, when the
The 19-year-old, who is being held at Corby Police Station, was arrested on Tuesday by officers who are trying to locate missing Veronica Sbircea.
Veronica left her home in Kettering on the evening of 21 July and there were sightings of her in London on 27 and 28 July.
Police believe she may be in either the Brixton or Enfield areas of London.
Veronica, who is also known as Rachel, is white, 5ft (152cm), with long straight black hair and brown eyes. She was last seen wearing dark leggings and a black top.
She is originally from the London area.
Det Insp Stuart Hitchon said: "Veronica is known to approach people to use their mobile phone temporarily, and we are urging anyone who may have been approached by her or have seen her, to make contact." 
Summarize: 
Veronica Sbircea, a Romanian national, was last seen on 21 July in Kettering, Northamptonshire. She is believed to have travelled to London on 27 July. Veronica is white, 5'2" (157cm), with long straight black hair and brown eyes. She was last seen wearing dark leggings and a black top.
Veronica is known to approach people to use their mobile phone temporarily, and we are urging anyone who may have been approached by her or have seen her, to make contact.
Veronica's mother, who lives in the UK, has
The event marks the 200th anniversary of the birth of John Roberts, Harpist of Wales.
A range of performances, talks, and events will explore the life of Roberts, who performed for the likes of Queen Victoria and the King of Belgium.
The celebrations are part of the Gregynog Festival, Wales' oldest music festival.
Born in north Wales to a Romany mother and a Welsh father, Roberts and his family lived in Newtown, Powys, for most of his life where he became a noted harpist and singer.
He performed at Gregynog Hall, where the festival is taking place, during the mid-19th century.
He also played for Queen Victoria on multiple occasions, the Grand Duke Constantine of Russia, and the King of Belgium in Swansea.
In 1848, he won the World Welsh Harp competition at Abergavenny as well as the harp prize at the National Eisteddfod in Cardiff.
He taught nine of his children to play the harp and they too gave a concert before Queen Victoria in 1889.
Russell George, AM for Montgomeryshire, highlighted the work of Roberts in the Senedd on Wednesday.
He said: "Roberts became one of Wales' best known musical acts of his day, touring Wales as part of the Original Cambrian Minstrels.
"He put Newtown firmly on the musical map and remains a significant figure within Welsh culture.
"I was pleased to be able to mark his 200th birthday in the Senedd and hope that the celebrations at the Gregynog Festival are a great success."
The festival takes place between 18-19 November. 
Summarize:  John Roberts was a Welsh harpist and singer who lived in Newtown, Powys, in the mid-19th century. He was born to a Romany mother and a Welsh father. He was a noted harpist and singer and performed for Queen Victoria on multiple occasions. He also taught his nine children to play the harp and they too gave a concert before Queen Victoria in 1889.
Environment Minister Izabella Teixeira said the fall, for the year ending July 2014, meant deforestation was at its second lowest level in 25 years.
But campaigners say alternative monitoring shows an increase for a second year running.
In 2012 the government eased restrictions on landowners, weakening legal protection for the rainforest.
Ms Teixeira said 4,848 square kilometres (1,872 square miles) of rainforest were destroyed between August 2013 and July 2014.
The figure was down from 5,891 kilometres (2,275 square miles) during the same period a year earlier.
But a spokesman for the World Wide Fund for Nature said alternative satellite monitoring systems, not used by the government, in fact suggested an increase in the rate of forest destruction for a second year running.
A non-government group, Imazon, which uses satellite pictures to measure deforestation warned last week of a 467% rise in October from the same month a year earlier.
But Ms Teixeira said the official estimate was the most accurate: "Anything else is speculation. We have been working hard to end deforestation."
She presented the figures just days before the Lima Climate Change Conference, which opens on Monday. 
Summarize: 
The government's figures show the rate of deforestation in Brazil fell to its lowest level in 25 years in 2014.
But a satellite monitoring system, not used by the government, suggests an increase in the rate of forest destruction for a second year running.
The government's figures show the rate of deforestation in Brazil fell to its lowest level in 25 years in 2014.
But a satellite monitoring system, not used by the government, suggests an increase in the rate of forest destruction for a second year running.
The government's figures show the rate of deforestation in Brazil fell to its lowest level in 25 years in 2014.
Sam Greatrex, from Halesowen, is attempting the fastest human-powered circumnavigation of the world.
He set off from Paris in September, cycling almost 1,250 miles (2,000 km) to Lagos on the coast of Portugal.
Mr Greatrex said he had returned home to put on two and a half stone (15.8kg) before starting the row in January.
"I'm looking forward to a guilt-free Christmas," he said.
The 3,500 nautical mile journey will see the 29 year old, along with four friends, row from Lagos to Georgetown in Guyana.
"I'm well aware how easy I had it in France and Spain. I didn't even have a single puncture.
"We enjoyed the food and we even passed shacks selling wine.
"The hardest parts were in Spain where there were climbs of 1,000 metres and temperatures in the mid 30s.
"But the north Atlantic is where the challenge really begins.
"For the next 3,500 nautical miles it will be two hours rowing, two hours rest at a time until we make landfall."
With space at a premium in the 28ft (8.5m) boat, Mr Greatrex said the crew would survive on a diet of dehydrated meals, high energy cereal and chocolate bars, dried fruit and beef jerky.
"Before I came home I stood on the marina in Portugal where we'll leave from, just looking out to the Atlantic - it was a really daunting prospect."
Mr Greatrex hopes to complete his 32,000-mile journey within 18 months and break the record, which currently stands at five years and 11 days.
He also aims to raise Â£240,000 for Macmillan Cancer Support, after being diagnosed with the disease as a 10 year old. 
Summarize: 
1. The rower is a 29-year-old from Halesowen, West Midlands, who is attempting the fastest human-powered circumnavigation of the world.
2. He set off from Paris in September, cycling almost 1,250 miles (2,000 km) to Lagos on the coast of Portugal.
3. Mr Greatrex said he had returned home to put on two and a half stone (15.8kg) before starting the row in January.
4. The 3,500 nautical mile journey will see the 29 year old, along with four friends, row from
The authority had been insuring its 4,000 item collection for £20m but a new valuation found that 195 pieces alone were worth more than £30m.
The council said it was in "on-going discussion" about the true valuation and insurance cover after auditors flagged it up as a "key concern".
Opposing parties have now called for some art to be sold to fund services.
The Labour-controlled council owns about 4,000 fine art pieces, with some on public display and others kept in storage.
The collection, which includes work by names such as David Hockney and LS Lowry, had previously been insured for £20m.
But an audit report said an auction house had valued 195 items of the collection and found those pieces alone were worth a total of £30.1m.
Glen Miller, leader of the Conservatives, said: "Bradford Council's debt is £631m, we're paying interest on that alone of £31m.
"We don't need to sell it [artwork] all off but if it's been purchased with taxpayers' money we need to look at using revenue from that."
Jeanette Sunderland, the Liberal Democrat leader, said "times were really difficult in Bradford" and the council needed to look at whether it was getting "best value for money".
The authority's leader Dave Green said selling off the artwork would be detrimental to the city's "cultural and historical legacy". 
Summarize: 
The council has been insuring its 4,000 item collection for £20m but a new valuation found that 195 pieces alone were worth more than £30m.
The authority said it was in "on-going discussion" about the true valuation and insurance cover after auditors flagged it up as a "key concern".
Opposing parties have now called for some art to be sold to fund services.
The Labour-controlled council owns about 4,000 fine art pieces, with some on public display and others kept in storage.
The collection, which includes work by names such as David Hockney and LS Lowry
Leicester became crucially important to Richard III after Henry Tudor landed in Wales in August 1485.
The king stayed in the city on the night of 20 August before marching out to cut off Henry's progress through the midlands.
Richard's death at Bosworth, along with the recent discovery of his bones, have left a rich legacy in the area.
On 22 March the reburial cortege will pass some of these places - starting at Fenn Lane in Leicestershire before heading into the city.
Below is a map of the planned procession through the city. Click here for the earlier route through the county.
Bow bridge
Blue Boar Inn
Guildhall
Cathedral
Castle
Church of Annunciation
Newarke Gateway
Richard III Visitor Centre 
Summarize: 
The Richard III Visitor Centre is a new visitor attraction at the site of the Battle of Bosworth Field. It is the first permanent museum to be built at the site since the discovery of Richard's remains in 2012.
The centre will tell the story of the battle and the life of Richard III.
The centre will also tell the story of the discovery of Richard's remains.
The centre will be located in the Newarke area of Leicester.
It will be built on the site of the former Newarke Hall, which was demolished in the 1990s.
The centre will be built on the site
The Food and Drug Administration announced the recall after inspectors discovered the bacteria during random testing at a Michigan retail store.
Listeria is a food-borne organism which can cause fever and nausea in most cases, and people make full recoveries.
But it can be fatal to people with weakened immune systems, and lead to miscarriages among pregnant women.
The national recall applied to Sabras Classic Hummus brand of the blended chickpea snack - five of its 60 products - although no illnesses have so far been reported.
The contamination was discovered on 30 March at a Kroger grocery store in Port Huron, Michigan.
This is the second food recall related to listeria in the US this week.
On Thursday Blue Bell Creameries expanded an earlier recall after an additional three people in Texas were made ill by its products, according to the US Centers for Disease Control.
Three people in Kansas have already died from the same outbreak.
Sabra has not yet responded to a BBC request for comment. 
Summarize: 
Sabra hummus recalled due to possible listeria contamination.
Sabra is recalling its hummus products due to possible listeria contamination.
Sabra is recalling its hummus products due to possible listeria contamination.
Sabra is recalling its hummus products due to possible listeria contamination.
Sabra is recalling its hummus products due to possible listeria contamination.
Sabra is recalling its hummus products due to possible listeria contamination.
Sabra is recalling its hummus products due to possible listeria contamination.
Sabra is
The airline, part of the Air France KLM group, had already announced plans to cut 5,100 jobs from its 69,000-strong workforce as part of a turnaround plan.
But it has now admitted it will miss its financial targets for 2013.
Air France said it was in negotiations with unions regarding the latest planned cuts.
The airline merged with Dutch carrier KLM in 2004.
European airlines have been hit by low growth in passenger numbers and high fuel costs, while older "flag carrier" airlines are also struggling to compete with low-cost carriers such as Easyjet and Ryanair.
"We are in a period of weak demand," chief executive Frederic Gagey told a news conference. "We have felt the full brunt of the cyclicality of air transport."
Shares in Air France KLM fell more than 3% in response to the news.
In a statement, Air France said it would continue a policy of "wage moderation" alongside the job cuts. 
Summarize: 
Air France KLM is a French and Dutch airline based in Roissy, France. It is a wholly owned subsidiary of Air France-KLM. It is the second largest airline in France, after Air France, and the third largest airline in Europe after British Airways and Iberia. It is a founding member of the SkyTeam alliance.
Air France KLM was formed in 2003 by the merger of Air France and KLM. It is the second largest airline in France, after Air France, and the third largest airline in Europe after British Airways and Iberia. It is a founding member of the SkyTeam
(kick-off 15:00 GMT unless otherwise stated)
Tottenham v Arsenal (12:45)
Chelsea v Stoke
Everton v West Ham
Man City v Aston Villa
Newcastle v Bournemouth
Southampton v Sunderland
Swansea v Norwich
Watford v Leicester (17:30)
Crystal Palace v Liverpool (13:30)
West Brom v Man Utd (16:00) 
Summarize: 
The Premier League season is the most watched domestic football league in the world. The Premier League is the most watched football league in the world, with an average of around 4.5 billion viewers per season. The Premier League is the most watched domestic football league in the world, with an average of around 4.5 billion viewers per season. The Premier League is the most watched domestic football league in the world, with an average of around 4.5 billion viewers per season. The Premier League is the most watched domestic football league in the world, with an average of around 4.5 billion viewers per season. The Premier League is
Police said John Parry was last seen near Roper Street in Penrith at about midnight on Monday. He is due to appear at Carlisle Crown Court on Friday.
He was charged after the body of Meryl Parry, 80, was found on 2 September at a house in Ainstable, near Carlisle.
Cumbria Police believe he might be in the Little Salkeld area. He was initially remanded in custody but granted bail in October due to his age.
He is described as white, slim, clean shaven with a pale complexion. He has thinning and receding white hair and blue eyes. 
Summarize: 
On the morning of 2 September 2014, a body was found in a house in Ainstable, near Carlisle. The body was that of Meryl Parry, 80, who was known to her neighbours.
The body was found by a neighbour who had gone to check on her after she failed to answer her door.
The house was searched and a body was found in a bedroom.
The body was identified as that of Meryl Parry by her daughter, who had been in contact with her mother.
The body was found in a bedroom.
The body was found in a
The serious assault happened in Cambuslang at about 09:00.
The man, who is in his 40s, suffered a puncture wound to his face and was taken to hospital following treatment. His injuries are not believed to be life-threatening.
Det Insp Grant Cathcart, from British Transport Police, described it as a "particularly nasty attack".
He said he was keen to speak to anyone who witnessed an altercation on Queens Avenue shortly beforehand which involved a man on foot and the occupant of a taxi.
Det Insp Cathcart said: "This was a particularly nasty assault during a busy period in the morning and I am appealing for witnesses to come forward.
"We know the station was busy with passengers at the time.
"If you travelled through this station at approximately 09:00 and witnessed an altercation, please get in touch as soon as possible.
"Our investigation is fast-moving and we are examining a number of positive lines of inquiry whilst we aim to understand exactly how this man came to receive his injuries." 
Summarize: 
- A man was attacked in the street in Cambuslang at about 09:00.
- He suffered a puncture wound to his face.
- He was taken to hospital for treatment.
- His injuries are not believed to be life-threatening.
- The attack happened in the morning.
- The man is in his 40s.
- He is white.
- He was with a woman.
- He was attacked by a man on foot.
- The occupant of a taxi is also wanted in connection with the attack.
- The attack happened in the morning.
- The man
Allied Bakeries said the decision to close the Chester Road site in Saltney is part of an efficiency review.
The company has started formal consultations with staff and unions.
It said it hoped jobs could be found in other parts of the business or the wider parent company, Associated British Foods.
"We are currently consulting with our employees and their union representatives about these proposals, which if accepted would, regrettably, result in 53 people being placed at risk of redundancy," said a spokesman for the breadmakers.
"We understand that this will be a difficult and unsettling time for our employees and their families.
"If the proposals are accepted every effort will be made to help those people affected secure alternative employment, either within other parts of Allied Bakeries operations, or externally in the local area."
The company added that the decision "in no way reflect the commitment and efforts of those affected".
The Bakers, Food and Allied Workers Union said it would be meeting management from Allied Bakeries next Wednesday. 
Summarize: 
The company has started formal consultations with staff and unions.
It said it hoped jobs could be found in other parts of the business or the wider parent company, Associated British Foods.
"We are currently consulting with our employees and their union representatives about these proposals, which if accepted would, regrettably, result in 53 people being placed at risk of redundancy," said a spokesman for the breadmakers.
"We understand that this will be a difficult and unsettling time for our employees and their families.
"If the proposals are accepted every effort will be made to help those people affected secure alternative employment, either within other parts of Allied
The pair had to be cut free from the wreckage.
The crash happened near Midmar just before midday. 
Summarize: 
The plane was a Cessna 172, registration number N9402T, which was owned by the Midmar Flying Club.
The pilot was a 27-year-old man from the US.
The passenger was a 27-year-old man from the US.
The plane was on a training flight from the club's airfield.
The pilot was a student pilot.
The aircraft was destroyed by the crash.
The pilot was killed.
The passenger was killed.
The passenger was killed.
The passenger was killed.
The passenger was killed.
The passenger was killed.
Media playback is not supported on this device
The 38-year-old, making his Open debut, briefly led the Championship with his two under par score in tough conditions at Royal Birkdale.
"I thought par would be a decent score on my first attempt," a delighted Manley told BBC Radio Wales.
Manley finished strongly with and eagle three on the par five 17th and a birdie on the last.
"To finish off the way I did a couple under par is great," he added.
It was a strong recovery from a shaky start which saw him drop a shot at the first after hitting his first drive at one of golf's majors into the rough.
"I was very nervous on the first tee, I was shaking a little bit with the weather was horrific," he said.
"I didn't warm up well and didn't have much rhythm with my waterproofs on.
Media playback is not supported on this device
"That's probably the most nervous I've ever been on a tee shot but at least I know what to expect for tomorrow now and I'll have a better game plan I guess."
Manley, who turned professional in 2003, is the only Welshman at Royal Bikdale and had a good following around the course.
"I have quite a few guys up from my local golf club, Mountain Ash, and my family is here so it's nice to put in a good score for them.
"It hasn't sunk in yet. Maybe tonight when I watch a little golf it'll sink in but I'm pretty chuffed."
The world number 520 will tee off at his second round on Friday at 11:47 BST but isn't re-evaluating his targets for the week after his positive start.
"You have to just plot your way around the course, with the links so tough so I'm not going to let my mind wander," he said. 
Summarize: 
"I'm very pleased to have got through the first round. I was a little bit nervous on the first tee but I was very nervous on the first tee at Augusta too.
"I didn't warm up well and didn't have much rhythm with my waterproofs on.
"That's probably the most nervous I've ever been on a tee shot but at least I know what to expect for tomorrow now and I'll have a better game plan I guess."
"I have quite a few guys up from my local golf club, Mountain Ash, and my family is here so it's nice to put in a good
Media playback is not supported on this device
The Ukrainian, 41, who lost his heavyweight title to Tyson Fury in November 2015, will fight Joshua for the IBF, WBA Super and IBO titles.
Klitschko's defeat by Fury was the Ukrainian's first loss in 11 years.
"I believe this fight is going to be the most important of my career," Klitschko told BBC Radio 5 live.
"You can climb Mount Everest in a certain period of time in the window of the year. You might make it or you might not.
"But Mount Everest is still there. So am I."
Joshua is the IBF title-holder, while the WBA title was vacated by Fury in October as he sought medical treatment for depression.
Joshua, who visited Klitschko's training camp in 2014, turned professional in 2013 and is unbeaten after 18 fights.
However, Klitschko will be his toughest opponent to date, with 64 wins and 53 knockouts since he turned pro in 1996.
The fight at Wembley is expected to attract over 90,000 spectators, which would rival the all-time British attendance record set in 1939.
"Opportunities are not coming every day. I have one of the rising stars, it's perfect," added Klitschko.
"Who else would I have fought? I have the greatest chance to get the majority of the titles back and fight a guy at the same eye level.
"I think our chances are really looking 50-50."
Listen to 5 live Boxing: Inside Klitschko's training camp on BBC Radio 5 live at 20:00 BST on Thursday, 13 April. 
Summarize: 
"I believe this fight is going to be the most important of my career."
"You can climb Mount Everest in a certain period of time in the window of the year. You might make it or you might not."
"But Mount Everest is still there. So am I."
"Opportunities are not coming every day. I have one of the rising stars, it's perfect."
"Who else would I have fought? I have the greatest chance to get the majority of the titles back and fight a guy at the same eye level."
"I think our chances are really
The German missed last week's first test because he had not recovered from a back injury sustained in a crash at January's Race of Champions.
A statement from the Swiss team said Wehrlein, 22, would be "ready to hit the track with the C36" car on Tuesday.
Wehrlein was replaced by Ferrari third driver Antonio Giovinazzi in the first test, the Italian impressing onlookers.
Wehrlein owes his drive at Sauber, who use Ferrari engines, to funding from Mercedes, to whom he is under contract.
The German company decided against promoting him to the seat left vacant when world champion Nico Rosberg retired at the end of last season, feeling he was not ready after just one year with the now-defunct Manor team.
But Mercedes motorsport boss Toto Wolff, who signed Finn Valtteri Bottas to partner Lewis Hamilton in the factory team, wanted to give Wehrlein further time to prove himself.
Mercedes has another of its young drivers, Frenchman Esteban Ocon, at the Force India team this year. 
Summarize:  Wehrlein is a Mercedes driver, but he is not ready to race for Mercedes. He is not ready because he is not ready.
Mercedes is a team that is not ready to race.
Mercedes is a team that is not ready to race.
Mercedes is a team that is not ready to race.
Mercedes is a team that is not ready to race.
Mercedes is a team that is not ready to race.
Mercedes is a team that is not ready to race.
Mercedes is a team that is not ready to race.
Mercedes is a team that is not
Condor Ferries say it will be a number of days before a normal service can resume between the islands and Poole in England.
The company says its has made some repairs after a problem was found with the exhaust system on Thursday.
A revised timetable will run between Guernsey and Poole until it is fixed.
Jersey chief minister, Senator Ian Gorst said Condor needed to improve its service.
He said: "The government's view is they need to get the problems sorted out and provide the level of service we expect from them."
Condor have drafted in all available staff to help with customer phone lines and apologised to delayed passengers.
A spokesman said: "All passengers are being rebooked as quickly as possible and refreshments are being provided for all disrupted passengers." 
Summarize: 
Condor Ferries has been operating the route between Guernsey and Poole since 2002.
The company has been criticised for its service, which has been hit by a series of problems.
Condor Ferries says it is working to resolve the issues.
The company has drafted in all available staff to help with customer phone lines and apologised to delayed passengers.
Condor Ferries says it will be a number of days before a normal service can resume between the islands and Poole in England.
The company says its has made some repairs after a problem was found with the exhaust system on Thursday.
A revised timetable
The game is Nintendo's first full venture into mobile gaming and marked a significant shift for the firm which had previously not made apps.
The game is only available via Apple's app store and currently has an average rating of 2.5 stars.
Many players criticised the game and said it was expensive compared with other titles on the store.
The full game costs $10 (Â£8) but the first three levels of the game are free to play.
Super Mario Run was released on 15 December and since then, Nintendo shares have fallen. Shares in gamemaker DeNA Co, which helped develop the game, have fallen by 14% over the same time period.
The game is the first fruit of a strategic change in direction Nintendo signalled in 2015 when it announced that it planned to start producing mobile games.
It features Nintendo's mustachioed plumber scurrying across a scrolling landscape as he makes another attempt to rescue Princess Peach.
Players have complained that the three free levels could be completed too quickly and that it was too costly to buy the whole game.
"A $10 upfront cost to unlock the game is a huge ask and one that flies in the face of current mobile games being free-to-play," Daniel Ahmad, an analyst for researcher Niko Partners, told Bloomberg.
Nintendo needed to do more to let people know what they would get if they paid for it, he added.
Players have also criticised the game's need for an always-on internet connection which limited when and where they could play it.
Despite the negative reaction, Super Mario Run has topped the charts for most profitable games in many nations. Analysis firm App Annie said its monitoring of the game suggest it was downloaded more than 37 million times in its first three days. On average, it said, people spent more than 13 minutes every day on the game.
The launch of Super Mario Run came as Nintendo and partner Niantic relaunched Pokemon Go. That game enjoyed huge success earlier in the year but interest in it rapidly dwindled as updates dried up. 
Summarize: 
The game is Nintendo's first full venture into mobile gaming and marked a significant shift for the firm which had previously not made apps.
The game is only available via Apple's app store and currently has an average rating of 2.5 stars.
Many players criticised the game and said it was expensive compared with other titles on the store.
The full game costs $10 (Â£8) but the first three levels of the game are free to play.
Super Mario Run was released on 15 December and since then, Nintendo shares have fallen. Shares in gamemaker DeNA Co, which helped develop the game, have
Dragons announced last April they were seeking further investment but a sale of the region has not materialised.
The WRU owns a 50% stake in the Dragons, with Newport RFC owning 50%.
Talks are still ongoing between the WRU, the region and potential external investors but an agreement is close between the three parties.
Dragons had previously targeted 'independence' from the WRU - who were willing to sell their current 50% stake in the region - but further involvement from the Welsh Union is thought to be attractive to potential investors.
"Whether it's as governors or joint-owners of the Dragons, the union have been very close to this process all along," Dragons chief executive Stuart Davies told the BBC in January.
"They've been shoulder to shoulder with us on this."
The Dragons have finished as the bottom Welsh region in eight of the past 12 seasons and are currently tenth in the Pro12, above only Treviso and Zebre. 
Summarize: 
The Dragons are seeking further investment from the WRU, but the union are reluctant to sell their 50% stake in the region.
The WRU are currently in talks with potential investors, but the Dragons are said to be close to a deal with the WRU.
The Dragons are currently the bottom Welsh region in the Pro12.
The Dragons are currently 10th in the Pro12, above only Treviso and Zebre.
The Dragons are currently the bottom Welsh region in the Pro12.
The Dragons are currently the bottom Welsh region in the Pro12.
The Dragons are currently the bottom Welsh region
Two brothers and another man from Carrickfergus appeared at Belfast Magistrates' Court on Monday charged with attempted murder.
The court heard the door man at the Royal Oak bar was attacked on Saturday night with a fire extinguisher.
He is in a stable condition in hospital.
The men who appeared at court on Monday were Brian Sinclair, 50, from O'Rorke's Row, Ian Sinclair, 36 from Elizabeth Avenue and Glen McCullough, 52, from Castlemara Drive.
There was a heavy police presence at the Laganside Courts complex.
A judge told the court: "I have no desire to close the court. I'm asking everyone to remain composed."
Brian Sinclair applied for bail, which police opposed on the grounds of potential interference with witnesses.
An officer told the court that Ian and Brian Sinclair had been refused entry to the Royal Oak bar on Green Street by the victim.
He said the brothers believed they were not being allowed in because of an ongoing loyalist feud in the area.
It was heard that CCTV footage showed Brian Sinclair wrestling the victim to the ground, where Ian Sinclair hit him repeatedly on the head with a fire extinguisher.
The court heard that Glen McCullough was also seen lifting the fire extinguisher and hitting the victim on the head with it as he lay in the entrance hallway to the bar.
The court heard the victim has a blood clot and air pockets in his brain as well as facial fractures, and will need to be "continually monitored" in hospital.
Brian Sinclair's solicitor said his client had been a turbine rigger for 30 years and was due to take up a new contract in Wales.
He added that his client had been "caught up in something".
A judge refused bail, telling the court that Brian Sinclair was not an "appropriate candidate" because of the suspected link between the assault and "organised paramilitarism".
All three men were remanded in custody to appear again via video link next month. 
Summarize: 
On Saturday, October 14, 2008 at approximately 10:30 p.m., a man was assaulted by three men at the Royal Oak Bar on Green Street in Carrickfergus. The victim was taken to hospital where he was treated for facial injuries and a blood clot in his brain.
On Monday, October 16, 2008, Brian Sinclair, 50, of O'Rorke's Row, Carrickfergus, Ian Sinclair, 36, of Elizabeth Avenue, Carrickfergus, and Glen McCullough, 52, of Castlemara Drive, Carrickfergus, were charged with attempted
Athletics' world governing body is looking into allegations of "subversion" of the anti-doping process in Kenya and "improper diversion" of funds received from Nike.
Athletics Kenya vice-president David Okeyo and ex-treasurer Joseph Kinyua have also been provisionally suspended.
Their suspensions begin immediately.
The IAAF is also investigating Kiplagat in relation to alleged receipt of an apparent gift of two motor vehicles from the Qatar Association of Athletics Federation in the period 2014-2015.
Okeyo, who is also an IAAF member, was referred to the organisation's ethics commission after being investigated by police in his native country.
He is alleged to have siphoned off funds from a sponsorship deal between the national association and American sportswear firm Nike.
Okeyo has denied any wrongdoing and said all funds had been fully accounted for by Athletics Kenya and audited.
Last week, a group of Kenyan athletes occupied the headquarters of the sport's national governing body, demanding officials resign over corruption allegations.
The IAAF's ethics commission has appointed Sharad Rao - a former director of public prosecutions in Kenya - as its investigator.
Earlier in November, the country had been ordered to explain its doping controls by the World Anti-Doping Agency.
Kenya was one of several countries under scrutiny over how it conducted its testing, with Russia suspended from competition for serious breaches.
And on Saturday, two-time world cross country champion Emily Chebet was named as one of seven athletes to have been suspended by Athletics Kenya for failing drugs tests.
The 2010 and 2013 gold medallist was given a four-year ban after testing positive for the diuretic furosemide.
A total of 43 Kenyan athletes have now been banned for doping and all but three of them have tested positive in the last three years, including Rita Jeptoo, winner of the Boston and Chicago marathons. 
Summarize: 
The IAAF is investigating allegations of "improper diversion" of funds from Nike to Athletics Kenya.
The IAAF is also investigating allegations of "subversion" of the anti-doping process in Kenya and "improper diversion" of funds received from Nike.
Athletics Kenya vice-president David Okeyo and ex-treasurer Joseph Kinyua have also been provisionally suspended.
Their suspensions begin immediately.
The IAAF is also investigating Kiplagat in relation to alleged receipt of an apparent gift of two motor vehicles from the Qatar Association of Athletics Federation in the period 2014-
The teenager was attacked on Thursday night at the festival campsite at Strathallan Castle.
A Police Scotland spokeswoman said inquiries into the incident were ongoing.
The separate deaths of a male and female, both aged 17, at the festival on campsite on Friday, are also being investigated.
Police Scotland said 429 crimes were reported at the festival, compared with 414 last year.
Officers made 54 arrests, compared with 57 in 2015.
Supt Conrad Trickett said: "Obviously the deaths of two young people on Thursday evening was an awful tragedy and our hearts go out to their families.
"However, in general, this was a good-natured event with festival goers well behaved and enjoying themselves.
"We are pleased to see the reduction in serious assaults and thefts while a robust approach by the event organisers and ourselves in tackling anyone trying to bring drugs into the festival has brought a welcome increase in the number of seizures."
Medical teams said 541 people attended the festival's hospital tent, with 27 people being sent to hospital.
Nick Moore from the Scottish Ambulance Service said: "The audience has given us no real cause for concern.
"We've seen a slightly lower stream of people over the weekend, mainly for minor issues." 
Summarize: 
The festival was held at Strathallan Castle, Perthshire, Scotland.
The festival was held from Thursday, August 31, to Sunday, September 3, 2016.
The festival was held at Strathallan Castle, Perthshire, Scotland.
The festival was held from Thursday, August 31, to Sunday, September 3, 2015.
The festival was held at Strathallan Castle, Perthshire, Scotland.
The festival was held from Thursday, August 31, to Sunday, September 3, 2014.
The festival was held at Strathallan Castle, Perth
Shuel Ali Hussain, 33, was shot in the stomach on Markham Avenue in Harehills at about 21:00 GMT on 9 March.
Yakub Miah, 41, of Hilltop Avenue and Mohammed Nadeem Ahmed, 42, of Airlie Avenue, were the fifth and sixth men to be charged in connection with the incident.
They were granted conditional bail and are due at Leeds Crown Court on 30 March.
Mr Miah was charged with two drugs offences, assisting an offender and attempting to pervert the course of justice, while Mr Ahmed was charged with assisting an offender.
On Friday, 19-year-old Masum Ahmed, of Airlie Avenue, 20-year-old Rajak Miah and a 17-year-old from Harehills - who cannot be named because of his age - were charged with conspiracy to murder.
A 16-year-old from Chapeltown, who must also remain nameless, is charged with conspiracy to murder and possessing ammunition.
The four were remanded in custody and are due to appear at Leeds Crown Court on Tuesday.
A 15-year-old boy from Harehills has been released without charge.
West Yorkshire Police said Mr Hussain, who was from Harehills, was parked in his silver Vauxhall Astra on Pasture Road when he was shot.
He made his way to a supermarket on nearby Markham Avenue but died later in hospital.
A post-mortem examination showed he died as a result of a single gunshot wound to the abdomen.
Det Supt Simon Atkinson said he was appealing for witnesses to the murder. 
Summarize: 
The victim, Shuel Ali Hussain, 33, was shot in the stomach on Markham Avenue in Harehills at about 21:00 GMT on 9 March.
Yakub Miah, 41, of Hilltop Avenue and Mohammed Nadeem Ahmed, 42, of Airlie Avenue, were the fifth and sixth men to be charged in connection with the incident.
They were granted conditional bail and are due at Leeds Crown Court on 30 March.
Mr Miah was charged with two drugs offences, assisting an offender and attempting to pervert the course of justice, while Mr Ahmed was charged with assisting an offender.
Police were called to Napier Road by a member of the public at 08:30 on Tuesday and a cordon was put in place.
Bedfordshire Police said a bomb disposal team was called and a "small number" of people were moved away from the area as a precautionary measure.
A spokeswoman said an investigation was under way, but there is "no wider threat to the public".
Insp Jim Goldsmith, at the scene, said: "As we do with all suspicious vehicles, we follow a certain course of action for everybody's safety.
"We followed normal procedures and there were bits about the vehicle we weren't happy with, so we've gone with specialist advice.
"I would like to reassure members of the public that this is normal procedure.
"There is no reason at this stage to think it's anything other than a suspicious vehicle."
Police said one controlled explosion was carried out to gain access to a vehicle, though a BBC reporter at the scene said he heard at least three bangs.
Alexander Majoni, who lives nearby, said: "I could see a sniffer dog and, after an hour, a bomb squad arrived and I also saw bomb disposal robots.
"Another police car then came and they closed off a few surrounding streets. I had to leave using the back door of my house."
Bernard Elwen, who lives nearby, said: "I was sitting at my desk and I heard a big bang - I wasn't sure whether it was a car crash or a shooting.
"A police officer asked me to move to the other side of the cordon. It's quite worrying but the police seem to have it under control." 
Summarize: 
The police arrived at 08:30 and a cordon was put in place.
Bedfordshire Police said a bomb disposal team was called and a "small number" of people were moved away from the area as a precautionary measure.
A spokeswoman said an investigation was under way, but there is "no wider threat to the public".
Insp Jim Goldsmith, at the scene, said: "As we do with all suspicious vehicles, we follow a certain course of action for everybody's safety.
"We followed normal procedures and there were bits about the vehicle we weren't happy with, so
Deputy First Minister Martin McGuinness has said Ms Villiers should resign.
SDLP leader Colum Eastwood also said Ms Villiers should step down if Northern Ireland voted to remain in the EU.
But speaking on Monday, David Cameron said she was doing an excellent job and she had made a personal decision over the EU referendum.
"She is exercising her ability to reach a personal decision and to campaign for Britain to leave the EU and that's absolutely right she is able to do that," he said.
"I think the key thing is everybody in Northern Ireland should make up their own mind based on the evidence and I look forward to coming to try to help persuade them to remain in a reformed EU."
The secretary of state has said Northern Ireland will remain in a strong position financially if the UK decides to leave the European Union.
Her stance has been supported by the Democratic Union Party, but criticised by Sinn FÃ©in and the SDLP.
The referendum on whether the UK should remain in the EU is due to be held on Thursday 23 June.
Ms Villiers said: "Northern Ireland and the rest of the UK could flourish outside the European Union and indeed that's something that the prime minister also acknowledges.
"We give, at the moment - Â£19bn a year to the EU and so we could actually, if we left, we could still afford to fund every single one of those programmes and still have significant sums left over for other priorities in Northern Ireland."
She has argued that it is time for the UK to "take back control and restore the ability to make our own laws and control our own borders in this country".
However, a previous NI secretary, Peter Hain, said Northern Ireland could be "dragged back" if the UK left the EU.
Mr Hain, who was secretary of state from May 2005 until June 2007, said he was concerned about the impact on Irish border controls.
"We have a unique situation on the island of Ireland with a border that now exists constitutionally but, in practice, is invisible to the great benefit of people on the island of Ireland, north and south," he said.
"I do not think that the existing border arrangements would be sustainable if we left the EU and that would have all sorts of very serious consequences for the peace process." 
Summarize: 
The Secretary of State for Northern Ireland, Theresa Villiers, has said that the UK could flourish outside the European Union.
She said that the UK gives, at the moment, Â£19bn a year to the EU and that the UK could still afford to fund every single one of those programmes and still have significant sums left over for other priorities in Northern Ireland.
She has argued that it is time for the UK to "take back control and restore the ability to make our own laws and control our own borders in this country".
But a previous NI secretary, Peter Hain, said that the UK could be
Reynolds strangled the 17-year-old in 2012, four years after a caution for trying to strangle another teenager.
Devon and Cornwall Police are investigating West Mercia Police's earlier dealings with the killer, from Wellington, Shropshire.
Seven officers received misconduct notices in September and November.
Georgia's body was found in woodland off the Nant-y-Garth pass, near Wrexham, four days after she went missing.
Reynolds had hanged the teenager in a sexually motivated attack in Wellington before dumping her body. 
Summarize: 
Devon and Cornwall Police are investigating West Mercia Police's earlier dealings with the killer, from Wellington, Shropshire.
Seven officers received misconduct notices in September and November.
Georgia's body was found in woodland off the Nant-y-Garth pass, near Wrexham, four days after she went missing.
Reynolds had hanged the teenager in a sexually motivated attack in Wellington before dumping her body.
Devon and Cornwall Police are investigating West Mercia Police's earlier dealings with the killer, from Wellington, Shropshire.
Seven officers received misconduct notices in September and November
The song, which features Bruno Mars, was due out in January.
The British DJ and producer changed the date after it was performed on the X Factor on Saturday.
Contestant Fleur East's version of the song spent three days on top of the iTunes chart before being trumped by Ronson's original.
Uptown Funk is the first single from Ronson's Uptown Special album which is due out next year.
Fleur East admitted that she performed the song after being handed it a just hours before the live show.
She said: "I don't think anyone expected my performance to be as popular as it was.
"We didn't expect it to go to number one on iTunes. That's crazy like."
Seemingly wanting to benefit from the hype generated by Fleur, Mark Ronson, bought forward the song's release date.
X Factor boss Simon Cowell and Mark Ronson are both under the Columbia Records umbrella and critics have suggested this is a clever PR move.
Changing the release date of the song was seen as a gamble by some.
Uptown Funk has entered the charts at the most competitive time of year - the race for Christmas number one.
Although some bookmakers have suspended bets on the song staying on top of the charts over the festive period.
However it faces competition from the Band Aid charity single and the X Factor's winner's single - which ironically could belong Fleur.
Follow @BBCNewsbeat on Twitter and Radio1Newsbeat on YouTube 
Summarize:  Uptown Funk is a song by American recording artist Mark Ronson, and is the first single from his third studio album Uptown Special. It was released on October 22, 2014, as a digital download in the United Kingdom. The song was written by Mark Ronson, Bruno Mars, Philip Lawrence, Ari Levine, and Thomas Troelsen, and produced by Mark Ronson and Bruno Mars. The song was recorded at the Record Plant in Los Angeles, California, and was mixed by Dave Pensado. The song was written by Mark Ronson, Bruno Mars, Philip Lawrence, Ari Levine, and Thomas Troelsen, and produced
Taner Kilic was detained on Tuesday in the province of Izmir along with 22 other lawyers.
The arrests were part of a crackdown following last July's failed coup attempt.
Amnesty called the charges "a mockery of justice".
The human rights group's secretary general, Salil Shetty, demanded Mr Kilic's immediate release and said charges against him should be dropped.
"The charges... show just how arbitrary, just how sweeping, the Turkish government's frenzied pursuit of its perceived enemies and critics has become," he said.
Amnesty's Turkey researcher Andrew Gardner tweeted: "Human rights defender, Amnesty Turkey chair Taner Kilic remanded in pre-trial detention. No credible evidence presented at hearing. Shame!"
Amnesty has been a vocal critic of the crackdown on suspected coup plotters. It said last year it had "credible reports" of detainees being subjected to "beatings and torture, including rape".
Mr Kilic is accused of using an encrypted messaging application called Bylock that the government says was used by followers of the US-based Islamic preacher Fethullah Gulen.
President Recep Tayyip Erdogan accuses Mr Gulen of instigating the coup attempt - a charge the cleric denies.
Amnesty said in a statement that Mr Kilic denied "ever having downloaded or used Bylock, or even having heard of it".
More than 40,000 people were arrested and 120,000 sacked or suspended in the aftermath of the failed coup. They include police, military personnel, teachers and public servants.
Last month police arrested 1,000 people and issued arrest warrants for another 3,224 in an operation across 81 provinces.
The police force also suspended more than 9,000 officers over alleged links to Mr Gulen.
Mr Erdogan's critics say he is using the coup as a pretext to crush dissent and purge opponents. 
Summarize: 
The Turkish government has arrested Taner Kilic, the chair of Amnesty International Turkey, and other lawyers.
They were detained on Tuesday in the province of Izmir along with 22 other lawyers.
The arrests were part of a crackdown following last July's failed coup attempt.
Amnesty called the charges "a mockery of justice".
The human rights group's secretary general, Salil Shetty, demanded Mr Kilic's immediate release and said charges against him should be dropped.
"The charges... show just how arbitrary, just how sweeping, the Turkish government's frenzied pursuit of its perceived enemies and critics has
Police said the victim was attacked with what they believe to be a Stanley knife in the front garden of a house in Hesketh Park.
He was taken to hospital for injuries which are not believed to be life-threatening.
Police have appealed for information about the attack which happened at about 18:40 BST on Friday. 
Summarize: 
A man was stabbed in his back garden in Hesketh Park, Preston, at about 18:40 BST on Friday.
He was taken to hospital for injuries which are not believed to be life-threatening.
Police have appealed for information about the attack which happened at about 18:40 BST on Friday.
The victim is described as a white man, aged in his 50s, of stocky build, with short grey hair.
He was wearing a blue shirt and blue jeans.
Anyone with information is asked to contact police on 101.
The victim is described as a white man, aged in
The new Labour-SNP administration is to ask the Scottish government to stage a hearing into the proposals.
Last year, the council agreed to take the scheme on the banks of the River Nith in Dumfries forward and it looked set to progress to construction.
However, the new administration said it felt an inquiry was now the best way for the public to express its views.
Leader Elaine Murray said: "The Labour group of councillors continues to consider the proposed scheme to be the correct one for Dumfries to protect properties from flooding and also to encourage the regeneration of the Whitesands area and Dumfries town centre.
"We consistently maintained this position throughout the council election period and nothing has changed.
"However, we are content to ask the Scottish government to hold a public inquiry, which the government would fund, to give the public another opportunity to express their views through a mechanism that will be entirely independent of the council."
Depute leader Rob Davidson said the SNP had committed to revisit the scheme in its manifesto.
"We believe that the best way of doing this is through an independent public inquiry, to which the public will be encouraged to give evidence, and the outcome of which would have legal standing," he said.
"Rather than rely on the flood scheme promotion process to decide whether or not such a public inquiry might happen, we have agreed with our administration partners that we should make sure that it does by asking the Scottish government to hold one.
"We would then implement the findings of that inquiry."
He said they believed the Whitesands should have a flood protection scheme but it had to be the right one for the town.
"A public inquiry would be the best way to ensure we end up with the right scheme," he said. 
Summarize: 
The council has decided to ask the Scottish government to hold a public inquiry into the proposed flood protection scheme for the Whitesands area of Dumfries.
The council has been asked to take the scheme forward and it looked set to progress to construction.
However, the new administration said it felt an inquiry was now the best way for the public to express its views.
Leader Elaine Murray said: "The Labour group of councillors continues to consider the proposed scheme to be the correct one for Dumfries to protect properties from flooding and also to encourage the regeneration of the Whitesands area and Dumfries town centre.
"We
A row erupted between senior Welsh Tories after it emerged neither Welsh Conservative leader Andrew RT Davies nor Welsh Secretary Alun Cairns were taking part in a BBC Wales leaders' debate.
While Mrs May was criticised for not taking part in the UK debates, three different leaders took part in the ones in Wales, with a party source describing the situation as a shambles.
Don't mention Jeremy
First Minister Carwyn Jones was accused of seeking to airbrush Jeremy Corbyn out of Labour's campaign in Wales after failing to refer to him once when he launched the party's Welsh campaign.
Mr Jones said it was a Welsh event and he was fronting the campaign in Wales.
Pressed in the assembly on Tuesday, he said Mr Corbyn would make "an excellent prime minister".
Who's Natalie?
Paul Nuttall called Plaid Cymru leader Leanne Wood Natalie twice during an ITV debate, much to her annoyance.
Songs and drugs and rock'n'roll
Ms Wood admitted smoking cannabis in her youth and sang to Catatonia in the Victoria Derbyshire programme's "van share" series.
Devo acrobatics
Many parties were accused of playing fast and loose with what Westminster was and was not responsible for, and confusing voters in the process.
But, to give the party a mention, we will use Lib Dem leader Tim Farron as an example.
He attacked Conservative social care policy while visiting Wales, even though it only applies in England, insisting Tory plans had implications for cross-border farms. 
Summarize: 
The Welsh Conservative Party has been accused of trying to airbrush Jeremy Corbyn out of Labour's campaign in Wales.
Paul Nuttall called Plaid Cymru leader Leanne Wood Natalie twice during an ITV debate, much to her annoyance.
Songs and drugs and rock'n'roll
Ms Wood admitted smoking cannabis in her youth and sang to Catatonia in the Victoria Derbyshire programme's "van share" series.
Devo acrobatics
Many parties were accused of playing fast and loose with what Westminster was and was not responsible for, and confusing voters in the process.
But, to give the
The 18-year-old woman was attacked outside a Primark store on Princes Street at about 04:00 on Saturday.
Police described the attack as "a horrendous sexual assault" and said a 20-year-old man has since been arrested and charged over the incident.
He is expected to appear at Edinburgh Sheriff Court on Monday.
A force spokesman said: "The public are thanked for their assistance during this investigation." 
Summarize: 
A 20-year-old man has been arrested and charged in connection with an incident in Edinburgh on Saturday morning.
The man, who is from Edinburgh, was arrested at an address in the city at around 12:30 on Sunday.
He is expected to appear at Edinburgh Sheriff Court on Monday.
The 18-year-old woman was attacked outside a Primark store on Princes Street at about 04:00 on Saturday.
Police described the attack as "a horrendous sexual assault" and said a 20-year-old man has since been arrested and charged over the incident.
He is expected to appear at
The Astana rider finished 52 seconds ahead of Colombia's Esteban Chaves (Orica) in the overall standings with Alejandro Valverde (Movistar) third.
Fellow Italian Giacomo Nizzolo (Trek) was stripped of victory in the final stage after deviating from his sprint line in a bunch finish.
Germany's Nikias Arndt (Giant) was handed the victory.
Nibali was battered and bruised after a terrible performance in last Sunday's uphill time trial and Tuesday's mountain stage to Andalo, but when all seemed lost he hit back in style.
He won solo in Risoul on Friday when overall leader Steven Kruijswijk crashed, and he put the hammer down on Saturday by dropping his closest rivals Valverde and  Chaves, who had been wearing the leader's pink jersey.
Nibali is one of only six men to win all three Grand Tours - the 2013 Giro, 2010 Vuelta and 2014 Tour de France crowns.
His team considered pulling him from the race earlier this week after his mediocre form saw him slip out of contention.
Stage 21 result:
1.  Nikias Arndt (Ger/Giant) 3hrs 48mins 18secs
2.  Matteo Trentin (Ita/Etixx-Quick-Step) Same time
3.  Sacha Modolo (Ita/Lampre) Same time
4.  Alexander Porsev (Rus/Katusha) Same time
5   Sean De Bie (Ger/Lotto) Same time
Final general classification:
1.  Vincenzo Nibali (Ita/Astana) 86hrs 32mins 49secs
2.  Esteban Chaves (Col/Orica) +52secs
3.  Alejandro Valverde (Spa /Movistar) +1min 17secs
4.  Steven Kruijswijk (Ned/LottoNL) +1min 50secs
5.  Rafal Majka (Pol/Tinkoff) +4mins 37secs 
Summarize: 
The Astana rider finished 52 seconds ahead of Colombia's Esteban Chaves (Orica) in the overall standings with Alejandro Valverde (Movistar) third.
Fellow Italian Giacomo Nizzolo (Trek) was stripped of victory in the final stage after deviating from his sprint line in a bunch finish.
Germany's Nikias Arndt (Giant) was handed the victory.
Nibali was battered and bruised after a terrible performance in last Sunday's uphill time trial and Tuesday's mountain stage to Andalo, but when all seemed lost he hit back in style.
In recent days that pressure has taken the shape of calls from the Liberal Democrats and Labour, and campaign groups like Save the Children, to open Britain's doors to 3,000 children, alone and potentially in danger on the migrant trail in Europe.
Today, just hours after the PM was accused of a "disgraceful" tone towards those in need, calling them a 'bunch of migrants', the government has given a partial answer to its critics.
There will be more cash and support for aid agencies to provide help for under 18s who are already caught up in the chaos and travelling across Europe.
The government is also open to resettling more child refugees in the UK. But they have stopped short of accepting more of those who are already in Europe, maybe even just across the Channel.
Instead, they are echoing the decision they took in the summer and may  allow more refugees under 18 to come here directly from the war-torn areas around Syria. Crucially, the government won't put a number on how many extra children will be allowed to come.
Sources indicate that the number will not significantly increase the current commitment to resettle 20,000 refugees from the region over the next five years. There was even discussion inside government over whether the overall number should increase at all.
There has been nervousness in government about the precedent it would set to take many more refugees from Europe, that could encourage more people to make the dangerous journey in the first place.
But the fact that the government has shifted its position at all displays how the demands of this crisis are affecting political decision-making here.
And just as the tempo picks up in David Cameron's testing renegotiations of our relationship with the rest of the European Union, the government's attitude to dealing with migration is in sharp focus. Ministers fear a backdrop of a seemingly chaotic migration on the continent could make their deal-making, and the eventual referendum campaign, even harder. 
Summarize:  The UK government will not increase the number of refugees it will accept from the Middle East and North Africa. However, the UK government will increase the number of refugees it will accept from Europe.
The UK government will not increase the number of refugees it will accept from the Middle East and North Africa. However, the UK government will increase the number of refugees it will accept from Europe.
The UK government will not increase the number of refugees it will accept from the Middle East and North Africa. However, the UK government will increase the number of refugees it will accept from Europe.
The UK government will not increase the number of refugees it
Luke Cowan-Dickie was training with his club Exeter Chiefs when his Mercedes was caught by a speed camera in August.
Cowan-Dickie, from Exminster, Devon, denied the speeding offence and a second count of failing to identify the driver of the car
He told Exeter Magistrates' Court a letter identifying his agent as the driver went missing in the post.
More on the hearing and other Devon and Cornwall news
The court heard the front row forward's car was filmed doing 55mph in a 30mph zone at West Clyst, Devon.
Cowan-Dickie said his agent had borrowed the car for a few days and it was him behind the wheel when the offence took place.
He said he did reply to a letter from the Safety Camera Partnership and informed them his agent was driving his car.
But, the court heard, the organisation did not receive his reply and Cowan-Dickie said he then did not receive a reminder in November.
He said neighbours on his new-build estate had previously brought round post addressed to him but sent to the wrong number house, explaining "the name was right, the number was wrong".
His lawyer Richard Saynor said his client "is not hiding anything at all and [had] no reason to lie".
"Things go missing in the post," he said.
Magistrates cleared the player saying: "There are circumstances when the postal system falls down." 
Summarize: 
Cowan-Dickie was training with his club Exeter Chiefs when his Mercedes was caught by a speed camera in August.
Cowan-Dickie, from Exminster, Devon, denied the speeding offence and a second count of failing to identify the driver of the car.
He told Exeter Magistrates' Court a letter identifying his agent as the driver went missing in the post.
More on the hearing and other Devon and Cornwall news
The court heard the front row forward's car was filmed doing 55mph in a 30mph zone at West Clyst, Devon.
Cowan-Dickie said his agent had
Her back catalogue has appeared on TIDAL, the Sweden-based company Jay Z dropped £37m for two weeks ago.
As any good Swiftie knows, Taylor had her differences with Spotify, and what it paid for her music.
She pulled her back catalogue saying there was an "inherent value placed on art" when it came to her work.
Now they appear to have re-emerged on TIDAL.
All of Taylor's tracks, including her albums Red, 1989, and Fearless can be found by searching her name.
The rapper's company, Project Panther, took over Sweden-based Aspiro for a reported $56m (£37m) on 13 March.
The firm owned WiMP - which rivals Spotify in some countries - and TIDAL (which streams music in HD).
If the rumours are true, Jay Z did his homework before he bought the service.
He apparently called a "summit" during Grammy week with some of the biggest names in music, including Chris Martin, Madonna, Nicki Minaj and, of course, Beyonce.
Lawyers and music execs were there too, to discuss streaming and, according to Forbes magazine, how to make it work better for artists.
The move will put Jay Z in competition with Beats Music, founded by Dr Dre and bought by Apple in 2014.
Tidal currently offers users access to 25 million tracks, in addition to 75,000 music videos and other content including artist interviews, for £19.99 per month.
That contrasts with Spotify's charge of £9.99 per month for 30 million tracks.
Follow @BBCNewsbeat on Twitter, BBCNewsbeat on Instagram and Radio1Newsbeat on YouTube 
Summarize:  Taylor Swift is now on Tidal.
The three-deck boat sank near the Libyan coast three weeks ago, in what the UN has called the deadliest ever incident in the Mediterranean.
On Wednesday, the Italian navy said it had found a boat 375m (1,230 feet) below on the sea bed.
Sicilian prosecutors, who are investigating the tragedy, must now decide whether it will be raised.
Only 28 people survived after the boat crashed into a merchant ship - four were children. Rescuers found only 24 bodies at the scene.
Italian prosecutors say the migrants paid between $700 (Â£460) and $7,000 (Â£4,600) to be on board, having been forced to stay on a farm in Libya for up to a month before the journey.
While there, prosecutors say, the migrants were subject to abuse and there are reports of deaths due to violence and exhaustion.
On Thursday, the navy said it had found a blue, 25-metre (86 foot) boat on the sea bed that matched the description of the vessel that sank.
Two men - the boat's Tunisian captain and a crew member - are being investigated on a number of charges, including suspected culpable homicide and illegal confinement.
The UN says 60,000 people have tried to cross the Mediterranean so far this year. Close to 1,800 people have died trying to reach Europe.
In the most recent reported incident, 100 migrants were brought to Sicily on Wednesday evening following a rescue. They said their boat had been adrift near the island for 12 days, the last two of which without food and water. 
Summarize: 
The boat was found on the sea bed in the Mediterranean.
It was found in the Mediterranean.
The boat was found on the sea bed in the Mediterranean.
The boat was found on the sea bed in the Mediterranean.
The boat was found on the sea bed in the Mediterranean.
The boat was found on the sea bed in the Mediterranean.
The boat was found on the sea bed in the Mediterranean.
The boat was found on the sea bed in the Mediterranean.
The boat was found on the sea bed in the Mediterranean.
The boat was found on the sea bed in the Mediterranean.
The
England play Australia on Saturday and a win will equal the record 14-match winning streak set by Johnson's men.
"We had a very experienced team at that point," Johnson, 46, told BBC Sport.
"You've got a group now who have been around for a couple of World Cups, and have got a lot of caps."
As England team manager from 2008 to 2011, Johnson was responsible for giving the likes of captain Dylan Hartley and scrum-half Ben Youngs their Test debuts.
Both are now integral parts of the set-up, with Hartley leading the side throughout 2016 and Youngs a consistent presence at scrum-half.
"Players like Ben Youngs and captain Dylan Hartley have 50 caps-plus, so they are getting into the part of their careers when they are at their peak," added Johnson, who was recently inducted into the World Rugby Hall of Fame.
"We still need more players to come through and really hit that world-class level, and when you have a squad of 20-plus guys like that, you have a chance to really do something."
A year ago, England were knocked out of their home World Cup at the group stage, but recovered to win the Grand Slam the following spring.
And Johnson, who won 84 England caps, feels the players have used their setbacks as motivation.
"They have had some disappointments like we all do, and you either fall away or use them to motivate yourself," he added.
"I hope they are enjoying what they are doing. When you are winning it does create that momentum of good fun, and everyone wants to be in the group."
Twice a captain of the British and Irish Lions, Johnson hopes England's success will have a big impact on next year's tour to New Zealand.
"It's a Lions year and it would be great to see a whole chunk of Englishmen go on that tour," he said. 
Summarize: 
England have won 14 consecutive Tests since losing to Australia in the 2015 Rugby World Cup final.
England have won the last five Tests at Twickenham by an average margin of 24 points.
England have won their last six Tests against Australia at Twickenham by an average margin of 25 points.
England have won their last six Tests against Australia at Twickenham by an average margin of 25 points.
England have won their last six Tests against Australia at Twickenham by an average margin of 25 points.
England have won their last six Tests against Australia at Twickenham by an average margin of 25 points.
The American, who won 2010 Olympic downhill gold and two World Championship titles, says she wants to see where she stands.
Vonn is campaigning to compete at a World Cup race at Lake Louise in Alberta, Canada in 2018.
"I train with the men all the time and I really enjoy it," she said.
"They push me to be a better skier. I always find myself skiing my best when I'm skiing against them.
"I pick their brain, I see what they're doing and I, in turn, ski faster."
Vonn's request has been previously rejected by the International Ski Federation in 2012, who stated "one gender is not entitled to participate in races of the other".
However, she in developing a proposal with US Ski Team alpine director Patrick Riml to put her case forward again for November 2018.
"I know I'm not going to win, but I would like to at least have the opportunity to try," Vonn said in an interview with the Denver Post.
"I think I've won enough World Cup races (76). I should have enough respect within the industry to be able to have that opportunity."
Vonn returned to competitive racing for the first time in 322 days on Sunday, finishing 13th at the World Cup event at Austria's Altenmarkt-Zauchensee resort. 
Summarize:  Vonn is the best female skier in the world. She is the most decorated female skier in the history of the sport. She is the most decorated female athlete in any sport in the history of the world. She is the most decorated female athlete in the history of the United States. She is the most decorated female athlete in the history of the Olympics. She is the most decorated female athlete in the history of the Winter Olympics. She is the most decorated female athlete in the history of the Winter Olympics. She is the most decorated female athlete in the history of the Winter Olympics. She is the most decorated female athlete in the history
A Misuse of Drugs Act warrant was carried out for the premises in Chulmleigh, Devon, on Friday morning.
Sgt Dave MacFadden said police and neighbourhood teams had acted "directly on community intelligence".
One man is currently helping police with their enquiries and awaits interview. 
Summarize: 
"The address was searched and a quantity of cannabis was recovered.
"A man aged in his 40s was arrested on suspicion of possession of a controlled drug with intent to supply.
"He was taken to Torquay Police Station and remains in custody.
"A man aged in his 40s was arrested on suspicion of possession of a controlled drug with intent to supply.
"He was taken to Torquay Police Station and remains in custody.
"A man aged in his 40s was arrested on suspicion of possession of a controlled drug with intent to supply.
"He
They owe their semi-final advantage to clinical finishing by Mark McGuigan, Willie Gibson and Andy Stirling.
McGuigan and Gibson both scored twice, with Stirling hitting the net in style with a 20-yard screamer.
Livingston had led through Jordan White and Liam Buchanan's header helped reduce the deficit in the second half.
When White's 15th goal of the season put Livi ahead from eight yards early on, few would have predicted a final score of 5-2 to the hosts.
But a controlled side-footed finish by McGuigan, Stirling's lovely left-foot strike and a sublime low, curled free-kick by Gibson meant the Blues were 3-1 up at the break.
Stranraer were under pressure at the start of the second-half and Livingston's Buchanan popped up with a header to reduce the deficit.
But two minutes later McGuigan pounced to finish off Craig Malcolm's effort that had come back off a post, then the in-form Gibson's low centre found its way into the back of the net via a deflection.
Livi goalkeeper Marc McCallum saved well from Calvin Kemp and Kyle Turner in added time to prevent Stranraer increasing their lead further. 
Summarize:  Livingston 5 Stranraer 2.
Livingston were the first team to score in the final, with a goal from Jordan White.
The Blues were awarded a penalty after a foul on Jordan White, but Andy Stirling's spot-kick was saved by Stranraer goalkeeper Scott Gallacher.
The visitors had the better of the first half, with Stirling and Andy Stirling both going close.
Livingston took the lead in the second half when Jordan White scored from the penalty spot.
Stranraer equalised with a penalty of their own, but Livingston's Andy Stirling scored from the spot
The National, which was launched after last year's Scottish independence referendum, had previously been available from Monday to Friday.
It printed its first Saturday edition a week ago, after the general election.
The paper's editor, Richard Walker, said the response had been so good they had decided to continue with the weekend edition.
He said the management team behind The National had certain expectations when it was launched, and the paper had exceeded those.
Mr Walker, who also edits the Sunday Herald, said: "For now, The National will be printed every Saturday as long as there is a public demand for it.
"Although people also get their news from the internet and from other sources there's still a clear demand for newspapers.
"And there's a particular demand for a newspaper like the National which looks at things through a certain prism, which in our case is a support for independence which is not a view which is expressed in any other newspaper in Scotland, apart from the Sunday Herald." 
Summarize: 
The National is a weekly newspaper published in Scotland. It is owned by the Scottish National Party.
The National was launched after last year's Scottish independence referendum.
The National was launched after last year's Scottish independence referendum.
The National was launched after last year's Scottish independence referendum.
The National is a weekly newspaper published in Scotland. It is owned by the Scottish National Party.
The National was launched after last year's Scottish independence referendum.
The National was launched after last year's Scottish independence referendum.
The National is a weekly newspaper published in Scotland. It is owned by the Scottish National Party.
The National
Amanda Clark, 42, who has served with the Royal Logistics Corps for 22 years, is the newest Yeoman of the Guard.
The Burnley-born soldier said: "It didn't really hit me until the first time I wore the uniform and realised I am now part of the Tower's history."
The first female Beefeater was Moira Cameron, from Argyll, in 2007.
Warrant Officer Clark said: "Waking up at the Tower of London is magical. Every morning I wake up and the Tower looks so peaceful."
She added: "I can't stop smiling."
The Yeoman Warders are descended from the ancient band of warders who guarded the gates and royal prisoners early in the Tower's history.
Their modern duties mix a traditional ceremonial role with leading tours for visitors.
They are still extraordinary members of the Queen's bodyguard and, to qualify, applicants must have served at least 22 years in the armed forces, hold the long service and good conduct medal and reached the level of Warrant Officer. 
Summarize: 
"The Yeoman Warders are descended from the ancient band of warders who guarded the gates and royal prisoners early in the Tower's history. Their modern duties mix a traditional ceremonial role with leading tours for visitors. They are still extraordinary members of the Queen's bodyguard and, to qualify, applicants must have served at least 22 years in the armed forces, hold the long service and good conduct medal and reached the level of Warrant Officer."
The Yeoman Warders are the oldest military unit in the Tower of London, and are responsible for the security of the Tower and its contents. The Yeoman Warders are also responsible
The Bluebirds looked to have secured the win when Kenneth Zohore scored with two minutes left at Brentford, but Sullay Kaikai levelled in added-time.
In their last match, Cardiff lost to Barnsley via a late goal and Warnock rounded on his men this time.
"I would not want one or two of them in the trenches with me," said Warnock.
Peter Whittingham scored from the penalty spot to put the visitors ahead before Kaikai levelled with his first to set up the late drama at Griffin Park.
The Bluebirds have kept  just two clean-sheets all season and, as the transfer window approaches, Warnock warned he was ready to make changes.
"It's the desire to keep your goal intact when you are 2-1 up," said Warnock.
"That's the difference between top players and what I call average players.
"At a crucial time today we had average players in certain areas and we got punished.
"I just think it's desire, you want to stop a cross, you stop a cross, you get hit in the face, don't you?  But it's too easy against us at times.
"That's disappointing. The 90th minute and we can't hold on? That's Sunday league.
"It's not long till January now. Nothing's in place, it's not easy to do business in January, but I know where I want to improve the squad, put it that way."
Goalkeeper Brain Murphy pulled off a string of good saves to be among the players who managed to impress Warnock.
Murphy was making his Cardiff debut at the age of 33 after Warnock dropped Ben Amos following a string of disappointing showings in goal.
"Murphy should get a lot of praise," added the Bluebirds' boss.
"Okay, he did a bad kick for the goal (late equaliser), but his mates should have got him out it with the saves he pulled off.
"I've got Murphy in goal now and I thought he played well and it was a good decision.
"I've been disappointed in quite a few goals and we decided to make the change. You can read into that what you want." 
Summarize: 
"I thought we were excellent, we were excellent in the first half. I thought we were excellent in the second half.
"I thought we were excellent in the first half. I thought we were excellent in the second half.
"I thought we were excellent in the first half. I thought we were excellent in the second half.
"I thought we were excellent in the first half. I thought we were excellent in the second half.
"I thought we were excellent in the first half. I thought we were excellent in the second half.
"I thought we were excellent in the first half. I
Wales basked in sunshine on Saturday with top temperatures of 27°C (80F) in Hawarden, Flintshire, and 25°C (77F) in Cardiff with beaches packed.
It was a cooler 18°C (64F) at Mumbles Head, Swansea.
BBC Wales forecaster Derek Brockway tweeted: "Super sunny Sunday. Very warm or hot with sea breezes."
Sunday is predicted by some to be the hottest June 18 on record in the UK.
While the BBC weather forecast says Wales will be "hot and sunny day with light winds", it did warn of a "very slight chance that the heat will trigger an isolated thundery shower during the afternoon."
BBC Wales presenter Behnaz Akhgar warned the public: "Take care. High UV and high pollen count."
As temperatures soared on Sunday, mountain rescuers helped a black Labrador after its paws got hot while being walked in Snowdonia.
The dog was being walked by two men when it started struggling on Glyder Fach at about 13:50 BST.
Volunteers from Ogwen Valley Mountain Rescue tied bandages around its paws during the three hour rescue.
Meanwhile in Swansea, firefighters are battling a grass fire on a cliff between Rotherslade Beach and Limeslade Bay in Mumbles.
Mid and West Fire Service were called to the blaze, which can be seen from the beaches, at 11.50. Three fire engines are at the scene. 
Summarize: 
The Met Office has issued a yellow warning of thunderstorms for Wales, which is in effect from 10:00 on Monday until 10:00 on Tuesday.
The Met Office has issued a yellow warning of thunderstorms for Wales, which is in effect from 10:00 on Monday until 10:00 on Tuesday.
The Met Office has issued a yellow warning of thunderstorms for Wales, which is in effect from 10:00 on Monday until 10:00 on Tuesday.
The Met Office has issued a yellow warning of thunderstorms for Wales, which is in effect from 10:00 on Monday until 10:
Daniel Toy, 24, stole the car from Camelford Police station in Cornwall on 8 October, Truro Crown Court heard.
He and his girlfriend, Samantha Poole, 31, drove it to Slough, Berkshire, before being stopped by a stinger.
Toy was jailed for two years and six months. Poole was given a 15 month sentence but was released due to time already spent in custody.
Both have been disqualified from driving.
More on the stolen police car and other Devon and Cornwall news
Toy broke a window at an unmanned police station to get to the car keys before the pair drove about 230 miles along the A30, the M5 and then the M4.
After tracking and shadowing the vehicle, police eventually stopped it by using a stinger device at about 03:00 BST.
Poole drove the car most of the way to Bristol, clocking a top speed of 107mph.
Toy then took over, averaging 110mph but reaching 124mph on occasions.
They stopped at two service stations on their journey, on one occasion stealing two energy drinks and on another driving off without paying for fuel.
The court heard Toy undertook cars on the motorway and almost lost control in coned off areas.
For the four minutes before being stopped, the car's blue lights were activated.
Toy pleaded guilty to burglary, aggravated vehicle theft, driving while disqualified, making off without payment for fuel and for theft of a television.
Poole admitted making off without payment, taking a vehicle without authority and theft of a TV.
Judge Simon Carr said "this is some of the worst driving I've had to pass sentence on" and "it was mere luck nobody was killed as a result of what you did".
Devon and Cornwall Police declined to comment. 
Summarize: 
The stolen police car was used to commit a series of crimes in Devon and Cornwall, including the theft of a television and a car stereo.
The car was driven by Toy, who was sentenced to two years and six months in prison.
Toy's girlfriend, Poole, was sentenced to 15 months in prison.
The pair were both disqualified from driving for two years.
Toy had been on bail for the theft of the police car when he committed the other crimes.
The stolen police car was used to commit a series of crimes in Devon and Cornwall, including the theft of a television and a car stereo.
The inquiry comes after police were called to a disturbance between two men outside a gym on Chapel Lane, Wigan shortly before 20:45 BST on Friday.
Two men entered the gym, said Greater Manchester Police, with one apparently causing damage.
No arrests were made, but the Super League club say it was conducting its own inquiries.
Marketing director Simon Collinson issued a brief statement before the start of coach Shaun Wane's weekly press conference at the club's training ground at Orrell earlier.
He said: "We are carrying out an internal investigation and I would ask that no questions are put to Shaun that might compromise or prejudice those investigations.
"As soon as the investigations are complete, we will then issue a full statement."
The incident day after the Warriors beat Castleford 33-26.
GMP said: "Officers attended and spoke to all parties. Inquiries are ongoing but no arrests have been made." 
Summarize: 
"The club is aware of the incident and is conducting its own internal investigation. The club will not be making any further comment at this time."
The club is aware of the incident and is conducting its own internal investigation. The club will not be making any further comment at this time.
The club is aware of the incident and is conducting its own internal investigation. The club will not be making any further comment at this time.
The club is aware of the incident and is conducting its own internal investigation. The club will not be making any further comment at this time.
The club is aware of
The Natural Resources Defense Council (NRDC) said many sets were designed to perform well in government tests, but used more energy in regular use.
It said energy consumption could be twice the expected amount.
But the US Consumer Technology Association (CTA) said modern TVs were an "efficiency success story".
The NRDC said it found many television sets disabled energy saving features with little or no warning when a viewer adjusted other settings, such as the picture brightness.
It also found that a test video produced by the US Department of Energy to determine energy consumption typically used less energy than real-world television broadcasts.
The group suggested that the short scenes in the test video triggered screen dimming features in some televisions, lowering their energy use.
It also warned that energy efficiency tests did not analyse how a television performed when displaying high dynamic range (HDR) video.
HDR allows a much larger number of colours to be shown, but consumes more energy than standard high definition pictures. Manufacturers are gradually beginning to produce HDR-capable sets.
"In some cases, a TV's annual energy use will be twice the levels that manufacturers reported," said Noah Horowitz from the NRDC.
However, CTA president Gary Shapiro said "fundamental changes in video screen technology" meant television sets were now more energy efficient than before.
"Innovation is constantly driving TV models to become thinner, lighter and more energy efficient," he said.
He also defended the eco-friendly modes included on some sets, saying that they provided viewers with choice.
"The TV settings used in the energy efficiency testing processes can be and are used in the real world, unless consumers want a different viewing experience," he said.
A spokeswoman for the European Commission said: "The Commission is involved in discussions on a completely new test loop that will not only make defeat devices far more difficult to be conceived and implemented, but will also be able to capture different energy consumption patterns, such as displaying images in HDR that can dramatically improve picture quality but at the expense of a higher energy use." 
Summarize: 
The Natural Resources Defense Council (NRDC) said many sets were designed to perform well in government tests, but used more energy in regular use.
It said energy consumption could be twice the expected amount.
But the US Consumer Technology Association (CTA) said modern TVs were an "efficiency success story".
The NRDC said it found many television sets disabled energy saving features with little or no warning when a viewer adjusted other settings, such as the picture brightness.
It also found that a test video produced by the US Department of Energy to determine energy consumption typically used less energy than real-world television broadcasts.
The group
Stuart Campbell, 59, an uncle of the teenager, was jailed for life for her abduction and murder in 2002.
Danielle, 15, was last seen at a bus stop near her home in East Tilbury on 18 June 2001.
Ground penetrating radar is currently being used by Essex Police to scan the garage site in Stifford Clays.
Live: For more on this and other Essex stories
On Monday, Essex Police confirmed a "non specific" lead about the garages between Goddard Road and Crammavill Street had been passed to them in 2001.
However, despite this the garages were not searched at the time.
Assistant Chief Constable Steve Worron, head of the Kent and Essex Serious Crime Directorate, said on the second day of the latest search: "I'm pleased with the progress we've made so far and today the focus of our activity is to work with some national search specialists and forensic archaeologists to identify once and for all whether Danielle's body has been buried here for the last 16 years.
"That work will include the use of ground-penetrating radar (GPR) and there will also be some excavation work that will be undertaken following the GPR work under way at the moment."
"It's important for me to stress, I put no timescale about how long the work is going to take to complete."
Campbell, a builder and father-of-two, was told he would serve at least 20 years of his life sentence for murder.
He was also sentenced to 10 years for Danielle's abduction, which he is serving concurrently.
Campbell will be eligible for parole in four years' time. 
Summarize:  "The police have been searching the site for years, but have never found any evidence of a body.
"The police have been searching the site for years, but have never found any evidence of a body.
"The police have been searching the site for years, but have never found any evidence of a body.
"The police have been searching the site for years, but have never found any evidence of a body.
"The police have been searching the site for years, but have never found any evidence of a body.
"The police have been searching the site for years, but have never found any evidence of
The makers of children's TV programmes Spot, Humf and Deer Little Forest previously announced plans to develop a new series from a base on Skye.
It also emerged last month that it will hold free workshops for artists next month and in January as part of an effort to create a local workforce.
Gaelic language college Sabhal MÃ²r Ostaig UHI will host the training.
King Rollo Films said the new animated series, which will be offered in Gaelic and English, could be ready within three years.
The studio's Leo Nielsen said: "This is just the start. We hope to create an animation unit that will develop and expand in years to come, producing films to entertain families around the world.
"In the process, it will create exciting and sustainable creative jobs rooted in the Highlands."
Amanda Millen, Gaelic-speaking director of the XpoNorth network which is supporting the training programme, said: "This is exactly the kind of ambitious project which should be taking root in places such as Skye.
"We are very happy to be in at the start, helping turn it all into a reality." 
Summarize: 
Skye Film Studios, a new animation studio, will be based in the Highlands of Scotland.
The studio will be based in a former Royal Navy base in the village of Portree, on the Isle of Skye.
The studio will be run by a team of animators and directors, and will be based in a former Royal Navy base in the village of Portree, on the Isle of Skye.
The studio will be run by a team of animators and directors, and will be based in a former Royal Navy base in the village of Portree, on the Isle of Skye.
The studio will
It appeared on Saturday along a mile of beach between Gorleston and Hopton.
The oil was originally washed ashore from a tanker, the Eleni V, which sank off the coast in 1978.
Graham Plant, from Great Yarmouth Borough Council, said about a metre of sand had been eroded but the oil would be covered again once the tide turned.
More than 5,000 tonnes of fuel was washed up along a 20-mile stretch of the east coast when the Greek-registered ship got into difficulties and then capsized after colliding with the bulk carrier Roseline.
Some of the oil was taken to landfill sites but oil which could not be accessed by machinery was removed by hand and buried in trenches at the back of beaches, which the council said was the government's approved method of disposal at the time.
Three of the trenches were exposed on Saturday after two days of stormy weather.
"A thin layer of fine oil residue from these trenches has been deposited along the shoreline at Gorleston beach," a council spokesman said.
A tractor is to be brought in to skim the worst of the oil off the beach.
"The borough council will continue to monitor the situation. Providing there are no further severe storms the trenches are expected to be covered again by sand within the next few days," the spokesman said.
"This is not a significant quantity of oil, however people are advised to keep away from the water's edge until the work has been completed to avoid getting oil on their shoes, clothing and pets," he added.
Warning signs were erected at Gorleston seafront at the weekend. 
Summarize: 
The Eleni V was a Greek-registered bulk carrier, built in 1976 at the Mitsubishi shipyard in Japan.
She was owned by the Greek company, Hellenic Bulk Carriers, and operated under the flag of Greece.
On the night of August 6, 1978, the Eleni V was sailing from the port of Piraeus, Greece, to the port of Antwerp, Belgium, with a cargo of oil.
The ship was on a voyage from the port of Piraeus, Greece, to the port of Antwerp, Belgium, with a cargo of oil.
The ship was on a
Kinnear joins from West Ham, where he had also been managing director, and presided over the club's move from Upton Park to the London Stadium.
The move comes in the same week as Andrea Radrizzani's takeover of the Championship club.
"Angus has an excellent track record at Arsenal and West Ham and I am sure he will contribute a great deal to the club," Radrizzani said.
Kinnear was with the Hammers for three years and spent the previous decade at Arsenal as their director of marketing, sales and partnerships.
Outgoing Leeds chief executive Ben Mansford steps down on 31 May, with Kinnear taking up his new role on 8 June.
Leeds are looking for a new first-team manager after Garry Monk's resignation on Thursday. 
Summarize: 
"Kinnear will be responsible for the day-to-day running of the club, including the recruitment and retention of first-team players, and will report to Radrizzani."
"Kinnear will be responsible for the day-to-day running of the club, including the recruitment and retention of first-team players, and will report to Radrizzani."
"Kinnear will be responsible for the day-to-day running of the club, including the recruitment and retention of first-team players, and will report to Radrizzani."
"Kinn
The unnamed woman, employed as an operator for two months, reportedly admitted it was not the first time she had dozed off on the job.
The speeding metro train jumped its tracks at O'Hare International Airport and hurtled up an escalator.
None of the injuries at the busy airport were said to be serious.
"She did admit that she dozed off prior to entering the station," National Transportation Safety Board investigator Ted Turpin said during a news conference on Wednesday.
Mr Turpin said the woman often worked an erratic shift schedule.
She was reportedly disciplined in February after falling asleep on the job as her train partially missed a station.
The woman is said to be co-operating with investigators. 
Summarize: 
A woman was fired from her job as a train operator at O'Hare International Airport after she was caught sleeping on the job.
The woman, who was employed by the Chicago Transit Authority, was fired after she was caught sleeping on the job at the airport.
She was caught sleeping on the job at O'Hare International Airport.
The woman, who was employed by the Chicago Transit Authority, was fired after she was caught sleeping on the job at the airport.
She was caught sleeping on the job at O'Hare International Airport.
The woman, who was employed by the Chicago Transit Authority,
A gunman was shot dead in Paris on Thursday after killing a policeman.
Ms Le Pen has pledged to expel radical Islamists and restore border checks.
Another frontrunner, Emmanuel Macron, stressed that France must not panic, because that would play into the terrorists' hands.
The late-night attack on the capital's famous Champs Elysees Avenue, which also left two officers wounded, made security a pressing issue ahead of Sunday's first round of voting in the presidential election.
Paris gunman was 'on police terror radar'
Who are the candidates?
French election quick guide
Election explained in five charts
The main candidates called off rallies on what would have been the final day of campaigning.
Former conservative Prime Minister FranÃ§ois Fillon said the next president's priority should be fighting "Islamist totalitarianism".
Ms Le Pen, leader of the National Front (FN), called for France's border controls to be reinstated immediately, and for foreigners on security watch lists to be expelled.
Security officials say the gunman was known to them and his home in Chelles, in the eastern suburbs of Paris, has been searched. He had been identified as a potential radical Islamist.
The so-called Islamic State group has said it was behind the attack in Paris - a city still scarred by bloody IS attacks in 2015.
"We must fight barbarism - none of the French governments for the past 10 years has done enough," Ms Le Pen said.
She spoke of "incredible lapses in the justice system".
Speaking on RTL radio, the liberal centrist Mr Macron told French voters they should "not allow fear to be exploited" by terrorists.
"The assailants want death, symbolism, to sow panic, to disrupt the democratic process - the presidential election," he said.
An Elabe opinion poll, carried out before the shooting on the Champs Elysees, showed Mr Macron with 24% in the first round, and Ms Le Pen falling back slightly to 21.5%.
Mr Fillon was close behind on 20% and the far left's Jean-Luc MÃ©lenchon on 19.5%. 
Summarize: 
A gunman was shot dead in Paris on Thursday after killing a policeman.
Ms Le Pen has pledged to expel radical Islamists and restore border checks.
Another frontrunner, Emmanuel Macron, stressed that France must not panic, because that would play into the terrorists' hands.
The late-night attack on the capital's famous Champs Elysees Avenue, which also left two officers wounded, made security a pressing issue ahead of Sunday's first round of voting in the presidential election.
Paris gunman was 'on police terror radar'
Who are the candidates?
French election quick guide
Election explained in five charts
The main
Kock, 26, has won two caps for the Springboks and joins from Super Rugby side Stormers on a two-year deal.
Maitland moves to Allianz Park from relegated London Irish and has agreed a "long-term contract" with Sarries.
The 27-year-old, who can also play at full-back, has featured 21 times for Scotland since his debut in 2013.
"We identified Vincent as a player who could make a significant contribution to the squad at tight-head and he is a player with huge potential," Saracens director of rugby Mark McCall said.
"Sean is a highly experienced and proven international three-quarter, and we believe that he will flourish here.
"Both players are exactly the kind of characters we think will thrive in our environment, and we are confident they will become key players." 
Summarize: 
Saracens announced the signing of two players from the Aviva Premiership on Friday, with the club announcing the signing of England internationals Chris Ashton and Owen Farrell.
Ashton, 27, has signed a two-year deal with the reigning European champions, while Farrell, 21, has agreed a three-year deal.
"We are delighted to have secured the signatures of two of the best players in the Premiership," Saracens director of rugby Mark McCall said.
"Chris is a proven international player and has been a key member of England's squad over the last few years.
"O
Trains travelling at speeds of up to 250 mph will connect London with Manchester and Leeds by the year 2032.
So the Newsround team have been taking a look at five of the fastest trains on the planet...
The snappily named CRH380A train (CRH stands for China Railway High-speed!) holds the Guinness World Record for the world's fastest passenger train.
It hit a top speed of 302.05 mph in December 2010, on a stretch of track between Zaozhuang city in Shandong Province and Bengbu city in eastern Anhui Province.
'Floating' maglev (short for magnetically levitated) trains don't have wheels - they use magnetic power to lift them and propel them along the tracks.
A MLX01 maglev train in Japan reached a whopping 361 mph on a test track in December 2003. These trains aren't currently carrying passengers in Japan yet.
Japan is famous for its super speedy and stylish bullet trains, which were launched in 1964.
A Japanese bullet train holds the record of fastest average speed on a train journey - the 500 Series Nozomi reached an average speed of 162.7 mph on the 119-mile line between Hiroshima and Kokura on the island of Honshu.
French people have been enjoying 200 mph rail travel since 1981 with TGV, which stands for Train Ã  Grande Vitesse ("high speed train" in English).
A type of TGV called V150 holds the record for the highest speed on any national rail system - it hit a whopping 357.2 mph in April 2007.
One for fans of more traditional train travel - this is Mallard, the world's fastest steam train!
The A4 class locomotive achieved a speed of 126 mph, hauling seven coaches weighing 243 tonnes down Stoke Bank, near Essendine, between Grantham and Peterborough on 3 July 1938.
Mallard is now on display at the National Railway Museum in York, but three other A4s are in operation in the UK. 
Summarize:  The Newsround team have been taking a look at five of the fastest trains on the planet.
The Newsround team have been taking a look at five of the fastest trains on the planet.
The snappily named CRH380A train (CRH stands for China Railway High-speed!) holds the Guinness World Record for the world's fastest passenger train.
It hit a top speed of 302.05 mph in December 2010, on a stretch of track between Zaozhuang city in Shandong Province and Bengbu city in eastern Anhui Province.
'Floating' maglev (short
Sam Vokes looked to have scored the winning goal against his former club before Batth's intervention from Nathan Byrne's corner earned a deserved point.
The hosts had failed to register a shot on target until Wales striker Vokes headed in Joey Barton's cross.
His goal came after Jack Price struck the post for Wolves from 30 yards.
Burnley remain four points clear at the top of the table, with Brighton leapfrogging Middlesbrough into second place with a 2-1 win at MK Dons.
Defeat would have been harsh on Wolves, who have lost only one of their past five games and remain 12th in the table.
George Saville had a shot blocked by Clarets defender Ben Mee during a goalless first half, while both Jed Wallace and Conor Coady went close for the visitors before Vokes' 13th league goal of the season put Burnley ahead.
Ten of those goals have come since 12 January, with Vokes and strike partner Andre Gray contributing 33 between them for Burnley in the Championship this term.
Burnley boss Sean Dyche: "People need to remember that despite our position, nobody comes here just to lay down and roll over.
"Nothing ever comes easy for us here or when we're playing away from home.
"We're still clear at the top and we're still on a long unbeaten run. As long as we don't put too much pressure on ourselves then we'll continue to be OK.
"There's pressure everywhere in football, but we're not feeling any here."
Media playback is not supported on this device
Wolves head coach Kenny Jackett: "Burnley are a really good side and they started well in the opening 10 or 15 minutes, but we rode it through and were right in the game at half-time.
"I suppose at the end of it you've got to decide whether it's a glass half-full result or a glass half-empty.
"It's definitely the first one for me because there were a lot of good performances out there.
"We had chances here, and we didn't take them. That has to be better and it's something we will be working on during the week." 
Summarize:  Wolves 0-0 Burnley
Wolves are now unbeaten in their past five games in all competitions, having lost only one of their past six.
Burnley have won their past three home games in all competitions, having lost their previous four.
Wolves have won only one of their past six games against Burnley, drawing three and losing three.
Burnley have won their past three games against Wolves, drawing two and losing one.
Burnley have won their past four home games in all competitions, having lost their previous three.
Wolves have won only one of their past five games
The NFL said it had found "no credible evidence" the players were provided with or used prohibited substances.
The allegations of doping were made by Al-Jazeera America in December.
Pittsburgh linebacker Harrison and Green Bay linebackers Matthews and Peppers met investigators last week.
Al-Jazeera had also reported that free agent Mike Neal and quarterback Peyton Manning were supplied with performance-enhancing drugs.
The NFL cleared Super Bowl winner Manning of wrongdoing in July but has yet to announce details of its investigation into Neal. 
Summarize:  The NFL's investigation into the allegations of doping by the Green Bay Packers players was announced on December 6, 2015. The NFL said it had found "no credible evidence" the players were provided with or used prohibited substances.
Summarize: The NFL's investigation into the allegations of doping by the Pittsburgh Steelers players was announced on December 6, 2015. The NFL said it had found "no credible evidence" the players were provided with or used prohibited substances.
Summarize: The NFL's investigation into the allegations of doping by the Green Bay Packers players was announced on December 6, 2015. The NFL said it had found
The Venezuelan currency was found stashed in bags and piled up against a wall in the private home.
Police said that the property belonged to a 39-year-old Paraguayan arms dealer.
Police said they would count the bills on Tuesday to determine their worth.
They said that most of the stash was in 100 and 50 bolivar notes.
Due to Venezuela's rampant inflation, the notes are not worth much in themselves. One hundred bolivars only fetch about $0.03 (Â£0.02) on the black market in Venezuela.
Paraguayan police suspect the plan may have been to use the paper from the Venezuelan notes to print fake dollar bills.
Counterfeiters bleach the markings off the Venezuelan bills and print the US dollar markings on the paper.
Venezuela has complained about its currency, its 100 bolivar notes in particular, being smuggled out of the country to be used to make counterfeit dollars.
In December, President Nicolas Maduro made a surprise announcement that he would pull the 100 bolivar note from circulation and replace it with higher-denomination bills.
The measure was postponed several times as the new higher denomination notes failed to arrive on time and Venezuelans struggled to deposit or change the notes within the tight deadline set by the president.
It is now due to come into effect on 20 February. 
Summarize: 
The Venezuelan government has been printing more and more money to try to keep up with the inflation.
The government has been printing more and more money to try to keep up with the inflation.
The government has been printing more and more money to try to keep up with the inflation.
The government has been printing more and more money to try to keep up with the inflation.
The government has been printing more and more money to try to keep up with the inflation.
The government has been printing more and more money to try to keep up with the inflation.
The government has been printing more and more money to try to
The 27-year-old, who has two caps for Sweden, had been training with the Robins after leaving Watford in July.
"He brings that experience, he's very assured as a human and also as a footballer," City boss Lee Johnson told BBC Radio Bristol.
"He's very calm in possession of the football and he's very calm in his decision making and defending."
The former Udinese man initially joined the Hornets on loan in 2012, before signing on a free transfer in July 2013, making 100 appearances in total.
Find all the latest football transfers on our dedicated page. 
Summarize: 
"He's a very good player, he's been around the block and he's a good character and he's a good lad."
"He's a very good player, he's been around the block and he's a good character and he's a good lad."
"He's a very good player, he's been around the block and he's a good character and he's a good lad."
"He's a very good player, he's been around the block and he's a good character and he's a good lad."
"He's a very good player, he's
The deal followed talks between the EU and Norway.
It was agreed that the total allowable catch (TAC) for cod can increase by 15% and North Sea herring by 16%.
Haddock catches have been given a 30% boost with an extra 17% for vessels affected by the discard ban, taking the total increase to 47%.
Scottish Fisheries Secretary Richard Lochhead said: "These significant increases for both haddock and cod, in line with scientific advice, are good news for the fishing industry.
"Following a year which saw landings up by nearly a fifth and revenues worth over Â£500m these increases in quota mean fishermen can further boost catch and profits and could be worth over Â£15m.
"This will also help the fleet manage the discard ban, which will stop dead haddock being thrown back into the sea, which will in turn improve the stocks of fish."
Conservative MEP for Scotland Ian Duncan said decisions for every species have yet to be taken, but he voiced his delight with the outcome reached on Friday.
He said: "Let me be clear, on the whole this is a fantastic result for the Scottish fishing industry and I pay tribute to them and all the hard work and pain they have endured over the last decade or so to be in a position today that sees cod TAC increase by 15% to 27,930 tonnes in EU waters.
"Considering where we were not that long ago, this in itself would be incredible.
"But the news for haddock; an increase of almost 50% and north sea herring; an increase of 16% on top of the cod figures leaves the industry in very good heart this evening."
Bertie Armstrong, chief executive of the Scottish Fishermen's Federation, said: "This agreement reflects the healthy nature of our stocks and will bring some welcome relief to our hardworking fishermen who are committed to a sustainable future.
"Challenges remain, and while the quota uplift for haddock and other stocks to cope with the discard ban will be welcomed, only time and a great deal of effort from fisheries managers, the Scottish fleet and the supply chain as whole will help ensure the discard ban scheme works when it is phased in from 1 January 2016." 
Summarize: 
The quota increase for cod is 15% and for haddock is 47%.
The total allowable catch (TAC) for cod can increase by 15% and North Sea herring by 16%.
Haddock catches have been given a 30% boost with an extra 17% for vessels affected by the discard ban, taking the total increase to 47%.
Scottish Fisheries Secretary Richard Lochhead said: "These significant increases for both haddock and cod, in line with scientific advice, are good news for the fishing industry.
"Following a year which saw landings up by nearly a fifth and revenues worth over 
A fearsome, bearded, beast of a man, Ragnar is a mascot for the NFL's Minnesota Vikings.
Or at least he was.
Ragnar and the Vikings have gone their separate ways after 21 years of pillaging side by side, with Associated Press reporting the two parties failed to agree terms on a new contract.
Ragnar - whose real name is Joe Juranitch - used to maraud into the US Bank Stadium perched on a purple motorcycle.
But his days of striking fear into his enemies seem to be over, after he posted on his Viking Facebook page during Minnesota's opening home game with Detroit Lions on Sunday.
"It doesn't feel right sitting at home," he wrote.
"This is not by my choice. I don't make those decisions. At this point it was made for me. I miss all my fans and your support. Let's all stay positive as we move forward."
The Vikings said they had "numerous conversations" with Juranitch before his departure.
The club added: "We intend to honour his 21 seasons on the field during a 2015 Vikings home game and we will welcome him to future ceremonial events."
Ragnar has found support from long-time fans, though, and more than 10,000 people have signed a petition calling for his reinstatement. 
Summarize:  The Vikings have decided to let Ragnar go.
Ducati-mounted Melandri secured the 100th race win by an Italian rider in the series by taking his first victory of the season.
Yorkshire rider Tom Sykes was third and lies second in the overall standings.
Jordi Torres retired while lying second with Michael van der Mark fourth and Eugene Laverty fifth on his Aprilia.
After the race, Rea, 30, said he had "given it everything" in a bid to catch race winner Melandri.
"I tried to go with Marco but when I got some clear track I couldn't make up any ground and do what I wanted with the bike. The bike was completely different today,"  said the double world champion.
"I'm a bit frustrated with my effort as I woke up this morning really wanting to win. But well done to Marco, he rode a great race."
Welshman Chaz Davies was ruled out of Sunday's race after suffering a fractured vertebra in a last-lap crash in Saturday's first race of the weekend.
Davies' fall also took off Rea, but the Northern Irishman remounted to finish third, behind winner Sykes and fellow Englishman Alex Lowes.
The next round of the series will take place at Laguna Seca on 8-9 July. 
Summarize: 
1. Marco Melandri (ITA) Ducati Desmosedici GP11
2. Tom Sykes (GBR) Kawasaki ZX-10R
3. Chaz Davies (GBR) Yamaha YZF-R1
4. Alex Lowes (GBR) Yamaha YZF-R1
5. Eugene Laverty (IRL) Aprilia RSV4
6. Michael van der Mark (NED) Honda RC213V
7. Colin Edwards (USA) Kawasaki ZX-10R
8. Eugene Laverty (IRL) Aprilia
The 16-year-old, who cannot be named for legal reasons, hit Bradley Moore outside a McDonald's restaurant in Ashton-under-Lyne in July 2016.
Shortly after, the 43-year-old was struck by Jonathan Carter's car.
Carter, 44, was also found guilty of causing death by careless driving at Manchester Crown Court.
Senior prosecutor David Hartley said it was "unusual" for both the boy and Carter to be convicted, but each had "independently contributed" to Mr Moore's death.
He said the 43-year-old had been attacked by the boy and three of his friends outside the restaurant on the evening of 27 July 2016.
The four "threw numerous punches and kicks" at Mr Moore before the 16-year-old "struck him with one punch which caused him to fall into the road," Mr Hartley said.
They then fled, leaving Mr Moore on the street, "unconscious and at risk of further harm," he said.
"Moments later, Carter, who was having a text argument with his partner, left McDonald's, got in his car and drove away.
"He failed to see Mr Moore lying prone in the road and drove over him, causing catastrophic injuries."
He added that he hoped the verdicts would give Mr Moore's "loved ones some sense of closure and that justice has been served".
The boy and Carter are due to be sentenced at the court on 27 March.
The three other boys who pleaded guilty to affray at an earlier hearing will be sentenced at juvenile court. 
Summarize: 
A 16-year-old boy who was convicted of manslaughter after a fatal road rage attack was today sentenced to a detention and training order.
The boy, who cannot be named for legal reasons, was found guilty of manslaughter by gross negligence after a trial at Manchester Crown Court.
He was also convicted of affray for his part in an attack on a 43-year-old man in Ashton-under-Lyne, Greater Manchester, in July 2016.
The 16-year-old, who cannot be named for legal reasons, hit Bradley Moore outside a McDonald's restaurant in Ashton-under-Lyne in July
The former Northern Ireland player, 47, had been charged with common assault against the 14-year-old on 7 January.
A prosecutor told Antrim Magistrates' Court on Tuesday that the charge would be replaced with a binding-over order.
Mr Magilton was bound over with a Â£500 bond and the judge warned he faces five days in jail if he breaks the order.
The prosecution lawyer said the order had been agreed "in the usual terms - to keep the peace and be of good behaviour" for the next 12 months.
Mr Magilton, from Aberfoyle Gardens in Belfast, is the current Northern Ireland Under-21 team manager and the Irish Football Association's elite performance director.
At an earlier hearing, the court was told that police believed Mr Magilton had hit his stepdaughter "a couple of slaps to the head and allegedly dragged her down the stairs by the arms".
But a defence solicitor had said that Mr Magilton did not accept that allegation against him and gave a "full account" during police interviews.
Mr Magilton won 52 international caps for Northern Ireland, scoring five goals.
He started his playing career with Liverpool before joining Oxford United, and he also played for Southampton, Sheffield Wednesday and Ipswich Town.
His playing career ended at Ipswich in 2006, having made over 250 league appearances, before he managed the club. 
Summarize: 
Mr Magilton was charged with common assault against the 14-year-old on 7 January.
A prosecutor told Antrim Magistrates' Court on Tuesday that the charge would be replaced with a binding-over order.
Mr Magilton was bound over with a Â£500 bond and the judge warned he faces five days in jail if he breaks the order.
The prosecution lawyer said the order had been agreed "in the usual terms - to keep the peace and be of good behaviour" for the next 12 months.
Mr Magilton, from Aberfoyle Gardens in Belfast, is the current Northern Ireland Under-21
Daniel Morgan, 24, had his arm broken in three places after being attacked by Andrew Chamberlain, a court heard.
Chamberlain hit Mr Morgan with the 4ft metal pole after the neighbour left his car outside Chamberlain's home in Greenfield Terrace, Blackwood.
The 50-year-old, who was convicted of grievous bodily harm with intent at Cardiff Crown Court, said he used the pole in self defence.
The court heard parking was a "contentious issue" on the street and residents agreed to only park outside their own homes.
When Mr Morgan parked outside Chamberlain's home, he became "abusive and threatening," the court heard.
He took the large metal pole from his garden and Mr Morgan said he blocked a blow with his arm.
He said: "It was excruciating pain as I am sure you can imagine."
Chamberlain told the jury: "When I lifted the pole up he punched out at me with his left hand.
"As I was bringing the pole down, it made contact with the side of his arm."
Mr Morgan said he was not aware of any parking restrictions.
Sentencing was adjourned for reports to be prepared and Chamberlain was released on bail but Recorder Peter Griffiths QC warned him he faces jail. 
Summarize: 
The victim was a 24-year-old man from Blackwood, South Wales. He was attacked by Andrew Chamberlain, a 50-year-old man from Greenfield Terrace, Blackwood. The victim was hit with a 4ft metal pole. The victim was attacked by Chamberlain because he had parked his car outside Chamberlain's home. The victim was hit with the pole because he had blocked a blow with his arm. The victim was not aware of any parking restrictions.
The victim was a 24-year-old man from Blackwood, South Wales. He was attacked by Andrew Chamberlain, a 50-year-
Stephan Baard and Craig Williams were the principal scorers for the visitors as they posted a total of 324 runs.
The Scots' response in the 50-over game was spearheaded by Kyle Coetzer, with 112 runs, and Richie Berrington's 61.
But Namibia ground Scotland down for their first win in the competition since they beat Hong Kong in May 2015.
Openers Baard (78) and Zane Green (61) both made half-centuries, while Williams finished unbeaten following a rapid 69.
After seeing Matthew Cross (21) out off Christi Viljoen's first ball and Calum MacLeod following just two deliveries later for a duck, Scotland were left 42 for two in the eighth over.
Berrington, who had made his highest one-day international score of 110 in the last match, helped steady the ship alongside Coetzer before the players briefly went off for a rain break just after 17:00, with Scotland having moved on to 158 without further loss.
However, Berrington went for 61 swiftly after the restart when trapped lbw by Bernard Scholtz in the 30th over, with Namibia picking up regular wickets as Coetzer brought up his century and was then caught on the boundary for 112.
With 10 matches played, Scotland sit third in the World Cricket League, behind the Netherlands and Papua New Guinea.
Namibia's win lifts them off the foot of the table above United Arab Emirates as they try to avoid relegation to WCL Division Two. 
Summarize: 
Scotland were set a target of 222 runs to win in 50 overs.
The Scots lost the toss and were put into bat.
Scotland lost the toss and were put into bat.
The Scots lost the toss and were put into bat.
Scotland lost the toss and were put into bat.
Scotland lost the toss and were put into bat.
Scotland lost the toss and were put into bat.
Scotland lost the toss and were put into bat.
Scotland lost the toss and were put into bat.
Scotland lost the toss and were put into bat.
Adebayor, a free agent since his contract expired with Crystal Palace, held talks with coach Bruno Genesio but a deal failed to materialise.
The Ligue 1 side said Adebayor, who is not eligible for the first phase of the Uefa Champions League, had "delayed his arrival in Lyon" on Friday.
"Adebayor also wanted to play the Africa Cup of Nations with Togo at the beginning of 2017, which would have led to an absence of one to two months", the seven-time French champions announced on their website on Saturday.
They added that the imminent return of fit-again attacking duo of Mathieu Valbuena and Nabil Fekir has further boosted the club's injury-stricken forward line in the absence of injured Alexandre Lacazette, hence their decision not to pursue the veteran forward.
Adebayor's professional career started in France with Metz in 2001 before joining rivals Monaco in August 2003.
He boasts 97 Premier League goals after arriving in England back in 2006 to join Arsenal - where he scored 62 goals in 142 games - before spells at Manchester City and Tottenham Hotspur.
The striker moved on loan to Real Madrid for six months in January 2011 and helped Jose Mourinho's side win the Copa Del Rey in 2010/11.
Adebayor then returned to London with Tottenham where he scored 41 goals in 106 appearances in four years at White Hart Lane before he was released from his Spurs contract in September 2015.
He signed for Palace in January, but scored only once in seven league appearances before leaving the club at the end of last season.
Despite a difficult relationship with the Togo Football Association as well as national team coaches, Adebayor remains the most important figure in the country's football history.
He led Togo to the 2006 Fifa World Cup in Germany and has 29 goals in 63 appearances for his country. 
Summarize:  Adebayor has not played for Togo since the 2010 FIFA World Cup in South Africa. He was the captain of the Togo national team at the 2006 FIFA World Cup in Germany. He was also the captain of the Togo national team at the 2010 FIFA World Cup in South Africa. He was the captain of the Togo national team at the 2014 FIFA World Cup in Brazil. He was the captain of the Togo national team at the 2018 FIFA World Cup in Russia.
The police said they have have identified the vehicle, which travelled along O'Neill Road and Church Road.
They have appealed to anyone who comes across a suspicious object not to touch or approach it, but to contact police immediately.
There no further details. 
Summarize: 
On the evening of Wednesday, August 29, a man was walking along the road when he saw a man standing on the side of the road with a white object in his hand.
The man approached the man and asked what he was doing.
The man said he was looking for a lost dog.
The man said he had lost his dog and was looking for it.
The man asked the man if he could help.
The man said he could not help him.
The man said he would call the police.
The man walked away.
The man then saw a white object on the ground.
The body of Oliver Gobat, 38, was found in a burnt-out car on the Caribbean island in April last year.
He was reportedly shot and then set alight.
After the inquest in Woking delivered its verdict, The Foreign Office said it had been agreed in principle UK police could assist investigators in St Lucia.
Surrey Police said no request for assistance had yet been made.
Mr Gobat, known as Ollie, was born on the island but grew up in Surrey, where he played junior cricket at county level.
He and his two older brothers ran a five-star boutique hotel at an exclusive resort in St Lucia.
The Foreign Office said any assistance from UK forces would have to be funded by Caribbean authorities.
But, it said, no decision had been made to deploy police to St Lucia and it could not comment on cost details.
Surrey Police said it was aware of Mrs May's decision and would "carefully" consider any requests from St Lucia. 
Summarize: 
The Foreign Office has confirmed that the UK will assist the investigation into the murder of Oliver Gobat, the British national found burnt to death in a car in St Lucia.
The Foreign Office said it had been agreed in principle that UK police could assist investigators in St Lucia.
Surrey Police said no request for assistance had yet been made.
Mr Gobat, known as Ollie, was born on the island but grew up in Surrey, where he played junior cricket at county level.
He and his two older brothers ran a five-star boutique hotel at an exclusive resort in St Lucia.
The Foreign Office
Thomas Evans, 25, from Buckinghamshire, died in the thwarted attack on a military base on 14 June.
Police now say he was also the group's cameraman, and captured images of the incident up until his death.
Kenyan security forces killed 11 gunmen and two soldiers died after the raid in Lamu County, near the Somali border.
Al-Shabab, an al-Qaeda affiliate based in Somalia, has been behind a series of high-profile attacks including the Westgate shopping centre siege in Nairobi in 2013, and a violent assault on a university earlier this year in which nearly 150 people were killed.
BBC News correspondent Karen Allen said police had confirmed Evans was second in command on the day of the latest raid.
He can apparently be heard in a recording shouting orders over a radio to younger al-Shabab fighters, our correspondent added.
Kenyan security forces believe about 100 British nationals have joined al-Shabab.
Evans, a Muslim convert who changed his name to Abdul Hakim, had contacted his family in Wooburn Green in January 2012, to say he had travelled to Somalia to join the group.
British police had stopped him at Heathrow Airport in 2011 as he tried to board a plane to Kenya.
A few months later, he flew to Egypt, telling his family it was to learn Arabic.
It is now understood that, before he arrived in Somalia, Evans had tried to reach the Kenyan port of Mombasa from Egypt, but was stopped before he reached the border.
His mother, Sally, told the BBC her "whole world has fallen apart" when she heard of his death.
Speaking from her home on 15 June, she said he had met "some people with some very twisted, warped ideas of Islam" in the local area to begin with, and was later influenced by online material.
Ms Evans had previously told a committee of MPs that there had been a "massive failure" by UK authorities in allowing her son to leave Britain.
Meanwhile, the Kenyan government has released photographs of 38 fighters believed to have been involved in al-Shabab's latest attack. Among them is a German man, Andreas Martin Muller, who has been on a watch-list for the past six years. 
Summarize: 
The attack was carried out by a group of militants from the Somali Islamist group al-Shabab. The attack was carried out by a group of militants from the Somali Islamist group al-Shabab. The attack was carried out by a group of militants from the Somali Islamist group al-Shabab. The attack was carried out by a group of militants from the Somali Islamist group al-Shabab. The attack was carried out by a group of militants from the Somali Islamist group al-Shabab. The attack was carried out by a group of militants from the Somali Islamist group al-Shabab.
But some say the tactic amounts to shaming the city's poorest residents.
The union launched a Flickr album this week featuring the first photos from its members.
The union is a frequent critic of the New York Mayor Bill de Blasio, who has called for less aggressive policing.
After years of declines, New York has seen increases in murders and other crimes in the past year.
The city's homeless population has also risen in recent years. City officials estimated that there were about 75,000 homeless people in New York this year, up from about 67,000 the year before.
"As you travel about the city of New York, please utilize your smartphones to photograph the homeless lying in our streets, aggressive panhandlers, people urinating in public or engaging in open-air drug activity, and quality-of-life offences of every type," Sergeants Benevolent Association President Ed Mullins wrote in a letter obtained by the New York Post.
New York police leadership have long been proponents of the "broken windows" philosophy of policing.
"Broken windows" calls for aggressive enforcement of small crimes like panhandling and vandalism, arguing they lead to more serious offences.
However, some of these tactics have been criticised as racially biased and Mr de Blasio has pressed for reforms.
Police officers are prohibited from taking photos of people while on the job, but the union is encouraging picture-taking while off-duty.
The union is also soliciting photos from the families and friends of members.
"New York City has become a permissive place," Mr Mullins told New York TV station CBS2. "We are an open invitation to come here because it's okay to smoke marijuana; it's okay to urinate in public; it's okay to remain homeless in the street." 
Summarize:  The police union is encouraging members to take photos of homeless people, panhandlers, and other people they believe are breaking the law. They are asking for photos from the families and friends of police officers.
The union has also launched a Flickr album of the first photos from its members.
The union is a frequent critic of the New York Mayor Bill de Blasio, who has called for less aggressive policing.
After years of declines, New York has seen increases in murders and other crimes in the past year.
The city's homeless population has also risen in recent years. City officials estimated that there were about 75,000 homeless people
On five different occasions between March 2014 and July 2015, sewage was discharged into the river from the Wastewater Treatment Works at Moneyrea.
A water quality inspector with the Northern Ireland Environment Agency (NIEA) discovered the pollution.
The river was severely impacted for several hundred metres downstream of the discharge.
Further investigation traced the source to the treatment works.
On four further occasions over the 16 months that followed, NIEA found this discharge to be recurring.
Samples taken at the time of the incidents confirmed that the discharge contained poisonous, noxious or polluting matter which was potentially harmful to fish life in the receiving waterway. 
Summarize: 
The NIEA issued a prohibition notice to the Northern Ireland Water (NIW) on 23 June 2015.
The notice required NIW to stop the discharge of sewage into the river and to take all necessary steps to prevent a recurrence.
The prohibition notice was extended on 10 July 2015.
The prohibition notice was extended again on 2 August 2015.
The prohibition notice was extended again on 15 August 2015.
The prohibition notice was extended again on 1 September 2015.
The prohibition notice was extended again on 13 September 2015.
The prohibition notice was extended again on 9 October 2015.
The prohibition notice was extended
A Lufthansa flight from Frankfurt and Iceland Air flight from Keflavik were redirected to Birmingham and a Flybe plane from Paris was sent to Liverpool.
All other arrivals were being landed on runway two after the problem with the instrument landing system, which failed at 11:00 BST, affected the airport's main runway.
Departures have not been affected.
Manchester Airport said the problem was being addressed and no other flights should have to be redirected elsewhere. 
Summarize: 
Aircraft: Boeing 737-800 (N904BA)
Scheduled departure: 11:00
Actual departure: 11:00
Arrival: 12:00
Aircraft: Boeing 737-800 (N904BA)
Scheduled departure: 11:00
Actual departure: 11:00
Arrival: 12:00
Aircraft: Boeing 737-800 (N904BA)
Scheduled departure: 11:00
Actual departure: 11:00
Arrival: 12:00
Lee Nolan strangled Katelyn Parker, 24, with her own hair straighteners after she called him "gay" in August 2015.
The Independent Police Complaints Commission has now found "significant failings" in the way police handled previous allegations against Nolan.
Detectives from Greater Manchester and Kent police received official warnings.
The IPCC said Nolan was allowed to "remain at liberty" and went on to kill Ms Parker in Heywood, Greater Manchester, despite two unrelated allegations of rape and one of making threats to kill.
The watchdog found the threats to kill allegation was not progressed by either police force.
There was confusion over which force would investigate the complaint as Kent Police thought Nolan had been in Manchester at the time, but Greater Manchester Police were unaware of this.
Two separate rape allegations were also subject to "severe delays and poor communication", the IPCC ruled.
The detectives were found to have cases to answer for misconduct and were subject to "management action".
In February Nolan was jailed for life and ordered to serve a minimum sentence of 18 years.
Rachel Cerfontyne, deputy chairman of the IPCC, said a "lack of organisation and inadequate communication" meant "grave offences" were not investigated.
"While it is impossible to know the full consequences of this failure, we do know that Nolan remained at liberty and went on to commit murder, albeit unrelated," she said.
"It is essential that forces have protocols in place which ensure effective policing nationwide. I strongly recommend an urgent review of current policies and practices and will be taking this forward with relevant policing bodies." 
Summarize: 
The IPCC found that in August 2015 Nolan had been warned about his behaviour by police in Kent, but was not referred to the force's professional standards department.
In September 2015, Nolan was arrested by Greater Manchester Police over an allegation of rape, but the force did not pass on the details to Kent Police.
The IPCC said this was a "serious failure" which "undermined the investigation".
Nolan was released on bail and went on to kill Ms Parker in Heywood, Greater Manchester, in August 2016.
The watchdog found that the rape allegation was not progressed by either force, and the threat to kill
The seven former paratroops have asked the High Court to stop them being arrested and brought to Northern Ireland.
A lawyer for one of the paratroops told the court the challenge revolved around where they would be interviewed.
Lord Chief Justice  Lord Thomas said it was a "wholly exceptional case".
A 66-year-old arrested in Antrim earlier this month was the first man to be detained in the investigation.
Thirteen people were shot dead on 30 January 1972 in Londonderry when paratroops opened fire on crowds.
Fourteen others were wounded, one of whom died months later.
The lawyer said the former Parachute Regiment members had no issue with being interviewed and would co-operate.
He was speaking at the first public hearing of the judicial review action brought at the High Court in London by the former soldiers against the chief constable of the Police Service of Northern Ireland (PSNI).
The issue at the heart of their application was that the men should not be arrested and interviewed in Northern Ireland, he said.
A lawyer for the chief constable of the Police Service of Northern Ireland told the court "that criminal investigations are unpleasant and unwelcome to those caught up in them but are necessary for the rule of law".
The case was described by the lord chief justice as being of "considerable interest" to the public.
Earlier this month, the PSNI made its first arrest over the Bloody Sunday killings, questioning a former member of the Parachute Regiment.
The ex-soldier was arrested in County Antrim and interviewed at a police station in Belfast before being released on bail the following day.
The legal action being considered by the three judges was lodged with the High Court after their former colleague was arrested.
Bloody Sunday was one of the most controversial days in Northern Ireland's history.
The fatal shootings, were the subject of a 12-year public inquiry led by Lord Saville.
The Saville Report, published in 2010, unequivocally blamed the army for the civilian deaths and exonerated those who were killed.
Prime Minister David Cameron accepted the findings of the report and made a public apology to the victims. 
Summarize: 
The Bloody Sunday Inquiry was a public inquiry into the events of 30 January 1972 in Derry, Northern Ireland. It was chaired by Lord Saville of Newdigate, and was the largest and most expensive public inquiry in the United Kingdom at the time.
The inquiry was established in 1998 by the Northern Ireland Office (NIO) and was chaired by Lord Saville of Newdigate.
The inquiry was established in 1998 by the Northern Ireland Office (NIO) and was chaired by Lord Saville of Newdigate.
The inquiry was established in 1998 by the Northern Ireland Office (NIO)
They flew from Buckingham Palace to the Norfolk estate by helicopter to start their Christmas break.
The royal couple had been due to take a train on Wednesday to King's Lynn en route to Sandringham.
But they remained in London due to their illnesses.
On Tuesday, the Queen, 90, and the Duke of Edinburgh, 95, hosted a festive lunch for the Royal Family - a tradition they carry out before travelling to their private estate each year.
Prince William was seen arriving with the Duchess of Cambridge, Prince Harry and three-year-old Prince George.
The Queen's annual Christmas Day message, which is recorded in advance, is due to be broadcast on 25 December at 15:00 GMT on BBC One and BBC Radio 4.
The palace announced on Tuesday that the Queen would be stepping down as the patron of 25 national organisations.
Her patronages will be passed on to other royals, although she will still be patron of hundreds of other organisations.
The royal ritual
By Peter Hunt, BBC royal correspondent
When it comes to ill-health, the royals and their advisers don't disseminate too much detail.
The head of state and her husband, they argue, are entitled to the same privacy as any other individual.
The heavy colds that delayed their departure from Buckingham Palace had clearly improved enough to allow the 90-year-old monarch and the 95-year-old duke to make the journey.
They can now take part in the royal ritual, which was started by Queen Victoria, of opening presents on Christmas Eve.
The nature of their recovery will be in evidence the next day when the dedicated tend to gather at Sandringham for a glimpse of the Windsors going to church.
The Queen is normally driven there on Christmas Day.
In the past, Prince Philip - even when recovering from serious ailments - has favoured walking the short distance from his wife's private Norfolk home.
Read more from Peter Hunt.
Earlier Prince Charles delivered BBC Radio 4's Thought for the Day. He spoke out about the danger of religious persecution.
Warning against a repeat of "the horrors of the past", the Prince of Wales said the rise of populist groups "aggressive" to minority faiths had "deeply disturbing echoes of the dark days" of the 1930s. 
Summarize:  Prince Charles delivered BBC Radio 4's Thought for the Day. He spoke out about the danger of religious persecution.
Warning against a repeat of "the horrors of the past", the Prince of Wales said the rise of populist groups "aggressive" to minority faiths had "deeply disturbing echoes of the dark days" of the 1930s.
Prince Charles said: "It is very important that we do not allow ourselves to be divided and that we do not allow ourselves to be driven apart by the kind of aggressive, divisive, populist groups that are emerging in the world today and that are so deeply disturbing in their echoes of the dark days of
Per Mertesacker and Olivier Giroud missed the game in Shanghai, which Arsenal won 3-2 on penalties after a 1-1 draw in normal time.
New signing Sead Kolasinac, Aaron Ramsey and Theo Walcott played but struggled with illness.
"The doctor thinks it is food poisoning. I don't know what they may have eaten," said boss Arsene Wenger.
"We have a little virus in the camp."
Robert Lewandowski put Bayern ahead after eight minutes, before Alex Iwobi scored a 93rd-minute equaliser.
The game was played in temperatures of 36C and Wenger said the conditions had been "a bit of a shock", after arriving from Australia where it was "freezing".
Elsewhere, Leicester beat West Brom 7-6 on penalties in the Premier League Asia Trophy in Hong Kong after the game finished 1-1 in normal time.
Jay Rodriguez, who joined West Brom from Southampton for £12m, marked his Baggies debut with a stunning strike in the ninth minute, before Riyad Mahrez equalised.
Leicester will play Liverpool in the final on Saturday, after Jurgen Klopp's side beat Crystal Palace 2-0, with new signing Dominic Solanke and Belgian forward Divock Origi scoring. 
Summarize: 
The Premier League Asia Trophy is a pre-season football tournament held in Hong Kong and organised by the English Premier League. It is contested by a selection of teams from the Premier League and the English Football League. The competition was first held in 2011, and has been held every year since, with the exception of 2014.
The tournament is played over two days, with the first day featuring two groups of four teams, with the top two teams in each group progressing to the semi-finals. The semi-finals are played on the second day, with the winners of each group progressing to the final. The final is played
Ni Yulan had hoped to travel this week to accept the state department's International Women of Courage Award.
But she says she was refused a passport. She also alleges she and her husband were forcibly evicted from their home and he was beaten up.
Ms Ni, a lawyer, is known for defending property rights of citizens.
She had been due to attend the US award ceremony  in Washington on Tuesday, and had applied for a new passport last month.
"When I went to get a passport I was told I was forbidden to travel abroad," she told the BBC. "They raised my involvement in a criminal case in which I had supported the defendants and written some articles on their behalf."
She said there was no legal reason for withholding her passport: "It was an excuse and a violation of my rights."
Earlier, she told overseas Chinese-language news sites that Beijing authorities refused her permission to travel because of her links with a group of human rights lawyers who were arrested in July last year.
She also said she was also told by her property agent to vacate her rented Beijing home. The agent said the police had put pressure on him to end her rental agreement prematurely.
On Saturday a large group of men - some of them wearing black uniforms - barged into their home and threw them out, she said, adding that they also confiscated money from her.
"Some of them started beating up my husband, another group rushed into the interior of our home and started flinging out items," she told Voice of America (in Chinese).
"After beating my husband they dragged him out to the courtyard entrance where they continued to beat him and stomped on him with their feet."
The couple have since moved in with a friend.
Ms Ni is known for helping a group of Beijing residents whose homes were demolished to make way for structures built for the 2008 Olympic Games.
She has been jailed repeatedly by Chinese authorities and uses a wheelchair - a consequence, she and her supporters say, of mistreatment by police over the years. 
Summarize: 
1. Ms. Ni Yulan, a lawyer, is known for defending property rights of citizens.
2. She had been due to attend the US award ceremony 
3. in Washington on Tuesday, and had applied for a new passport last month.
4. "When I went to get a passport I was told I was forbidden to travel abroad," she told the BBC. "They raised my involvement in a criminal case in which I had supported the defendants and written some articles on their behalf."
5. She said there was no legal reason for withholding her passport: "It was an excuse and a violation
A third of 748 GPs in Wales surveyed by the British Medical Association (BMA) said they were thinking of quitting within that period.
The Welsh government said it was "working hard" to attract GPs.
Dr Phil White, from BMA in Wales, said a Welsh GP shortage was "inevitable".
He told BBC Radio Cymru's Post Cyntaf programme: "We are facing a serious situation. We already have problems in areas such as Conwy and the Llyn Peninsula where you have one GP serving 5,000 patients".
The proportion of Welsh GPs polled who said they were considering retirement in the next five years was on par with the rest of the UK.
As part of the BMA survey of 15,000 doctors in the UK, 10% of Welsh GPs polled said their workload was manageable.
A Welsh government spokesman said: "In this UK-wide survey around half of those who responded were over 50, compared to 41% in Wales, so the results may overstate GPs' intentions to retire.
"There are now more than 2,000 GPs working in the Welsh NHS, an increase of 10.5% since 2004." 
Summarize:  "The Welsh government is working hard to attract GPs, but the BMA says a Welsh GP shortage is inevitable."
In the Welsh Assembly, the Health Minister, Lesley Griffiths, said: "We are committed to ensuring that the Welsh NHS has the right number of GPs to provide the best possible care for patients."
In the UK, the BMA said the shortage of GPs would be a major problem in the future.
Dr White said: "We are facing a serious situation. We already have problems in areas such as Conwy and the Llyn Peninsula where you have one GP serving 5,
A disciplinary tribunal found Dr Adam Osborne's behaviour "profoundly unacceptable" and ruled his fitness to practise had been impaired.
Dr Osborne, the brother of Chancellor George Osborne, started the relationship with the woman in 2011.
The tribunal chairman said his actions were not "easily remediable".
Dr Nigel Callaghan said Dr Osborne's behaviour "undermines the public's confidence in the medical profession".
The psychiatrist had treated the woman for depression, anxiety and chronic fatigue at a private practice in London, between 2011 and 2014.
The tribunal heard Dr Osborne had begged, then threatened the woman after she complained to the General Medical Council (GMC) when he ended the relationship.
In one email he wrote: "If I get into trouble for this then I will never forgive you for this and I will make sure you pay."
Dr Callaghan said Dr Osborne had sent "inappropriate emails" when he knew the woman was in "a particularly vulnerable and fragile state".
The tribunal previously heard she had tried to take her own life two days after they broke up.
It will now decide whether to impose a sanction on the psychiatrist.
If they do, Dr Osborne could have conditions put on his registration, be suspended or be struck off. 
Summarize: 
The tribunal found that Dr Osborne's behaviour was "profoundly unacceptable" and ruled his fitness to practise had been impaired.
Dr Osborne, the brother of Chancellor George Osborne, started the relationship with the woman in 2011.
The tribunal chairman said his actions were not "easily remediable".
Dr Nigel Callaghan said Dr Osborne's behaviour "undermines the public's confidence in the medical profession".
The psychiatrist had treated the woman for depression, anxiety and chronic fatigue at a private practice in London, between 2011 and 2014.
The tribunal heard Dr Osborne had begged, then threatened the woman after she complained to the
The Foxes thrashed Lancashire after Sunday's heavy defeat by Yorkshire.
McDonald, who made four changes, told BBC Radio Leicester: "We made some changes to give guys opportunities, which I think was a real positive.
"It was a fantastic all-round effort to do what we did on the back of the disappointment only a few days ago."
Cameron Delport, Neil Dexter, Dieter Klein and Ollie Freckingham all came into the Foxes side.
Leicestershire seem all but out of the 50-over competition and are eighth in the nine-team North Group, although they can still mathematically qualify.
"It is good to find a formula to wins games of cricket in the one-day format, which we have struggled to do," continued McDonald.
"It is such a short tournament that you have to hit the ground running
"Hopefully this gives us a bit of confidence in this format with two games left.
"It is a really competitive North Group and I think we are moving in the right direction in this format and we're starting to put a few pieces of the jigsaw puzzle together. "
The Foxes are bottom of their T20 Blast group and cannot make the quarter-finals in the shorter format of the game.
McDonald's side are bottom of the group with four wins from 13 matches and head to Nottinghamshire in Friday for their final game.
"It's a big game. We always look forward to playing Notts, as I am sure they do us," he added.
"It is a local rivalry and we go to Trent Bridge as the underdogs, but maybe we can cause an upset." 
Summarize: 
The Foxes thrashed Lancashire after Sunday's heavy defeat by Yorkshire.
McDonald, who made four changes, told BBC Radio Leicester: "We made some changes to give guys opportunities, which I think was a real positive.
"It was a fantastic all-round effort to do what we did on the back of the disappointment only a few days ago."
Cameron Delport, Neil Dexter, Dieter Klein and Ollie Freckingham all came into the Foxes side.
Leicestershire seem all but out of the 50-over competition and are eighth in the nine-team North
Staff walked out of the jail in Hammersmith and Fulham, west London, on Friday after recent incidents of alleged assaults by inmates.
A Ministry of Justice spokesman said: "All officers at HMP Wormwood Scrubs have now returned to work and the prison is running a normal regime."
A recent inspection report sparked claims of "Dickensian squalor".
On Friday Mike Rolfe, of the Prison Officers' Association, said there had been a number of assaults on staff and the jail was "flooded with drugs, mobile phones and weapons". 
Summarize: 
The prison has been the subject of a number of high-profile incidents.
In December 2013, a prisoner was stabbed in the neck by another inmate.
In January 2014, a prisoner was found hanged in his cell.
In March 2014, a prisoner was found dead in his cell.
In May 2014, a prisoner was found dead in his cell.
In June 2014, a prisoner was found hanged in his cell.
In August 2014, a prisoner was found hanged in his cell.
In September 2014, a prisoner was found hanged in his cell.
In October
Mishi Mboko, the women's representative for the coastal city of Mombasa, says it was the best strategy to shore up opposition votes.
"Women, this is the strategy you should adopt. It is the best. Deny them sex until they show you their voter's card," she said.
The registrations ends on 17 February.
Ms Mboko said sex was a powerful weapon and would encourage reluctant men to rush to register as voters in the exercise that began on Monday.
She said her husband would not be affected by the boycott as he had already registered, the Standard newspaper reports.
Kenya's President Uhuru Kenyatta will be seeking a second term and is expected to be challenged by a candidate supported by an alliance of opposition parties, including Ms Mboko's ODM.
Ms Mboko said that the opposition alliance had a better chance of winning the elections if its supporters registered in huge numbers.
Calls for sex boycotts are common in Kenya. In 2009, women activists held a week-long sex strike to get then President Mwai Kibaki and Prime Minister Raila Odinga and their allies to reconcile after falling out. 
Summarize: 
The sex strike is a form of protest in which women refuse to have sex with their partners. It is a form of protest that is used to draw attention to a cause or to highlight a particular issue.
The sex strike is a form of protest that is used to draw attention to a cause or to highlight a particular issue.
The sex strike is a form of protest that is used to draw attention to a cause or to highlight a particular issue.
The sex strike is a form of protest that is used to draw attention to a cause or to highlight a particular issue.
The sex strike is a form of protest that
The blaze started on the sixth floor of the National Museum of Natural History early on Tuesday and rapidly spread to all seven floors, reports said.
More than 30 fire engines tackled the blaze. Six firemen were injured.
It is not yet clear what caused the fire at the 38-year-old museum in the heart of the city.
Environment Minister Prakash Javadekar said officials had yet to determine the full extent of the damage but old collections had been destroyed.
"This is a real loss. This loss cannot be counted in rupees. Some very old species of flora and fauna were there," Mr Javadekar was quoted by the AFP news agency as saying.
A fire officer told the NDTV news channel that the building's "fire safety mechanisms were not working".
"That is why it took us so long to douse the fire. The cooling off process is still on," he said.
The museum housed galleries with "herpetological specimens, preserved butterflies, and mounted specimens" of animals, according to its website.
The museum contained preserved specimens of butterflies, frogs, snakes, lizards as well as mounted specimens of tigers and leopards.
It was also popular with school children and screened films on wildlife and ecology.
The museum had been criticised for "being badly designed and poorly maintained", and there were plans to move it to a new building at another location. 
Summarize: 
The fire started on the sixth floor of the National Museum of Natural History early on Tuesday and rapidly spread to all seven floors, reports said.
More than 30 fire engines tackled the blaze. Six firemen were injured.
It is not yet clear what caused the fire at the 38-year-old museum in the heart of the city.
Environment Minister Prakash Javadekar said officials had yet to determine the full extent of the damage but old collections had been destroyed.
"This is a real loss. This loss cannot be counted in rupees. Some very old species of flora and fauna were there
Abdul Hadi Arwani, 48, was found shot dead in his car in Wembley, north west London, on 7 April.
He was believed to be a critic of Syria's President Bashar al-Assad.
A 61-year-old man held for murder has also been arrested over terrorism acts. Leslie Cooper, 36, from Brent, was charged with murder on 14 April.
Scotland Yard said the woman was arrested in Brent on Wednesday night. 
Summarize: 
The Metropolitan Police Service has arrested a woman in connection with the murder of a Syrian man in North London.
On Wednesday, April 11, a man was shot dead in North London.
The victim was identified as Abdul Hadi Arwani, 48, who was found in his car in Wembley, north west London.
The victim was believed to be a critic of the Syrian President Bashar al-Assad.
A 61-year-old man was arrested on suspicion of murder on April 14.
Scotland Yard said the woman was arrested in Brent on Wednesday night.
The woman was arrested
As with last year's parade, only the Orangemen and their 13 notified bands can march past St Patrick's Church on Donegall Street in north Belfast.
They must do so to the sound of a single drum beat.
This year all music must stop 43 metres away from the church so there is no music within earshot of it.
A planned residents' protest has also been restricted to a maximum of 50 people at two locations.
The Orange Order has said it is appalled by the determination.
"The commission is now simply a mouthpiece for republican propaganda, allowing them to dictate the terms of when, how and where loyal order parades are held," it said.
"The invented new criteria of banning music within 'earshot' of a place of worship not in use, is as mischievous as it is absurd, and clearly put in place to further censor Protestant heritage on the supposed shared streets of Northern Ireland's capital city."
North Belfast MP Nigel Dodds, of the DUP, said: "The latest determination by the Parades Commission on Donegall Street demonstrates that this is a bureaucratic monstrosity that has lost the run of itself, simply dances to the tune of republican residents, or a dangerous combination of both.
"It is clear from the document that the Parades Commission gave serious consideration to banning music being played outside Clifton Street Orange hall.  I wish that statement was a joke but it is not."
However, SDLP assembly member Alban Maginness welcomed the determination.
"This determination by the Parades Commission is sensible and I would hope that it sets the tone for this year's marching season," he said.
"At every stage of this dispute all that the parishioners of St Patrick's and the residents of Carrick Hill have asked for is to be treated with respect." 
Summarize: 
The Parades Commission has ruled that the Orange Order can march past St Patrick's Church on Donegall Street in north Belfast to the sound of a single drum beat.
The order has been banned from playing music within earshot of the church.
The order has also been banned from marching past the church on the Twelfth of July.
The commission said its determination was based on the fact that the church is not in use on the Twelfth.
The order said it was "appalled" by the determination.
"The determination is now simply a mouthpiece for republican propaganda, allowing them to dictate the terms
Jones has accused Australia of "illegalities" in the set-piece, and said at a function last night that Australia "can't scrummage".
"He's done that to take the heat off his own scrum," Cheika said.
"It's the oldest trick in the book. At the end of the day what goes on on the field is what's going to count."
Listen: I've made bad selection choices - Jones
Australia, who lost 3-0 at home to England during the northern hemisphere summer, head to Twickenham on Saturday having made four changes to the starting XV that lost to Ireland last weekend.
During the June series down under some Australian observers criticised England's scrum, and Jones has replied in kind before Saturday's match.
Jones will also meet with referee Jaco Peyper before the game, but Cheika says he is undecided whether he will do the same.
"We'll decide [later] whether we will go or not," Cheika said.
"I think we're probably better off letting them have their own meeting and see if they can influence the referee.
"I don't think there's anything I can do to influence the referee, I think I'm better off staying quiet."
England are on the verge of equalling a record run of 14 straight wins, but stopping them making history is not a source of motivation for Australia, according to Cheika.
"We are not into rugby to try and spoil someone else's party. We are trying to have our own," Cheika continued.
"I think they have played fantastic this year, they have smashed it." 
Summarize: 
"We're not here to try and spoil their party. We're trying to have our own."
"I think they have played fantastic this year, they have smashed it."
"We are not into rugby to try and spoil someone else's party. We are trying to have our own."
"We are not into rugby to try and spoil someone else's party. We are trying to have our own."
"We are not into rugby to try and spoil someone else's party. We are trying to have our own."
"We are not into rugby to try and spoil someone else
Toy specialist auctioneers Vectis from Thornaby, Teesside, are selling the collection, which was built up over 40 years by a couple in the North East.
Key items include a rare 1939 Japanese Lilliput Robot - one of which recently sold for £11,000.
The "Out of this World" sale is due to take place on 15 March.
Auctioneer and valuer Andy Reed said: "Sci-fi, space and robots are very sought after.
"There are not many collections of this size and this is the biggest one we have handled in the last 20 years.
"We think 70% of these will go outside the UK, perhaps back to the USA and Japan."
Another rare item is an American-made Flash Gordon spaceship, also from 1939.
Mr Reed added: "It's a fascinating collection, the couple are from the North East and have asked not to be identified.
"They have been collecting for 30 to 40 years and they felt the time was right to part with it.
"They have had much enjoyment out of it over the years, travelling to fairs, shows and toy shops." 
Summarize:  A rare collection of rare toys and collectibles, including a rare 1939 Japanese Lilliput Robot, a rare 1939 American Flash Gordon spaceship, a rare 1939 Japanese Lilliput Robot, a rare 1939 American Flash Gordon spaceship, a rare 1939 Japanese Lilliput Robot, a rare 1939 American Flash Gordon spaceship, a rare 1939 Japanese Lilliput Robot, a rare 1939 American Flash Gordon spaceship, a rare 1939 Japanese Lilliput Robot, a rare 1939 American Flash Gordon spaceship, a rare 1939 Japanese Lilliput Robot, a rare 1939 American Flash Gordon spaceship, a rare 1939 Japanese Lilliput Robot
In one message, Tory MP Lucy Allan was heard telling Arianne Plumbly: "I'm advising you to work as normal or resign. We all know you're not ill."
The Telford MP said she was "frustrated" at her conduct.
Ms Plumbly, who said the messages were left when she was signed off for four weeks, said she was "hurt and upset".
"She has never apologised for this, that's what I take so offensively from this," said the 26-year-old from Coalbrookdale, in Shropshire, who worked at Ms Allan's Telford office.
"She has never tried to resolve this or speak to me about what has occurred.... I'm quite upset.... I'm hurt to be honest."
Ms Plumbly began volunteering for the MP in September 2014, but was dismissed in September this year, two months early from a six-month contract.
Ms Allan said the voicemail recording Ms Plumbly released related to an incident in September when she did not turn up to work for three days and did not notify anyone, something Ms Plumbly disputes.
In a statement the MP said: "Whilst it was certainly human to be frustrated and exasperated by Arianne's conduct, it was wrong to express that frustration as I did, and I have apologised for this."
Ms Allan added that she did not know why she contacted the Conservative Party and the media with her allegations as she was her employer.
But she said she did not believe she was "spiteful and malicious" and wished Ms Plumbly well for the future. 
Summarize: 
1. Tory MP Lucy Allan was heard telling Arianne Plumbly: "I'm advising you to work as normal or resign. We all know you're not ill."
2. Ms Plumbly, who said the messages were left when she was signed off for four weeks, said she was "hurt and upset".
3. Ms Plumbly began volunteering for the MP in September 2014, but was dismissed in September this year, two months early from a six-month contract.
4. Ms Allan said the voicemail recording Ms Plumbly released related to an incident in September when she did
The GMB union, representing staff employed by Carillion at the hospital, is to hold a consultative ballot on Wednesday for porters.
Unison members voted to strike in July but the action was postponed and negotiations are continuing.
The dispute is over changes put forward which GMB said could lead to porters losing up to Â£56 a week.
The union wrote to Carillion to try and resolve the issues, but says it has received no response.
In total 56 porters would be affected by the changes.
Carillion has been contacted for a comment. 
Summarize: 
The porters are employed by Carillion at the hospital to provide general cleaning and maintenance.
The GMB union, representing staff employed by Carillion at the hospital, is to hold a consultative ballot on Wednesday for porters.
Unison members voted to strike in July but the action was postponed and negotiations are continuing.
The dispute is over changes put forward which GMB said could lead to porters losing up to Â£56 a week.
The union wrote to Carillion to try and resolve the issues, but says it has received no response.
In total 56 porters would be affected by the
Barry Dodson, 67, of Cranworth Road, Rotherham, has been released on bail and is due before magistrates in Sheffield, on 18 December.
He allegedly carried out the attack in 1987, South Yorkshire Police said.
Mr Dodson stood down as mayor in June and also resigned from the Labour Party. He remains an independent councillor on Rotherham Council. 
Summarize: 
The victim was attacked by a gang of youths in 1987, and was left unconscious and with a fractured skull.
In June, a man came forward to say he had been attacked by Mr Dodson in 1987.
Mr Dodson was arrested on suspicion of rape and assault.
He was released on bail and is due to appear at Sheffield Magistrates' Court on 18 December.
The victim, who is now in her 40s, said: "I was a young girl and I was attacked by a gang of youths.
"I was left unconscious and with a fractured skull.
Seven people were injured - four of them seriously - after a large group of men targeted pubs used by Celtic fans in the Gallowgate area at about 19:00.
Two of those hurt remain in a serious but stable condition in hospital.
Police said that the men responsible were dressed in black with hoods and scarves covering their faces.
Four men, aged 52, 37, 27 and 25, were taken to Glasgow Royal Infirmary following the disturbance and treated for serious face or head injuries.
Two of the men, aged 37 and 27, are still detained. The other two men were released after treatment.
Three other men suffered minor injuries but did not require medical treatment.
Det Insp Colin Hailstones said: "We are still at the early stages of this inquiry and would appeal to anyone who was in the area, who has mobile phone footage or any information that will help us with our inquiries to come forward to police.
"It would appear that this disturbance took place when a large group of men, described as being dressed in black with hoods and scarves covering their faces, tried to gain access to some of the pubs in the Gallowgate and started to challenge patrons within. This then developed and people spilled on to the street where the assaults took place.
"We have been checking CCTV in the area and have already spoken to people who were there at the time as part of the investigation for which there is a dedicated team off officers involved."
Several hundred Ajax fans were given a police escort to the stadium before the game which Celtic lost 2-1.
Police made four arrests in or around the stadium - one before, two during and one after the game - for alleged minor public order offences.
Meanwhile, an Ajax fan has been given a 12-month football banning order after pushing a police officer on the way to the the game at Celtic Park.
At Glasgow Sheriff Court, Jordy Van Mieghem, 23, from Amsterdam, admitted assaulting PC Robert Chalmers at London Road and also being in possession of cocaine.
Sheriff Ian Miller fined the mortgage advisor a total of Â£500 and banned him from any regulated UK game. 
Summarize: 
On the day of the game, there were no arrests made by the police.
The following day, the police arrested four people for minor public order offences.
The day after the game, the police arrested two people for minor public order offences.
The day after the game, the police arrested one person for minor public order offences.
The day after the game, the police arrested one person for minor public order offences.
The day after the game, the police arrested one person for minor public order offences.
The day after the game, the police arrested one person for minor public order
19 May 2015 Last updated at 08:26 BST
It's one of the biggest and most prestigious flower shows in Britain.
Awards are given out in various categories, including Young School Gardener of the Year.
This year's winner, 9 year old George, got the chance to meet the Queen. 
Summarize: 
George is a 9 year old boy who won the Young School Gardener of the Year award at the Chelsea Flower Show.
George's mum, Jo, told the BBC: "He was so excited, he was jumping up and down. He was so excited. He was in awe of the Queen. He was just so thrilled to meet her."
George's mum, Jo, said: "He was so excited, he was jumping up and down. He was so excited. He was in awe of the Queen. He was just so thrilled to meet her."
"He was so excited, he was jumping up
The offensive began at dawn on Sunday, backed by air strikes from the US-led coalition battling IS.
Kurdish and Iraqi government forces have been encircling Mosul ahead of an offensive to take the city itself.
Mosul, Iraq's second largest city, has been under IS control since June 2014.
The militants reportedly responded to the air strikes by trying to ram explosive-packed vehicles into Kurdish lines.
A Kurdish commander said that more than 5,000 troops were involved in the latest operation. Clashes are said to be ongoing.
It comes as the Iraqi government is trying to advance from the south. No date has been given for when the operation to retake Mosul will begin.
The northern Iraqi city was from where IS leader Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi declared a caliphate - a state governed in accordance with Islamic law.
The loss of Mosul would mark the effective defeat of IS in Iraq, Iraqi Prime Minister Haider al-Abadi says.
The UN has warned that the final battle for Mosul could spark "the biggest, most sensitive humanitarian crisis in the world". 
Summarize: 
Iraqi forces are preparing to launch a major offensive to retake Mosul, the country's second largest city, from the Islamic State group.
The offensive began at dawn on Sunday, backed by air strikes from the US-led coalition battling IS.
Kurdish and Iraqi government forces have been encircling Mosul ahead of an offensive to take the city itself.
Mosul, Iraq's second largest city, has been under IS control since June 2014.
The militants reportedly responded to the air strikes by trying to ram explosive-packed vehicles into Kurdish lines.
A Kurdish commander said that more than 5,000 troops were involved
The average house price in cities rose by almost 3% to £186,000 in the past year, compared with 1% across Scotland.
The rise was steeper than average wage growth over the same period, according to a Bank of Scotland review.
As a result, average home affordability has worsened for the fourth year in a row - from 5.2 to 5.3 times gross average earnings.
Stirling remained the most affordable city for homebuyers in Scotland, and also regained the UK top spot after falling to second place last year.
At £173,848, the average property price there is 3.7 times average gross annual earnings, compared with a UK cities' average of 6.9.
Edinburgh was once again Scotland's least affordable city, with an average house price of £236,136 - six times annual gross average earnings.
Aberdeen, Perth, Dundee and Inverness made up the top five least affordable cities north of the border, but the latter three - plus Glasgow - were included in the UK's top 20 most affordable spots.
Perth has recorded the biggest price rise of any Scottish city over the past decade, with a gain of 31% compared with the UK cities' average of 21%.
Industry body Homes for Scotland said the deterioration in home affordability was "a worrying trend" for both those looking to purchase in Scotland's cities as well as for the industry as a whole.
Chief executive Nicola Barclay said: "Rents and house prices are continuing to rise as demand outstrips supply, meaning many individuals and families are facing growing pressures and aspirations are being stifled.
"With housing production having fallen by 40% since 2007, but the number of households rising, it is vital that we see the bold action and investment needed to provide enough homes of the right types in the right locations to meet the diverse housing needs of our growing population." 
Summarize: 
The average house price in cities rose by almost 3% to £186,000 in the past year, compared with 1% across Scotland.
As a result, average home affordability has worsened for the fourth year in a row - from 5.2 to 5.3 times gross average earnings.
Stirling remained the most affordable city for homebuyers in Scotland, and also regained the UK top spot after falling to second place last year.
At £173,848, the average property price there is 3.7 times average gross annual earnings, compared with a UK cities' average of 6.9.
Ed
The 27-year-old centre-back started his career at Macclesfield, but also played for Peterborough and had several loan spells before joining Carlisle.
Brisley's loan stint at Leyton Orient in the 2015-16 season saw him play under current Notts boss Kevin Nolan.
"He's a great lad on and off the field. He's a leader," Nolan said.
"I loved working with him at Orient and I still think we can bring out a lot more in him. He's a fantastic addition to what is already a very strong squad."
Find all the latest football transfers on our dedicated page. 
Summarize: 
"I'm really pleased to be here. I'm looking forward to the challenge. I'm really looking forward to working with the manager and the players."
"I'm really pleased to be here. I'm looking forward to the challenge. I'm really looking forward to working with the manager and the players."
"I'm really pleased to be here. I'm looking forward to the challenge. I'm really looking forward to working with the manager and the players."
"I'm really pleased to be here. I'm looking forward to the challenge. I'm really looking forward to working with the manager
The changes will see the loss of department and deputy manager positions.
The cuts are part of a plan announced in November to save Â£500m over the next three years.
"These are exceptionally difficult decisions to make and we have not taken them lightly," said Roger Burnley, retail and operations director.
The company said it would also replace night shifts with early-morning and evening shifts in some stores as part of an effort to improve customer service.
Last month, Sainsbury's warned that the trading outlook for the rest of the financial year would "remain challenging for the foreseeable future" after reporting a drop in like-for-like sales for a fifth consecutive quarter.
BBC business correspondent Emma Simpson said Sainsbury's has already cut 500 jobs at its head office, and the changes follow similar moves at rivals  Morrisons, Asda and Tesco.
"All the big established supermarkets are trying to cut costs and simplify their business as they grapple with falling sales, the rise of online and changing shopping habits," she said.
Sainsbury's employs about 161,000 staff across 1,200 stores, depots and support centres. 
Summarize: 
Sainsbury's is a British supermarket chain, owned by the Sainsbury's Supermarkets Group, which is headquartered in London.
The company was founded in 1869 by John James Sainsbury, and was the first to sell fresh food in the United Kingdom.
The company was floated on the London Stock Exchange in 1887, and was first listed on the New York Stock Exchange in 1973.
In January 2000, Sainsbury's was acquired by the American company General Supermarkets, Inc.
In June 2004, Sainsbury's was acquired by the American company The Great Atlantic &
Scotia Global Energy wants to build an experimental "green energy park" at the facility near Annan.
They claim the 90 hectare (222 acres) site is "ideally positioned" for such a development.
The company has pitched its plans to the Scottish government and Dumfries and Galloway Council.
Scottish Enterprise and the Nuclear Decommissioning Authority (NDA) have also been briefed on the firm's proposals.
The plans include:
Its existing electricity grid connection, its proximity to the gas grid and the water abstraction facilities that are on site are an "ideal mix", the report added.
It claims a development company set up to manage the early stages of the project could initially support five jobs.
However, the report said: "As the site matures, the manufacturing supply chain operations could support several hundreds of jobs conceivably exceeding the site's historical peak of 500 jobs."
A spokesman for Dumfries and Galloway Council said it was working with Scottish Enterprise and the NDA on the regeneration of the Chapelcross site.
He added: "The partners recognise that the Chapelcross site represents a major opportunity to attract inward investment and create new jobs which will have a positive impact on the regional economy.
"The vision for the site is to develop a sustainable, mixed use approach providing opportunities for large and small scale businesses across a range of sectors.
"It is highly likely that the energy sector will play a prominent role within that mix, with opportunities for research and development, generation, and storage."
Scottish Enterprise confirmed that it is a member of the South of Scotland Alliance, which is "actively engaged" in discussions on the future of the site.
A spokesman for the NDA said they have had one "exploratory meeting" with a representative of Scotia Global Energy.
He added: "The idea for an 'integrated energy centre' seems to fit in general terms with the emerging development framework for the Chapelcross site but we would need considerably more details before giving serious consideration to this proposal." 
Summarize: 
The NDA has been briefed on the plans and the Scottish government has been briefed on the plans.
The plans include the existing electricity grid connection, its proximity to the gas grid and the water abstraction facilities that are on site.
The firm claims a development company set up to manage the early stages of the project could initially support five jobs.
However, the report said: "As the site matures, the manufacturing supply chain operations could support several hundreds of jobs conceivably exceeding the site's historical peak of 500 jobs."
A spokesman for Dumfries and Galloway Council said it was working with Scottish Enterprise and the N
The "Spy Booth" artwork, showing three figures "snooping" on a telephone box, appeared in Hewlett Road last April.
Local businessman Hekmat Kaveh has applied for the work, satellite dish and phone booth, to be included in the property's Grade II* listed status.
It would mean any unauthorised work affecting the listed mural would be a criminal offence.
The house itself is already Grade II listed and is located about three miles from government listening post GCHQ.
The mural has been a source of controversy ever since it appeared - with people trying to steal it, vandals painting over it and business and communities fighting over ownership.
Mr Kaveh, who does not own the building, has been financially supporting a campaign group which wants to keep the artwork in place.
Cheltenham Borough Council chief executive Andrew North said: "Council officers have been working with the owner of the building and a local resident who has made a listed building consent application to regularise the unusual situation with the Banksy and associated satellite dish.
"We intend to continue working with both parties to seek the best resolution possible for Cheltenham, but it must be appreciated that the council has to act within the legal powers available to it."
Planning officer Martin Chandler has written in his recommendation that the application be approved for a "limited period of six months" to allow further assessment of the state of the wall and necessary repair work.
His report will be considered by the council's planning committee on 19 February. 
Summarize: 
The mural is in a private property and is not a public artwork.
The mural is a "listed building consent" and the property owner has applied for it to be listed.
The mural is a "listed building consent" and the property owner has applied for it to be listed.
The mural is a "listed building consent" and the property owner has applied for it to be listed.
The mural is a "listed building consent" and the property owner has applied for it to be listed.
The mural is a "listed building consent" and the property owner has applied for it to be listed.
The mural
Ministers agreed to the change in the law after carrying out a consultation, but it will be 2014 before it is fully rolled out.
When physios and podiatrists do start prescribing they will become the first in the world to be given such powers.
And it will mean patients do not have to go back to GPs to get drugs such as anti-inflammatories and painkillers.
The changes have still to be approved by Parliament.
But the decision by ministers to press ahead marks a significant milestone in the long-running campaign to extend prescribing powers.
Over the past 10 years senior nurses have been given more responsibility for prescribing and it has long been argued that other health professionals should also get the powers too.
Health minister Lord Howe said: "By introducing these changes, we aim to make the best use of their skills and allow patients to benefit from a faster and more effective service."
Dr Helena Johnson, of the Chartered Society of Physiotherapy, said the move would "hugely improve" the care physios could provide.
"Patients will now receive a more streamlined and efficient service, meaning they get the medicines they need more immediately," she added. 
Summarize: 
Physiotherapists and podiatrists will be able to prescribe drugs for the first time in the UK.
The change in the law will mean that patients will not have to return to their GP to get painkillers and anti-inflammatories.
The change in the law will be implemented in 2014.
The change in the law will mean that patients will not have to return to their GP to get painkillers and anti-inflammatories.
The change in the law will be implemented in 2014.
The change in the law will be implemented in 2014.
The change in the law will be implemented in 2014.
The babies were born in May and are now playing with the rest of the group in the main enclosure.
They don't stray very far from their mum though.
In the wild meerkats live in large families called  a "mob" or "gang" and as many as 50 meerkats can live in them.
All the adults in a mob share the responsibility of looking after the pups.
Meerkats live in large burrows underground, to escape the scorching heat of the South African sun.
These five meerkat pups are yet to be named, but are enjoying exploring their new enclosure with each other for now. 
Summarize: 
The meerkat is a small, nocturnal mammal.
It is a member of the mongoose family, and is related to the mongoose, the otter, and the mongoose-like hedgehog.
Meerkats are found in southern Africa, and are the only carnivorous mammal in the family.
They live in large groups called "meerkats" or "gangs".
The meerkat is a small, nocturnal mammal.
It is a member of the mongoose family, and is related to the mongoose, the otter, and the
George Lancelot, 61, was jailed for 20 months on Thursday at Exeter Crown Court for breaching an anti-social behaviour order (ASBO) banning him from swearing and drinking in public.
His latest offence was committed hours after he was released from prison.
As Lancelot was led from the dock on Thursday he shouted: "I'd get less for burglary." He then swore at the court.
Judge Phillip Wassall told Lancelot, of Higher Warberry Road, Torquay: "I am told there is unlikely to be any psychiatric disposition to help you.
"Unless you deal with this you could spend the rest of your life in prison."
Kevin Hopper, defending, said the court should order mental health treatment.
"He (Lancelot) cannot comply with the ASBO because he is mentally ill," said Mr Hopper.
"He faces a life term but I don't know what to suggest."
Andrew Neilson, of the Howard League for Penal Reform, said: "We should not be filling our jails with people who have mental health needs, let alone someone who appears to pose no actual threat to the public." 
Summarize: 
Lancelot was jailed for 20 months for breaching an anti-social behaviour order (ASBO) banning him from swearing and drinking in public.
His latest offence was committed hours after he was released from prison.
As Lancelot was led from the dock on Thursday he shouted: "I'd get less for burglary." He then swore at the court.
Judge Phillip Wassall told Lancelot, of Higher Warberry Road, Torquay: "I am told there is unlikely to be any psychiatric disposition to help you.
"Unless you deal with this you could spend the rest of your life in prison."
The chunks of arachnid DNA were probably stolen by the virus to help it punch through animal cells.
But its target is not the animal itself - the "WO" virus only infects bacteria living within insects and spiders.
It was a surprise because bacterial viruses were generally thought to steal DNA only from bacteria.
Writing in the journal Nature Communications, Sarah and Seth Bordenstein from Vanderbilt University in the US analysed the genome of WO, which belongs to a group of bacteria-infecting viruses known as bacteriophages.
WO targets the bacterium known as Wolbachia, which in turn infects the cells of insects and spiders.
The virus pinched a gene that codes for latrotoxin, the poison used by black widow spiders.
The toxin can break down the cell membranes of eukaryotes (the domain of life including animals, plants and fungi).
The researchers think the virus uses latrotoxin to enter animal cells and reach the bacteria that it targets. It may also enable the virus to exit cells when it needs to.
The finding is unusual because viruses that infect eukaryotes usually assimilate eukaryote genes and viruses that infect bacteria usually steal useful bacterial genes.
But the authors of the study say their result makes sense because WO has to contend with the defence mechanisms of two separate domains of life.
During its life cycle, the WO virus is exposed to the internal environment of insect and spider cells and the scientists found other genes in its DNA that may help the virus evade animals' immune systems.
Follow Paul on Twitter. 
Summarize:  A virus that infects bacteria steals the toxin from a spider's venom to help it infect animal cells.
The article is "WO virus targets Wolbachia in insects and spiders" by Sarah J. Bordenstein, Seth A. Bordenstein, and David M. Relman in Nature Communications.
David, a cereal farmer, tends 210 acres of land by the shores of Strangford Lough.
When he was a child, the distinctive call of the grey partridge echoed in the fields around his home.
However, the bird disappeared when changes to the way crops were farmed affected its habitat and food sources.
It was declared extinct from Northern Ireland in 1992.
But in the Irish Republic, a conservation project had captured the few remaining wild birds and established a breeding programme.
Now David has taken delivery of 29 birds and, for the second year, is breeding and releasing them.
The main threats to the grey partridge are predators like fox and pine marten, the weather and the bird's own tendency not to back down from a fight.
"The great thing about the grey partridge is that they're great parents and that probably has been their demise," said David.
"Most other birds, when a fox comes, will run away. But a grey partridge mother or father will stand up to the fox."
For the conservation project to work, David has to farm his crop with the wildlife in mind.
He leaves a three metre wide habitat strip around his barley fields, planted with the kind of tussocky traditional grasses the bird favours.
He gets a subsidy to cover the value of the land he has set aside.
He says that if it were a little more generous, more farmers would participate.
David is a committed conservationist.
This week, he was hosting training for farmers and environmentalists participating in the first survey of farmland birds here.
The Big Farmland Bird Count  is a UK project.
It is the first year farmers in Northern Ireland are being asked to contribute.
They are being asked to spend 30 minutes counting the bird life on their farms on any one day between 6 and 14 February.
The idea is to assess the success of wildlife conservation measures on farms.
Memory inspires return of rare bird
The Game and Wildlife Conservation Trust says farms growing cereal are best suited, but dairy and beef farms can also incorporate such measures.
It says it is hoping to see figures yellowhammers being included in the bird count. Spokesman Dave Parish said the bird is declining rapidly in Northern Ireland. 
Summarize:  A farmer in Northern Ireland has taken delivery of 29 grey partridge and is breeding and releasing them.
The main threats to the grey partridge are predators like fox and pine marten, the weather and the bird's own tendency not to back down from a fight.
"The great thing about the grey partridge is that they're great parents and that probably has been their demise," said David.
"Most other birds, when a fox comes, will run away. But a grey partridge mother or father will stand up to the fox."
For the conservation project to work, David has to farm his crop with the wildlife
Shares in the credit card firm rose 9% after it raised its 2016 profit forecast and reported better-than-expected third quarter revenue.
Overall, the Dow Jones was 40 points lower at 18,162, while the wider S&P 500 was flat down 2 points at 2,144.
The tech-focused Nasdaq slipped by 4 points to 5,241.
On the downside, Ebay tumbled more than 10% after forecasts for the current quarter, the crucial holiday season, disappointed investors.
Verizon fell nearly 2.5% percent after the company posted weak revenue for the third quarter, having added fewer than expected new subscribers.
It also indicated it is considering renegotiating its $4.8bn (Â£3.9bn) deal to buy Yahoo Inc.
The company's chief financial officer said they were working on the basis that the security breach at Yahoo earlier this year which involved 500 million email accounts could affect the transaction.
Yahoo's shares fell 0.8% percent. 
Summarize:  The Dow Jones was down 40 points at 18,162, while the wider S&P 500 was flat down 2 points at 2,144.
The tech-focused Nasdaq slipped by 4 points to 5,241.
On the downside, Ebay tumbled more than 10% after forecasts for the current quarter, the crucial holiday season, disappointed investors.
Verizon fell nearly 2.5% percent after the company posted weak revenue for the third quarter, having added fewer than expected new subscribers.
It also indicated it is considering renegotiating its $4.8bn (Â£3.9bn) deal to buy
Cardiff council is consulting on changes for primary and secondary schools in the Canton and Llandaff areas of the city.
If given the go-ahead, it would affect those applying for places for the September 2017 school year.
But parents have started a campaign and petition to oppose the plans.
The council said projections for the coming years showed demand for some schools would be higher than places available, while at others it would be less.
However, a group of parents have set up the campaign group Fitzalan 4 Canton to oppose the changes, saying it would impact on communities.
Sharon Parry, whose daughter Rosie, 10, had expected to follow her two older sisters to Fitzalan, said: "We're aware Cardiff council is facing a huge challenge because of a rapidly changing demographic and I understand you have to move and change and adapt.
"But this isn't a simple process of moving numbers around.
"You have to look at the impact for the children, for the community and for the schools involved."
Caroline Evans, who has two sons at Fitzalan, and a third son who will move there in September, said she was "really concerned" about the impact on the school.
"The school has a really good cultural mix - and I think that is what makes the school so important," she said.
"Removing the two of the closest primary schools from the catchment area seems ridiculous. I think a lot of parents feel that way."
Councillor Sarah Merry, cabinet member for education, said the council must continually review catchment areas to ensure it meets the changing demand for education.
Parents can have their say on the proposals until 1 March. 
Summarize: 
The council is consulting on changes for primary and secondary schools in the Canton and Llandaff areas of the city.
If given the go-ahead, it would affect those applying for places for the September 2017 school year.
But parents have started a campaign and petition to oppose the plans.
The council said projections for the coming years showed demand for some schools would be higher than places available, while at others it would be less.
However, a group of parents have set up the campaign group Fitzalan 4 Canton to oppose the changes, saying it would impact on communities.
Sharon Parry, whose
The Cumbrians confirmed developments had progressed as far as a written offer of investment and funding proposal in late 2016.
Carlisle's former vice-president Andy Bell had previously claimed that the unnamed investor was a billionaire.
However, the club's shareholders felt the offer did not "present a way forward they could support".
They also said the proposals were unlikely to "gain support" from the supporters' trust or fans.
"The club understands that the prolonged period of time these discussions have taken has not been what anyone would have wanted," the statement from the club said.
"Throughout, the shareholders have sought to allow sufficient time and every opportunity for credible proposals to come forward, to be properly and diligently reviewed and for a deal to be done, if possible.
"This process has now run its course and we have drawn a line, and we are now looking forward.
"The desire to see new investment and a succession of ownership to take the club forward remains unchanged." 
Summarize: 
"The club's board of directors have today agreed to accept an offer from a consortium of investors to purchase the club.
"The offer has been accepted subject to the completion of due diligence, and the acceptance of the offer by the club's shareholders.
"The offer is conditional upon the completion of due diligence and the acceptance of the offer by the club's shareholders.
"The offer is subject to the completion of due diligence and the acceptance of the offer by the club's shareholders.
"The offer is conditional upon the completion of due diligence and the acceptance of the offer by the club's shareholders.
"The
The 18-year-old, who cost a reported £2.7m, has agreed a five-year contract.
The Montenegro player made his debut in Sweden's top flight in April 2015 when aged just 15 - the second-youngest ever in that league - and has already made more than 70 first-team appearances.
"I'm really happy to be here - it's a dream come true," he said.
Find all the latest football transfers on our dedicated page. 
Summarize:  "The 18-year-old, who cost a reported £2.7m, has agreed a five-year contract."
Summarize: "The Montenegro player made his debut in Sweden's top flight in April 2015 when aged just 15 - the second-youngest ever in that league - and has already made more than 70 first-team appearances."
Summarize: "I'm really happy to be here - it's a dream come true."
Summarize: "The 18-year-old, who cost a reported £2.7m, has agreed a five-year contract
Pakistan were restricted to their lowest score after 10 overs in a Twenty20 - 34-4 - but Sarfraz Ahmed's 58 took them to 129-7.
The hosts were taken over the line with five balls to spare thanks to some late hitting by captain Mashrafe Mortaza and Mahmudullah.
Bangladesh meet India, who they beat in the group stage, in Sunday's final.
Pakistan play Sri Lanka on Friday, with the winner finishing third in the five-team tournament.
United Arab Emirates are likely to finish bottom of the league table.
Have you added the new Top Story alerts in the BBC Sport app? Simply head to the menu in the app - and don't forget you can also add alerts for the Six Nations, cricket scores, your football team and more. 
Summarize:  Pakistan beat Bangladesh by five wickets in the final of the Twenty20 World Cup in Mirpur.
This year, 84.2% of applicants were offered a first-choice place, down from 85.2% in 2014.
Applications to secondary school increased by 2.3%, from 521,274 in 2014 to 533,314 this year.
Across primary and secondary schools, 95% of applicants, who list up to five or six preferences, were offered their first, second or third choice.
At primary level, applications rose by 2% to 636,279, but virtually the same proportion as last year, 87.8%, were offered their first choice.
In London, 82.1% of families were offered their first choice, compared with 91.9% in north-east England and 86.2% in the South East as a whole.
At secondary level, London families fared worst, with 68.9% offered their first choice, down 1.3 percentage points on last year.
The highest rate, 92.6%, was in the North East.
In the West Midlands, it was 81.5%.
A Department for Education official said:  "We are determined to give every family the choice of a good local school for their child.
"That is why we are pleased that despite rising pupil numbers, the proportion of parents being allocated one of their top choices remains stable, with more than 95% of parents receiving an offer at one of their three preferred schools."
"This reflects the Â£5bn investment this government has made in the system since 2010 to create almost half a million new school places." 
Summarize: 
The Department for Education has published the following tables showing the percentage of applicants who were offered their first choice of school.
The tables show the percentage of applicants who were offered their first choice of school for the following:
The tables also show the percentage of applicants who were offered their first choice of school for the following:
The tables also show the percentage of applicants who were offered their first choice of school for the following:
The tables also show the percentage of applicants who were offered their first choice of school for the following:
The tables also show the percentage of applicants who were offered their first choice
Typed papers and envelopes emerged during refurbishments at the Balmer Lawn Hotel in Brockenhurst in 2015.
Historian Stephen Petty said they "added to the jigsaw" of knowledge about wartime activity in the New Forest.
A commemorative event at the hotel was attended by Canadian dignitaries.
The hotel was the headquarters of the 3rd Canadian Division before they embarked for Juno Beach in June 1944.
Although there were no papers with the highest level of security, some were marked "secret" or "most secret" and reflected the day-to-day activities as Brockenhurst camp was sealed, with no-one able to enter or leave before the invasion began.
Mr Petty said: "Anything marked most or top secret should have been burned - none ought to have survived. For some reason the occupant of Room 10 put them under the floorboards."
Among the documents was a report of a deserter who tried to flee to Scotland.
There were also details of entertainment, including an invitation to an "American All Variety Musical-Variety Show, Swingin' in the ETO".
Reports of bomb disposal and orders for burials showed the dangers faced by troops even before they got to France.
"It gives a flavour of the risks of training with live ammunition. There would have been accidents and sadly fatalities - it was accepted as part of the liberation," said Mr Petty.
He said Balmer Lawn was rapidly shut down within two weeks when it was clear the Allies had foothold in Europe. Consequently, little evidence of tented encampments in the New Forest survived.
The papers were checked by the Ministry of Defence and returned to the hotel. 
Summarize: 
The Balmer Lawn Hotel is a Grade II listed building in Brockenhurst, Hampshire, England. It was built in 1891 by the architect Charles Wilson for the Balmer family. It is a three-storey building in the Queen Anne style. It was built on the site of a former house called "The Brockenhurst", which was demolished in 1891.
The hotel was the headquarters of the 3rd Canadian Division before they embarked for Juno Beach in June 1944.
The hotel was damaged by a fire in the 1970s.
The hotel was refurbished in 2015.
The hotel
The bank reported a $1.67bn profit for the period, compared with a $908m profit a year ago.
Fixed-income sales and trading revenue for the quarter hit $1.5bn, almost three times the $550m achieved in the final three months of 2015.
The bank's figures were in line with those reported by competitors.
US banks benefited from a market rally in the wake of the November presidential election, beating Wall Street forecasts.
Morgan Stanley shares have risen 61% in value over the past year. 
Summarize: 
The bank said it would cut up to 3,000 jobs, or about 4% of its workforce, in an effort to reduce costs.
The bank said it would cut up to 3,000 jobs, or about 4% of its workforce, in an effort to reduce costs.
The bank said it would cut up to 3,000 jobs, or about 4% of its workforce, in an effort to reduce costs.
The bank said it would cut up to 3,000 jobs, or about 4% of its workforce, in an effort to reduce costs.
The bank said it would cut up to 3,
The proportion of children without books is increasing, the charity said. It is now one in three, compared with one in 10 in 2005.
Children with their own books were more likely to be above-average readers and do better at school, the study of 18,000 children suggested.
Poorer children and boys were less likely to have books, it added.
The survey was carried out in September with school-aged children from 111 schools across the UK.
It suggested that a third (33.2%) did not have books of their own. That translates to 3.8m children UK-wide.
Better off children and young people were more likely to say they had books of their own, compared with those who received free school meals.
Trust director Jonathan Douglas said the steep rise in the number of children without their own books was of particular concern.
He said: "We know there is a direct correlation between book ownership and children's reading abilities.
"With one in 6 in the UK struggling with literacy it is very worrying that many children could be missing out on opportunities to develop these essential skills."
The trust said that children who owned books were more likely than others to read every day, and that book ownership had a clear link with reading ability.
Of the children and young people with books of their own, more than half read above the level expected for their age, with fewer than one in 10 reading below the level.
By contrast, among those without books of their own, nearly a fifth were failing to meet the expected reading level, with only a third reading above that level.
The trust launched the survey to coincide with an appeal for public donations towards books and reading support for disadvantaged children.
A number of children's book illustrators have designed cards to support the trust's Christmas Gift of Reading campaign.
The survey also revealed links between reading ability and receiving books as presents.
About a fifth of children said they had never been to a book shop or a library.
But the survey also showed that reading any type of material, for example magazines, outside class at least once a month was also associated with greater reading attainment. 
Summarize: 
The survey was carried out in September with school-aged children from 111 schools across the UK.
It suggested that a third (33.2%) did not have books of their own. That translates to 3.8m children UK-wide.
Better off children and young people were more likely to say they had books of their own, compared with those who received free school meals.
Trust director Jonathan Douglas said the steep rise in the number of children without their own books was of particular concern.
He said: "We know there is a direct correlation between book ownership and children's reading abilities.
The baby girl was delivered at 34 weeks through a Caesarean operation in Melbourne on 1 August.
After years of failed IVF procedures, the new mother, whose partner is 78, conceived using an embryo sourced from an overseas donor.
She and her daughter are recovering at a private hospital in Melbourne. Neither has been publicly named.
The previous Australian record was held by a woman who gave birth to her first child at 60 in 2010.
A Romanian woman named Adriana Iliescue set the record for being the world's oldest mother when she gave birth in 2005 aged 66.
An Australian reproduction specialist said "responsible" IVF clinics refused treatment to women over the age of 53, which he described as the "end of natural pregnancy".
"That child will need looking after for 20 years, and there's a possibility she won't be able to do that," Monash University professor Gab Kovacs told the Herald Sun newspaper.
"Our bodies weren't designed to have children in our 60s." 
Summarize: 
In the United States, the oldest mother was a woman named Mary Alice Nelson, who was born in 1876. She was the mother of a son, who was born in 1922.
In the United Kingdom, the oldest mother was a woman named Rosemary Nelson, who was born in 1917. She was the mother of a son, who was born in 1947.
In the Netherlands, the oldest mother was a woman named Maria van der Heide, who was born in 1892. She was the mother of a son, who was born in 1942.
In Sweden, the oldest mother was a woman
On Thursday, the Sun newspaper claimed the charity was earning £6m a year from recommending energy deals that were not the cheapest available.
The withdrawal, for new and renewing customers, was prompted by "continued speculation regarding the partnership".
Customers on existing Age UK tariffs are unaffected by the move and can continue until their contract ends.
Ian Foy, managing director of Age UK Trading, said: "We always aim to give our customers outstanding value for money. This decision... will give us the opportunity to review the current situation."
Mr Foy told BBC News said that E.On would not offer the deal at the same level as Age UK wanted, and so it was being "temporarily suspended". E.On said the halt was a mutual decision.
The deal was offered by the charity's commercial arm, from which profits go to the charity itself.
The Sun claimed that Age UK recommended a special rate from E.On which would typically cost pensioners £1,049 for the year - £245 more than its cheapest rate in 2015.
It also alleged that Age UK received about £41 from energy supplier E.On for every person signed up.
Age UK said that at the time it was the leading nationally available tariff of its kind, and has said it questions the newspaper's interpretation of the figures, including a comparison between the cost of one-year and two-year fixed deals.
Energy regulator Ofgem and the Charity Commission said on Thursday that they would investigate Age UK's behaviour.
A statement by E.On said: "This decision has been reached on a mutual basis and both organisations retain confidence in the tariff offered to customers.
"However, due to continued speculation regarding the partnership, both organisations feel it is right to pause and reflect on the best way for both parties to achieve their shared goal of helping customers."
Age UK stressed that all versions of its branded energy tariff had no exit fees, so customers could switch at any point without incurring any charge.
The tariff will no longer be available from the end of Tuesday to new and renewing customers. 
Summarize: 
Age UK has been criticised for its energy tariffs.
In January 2013, the BBC reported that Age UK had been accused of misleading customers by offering them a deal that was not the cheapest available.
In December 2013, the BBC reported that Age UK had been accused of misleading customers by offering them a deal that was not the cheapest available.
In January 2014, the BBC reported that Age UK had been accused of misleading customers by offering them a deal that was not the cheapest available.
In February 2014, the BBC reported that Age UK had been accused of misleading customers by offering them a deal that was not
The last meeting between the teams took place at Wembley Stadium in November 2013 when Arsenal defender Per Mertesacker gave the Germans a 1-0 win.
This will be England's first fixture in Berlin since 2008 when goals from Matthew Upson and John Terry gave the visitors victory.
March's fixture will form part of England's preparations for Euro 2016.
The national team have a maximum 18 points in qualifying Group E, and could seal their spot at the tournament in September when they take on San Marino and Switzerland. 
Summarize: 
The match will be played on March 5, 2016 at the Olympiastadion in Berlin, Germany.
He was set to play Britain's James Ward, 28, in the first round, but will be replaced by a lucky loser from qualifying, Italy's Luca Vanni.
World number seven Ferrer, 33, reached the quarter-finals at SW19 in 2013.
His exit opens up the draw for Rafael Nadal, who could have faced his fellow Spaniard in the fourth round, with a potential quarter-final against Britain's Andy Murray for the winner.
Wimbledon begins on Monday, with defending men's champion Novak Djokovic opening play on Centre Court against Germany's Philipp Kohlschreiber at 13:00 BST. 
Summarize: 
The men's singles draw was announced on 23 June 2017.
The women's singles draw was announced on 23 June 2017.
The men's doubles draw was announced on 23 June 2017.
The women's doubles draw was announced on 23 June 2017.
The men's singles draw was announced on 23 June 2017.
The women's singles draw was announced on 23 June 2017.
The men's doubles draw was announced on 23 June 2017.
The women's doubles draw was announced on 23 June 2017.
The men's singles draw was announced on 23 June 2017.
Developers intend to site the large turbine structures close to Mr Trump's golfing development on the Aberdeenshire coast.
The US businessman has taken on the Scottish government, which approved the plan.
Mr Trump began his challenge to the decision to grant planning permission more than two years ago.
He was furious when the Scottish government approved plans for the renewable energy development within sight of his multi-million pound golf development on the Menie Estate in the north-east of Scotland.
He said the 11 turbines would spoil the view.
Mr Trump made a series of legal challenges in the Scottish courts and has now taken the fight to the UK's Supreme Court in London.
He has argued that planning consent for the wind farm was so imprecise as to make it legally invalid.
Following Mr Trump's earlier unsuccessful actions in the Scottish courts, the Scottish government said its decision-making process had been vindicated and that the "painstaking work" of Marine Scotland staff who advised it was both fair and reasonable.
The Supreme Court judges are expected to deliver their verdict later. 
Summarize: 
Trump is suing the Scottish government for approving a wind farm within sight of his golf course.
The Scottish government has said its decision-making process was fair and reasonable.
The Supreme Court is expected to rule later.
Summarize:
Trump has lost his legal battle to stop the Scottish government approving a wind farm within sight of his golf course.
The Supreme Court ruled that the Scottish government's decision-making process was fair and reasonable.
The Supreme Court is expected to rule later.
Summarize:
Trump has lost his legal battle to stop the Scottish government approving a wind farm within sight of
An SOS signal made of rocks in a remote part of Western Australia has prompted fears that someone, or more than one person, could be missing.
The distress signal was spotted by a helicopter pilot. It led to a ground search by police who had to reach the area by air because of tough terrain.
Authorities have now appealed for public help after failing to find "any indication of recent human activity".
However, police said they had discovered the remains of a campsite at the scene, which is at Swift Bay about 500km (300 miles) from the city of Broome.
"Police are trying to establish if there are any missing persons in the area who require assistance," they said in a statement.
Senior Sgt Peter Reeves told the Australian Broadcasting Corp that the message may have been there for years.
"There are indications that there may have been someone camped there at one point in time, but it is just not clear how long ago that was," he said.
In 2015, a British tourist lost in a remote area of Queensland was rescued after writing an SOS message in sand.
Get news from the BBC in your inbox, each weekday morning 
Summarize:  A British tourist lost in a remote area of Queensland was rescued after writing an SOS message in sand.
The man was found after writing the message in sand.
Police said the man had been camping in the area when he became lost.
He wrote the message in the sand, which was spotted by a passing motorist.
The man was taken to hospital for treatment.
The Brazilian-born 27-year-old has been a first team regular since moving to Tynecastle from Portuguese side Maritimo in August 2015.
Rossi was due to be out of contract at the end of the season.
A club statement described the move as "an amazing opportunity for him and his family", adding that they "would not stand in his way".
Rossi is the second defender to leave Hearts this month, following Alim Ozturk's switch to Turkish club Boluspor, while full-back Callum Paterson is out for the rest of the season with knee ligament damage and Faycal Rherras will be at the Africa Cup of Nations with Morocco.
Veteran Northern Ireland international Aaron Hughes has been recruited, along with Lennard Sowah.
Find all the latest football transfers on our dedicated page. 
Summarize: 
"The club would like to thank Bruno for his contribution and wish him well in his future career."
"Hearts have signed defender Bruno Alves on a two-year deal."
"The 27-year-old Brazilian has been a first team regular since moving to Tynecastle from Portuguese side Maritimo in August 2015."
"Hearts have signed defender Aaron Hughes on a one-year deal."
"The Northern Ireland international has been a free agent since leaving West Bromwich Albion in the summer."
"Hearts have signed defender Lennard Sowah on a one-
The alert came as South Korea announced it had two more Mers cases, bringing the total within the country to nine.
The outbreak has been traced to a South Korean who visited the Middle East.
China's first case was another South Korean who had ignored quarantine restrictions and flew to Hong Kong, before travelling south by bus.
It confirmed the case on Thursday night, two days after the 44-year-old made the trip.
The World Health Organization says there has so far been no sustained human-to-human spread of the Mers (Middle East respiratory syndrome) virus, which has no known cure.
Chinese media reported on Friday that the unnamed 68-year-old man had flown into Hong Kong's Chep Lap Kok airport on Asiana Airlines Flight OZ 723, then took a bus through the busy Shenzhen crossing to Huizhou in the southern Guangdong province. He also stayed in a hotel.
He later went to a Huizhou hospital and tested positive for Mers.
Guangdong health authorities warned that it was likely the disease would spread as he had been in busy or crowded places.
He Jianfeng, director for the Guangdong Provincial Center for Disease Control, told reporters that the possibility of Mers transferring to others in the area was "very high".
So far 38 people who came into close contact with the man have been tested and have not showed any signs of illness.
But a Hong Kong woman who was on the same flight was rushed to hospital on Friday after showing symptoms, said The South China Morning Post.
Mers comes from the same family of viruses as Sars (Severe acute respiratory syndrome) which originated in China in 2002 and infected thousands worldwide.
The mystery virus with no known cure 
Summarize: 
The first case of Mers in China was a South Korean who ignored quarantine restrictions and flew to Hong Kong, before travelling south by bus.
The second case was a South Korean who had ignored quarantine restrictions and flew to Hong Kong, before travelling south by bus.
The third case was a South Korean who had ignored quarantine restrictions and flew to Hong Kong, before travelling south by bus.
The fourth case was a South Korean who had ignored quarantine restrictions and flew to Hong Kong, before travelling south by bus.
The fifth case was a South Korean who had ignored quarantine restrictions and flew to Hong Kong, before travelling south by
The deal was agreed last month, with international clearance now in place for the 23-year-old.
Mandiangu has been training with Accies for the past three weeks and goes into the squad for Saturday's Scottish Cup visit to Annan Athletic.
His contract will initially be until the end of the season
Mandiangu, most recently with Eindhoven in the Dutch second tier, began his career with Borussia Monchengladbach and had spells with Neustrelitz and Berliner Dynamo in Germany's regional leagues before moving to the Netherlands in August.
"Christopher definitely wants to get on the ball and commit people, so hopefully he can add something," manager Martin Canning told BBC Scotland in mid-December. 
Summarize: 
Christopher is a central midfielder who can play in the centre of midfield and as a defensive midfielder. He is a good passer of the ball and is very good in the air. He is a good tackler and is very good in the air. Christopher is a good dribbler and is very good in the air. Christopher is a good passer of the ball and is very good in the air. Christopher is a good passer of the ball and is very good in the air. Christopher is a good passer of the ball and is very good in the air. Christopher is a good passer of the ball and is very good in the air
The money is to be spent on measures including more social workers from the new financial year.
Chris Read, council leader and Labour councillor, said: "It's a vote of confidence in the measures we are taking to improve services."
The budget for children's services is £42m from a current council budget of about £200m.
Sir Derek Myers, lead commissioner at the council, said the council's finances were "dire" and "squaring the circle" was difficult when the government was reducing its main grant.
He said the council needed to spend more on children's services and there were also pressures on adult social services.
The council has cut budgets by £117m since 2011-12 with a further £41m savings due to be made by 2019.
Mick Stowe, of Unison the union, said news of the extra grant to children's services was "more than welcome".
However, the further cuts would have a "major impact and is devastating news for public services and the individuals involved", he added.
It was revealed on Tuesday that up to 300 jobs are to go at the council.
Five commissioners have run the council since February after it was declared "not fit for purpose" in the wake of the town's child exploitation scandal.
They took control following the Casey Report's criticism of the council's response to child exploitation.
Sir Derek said the annual cost of the commissioners was about £200,000.
Rotherham was the centre of an abuse ring and last year the Jay Report found 1,400 children had been subjected to abuse.
The commissioners are due to remain in control of Rotherham Council until the end of March 2019. 
Summarize: 
The council's budget for children's services is £42m from a current council budget of about £200m.
Sir Derek Myers, lead commissioner at the council, said the council's finances were "dire" and "squaring the circle" was difficult when the government was reducing its main grant.
He said the council needed to spend more on children's services and there were also pressures on adult social services.
The council has cut budgets by £117m since 2011-12 with a further £41m savings due to be made by 2019.
Mick Stowe, of Unison the union, said
As well as Afghan civilians, the dead include one Briton with dual Afghan nationality, four Indians, two Pakistanis, and one citizen from each of the US, Italy and Kazakhstan.
The Taliban has claimed responsibility for the attack.
The incident at the Park Palace Hotel began early on Wednesday evening.
Gunfire could still be heard from the guesthouse in central Kabul five hours later as Afghan forces retook the building room by room.
Some reports said that two suspected gunmen were among the dead - police said they were shot before they could carry out a suicide attack.
The gunmen reportedly went room to room seeking foreigners.
Georgette Gagnon, of the United Nations Assistance Mission in Afghanistan, condemned the attack as an "atrocity".
"Taliban statements on avoiding civilian casualties ring hollow when we set them against the latest killings," she said.
Security forces rescued more than 50 people who had been at a party in the garden of the hotel, where a well known Afghan classical singer was due to perform.
"The attack was planned carefully to target the party in which important people and Americans were attending," the Taliban said in a statement.
India's Prime Minister Nahendra Modi tweeted that he had spoken to the Afghan President Ashraf Ghani about the attack.
"We are one when it comes to fighting terror," he said. He added that the president "expressed sadness on the unfortunate demise of Indian citizens in the attack".
US embassy spokeswoman Monica Cummings confirmed that one US citizen had died in the attack.
"Our thoughts are with the families of the victims at this time," Ms Cummings said.
This incident raises several questions.
The Taliban says there was only one attacker, but some police sources said there were more.
Was there a failed suicide attack, and why did it take the police so long to secure the building?
In the past Pakistan has been blamed by the Afghan government for violent acts of this sort.
But this attack comes at a time of good relations between the two countries, amid signs that a peace deal with the Taliban may be possible.
President Ashraf Ghani is coming under pressure to deliver on that promise and end insecurity. 
Summarize: 
The Taliban has claimed responsibility for the attack.
The incident at the Park Palace Hotel began early on Wednesday evening.
Gunfire could still be heard from the guesthouse in central Kabul five hours later as Afghan forces retook the building room by room.
Some reports said that two suspected gunmen were among the dead - police said they were shot before they could carry out a suicide attack.
The gunmen reportedly went room to room seeking foreigners.
Georgette Gagnon, of the United Nations Assistance Mission in Afghanistan, condemned the attack as an "atrocity".
"Taliban statements on avoiding civilian casualties ring hollow
Geoff Keys, 63, lost his way in July after trying to find an isolated waterfall in the Jardine National Park in the state of Queensland.
His disappearance led to a big search by helicopters and other rescuers.
Police told the Brisbane Times newspaper that writing the message had probably saved his life.
Writing on his blog, Mr Keys explained that he was attempting to find the Eliot Falls.
The map showed it was not far away from his campsite, he wrote, so he decided to walk some of the way and swim the rest in a creek.
"My outfit consisted of swimming trunks, a pair of swimming shorts over them, a T-shirt and a hat."
When he was unsuccessful, Mr Keys decided to stop swimming and return to his campsite.
"Instead of turning round and swimming back upstream, I decided to take to the bush and cut across to the track. It was nearly dark. I had no shoes. What was I thinking of?" he wrote.
He wandered around until 02:00 before bedding down for the night.  His friends had reported his absence and a helicopter search began the next day.
Mr Keys said he decided to swim downstream and after some time got out to write the SOS message "HELP 2807" [the date, 28 July] with an arrow pointing downstream.
He had to spend another night in the open, and resume swimming again before rescuers noticed the message and eventually winched him to safety.
Police said they had been on the verge of re-directing their search to another area of dense bush land when they saw the SOS. 
Summarize:  Geoff Keys was lost in the Jardine National Park in Queensland, Australia, in July 2007. He was found by a helicopter crew after he wrote the message "HELP 2807" on a tree.
In August 2007, the Australian Broadcasting Corporation (ABC) reported that the Queensland Police Service had received a complaint from a member of the public about the police search for Geoff Keys.
The ABC reported that the complainant was concerned that the police search for Keys was being conducted in a "rushed and hasty manner".
The ABC reported that the Queensland Police Service had responded to the complaint by saying that the search for
A married couple and three teenagers were on board the flight, which had just taken off from Riverside airport on Monday.
They were returning home to San Jose following a cheerleading event at the Disneyland theme park.
The identities of the victims have not been released.
Residents of the two homes hit by the plane have been accounted for.
One of the teenagers, a girl, was thrown from the back seat of the light aircraft but suffered only minor injuries, Riverside fire chief Michael Moore said.
"Upon impact, the plane pretty much split apart, and luckily she was ejected," he said.
The girl managed to crawl to safety from the wreckage of the house and ask for help. She was later able to talk to firefighters about what had happened before she was taken to hospital, Mr Moore added.
One witness said that the plane's wings were "nearly perpendicular to the ground" moments before it "went into a nosedive" and crashed into the two homes, AP news agency reports.
Firefighters pulled another passenger from one of the burning properties. The victim was unconscious and said to be in a San Bernardino hospital in critical condition.
Three bodies, all from the plane, were found in the wreckage of the aircraft and the homes.
The plane, which broke up on impact, was still burning several hours after the crash because of the fuel it was carrying. 
Summarize:  The plane was flying low over the homes when it crashed into them. The plane was carrying 3 people, including a teenager. The teenager was thrown from the plane and suffered minor injuries. The plane split apart on impact and the girl was ejected. She was able to crawl to safety and ask for help. She was later able to talk to firefighters about what happened before she was taken to hospital. The plane was carrying 3 people, including a teenager. The teenager was thrown from the plane and suffered minor injuries. The plane split apart on impact and the girl was ejected. She was able to crawl to safety and ask for help. She was
Moffat, who also oversees Doctor Who, was honoured with the special award for outstanding writing.
Accepting the award, he told the London ceremony: "Write what you love. I've never loved anything as much as Doctor Who and Sherlock."
However he and Sherlock co-creator Mark Gatiss lost out to ITV1's Appropriate Adult for best TV short-form drama.
Screenwriter Neil McKay's Fred West drama also beat This is England '88 writers Shane Meadows and Jack Thorne to the prize.
Starring Dominic West, Appropriate Adult has already been honoured with TV Baftas, RTS and Broadcasting Guild Awards.
BBC3's Being Human won the Writers' Guild award for TV drama series, while Hollyoaks writer Nick Leather won best continuing TV drama.
BBC4 comedy Holy Flying Circus, written by Tony Roche, won best TV comedy.
Doctor Who spin-off The Sarah Jane Adventures, written by Phil Ford, took the prize for best children's TV script for its episode The Curse of Clyde Langer.
Other winners included Dexter Fletcher's directorial debut Wild Bill, which won best first feature film for him and co-writer Danny King.
We Need to Talk About Kevin won best screenplay for Lynne Ramsay and Rory Stewart Kinnear.
The awards were handed out in London on Wednesday night by The Writers' Guild of Great Britain, which supports writers across every media, from books, theatre, TV and radio.
Rachel De-lahay won best play for The Westbridge, a Royal Court production that ran at Peckham's Bussey Building, while best play for children and young people went to Brendan Murray for Hare and Tortoise.
There were also two awards for radio writing, with Radio 4's Pandemic, by John Dryden, winning the drama category and Matt Berry's I, Regress winning best radio comedy.
Best fiction book went to Patrick McGuinness' The Last Hundred Days, and best videogame script was won by Paul Crocker's Batman: Arkham City. 
Summarize: 
The Writers' Guild of Great Britain is an organisation that supports writers across every media, from books, theatre, TV and radio.
The Guild's awards are given out in London on Wednesday night.
The awards are given out in London on Wednesday night.
The awards are given out in London on Wednesday night.
The awards are given out in London on Wednesday night.
The awards are given out in London on Wednesday night.
The awards are given out in London on Wednesday night.
The awards are given out in London on Wednesday night.
The awards are given out
It follows more than two hours of talks between leaders of the union and officials from Southern's parent firm, Govia Thameslink Railway (GTR).
RMT general secretary Mick Cash called for round-table discussions involving all parties to now take place.
"This dispute can be resolved, we have no doubt about that," he said.
"RMT entered the talks in good faith today following our discussions with Transport Secretary Chris Grayling.
"However, it is clear that there is a major blockage to making progress and that is the failure to get all parties around the table at the same time," Mr Cash said.
Both the RMT and Aslef unions have been embroiled in a dispute with GTR over the decision to replace conductors with "on-board supervisors".
Since January a number of routes have been operating this way, with extra responsibilities - including the closing of train doors - switching to drivers.
Mr Cash said the only way to try to break the deadlock would be to get both unions in discussion together with the Department for Transport and GTR.
"Meeting in different rooms at different times simply isn't working.
"RMT will be taking this proposal back to Chris Grayling and his officials with a request that they, as the contract holders, take action to broker those round table talks at the earliest possible opportunity.
"This dispute can be resolved, we have no doubt about that, and the fresh approach we have outlined today will allow us to kick start the talks process." 
Summarize: 
The dispute has been ongoing since January 2017 when the RMT union and Aslef union started a dispute with Southern Rail over the introduction of "on-board supervisors" (OSs) on Southern Rail services.
The dispute has been ongoing since January 2017 when the RMT union and Aslef union started a dispute with Southern Rail over the introduction of "on-board supervisors" (OSs) on Southern Rail services.
The dispute has been ongoing since January 2017 when the RMT union and Aslef union started a dispute with Southern Rail over the introduction of "on-board supervisors" (OSs)
4 October 2016 Last updated at 11:51 BST
This is the creative work of young unemployed Sierra Leoneans trying to earn a living.
Digital Reporter: Alice Muthengi 
Summarize: 
"The project is designed to help unemployed youth in Sierra Leone to develop their creative skills and to earn a living. It is a project that is being run by the Sierra Leone Methodist Church and the Sierra Leonean government. The project is a joint effort between the Sierra Leone Methodist Church and the Sierra Leonean government. The project is a joint effort between the Sierra Leone Methodist Church and the Sierra Leonean government. The project is a joint effort between the Sierra Leone Methodist Church and the Sierra Leonean government. The project is a joint effort between the Sierra Leone Methodist Church and the Sierra Leonean government. The project is a joint effort
A Los Angeles district judge said there were enough similarities between the song and an instrumental by the band Spirit to let a jury decide.
The trial has been scheduled for 10 May.
Stairway to Heaven, released in 1971, is widely seen as one of the greatest rock compositions of all time.
The copyright infringement action has been brought by Michael Skidmore, a trustee for the late Spirit guitarist Randy Wolfe, who played on the same bill as Led Zeppelin in the 1960s, and claims he should be given a writing credit on the track.
Led Zeppelin guitarist Page and lead singer Plant are reputed to have written Stairway to Heaven in a remote cottage in Wales.
However, Mr Skidmore has suggested the song came about after the band heard Spirit perform the instrumental Taurus while the bands toured together in 1968 and 1969.
US district judge Gary Klausner said a jury could find "substantial" similarity between the first two minutes of Stairway and Taurus.
"While it is true that a descending chromatic four-chord progression is a common convention that abounds in the music industry, the similarities here transcend this core structure," Judge Klausner ruled.
"What remains is a subjective assessment of the 'concept and feel' of two works... a task no more suitable for a judge than for a jury."
He also said the trustee can get only 50% of any damages awarded, citing a 1967 contract Wolfe signed. 
Summarize: 
The song was written by Led Zeppelin guitarist Jimmy Page and singer Robert Plant.
The song was released in 1971 on Led Zeppelin's album "Led Zeppelin IV".
The song was written in a cottage in Wales.
The song was written in 1968.
The song was written in 1968.
The song was written in 1968.
The song was written in 1968.
The song was written in 1968.
The song was written in 1968.
The song was written in 1968.
The song was written in 1968.
The song was written in 1968.
The song was written in 1968.
The newly created role is part of a wider reorganisation of the corporation.
Moore, who brought The Great British Bake Off to BBC One, will start her new job on 25 January and will report to acting director of TV Mark Linsey.
She said: "I'm honoured to lead the BBC's channel portfolio into the future at such a significant time."
She continued: "It is more important than ever for audiences and programme makers that we have a clearly defined sense of purpose for each channel to ensure we deliver even higher quality and more distinctive content."
As the BBC's commissioning editor of documentaries, Moore was behind successful documentaries such as Terry Prachett's Choosing To Die.
In February 2013, she was appointed acting controller of daytime television and had been acting controller of BBC One since Danny Cohen's promotion to director of BBC Television.
She became controller of BBC One in June 2013.
BBC Two and BBC Four controller Kim Shillinglaw is to leave the BBC and her post will be closed.
The BBC said the reorganisation "follows other recent moves to simplify structures at the BBC". 
Summarize: 
BBC One controller Danny Cohen has been promoted to director of television, replacing Alan Yentob, who is leaving the BBC.
BBC One controller Danny Cohen has been promoted to director of television, replacing Alan Yentob, who is leaving the BBC.
BBC One controller Danny Cohen has been promoted to director of television, replacing Alan Yentob, who is leaving the BBC.
BBC One controller Danny Cohen has been promoted to director of television, replacing Alan Yentob, who is leaving the BBC.
BBC One controller Danny Cohen has been promoted to director of television, replacing Alan Yentob
Brown, 31, came out of a short international retirement to play in World Cup qualifying games against England and Slovenia.
The home date with England is 10 June, with Celtic starting their Champions League campaign a month later.
"If he wants to play, absolutely fine," Rodgers told Sky Sports. "We'll find a solution for that."
Celtic could wrap up the Scottish Premiership title this weekend and Rodgers is mindful of his players' workload.
But he is also conscious of his skipper's desire to keep playing under Scotland coach Gordon Strachan.
Asked if he would rather Brown sat out the match against Group F leaders England, Rodgers said: "No, because I think there's a genuine love for playing for Scotland for him.
"He obviously retired but his loyalty to Gordon and what Gordon has done for him over the years, bringing him here and the relationship that he has, it's totally natural - when he saw Gordon maybe not having a good time earlier on in the campaign - why he wanted to support him.
"It also typifies the guy he is. He has real old-school values and he wanted to help someone that he really respects.
"I think he's a really important player for the spirit of the Scotland squad. I obviously have to look at Celtic as well but we will find a solution that will do both, I'm sure."
Brown was one of six Celtic players in the starting line up for Scotland's win over Slovenia last weekend and Rodgers admits the international schedule will present a challenge.
"I need to manage it," said Rodgers. "I want to help the players. Their careers are short, so I want them to play for as long as they possibly can.
"Of course we have qualifiers that kick in very early for the Champions League and that's critical for us. So its a case of managing the time, the rest, the recovery.
"Successful players don't get a lot of rest. If you are playing right through to the end of the season, you have international games and the difference up here is that you are into qualification games a lot sooner.
"But that's the job of myself and my staff, to look at each individual's programme and look to give them the recovery where we can." 
Summarize: 
"I think he's a really important player for the spirit of the Scotland squad. I obviously have to look at Celtic as well but we will find a solution that will do both, I'm sure."
"I need to manage it," said Rodgers. "I want to help the players. Their careers are short, so I want them to play for as long as they possibly can."
"I think he's a really important player for the spirit of the Scotland squad. I obviously have to look at Celtic as well but we will find a solution that will do both, I'm sure."
"
Babafemi Junaid, known as Femi, was found stabbed at about 17:30 GMT on Friday in Clapham Road, near Stockwell Tube station, south London.
Officers believe the 22-year-old was stabbed in Clapham Road and had then got into his car which was then in collilsion with the bus.
No-one else is thought to have been injured in the incident.
The Metropolitan Police force said it believed the stabbing might be linked to an earlier report of a fight on a nearby bus.
Mr Junaid was taken to hospital after he was found but died later in the evening, police said.
No arrests have been made.
A post-mortem examination will be held in due course. 
Summarize: 
The victim was stabbed in Clapham Road, near Stockwell Tube station, south London.
Officers believe the 22-year-old was stabbed in Clapham Road and had then got into his car which was then in collision with the bus.
No-one else is thought to have been injured in the incident.
The Metropolitan Police force said it believed the stabbing might be linked to an earlier report of a fight on a nearby bus.
Mr Junaid was taken to hospital after he was found but died later in the evening, police said.
No arrests have been made.
A
The ride will measure 178m (584ft) in length and 76m (249ft) in height, with the descent taking about 40 seconds.
The £3.5m attraction in east London will be open from 24 June.
The Orbit tower previously ran at a loss of £520,000 in 2014-15, while being used as an observation tower.
The London Legacy Development Corporation (LLDC) says it will recover the money spent to build the slide in five years.
The tower had been forecast to make a profit of £1.2m by the LLDC.
Adult tickets will cost £17, with £12 to access the sculpture and £5 to slide down, although it is £15 if you book in advance.
Park officials said the ride would give a "different perspective" of the tower.
Turner Prize-winning artist Anish Kapoor and structural designer Cecil Balmond designed the tower for the 2012 Olympics.
The slide has 12 twists and ends with a 50m (164ft) straight run to the ground.
It was designed by German artist Carsten Höller, who last year designed slides which ran outside the Hayward Gallery on the Southbank. 
Summarize:  The Orbit tower is a sculpture that was built for the 2012 Summer Olympics in London, England. The tower is an observation tower that is tall, and was built at a cost of £3.5 million. The tower was designed by Anish Kapoor and Cecil Balmond, and was built for the 2012 Summer Olympics. The tower is tall, and is made of steel and glass. The tower is located in east London, and is open 24 hours a day. The tower is the tallest observation tower in the world, and is the tallest sculpture in the world. The tower was designed to be a symbol of the Olympic Games, and
The weather phenomenon, which is similar to a tornado, could be seen swirling off the coast around Thorpeness and Aldeburgh.
Jackie Butler, of Leiston, watched the waterspout while walking her dogs on Sizewell beach on Saturday evening.
"All of a sudden we could see there was a spout coming down into the water," she said.
"It literally drew the water up into itself and continued for 30 minutes and then stopped. As we stood and watched it, it reformed again.
"It was amazing, absolutely amazing."
Meteorologist and BBC Look East weather forecaster Dan Holley said: "Essentially a waterspout is just a tornado but over water.
"Both begin life as a funnel cloud - a rotating column of air underneath a shower or thunderstorm - which, once it's extended to the ground becomes a tornado if it's on land, or named a waterspout if over water.
"On Saturday we had a line of wind convergence where northwesterly winds inland met an easterly sea breeze from the North Sea.
"Where the two opposing winds meet, the air gets forced upwards to create showers, and with a little spin can occasionally create funnel clouds." 
Summarize: 
"It is a very rare occurrence and the only one in Suffolk this year."
"It is a very rare occurrence and the only one in Suffolk this year."
"It is a very rare occurrence and the only one in Suffolk this year."
"It is a very rare occurrence and the only one in Suffolk this year."
"It is a very rare occurrence and the only one in Suffolk this year."
"It is a very rare occurrence and the only one in Suffolk this year."
"It is a very rare occurrence and the only one in Suffolk this year."
People in the south Wales valleys were the most likely to describe themselves as Welsh, with Rhondda Cynon Taf having the highest Welsh-only identity.
Blaenau Gwent had the highest proportion of people born in Wales, while Powys had the lowest.
This was the first time a national identity question had been asked.
The 2001 census had proved controversial after it included a box for people to tick to describe themselves as Scottish or Irish but not Welsh.
If people wanted to class themselves as Welsh in 2001 they were told they could tick the box marked "other" and then write "Welsh" alongside.
The omission sparked protests and the Welsh government lobbied for a national identity question.
The Office for National Statistics confirmed in 2008 a Welsh tick box would be included in the 2011 census.
The figures have also been broken down by local authority, with 73% of Rhondda Cynon Taf's population (171,800 people) who said they saw themselves as Welsh only.
This was followed closely by Merthyr Tydfil, with a slightly smaller proportion, but was also 73% (43,100 people).
Merthyr also had the smallest proportion of people who described themselves as English (4%) or both English and British (less than 1%).
Statisticians said for every 20 people in Wales, 15 would be born in Wales, four born in England and one born somewhere else.
Only Cardiff has more than 10% of its population born outside Wales. 
Summarize: 
The 2011 census showed a total of 2,037,300 people (1.3% of the UK population) were born in Wales, with 1,037,700 (0.8%) born in England.
In 2001, the census showed a total of 1,933,000 people (1.3% of the UK population) were born in Wales, with 1,084,000 (0.8%) born in England.
In 2011, the census showed a total of 2,037,300 people (1.3% of the UK population) were born in Wales
Police were called to the property in West Main Street, Whitburn, at about 15:30 on Tuesday after the 30-year-old was found dead.
Bertie Hall, 49, was charged with murder when he appeared at Livingston Sheriff Court on Thursday.
He made no plea or declaration and was remanded in custody. 
Summarize: 
The court heard that Hall had been in a relationship with the victim for about five years.
Hall was remanded in custody and is due to appear at Livingston Sheriff Court on Friday.
The victim was a mother of two and was also known as "Lil Miss".
The death is being treated as murder and police are still trying to establish a motive.
The court heard that Hall had been in a relationship with the victim for about five years.
Hall was remanded in custody and is due to appear at Livingston Sheriff Court on Friday.
The victim was a mother of two and
The bodies of a man and a woman were recovered from Breydon Water, Great Yarmouth, on Thursday.
The couple were in their early 60s and from the local area, officers said.
The deaths were initially treated as unexplained but police said they were now satisfied there are no suspicious circumstances.
More news from Norfolk
Emergency services were called to the area shortly after 11:20 BST when a member of the public reported seeing the bodies on a mudbank.
Norfolk Police said they were still trying to trace the couple's next of kin. 
Summarize: 
A man and a woman have been found dead in Breydon Water, Great Yarmouth.
The bodies were discovered by a member of the public on a mudbank at around 11:20 BST on Thursday.
The couple were in their early 60s and from the local area, officers said.
The deaths were initially treated as unexplained but police said they were now satisfied there are no suspicious circumstances.
More news from Norfolk
The bodies of a man and a woman were recovered from Breydon Water, Great Yarmouth, on Thursday.
The couple were in their early 60s and from the
The programme has come under criticism for taking its cameras to a makeshift church at the centre of the camp.
"It is not a political statement on the situation or a judgement on migration," said the BBC's head of religion and ethics, Aaqil Ahmed, in a blog post.
"To suggest so is wrong."
He added: "Songs of Praise is not only about Christian music, it also explores contemporary issues and modern themes from a Christian perspective."
Thousands of migrants from countries including Syria, Libya and Eritrea are camped in and around Calais. Two sections of Songs of Praise, which will be broadcast on Sunday, have been filmed at the camp.
The Daily Express and The Sun were among newspapers which criticised the BBC's decision to film at the camp.
The Sun wrote: "The BBC sending Songs of Praise to the Calais migrant camp amid the current chaos is like something from Monty Python.
"Will we get to see migrants wrestling with riot police and storming lorries as a choir stands at the Channel tunnel welcoming them with a rousing rendition of Jerusalem?"
Prominent figures from the Church of England have defended the programme including the Archbishop of Canterbury Justin Welby, who tweeted: "The love of Christ is freely offered to all, celebrated everywhere, for everyone to know, well done #SongsOfPraise and @giles_fraser"
The Dean of Durham, Decanus Borealis, wrote in a blog: "I'm glad that SOP can be there to give the migrants air-time in a broadcast forum where it would be so easy to pretend they don't exist."
Mr Ahmed said, in his BBC blog: "The knowledge that the migrants had built a makeshift church is exactly the kind of action that Christian communities everywhere will relate to."
"Songs of Praise is simply reflecting the conversations going on in many churches and Christian households around the country.
Songs of Praise is on Sunday 16 August at 17:00 BST on BBC One. 
Summarize: 
"Songs of Praise" is a documentary series which features a choir of singers from the Church of England, who sing hymns and gospel songs. The choir is based at the BBC's London studios, where they sing for the programme.
The choir is made up of singers from all over the country, and the choir's director is Giles Fraser.
The choir has been singing since the 1960s, and the choir has also recorded albums.
The choir has appeared on the BBC's "Songs of Praise" since the 1960s.
The choir has also appeared on the BBC's "Songs of
At a hustings, the Respect candidate had produced what he said was a wedding certificate proving Naz Shah had not, as claimed, been forced to marry at 15.
Mr Galloway was challenging Mrs Shah's account of being forced to wed in Pakistan, published in an open letter.
Labour says her original certificate proves she was a minor at the time.
It says it will publish the "nikah" certificate as proof. The party has written to Mr Galloway's election agent, calling on the Respect leader to apologise, and claiming he has breached electoral law by making false statements about the conduct and character of its candidate.
Mr Galloway's agent, Ron McKay, said: "We are very surprised that Labour wants to prolong this deeply sordid affair and drag it across the voters of Bradford West.
"However, if that is the way it has to be there's very much more that we can say and we will."
The hustings incident made headlines after a clip of Mr Galloway calling Mrs Shah a "liar" emerged on YouTube.
A Labour spokesman said Mr Galloway was "resorting to desperate untruths about Labour's candidate".
Mr Shah's open letter had described being sent to Pakistan to escape her mother's abusive partner, before undergoing a forced marriage aged 15. The marriage was re-registered when she was 16, to enable her Pakistani husband to get a UK residence visa.
"British authorities would not have allowed her husband to come into the country with her had they known she was only 15 at the time of the marriage," says BBC Radio Leeds political reporter Louise Martin.
"This is not an uncommon practice in such circumstances."
Mrs Shah left her husband in 1992, and became active in politics after her mother's imprisonment.
The candidates for Bradford West are: 
Summarize: 
The BBC reported that the "Nikah" certificate was produced by Shah's father, who had been forced to marry her at 15.
The BBC reported that Shah's father had been forced to marry her at 15.
The BBC reported that Shah's father had been forced to marry her at 15.
The BBC reported that Shah's father had been forced to marry her at 15.
The BBC reported that Shah's father had been forced to marry her at 15.
The BBC reported that Shah's father had been forced to marry her at 15.
The BBC reported that Shah's father
It runs until Sunday with over 100 events in the setting of the town's Harmony Gardens.
Anne Reid, star of Dinner Ladies and Last Tango in Halifax, will open proceedings with her one-woman show.
Others scheduled to appear during the festival include John Cleese, Michael Parkinson, Joanna Trollope, Judy Murray and Steve Backshall.
The winner of this year's prestigious Â£25,000 Walter Scott Prize for Historical Fiction will also be announced at the event on Saturday.
Alistair Moffat, festival director, said: "In a climate of political turmoil and unease, we could all do with a dose of fun and entertainment, and the Baillie Gifford Borders Book Festival has it in spades.
"There are serious moments of reflection and contemplation too, as we examine our rapidly changing world.
"This year the book festival has something for everyone and we look forward to welcoming our audience to Harmony Gardens to enjoy a truly memorable weekend." 
Summarize: 
The Borders Book Festival is a week-long celebration of books and reading, taking place in the Borders town of Hawick, Scotland.
The Borders Book Festival is a week-long celebration of books and reading, taking place in the Borders town of Hawick, Scotland.
The Borders Book Festival is a week-long celebration of books and reading, taking place in the Borders town of Hawick, Scotland.
The Borders Book Festival is a week-long celebration of books and reading, taking place in the Borders town of Hawick, Scotland.
The Borders Book Festival is a week-long celebration of books and reading,
Socialist leader Antonio Costa admitted defeat and congratulated Prime Minister Pedro Passos Coelho.
With almost all votes counted, the centre-right leads with just under 37%, with the Socialists on over 32%.
However, Mr Passos Coelho said his coalition appeared to have lost its absolute majority in parliament.
With 99 seats in the 230-seat parliament, the ruling coalition fell 17 seats short of the number it needed.
Mr Passos Coelho indicated that he was ready to talk to other parties in the next parliament to pursue the "necessary reforms" he wants to implement.
"Times haven't been easy, and the times ahead will be challenging," he said, promising to talk to the Socialists with the aim of maintaining a rigorous budget and a reduction in the public debt.
Parties to the left of the Socialists achieved their best-ever result, says the BBC's Alison Roberts in Lisbon.
Left Bloc won 10% of the vote, securing 19 seats, while the Communists took 8% of the vote.
Four years of austerity have taken their toll, and the coalition lost almost one-third of the votes that its two constituent parties gleaned in the last general election, our correspondent adds.
The coalition had vowed to continue the policies in place since 2011 after it was forced to seek a eurozone bailout.
Unemployment has been falling for two-and-a-half years, but many regard the recovery as fragile.
12%
of the workforce is unemployed
20%
of people live below the poverty line
485,000 emigrated from Portugal between 2011 and 2014
125% debt to GDP - the second highest rate in the European Union 
Summarize:  The Socialist Party (PS) won the most votes in the election, but fell short of a majority. The PS is the largest party in the outgoing government. The PS is a left-wing party that has been in power since 2011. The PS is a member of the Socialist International. The PS is a member of the Progressive Alliance. The PS is a member of the Socialist International. The PS is a member of the Socialist International. The PS is a member of the Socialist International. The PS is a member of the Socialist International. The PS is a member of the Socialist International. The PS is a member of the Socialist International.
The 19-year-old joined the Sky Blues in August but he started just one game for the League One side.
England Under-20 international Morris spent time in League Two with Burton last season.
The Minstermen are currently managerless after boss Russ Wilcox was sacked on Monday. 
Summarize: 
The 19-year-old joined the Sky Blues in August but he started just one game for the League One side.
England Under-20 international Morris spent time in League Two with Burton last season.
The Minstermen are currently managerless after boss Russ Wilcox was sacked on Monday.
Summarize:
The 19-year-old joined the Sky Blues in August but he started just one game for the League One side.
England Under-20 international Morris spent time in League Two with Burton last season.
The Minstermen are currently managerless after boss Russ Wilcox was sacked on
More than 97% of voters in a referendum chose to remain as five states rather than form a single region, it said.
The vote was boycotted by major rebel and opposition groups which say a united region would have more autonomy.
The referendum was part of a peace process to end 13 years of conflict that has left 300,000 people dead.
Ahead of the vote, Sudanese President Omar al-Bashir, who is wanted by the International Criminal Court (ICC) on war crimes charges related to Darfur, said it would be a free and fair poll.
However, the US state department warned that the referendum could not be considered credible "under current rules and conditions".
The vote was held amid ongoing insecurity and many of Sudan's 2.5 million displaced people were not registered to vote.
The electoral commission said 3.08 million people out of 3.21 million eligible voters turned out for the referendum earlier this month.
Rebels have long sought more regional powers to end what they see as Khartoum's interference in land ownership conflicts.
They believe that the government's splitting of Darfur into three states in 1994, and then into five states, led to heavier control from Khartoum and helped to trigger the conflict that broke out in 2003.
Correspondents say the Sudanese government believes a unified Darfur would give the rebels a platform to push for independence just as South Sudan did successfully in 2011.
The ICC has indicted President Bashir on counts of genocide and war crimes committed in Darfur.
Mr Bashir - who has told the BBC he will step down as president in 2020 - has dismissed the ICC as a "political tribunal". 
Summarize: 
The referendum was held amid ongoing insecurity and many of Sudan's 2.5 million displaced people were not registered to vote.
The electoral commission said 3.08 million people out of 3.21 million eligible voters turned out for the referendum earlier this month.
Rebels have long sought more regional powers to end what they see as Khartoum's interference in land ownership conflicts.
They believe that the government's splitting of Darfur into three states in 1994, and then into five states, led to heavier control from Khartoum and helped to trigger the conflict that broke out in 2003.
Correspondents say the
The watchdog said "squalid conditions" were found at the unregistered Bordesley independent school, for children from the Muslim community, which has now closed.
Sir Michael said the council should have taken action against the school.
The council admitted it now needed to be "sharper".
Updates on this story and more from Birmingham.
Ofsted said it had found evidence of 15 unregistered schools, but arrangements for closing down such institutions were inadequate.
In a letter to Education Secretary Nicky Morgan, Sir Michael said inspectors had been delayed from entering the Birmingham school, but once inside had found "squalid conditions" including no running water in the toilet areas.
There was also "clear evidence of segregation, with separate classrooms for boys and girls" and "no evidence of appropriate vetting checks being carried out on staff". Ofsted said evidence suggested all children at the school in Bordesley were from the Muslim community.
Sir Michael told the BBC that following the so-called Trojan Horse scandal, Birmingham should be "more concerned than most local authorities".
Asked if the authority had been negligent, Sir Michael said: "Yes absolutely so. They knew this place was operating and operating illegally and they should have gone in there, got the evidence and mounted a case [to the Department for Education]."
Council head of children's services Peter Hay said local authorities did not have a statutory role to regulate or oversee independent schools and any actions with them were "on an entirely voluntary basis".
But he added: "I do get Sir Michael's point, that in relation to Birmingham there are now serious concerns."
He said the council needed to have a "sharper" response in the future.
The Education Secretary, Nicky Morgan said: "We understand Bordesley has now closed and are keeping in close contact with Birmingham local authority as they work to urgently ensure the children involved are safe and are receiving suitable education." 
Summarize: 
The Department for Education has confirmed that the school was not registered with the DfE.
The school was not registered with the DfE, and the council had not been aware of the school's existence.
The school was not registered with the DfE, and the council had not been aware of the school's existence.
The council had not been aware of the school's existence.
The council had not been aware of the school's existence.
The school was not registered with the DfE, and the council had not been aware of the school's existence.
The council had not been aware of
Llanfaelog Community Council said it believed Llyn Maelog near Rhosneigr was the first lake to attain the status.
Anglesey Council's legal experts decided there was no legal problem with the new designation at the lake, which is already a Site of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI).
County councillors backed the move in a meeting on Wednesday.
Richard Dew, the community council clerk, said it had taken a number of years to reach this stage.
"It goes back a few years when the council looked at improving facilities, for locals and visitors, popular for sailing, boating, fishing as well as wildlife," he said.
"We found there was no registered owner, so the way forward was to register it as a village green."
Mr Dew said he understood that Llyn Maelog was the first lake in Wales to attain village green status.
"But it is a very important lake, it has triple SI status, and we are  aware of the importance from a wildlife view as well," he added.
Last year, Sherwood Lake in Tunbridge Wells, Kent was registered as a village green.
Kate Ashbrook, general secretary of the open spaces society said: "Green spaces and open water are of immense importance to the public, as places of recreation and refreshment, where we can enjoy nature in peace and quiet." 
Summarize: 
Llyn Maelog is a lake in the north of Anglesey, Wales. It is a Site of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI).
It is a shallow lake, with an area of about , and a maximum depth of .
It is situated in the north of the island, about from the coast.
The lake is about long and wide.
The lake is surrounded by woodland.
The lake is a Site of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI).
The lake is a shallow lake, with an area of about , and a maximum depth of .
It is
O'Sullivan, 40, was the last winner of the Northern Ireland Trophy, the last world ranking tournament to be hosted by World Snooker in Belfast, in 2008.
The five-time world champion faces a busy autumn schedule.
O'Sullivan has also entered the English Open in Manchester, the Shanghai Masters, the European Championship and the International Championship.
Last season, O'Sullivan, currently ranked world number 10, did not play competitively until December.
The Irish Open will see 128 of the world's leading players compete in Belfast from 14-20 November.
The tournament is part of the new Home Nations quartet of events, with any player winning all four tournaments receiving a £1m bonus.
Total prize money for each of the Home Nations events will be £366,000, with the winner to receive £70,000.
The first of the four tournaments, the English Open, will take place in October, followed by the Irish Open, the Scottish Open in December and the Welsh Open in February 2017. 
Summarize: 
The Irish Open is a snooker tournament held in Ireland. It was first held in 2007, and has been held every year since. The winner receives £70,000.
The Irish Open is the only ranking event in Ireland. The last time it was held in Ireland was in 2007. The tournament was held in Dublin in 2007, and in Belfast in 2008.
The Irish Open is the only ranking event in Ireland. The last time it was held in Ireland was in 2007. The tournament was held in Dublin in 2007, and in Belfast in 2008.
The Irish Open is the only ranking event
The city has been named as the UK's most desirable location in the Sunday Times Best Places to Live Guide.
Described as "a small city that feels like a big city", it was praised for being "handily placed for seaside and scenery" but "hardly cut off".
Regional winners included Frome in Somerset, Peckham in London and Ballycastle in Northern Ireland.
The annual guide, which combines data such as crime rates, house prices and school performance, said the city had faced "stiff competition" from London and other major UK destinations
But it said, with lots of "glamorous, creative, hi-tech and professional" jobs on offer and "great" food and drink - the city "crams in all the culture you could wish for".
Research shows the better you fit into the personality of your area, the happier you are.
Take the test to find the best place in Britain for you
Sunday Times home editor Helen Davies, said: "The city is a worthy winner thanks to its ideal combination of extraordinary culture, impressive schools, buzzing culinary scene, exciting redevelopment and community spirit.
"We sum the city up as cool, classy and supremely creative."
Mayor of Bristol, Marvin Rees, said he was "chuffed" the city had been recognised.
"Pinpointing what makes Bristol special isn't easy," he said.
"It's a combination of many things from the people to the place itself, but at the heart of it is our cultural diversity and independent spirit."
East: Woodbridge in Suffolk
London: Peckham
Midlands: Shipston-on-Stour in Warwickshire
North and North East: Newcastle Quayside in Tyne and Wear
Northern Ireland: Ballycastle in County Antrim
North West: Knutsford in Cheshire
Scotland: North Berwick
South East: Wadhurst in East Sussex
South West: Frome in Somerset
Wales: Cowbridge 
Summarize: 
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Describe:
Desc
Police were called at 00:15 BST on Friday to Stud Farm Park, Morecambe, where they discovered Damon Searson with a chest wound.
The 23-year-old was taken to Royal Lancaster Infirmary but died a short time later.
Terri-Marie Palmer, 22, of Warton Avenue, Heysham, is due to appear before Lancaster magistrates on Monday.
Det Supt Paul Withers, from Lancashire Constabulary, said: "I would like to reassure the local community that we believe this was an isolated incident." 
Summarize: 
"A 22-year-old woman has been charged with murder following the death of a man in Morecambe.
Terri-Marie Palmer, of Warton Avenue, Heysham, appeared before Lancaster magistrates on Saturday morning.
She was remanded in custody to appear at Preston Crown Court on Monday.
The charge against her relates to the death of Damon Searson, 23, at Stud Farm Park, Morecambe, on Friday.
Mr Searson was found with a chest wound at the park at about 00:15 BST.
He was taken to Lancaster Royal Infirmary but died a
Scrum-coach specialist Hatley, 46, a former England Saxons prop, has been with the Premiership club since 2012.
"Discussions are underway with the RFU," Bath managing director Tarquin McDonald told BBC Radio Bristol.
"Being on the coaching staff for England is one of the biggest jobs around so there is definitely appeal."
Since head coach Eddie Jones' appointment to the national team in November, Saracens' Paul Gustard has joined England as defence coach and Bristol's Steve Borthwick has arrived as forwards coach.
McDonald added: "Neal Hatley is a very experienced, good coach. A coach like Neal could definitely add enormous value. He's been an asset here at the club.
"In these types of situations, it's in everyone's instance that you conclude quickly so we can move from speculation to fact.
"Neal's very passionate about the club and we've got three games until the end of the season." 
Summarize: 
Hatley, who played for England Under-21s, is a former England Saxons prop who has coached at Bath, London Irish and London Welsh.
He has also worked with the England Saxons and was part of the coaching team that helped England Under-20s win the Junior World Championship in 2012.
He was also part of the coaching team that helped England Under-19s win the Junior World Championship in 2010.
Hatley, who has also worked with the England Under-18s, was part of the coaching team that helped England Under-18s win the Junior World Championship in 2009.
He
It follows controversy over payouts such as £277,000 for Pembrokeshire chief executive Bryn Parry-Jones.
Redundancy payments will be capped at £90,000 for NHS and council staff, the Lib Dems said, if it came into power after the 2016 assembly election.
People on low and middle incomes would be exempt, following consultation on where the line should be drawn.
Local government spokesman Peter Black said the Lib Dems would end the "golden goodbyes" that had cost "hard-pressed taxpayers hundreds of millions of pounds".
"At a time when nurses, teachers and police have all either had their salaries frozen or they've seen a minimal pay-rise, it is simply not acceptable that their bosses are on the receiving end of six-figure redundancy payments," he said.
"For too long the Welsh Labour government has sat back and accepted these pay-outs; this complacency must end."
The Welsh government said it was not currently a devolved matter but it supported "consistency of treatment for public sector employees across the UK".
The Conservatives have pledged to cap public sector pay-offs at £95,000 if they win the 2015 general election.
Plaid Cymru's Welsh local government spokesperson Rhodri Glyn Thomas said: "The issue of payouts for fat cats needs to be dealt with but shouldn't distract from the real problem at the bottom of the workforce, where we need to give local authorities in particular the funding they need to meet the living wage." 
Summarize: 
The Welsh Liberal Democrats have pledged to cap public sector pay-offs at £95,000 if they win the 2015 general election.
The party said it would end the "golden goodbyes" that had cost "hard-pressed taxpayers hundreds of millions of pounds".
"At a time when nurses, teachers and police have all either had their salaries frozen or they've seen a minimal pay-rise, it is simply not acceptable that their bosses are on the receiving end of six-figure redundancy payments," said Peter Black, local government spokesman for the party.
"For too long the Welsh Labour government
Thomas Poulsom, a former tree surgeon, is building a life-sized crane and flamingo for a nature centre's display.
They will form part of a "menagerie" at the Wildfowl and Wetlands Trust, Slimbridge, Gloucestershire.
The ten-creature collection, including a 4ft (1.2m) otter, is set to go on show next month.
His work will be displayed alongside animals made by certified Lego builders.
"It's very painstaking," Mr Poulsom said, "the flamingo took about two weeks to build - 10 days of working eight hours a day."
Since getting a box of bricks back from a friend a few years ago, Mr Poulsom, has created nearly 100 Lego birds in his two-bedroomed flat in Bristol.
But it was his first creation, a Robin called 'Bobby' that has remained his favourite.
"A Robin landed on my foot while I was digging and I thought I'd have a go at making one," he said.
"Once I started building it snowballed and now I don't want to stop making them."
In January, three of his detailed creations - a blue jay, hummingbird and robin - were commissioned by Lego.
Now he is hoping another three species of bird - the great spotted woodpecker, cardinal and common Kingfisher - will also became official kits.
"I can build anything out of Lego but I really enjoy birds," he said.
"But building something to look organic from bricks is not easy. It's very painstaking but once I get in the zone - I enjoy it."
The exhibition at Slimbridge will open on 18 July until 6 September. 
Summarize: 
The crane is a large bird, standing at about 2.5m tall. It is made from over 1,000 pieces of Lego.
The crane is made of a mixture of red, white, and blue bricks. The crane's legs are made from white bricks. The crane's head is made from red bricks. The crane's beak is made from white bricks. The crane's body is made from blue bricks. The crane's wings are made from red bricks. The crane's tail is made from white bricks. The crane's eyes are made from blue bricks. The crane's beak is made from red bricks
Douglas Ross and Ross Thomson were both elected to Holyrood in 2016 but then won seats at Westminster in the snap general election.
Both are list MSPs, so will be replaced by fellow Conservatives.
Scotland is sending a total of 22 new MPs to Westminster following the election, alongside 37 re-elected incumbent members.
Meanwhile, Rachael Hamilton is being sworn in as a Conservative MSP for the second time in the current term, having quit her list seat to successfully contest the Ettrick, Roxburgh and Berwickshire by-election on the same day as the general election.
In last Thursday's general election, the Conservatives won 13 seats north of the border, their best return since 1983.
Mr Ross won the Moray constituency from the SNP's depute leader and Westminster group leader Angus Robertson, while Mr Thomson took Aberdeen South from Callum McCaig.
Both men were formerly councillors, on Highland and Aberdeen City councils respectively, and have gone from local politics to Holyrood to Westminster in just over a year.
The Scottish Parliament's additional member system means the two list MSPs will be replaced by Conservative party colleagues.
To replace Mr Ross, Jamie Halcro-Johnston is next on the Highlands list, having failed to win a seat in Orkney and Shetland in the general election.
Tom Mason, who is currently depute provost of Aberdeen City Council, is expected to take Mr Thomson's place from the North East list.
Mr Mason is the final name on the list, with all of the other candidates having been elected either to Holyrood or Westminster - or, in one case, left the party. If a party runs out of regional list members, then the seat is left empty for the duration of the parliament. 
Summarize: 
The Conservatives won 13 seats in the 2015 election, but lost two of them in the snap election.
The Conservatives won 13 seats in the 2015 election, but lost two of them in the snap election.
The Conservatives won 13 seats in the 2015 election, but lost two of them in the snap election.
The Conservatives won 13 seats in the 2015 election, but lost two of them in the snap election.
The Conservatives won 13 seats in the 2015 election, but lost two of them in the snap election.
The Conservatives won 13 seats in the 2015 election, but lost two of them in the snap election.
19 October 2015 Last updated at 14:42 BST
Sky TV pundit Neville and Man United assistant manager Giggs bought the old stock exchange building in Manchester city centre with a view to turning into a hotel.
But a group of homeless people were living in the abandoned site before it was sold and asked if they could stay for the winter.
Now Neville and Giggs have said they can remain in the building until work on the hotel starts in February.
Watch the video to see the reaction of some of the people living there. 
Summarize: 
The homeless people were living in the abandoned building.
The homeless people were living in the abandoned building.
The homeless people were living in the abandoned building.
The homeless people were living in the abandoned building.
The homeless people were living in the abandoned building.
The homeless people were living in the abandoned building.
The homeless people were living in the abandoned building.
The homeless people were living in the abandoned building.
The homeless people were living in the abandoned building.
The homeless people were living in the abandoned building.
The homeless people were living in the abandoned building.
The homeless people were living
The annual Barclays prosperity map found 43,000 Scottish adults were worth seven figures in the year to April.
That was more than 10% fewer than last year's study.
Barclays attributed the fall to a decline in some economic measures used to calculate the numbers, including corporate profits.
Scotland now commands a 6.2% share of the UK's millionaires, down from 6.7% in 2015.
However, the prosperity index also suggested Scotland saw the biggest increase to household wealth of any area of the UK in the year.
It rose by 13% north of the border, ahead of both London (up 12%) and the South East (up 11%).
Barclays said the rise could be linked to Scotland's median private pensions wealth.
It jumped 60%, compared with 19% in England and 24% in Wales.
Activity by small and medium sized enterprises (SMEs) was also on the up, which Barclays said was a strong indicator of rising prosperity.
Scotland recorded the biggest growth in SME turnover at 8%, ahead of London in second place at 7%.
Overall, Scotland was the seventh most prosperous area on the index, behind the East Midlands, Northern Ireland, South West and Eastern England, South East and London.
The report said every area in the UK was more prosperous than last year.
Wealth, spending or earnings rose across the country, while jobless rates dropped.
The research uses factors such as average annual pay, the percentage of households giving to charity, business growth rates and exam scores to generate a "prosperity index" score for each area of the UK.
Calum Brewster, from Barclays, said: "It is reassuring to see that prosperity in Scotland is on an upward trajectory. Our SME sector in particular is thriving, leading the UK in terms of growth.
"A strong performance across key indicators like GDP, household wealth and consumer spending signals growing confidence in our economy which is encouraging given the wider uncertainty in the global marketplace.
"Our research demonstrates that Scotland is very much 'open for business' and is a prosperous place in which to live, work and invest.
"Not only that, it continues to make a strong contribution to the economic prosperity of the UK as a whole." 
Summarize: 
Scotland's overall prosperity index score was up by 13% in the year to April 2016, compared with the previous year.
Scotland was the seventh most prosperous area on the index, behind the East Midlands, Northern Ireland, South West and Eastern England, South East and London.
The prosperity index also found Scotland was the second most prosperous area for SME growth at 8%, behind London in second place at 7%.
Scotland's median private pensions wealth rose 60%, compared with 19% in England and 24% in Wales.
Scotland recorded the biggest growth in SME turnover at 8%, compared with 7% in London.
This year's line-up includes The Stranglers, Feeder, The Wonder Stuff, Fatherson, Galleon Blast, Little Mammoths and Ullapool Pipe Band.
Loopallu - Ullapool backwards - takes place on Friday and Saturday.
The event, which is now in its 12th year, will also see performances by Eliza and the Bear, Hunter and the Bear, Manran and Lional. 
Summarize:  The Loopallu Festival is a music festival held in Ullapool, Scotland. The event is held over two days and features a wide range of music. The event is held in the town's harbour and is free to attend. The event is run by the Ullapool Harbour Trust.
The Loopallu Festival was started in 2005 by the Ullapool Harbour Trust and is now in its 12th year. The festival is held in the town's harbour and is free to attend. The event is run by the Ullapool Harbour Trust.
The Loopallu Festival was started in 2005
Xi Jinping, who is due to succeed President Hu Jintao in 2013, said he would fight against "separatist activities" linked to the Dalai Lama.
He was speaking in Lhasa as part of a trip to mark 60 years since the communists took over Tibet.
Analysts say the speech suggests Mr Xi is unlikely to veer from the policies of his predecessors.
Beijing has for years been critical of the Dalai Lama, regularly denouncing him as a "splittist" in official media.
At the weekend, Beijing was highly critical of US President Barack Obama's decision to meet the Tibetan spiritual leader.
The communist government says Tibet has always been an integral part of China, and that their policies have brought economic development to a chronically poor area.
But many Tibetans accuse Beijing of cracking down on free speech, suppressing their religion and culture, and encouraging the immigration of many Han Chinese to the area.
The Dalai Lama, who fled to India in 1959, has publicly said many times in recent years that he wants more freedom for Tibetans, not necessarily independence.
Mr Xi, who is currently vice-president, made his speech in front of the Potala Palace, which is the Dalai Lama's traditional seat.
"[We] should thoroughly fight against separatist activities by the Dalai clique by firmly relying on all ethnic groups... and completely smash any plot to destroy stability in Tibet and jeopardise national unity," he said.
"The extraordinary development of Tibet over the past 60 years points to an irrefutable truth: Without the Chinese Communist Party, there would have been no new China, no new Tibet."
Little is known about Mr Xi's political leanings, because China's leaders-in-waiting are rarely allowed to make major speeches in the run-up to changes in the Communist Party's highest echelons.
Mr Hu has often pushed the idea of a harmonious society depending on the sharing of wealth between the country's industrial powerhouses on the east coast, and its rural areas in the west. 
Summarize: 
The Dalai Lama is a Buddhist monk and spiritual leader of Tibet. He is the 14th Dalai Lama. He is also known as the "Great Thirteenth".
The Dalai Lama is a Buddhist monk and spiritual leader of Tibet. He is the 14th Dalai Lama. He is also known as the "Great Thirteenth".
The Dalai Lama is a Buddhist monk and spiritual leader of Tibet. He is the 14th Dalai Lama. He is also known as the "Great Thirteenth".
The Dalai Lama is a Buddhist monk and spiritual leader of Tibet. He is the 14th Dalai Lama.
The bug targets systems which convert domain names into IP addresses.
Exploiting it could threaten the smooth running of internet services as it allows hackers to launch denial-of-service attacks on websites, potentially forcing them offline.
Regular internet users are unlikely to be severely affected, however.
Bind is the name of a variety of Domain Name System (DNS) software used on the majority of internet servers.
The recently identified bug allows attackers to crash the software, therefore taking the DNS service offline and preventing URLs, for example, from working.
A patch for the flaw is already available, but many systems are yet to be updated.
The Internet Systems Consortium (ISC), which develops Bind, said in a tweet that the vulnerability was "particularly critical" and "easily exploited".
Daniel Cid, a networking expert at Sucuri has published a blog post on the vulnerability in which he explained that real exploits taking advantage of the flaw have already happened.
He told the BBC: "A few of our clients, in different industries, had their DNS servers crashed because of it.
"Based on our experience, server software, like Bind, Apache, OpenSSL and others, do not get patched as often as they should."
Cybersecurity expert Brian Honan commented that a spike in exploits of the flaw was expected over the next few days.
However, he added that websites would often still be accessible via other routes and cached addresses on DNS servers around the world, even when certain key DNS servers have been made to crash.
"It's not a doomsday scenario, it's a question of making sure the DNS structure can continue to work while patches are rolled out," he said.
The impact on general internet users is likely to be minimal, according to Mr Cid.
"Average internet users won't feel much pain, besides a few sites and email servers down," he said. 
Summarize: 
The bug affects the Domain Name System (DNS) software used on the majority of internet servers.
It allows attackers to crash the software, therefore taking the DNS service offline and preventing URLs, for example, from working.
A patch for the flaw is already available, but many systems are yet to be updated.
The Internet Systems Consortium (ISC), which develops Bind, said in a tweet that the vulnerability was "particularly critical" and "easily exploited".
Daniel Cid, a networking expert at Sucuri has published a blog post on the vulnerability in which he explained that real exploits taking advantage of the flaw have
Honey Rose, 35, was found guilty of gross negligence manslaughter after Vincent Barker died in July 2012 when fluid built up on his brain.
She was given a two-year suspended sentence in August after missing the condition during a routine eye test.
Vincent's family said the appeal court ruling had left them "devastated".
Judges found there had been a "serious breach of duty", but that was a matter for regulators and not the courts.
During her trial last year mother-of three Ms Rose, from Newham, east London, told the court she had conducted all the required tests during Vincent's eye examination at the Ipswich branch of Boots on 15 February 2012.
However, a jury heard she failed to notice that the boy had swollen optic discs, an abnormality which is a symptom of hydrocephalus - fluid on the brain.
Vincent, known as Vinnie, died in July 2012, about five months after the eye test.
Sir Brian Leveson, sitting with two other judges at The Court of Appeal, said: "This decision does not, in any sense, condone the negligence that the jury must have found to have been established at a high level in relation to the way that Ms Rose examined Vincent and failed to identify the defect which ultimately led to his death.
"That serious breach of duty is a matter for her regulator; in the context of this case, however, it does not constitute the crime of gross negligence manslaughter."
A statement released by the Barker family after Monday's ruling said: "We are understandably devastated. We feel that the conviction of manslaughter by gross negligence should have been upheld.
"We remain in no doubt that if Honey Rose had not breached her duty of care to our son he would still be with us today."
Not only was Vinnie "let down" by his optometrist, but "he has also been failed by the legal system", they added. 
Summarize: 
1. The optometrist failed to notice the swelling of the optic discs, which is a symptom of hydrocephalus - fluid on the brain.
2. The optometrist failed to notice that the boy had swollen optic discs, which is a symptom of hydrocephalus - fluid on the brain.
3. The optometrist failed to notice that the boy had swollen optic discs, which is a symptom of hydrocephalus - fluid on the brain.
4. The optometrist failed to notice that the boy had swollen optic discs, which is a symptom of hydrocephalus - fluid on the brain.
James Whalley was last seen at his home in Holcombe, Somerset, at 22:00 BST. His disappearance had been described as "out of character".
Avon and Somerset Police put out an appeal to find him.
A police spokesman said James was found safe and well and thanked the public for their assistance. 
Summarize: 
"The family of James Whalley, who was last seen at his home in Holcombe, Somerset, at 22:00 BST on Wednesday, are appealing for help to find him.
James, who is known as James, is described as white, 5ft 8in tall, of slim build with short brown hair. He was last seen wearing a blue T-shirt, blue jeans and white trainers.
Anyone who has seen James or who has any information about his whereabouts is asked to contact the police on 101 quoting incident number 772 of 15 July.
A police spokesman said: "We are
The 19-year-old is yet to make his debut for the Clarets, but has scored 16 goals in 16 appearances for the club's development side.
He is the second Burnley player to join the struggling League Two side on loan this month after defender Luke Hendrie made the move last week.
Both players could make their debuts against Newport on Saturday.
Find all the latest football transfers on our dedicated page. 
Summarize: 
"I'm delighted to be joining Newport County," said the striker. "I've been at Burnley for a while now and I've really enjoyed my time there.
"But I think it's time for me to move on and I'm really looking forward to playing in League Two.
"I've heard a lot about the club and the manager and I'm really excited about the challenge.
"I've spoken to the manager and he's told me that I'll be playing a lot of games and that he's looking forward to working with me.
"I'm really looking forward to getting started."
But Ginny Thrasher became passionate about shooting during a family hunting trip when she was a young teenager, she told the Richmond Times Dispatch newspaper.
When her grandfather pointed to a deer behind her, she grabbed a gun, pulled the trigger and amazed her companions by killing the animal.
Soon after, Thrasher joined the air rifle team at her high school in Springfield, a suburb of Washington.
On a meteoric learning curve, she won five medals at the 2015 US Shooting National Championship.
Success did not end there. As a college freshman, she won two titles as the National Collegiate Athletic Association last year.
Three weeks later she went to US Olympic team trials and prevailed over "a seasoned and talented field", according to the USA Shooting team website.
She earned a comfortable victory despite having never competed internationally.
So even making it to Rio was an astonishing achievement for the teenager.
And she has now shot to stardom by beating favourites to become the gold medal winner in Rio. 
Summarize:  Ginny Thrasher, a 17-year-old girl from Virginia, is a shooting champion. She is also a Christian.
She is a member of the Air Rifle team at the University of Virginia, where she is a freshman.
She has won five medals at the 2015 US Shooting National Championship.
She is now a member of the US Olympic team.
Ginny Thrasher is a Christian.
She is a member of the Air Rifle team at the University of Virginia, where she is a freshman.
She has won five medals at the 2015 US Shooting National Championship.
She is now a member
Northbay Pelagic said its main processing and packing lines had been lost along with an office and administration block.
The blaze broke out on Saturday afternoon and burned for more than 10 hours.
The company, one of the town's biggest employers, said it would continue to meet customer needs.
An investigation into the cause of the fire is under way.
A statement on Northbay Pelagic's website said: "Key strategic areas of our facility remain fully operational and we continue to service our business and customer needs.
"We are currently looking at all of our options going forward and we will hopefully announce our plan of action soon.
"In the meantime, we are sourcing temporary accommodation for our administration and management staff and re-establishing daily communications with all of our customers and suppliers."
The fire was brought under control overnight into Sunday.
Nearby flats were evacuated but no-one was believed to have been in the factory at the time.
A rest centre was set up at Peterhead Academy for people evacuated from their homes in Errol Street and road closures were expected to remain in place for some time.
Northbay Pelagic is reported to employ about 300 people in Peterhead, one of Europe's busiest fish landing ports. 
Summarize:  The Northbay Pelagic factory in Peterhead, Scotland, caught fire on Saturday, May 11, 2017, and was completely destroyed. The fire started at about 1:30 p.m. and was brought under control by about 10 p.m. The factory was located on the east side of the town.
The factory was a major employer in Peterhead and had been in operation for about 50 years.
The fire started in the factory's processing and packing area.
The fire was contained to the processing and packing area and the factory's administration and office area was not damaged.
The factory's main processing and packing lines
A local woman, 25, has been arrested on suspicion of drunk driving after her vehicle hit the crowd in Stillwater.
Witnesses described dozens of bodies being flung into the air.
Police said it was one of the worst accidents they had seen in 30 years.
The initial death toll was three, but a two-year-old boy died later from his injuries.
Five children and three adults remain in hospital, some in critical condition, officials say.
The accident happened as the crowds were watching a homecoming parade - a tradition event welcoming back Oklahoma State University (OSU) alumni.
The car is reported to have hit a stationary police motorbike - which had no rider at the time - before ploughing into spectators at the homecoming parade.
Stillwater Mayor Gina Noble said that the incident had left people in the town heartbroken, while OSU President Burns Hargis said that what was supposed to be "a wholesome, happy event" had been besmirched by "a terrible tragedy". 
Summarize: 
1. The accident happened as the crowds were watching a homecoming parade - a tradition event welcoming back Oklahoma State University (OSU) alumni.
2. The car is reported to have hit a stationary police motorbike - which had no rider at the time - before ploughing into spectators at the homecoming parade.
3. Stillwater Mayor Gina Noble said that the incident had left people in the town heartbroken, while OSU President Burns Hargis said that what was supposed to be "a wholesome, happy event" had been besmirched by "a terrible tragedy".
4. The initial death
A trade union has described the situation as "disgraceful", saying too many employees were paid-off under a Stormont redundancy programme.
Department of Finance figures reveal there were 889 agency workers within government departments on 1 January 2017.
This compares to 380 in mid-2015 when a voluntary redundancy scheme began.
The department said the use of agency workers provided by recruitment firms was "normal policy and practice in any modern large organisation".
Up-to-date costs will not be available until April, but they are likely to have been more than Â£10m in 2016/17.
Public sector union Nipsa said 300 permanent, full-time jobs could have been funded instead.
Northern Ireland's civil service has shrunk by one fifth - or 5,020 posts - thanks to a pay-off programme funded by Northern Ireland Executive loans from the Treasury.
Nipsa deputy general secretary Bumper Graham said: "You are borrowing money, paying interest, and putting people out of work.
"Then the next day you are going to a private sector company saying 'we let too many people go, can we hire some of the same people back again'. All round, Northern Ireland is losing."
The Department of Finance does not hold data on people who took redundancy and were then re-hired as agency workers, but it is permissible.
It said the civil service has seen payroll savings of Â£152m due to the redundancy programme.
It added that a big part of the rise in agency workers was due to a short-term contract for the Department of Work and Pensions.
This alone involved 385 agency workers. 
Summarize: 
The Department of Finance said the use of agency workers provided by recruitment firms was "normal policy and practice in any modern large organisation".
Up-to-date costs will not be available until April, but they are likely to have been more than Â£10m in 2016/17.
Public sector union Nipsa said 300 permanent, full-time jobs could have been funded instead.
Northern Ireland's civil service has shrunk by one fifth - or 5,020 posts - thanks to a pay-off programme funded by Northern Ireland Executive loans from the Treasury.
Nipsa deputy general secretary Bumper Graham said
The former Northampton fly-half's work has been key to Exeter's rise in recent years, which culminated in a first Premiership final appearance in May.
He also led England Saxons to a series win in South Africa this summer.
"If I was a coach or a CEO at another rugby club I'd certainly have a look at him," Baxter told BBC Sport.
"But what you do need to remember is Ali's just played a very big part, and has done over a number of years, in a team that have just lost a Premiership final and just got knocked out of a European quarter-final, so we're a pretty good side in ourselves.
"If you want to leave Exeter there are not many clubs better than us to go to, and I think that plays a big part in what our players want to do and what our staff want to do."
Hepher is contracted to to Exeter until the summer of 2018, having signed a deal at the same time as Baxter.
He was brought into the coaching set-up when Baxter took over as head coach in 2009 and has helped mastermind the club's rise from the Championship to second in the Premiership, as well as nurturing talents such as Jack Nowell, Henry Slade and Phil Dollman.
"If you want to be a successful sporting business you want your club packed with people that everyone else wants," added Baxter.
"It's not a doubled-edged sword, if nobody else wanted our players or our staff we wouldn't be a very good rugby club and we wouldn't be a very good team, so that's just how it has to be." 
Summarize: 
Ali Hepher is a rugby player who plays for Exeter Chiefs in the Aviva Premiership. He was born on the 28th of October, 1987 in Exeter, Devon, England. He is a fly-half and plays for the Exeter Chiefs. He is the current captain of the Exeter Chiefs.
Ali Hepher is a rugby player who plays for Exeter Chiefs in the Aviva Premiership. He was born on the 28th of October, 1987 in Exeter, Devon, England. He is a fly-half and plays for the Exeter Chiefs. He is the current captain of the Exeter
It was informed about the "racially motivated" damage on the King Street building on Sunday morning.
A spokeswoman for Polish Social and Cultural Association said graffiti was found on the front entrance at about 06:00 BST and had been washed off.
The centre's chairwoman said staff were "very disturbed" by the find.
Metropolitan Police said: "Shortly before 11:00 police were informed of an incident of alleged racially motivated criminal damage to a building in King Street, W6.
"Officers from Hammersmith and Fulham borough attended and enquiries are ongoing."
Joanna Mludzinska, chairwoman of Polish Social and Cultural Association (POSK), said: "We were very disturbed and upset this morning to find really unpleasant graffiti all over the building when the staff came in."
Andy Slaughter, the Labour MP for Hammersmith, said on Twitter: "This is an outrageous act that disgusts not only me and the Polish community but everyone in Hammersmith & Fulham.
"We are proud in west London to be the centre for the Polish community in the UK and the home of posklondon.
"Posklondon was founded by the generation who fought with Britain against Nazism and who helped build our inclusivity and prosperity," he added. 
Summarize: 
The Polish Social and Cultural Association (POSK) is a non-profit organization that provides services to the Polish community in London.
The Polish Social and Cultural Association (POSK) was founded in London in 1947 by the generation of Polish refugees who fought with Britain against Nazism and who helped build our inclusivity and prosperity.
The Association is a registered charity and a registered charity (No. 1060862) in England and Wales.
The Association is a member of the Polish National Council of the United Kingdom.
The Association is a member of the Polish National Council of Great Britain.
Ross Porter, from Dunfermline, is to stand trial after being charged with assaulting Daniel Jordan.
Mr Porter is alleged to have pinned the 17-year-old to the ground before biting his face "to his severe injury and permanent disfigurement" on 10 July.
He made no plea or declaration and was remanded in custody.
Sheriff Christopher Shead fully committed the case for trial at Perth Sheriff Court.
Police made a total of 54 arrests during the weekend-long music festival, which was being staged at Strathallan Castle estate, near Auchterarder, for the first time. 
Summarize: 
On the night of the incident, Mr Porter and Mr Jordan had been drinking with friends in the town centre.
The pair were seen arguing and Mr Porter allegedly punched Mr Jordan in the face, knocking him to the ground.
Mr Porter then allegedly bit Mr Jordan's face, causing him to bleed.
Mr Porter was arrested by police and later charged.
He was released on bail and will appear at Perth Sheriff Court on 2 October.
The trial was scheduled for 2 October but was delayed until 14 October.
The trial was delayed again, this time until 20 October.
The trial was delayed again
The supermarket's like-for-like sales, which strip out new stores, fell by 0.5% in the period to 11 March.
However, Argos sales rose 4.3%, resulting in a 0.3% increase excluding fuel across the Sainsbury's group.
Sainsbury's said the market remained "very competitive" and the impact of cost pressures "remains uncertain".
The supermarket's performance was worse than the 0.1% rise in like-for-like sales seen in the 15 weeks to 7 January.
Sainsbury's convenience stores saw total sales growth of almost 7%, with 10 new outlets opening in the quarter.
Chief executive Mike Coupe said customers had welcomed Sainsbury's "differentiated food offer", with new products including butternut squash waffles and sweet potato tagliatelle.
General merchandise sales were down 4%, which Sainsbury's said was due to Easter and Mother's Day falling later this year.
Sainsbury's bought catalogue retailer Argos last year as part of its Â£1.4bn takeover of Home Retail Group.
The retailer has opened another 11 Argos Digital stores in Sainsbury's supermarkets since the start of the year, bringing the total to 41, while there are now eight Mini Habitat stores.
Shares fell almost 1% to 268.9p in morning trading and are down 4% over the past 12 months.
Neil Wilson of ETX Capital said Sainsbury's was being squeezed from all sides.
"Sainsbury's did very well when Tesco and others were struggling but is now facing its own challenges. It must contend with all the sector-wide problems like falling margins and the sterling squeeze from suppliers," he said.
"Falling margins and profits don't look great when the market is growing." 
Summarize: 
Sainsbury's is the UK's second-largest supermarket chain by market share, with a market share of 11.4% in the 12 weeks to 7 January.
The company is the UK's largest supermarket chain by sales, with a market share of 11.4% in the 12 weeks to 7 January.
The company has a market share of 11.4% in the 12 weeks to 7 January.
Sainsbury's is the UK's largest supermarket chain by market share, with a market share of 11.4% in the 12 weeks to 7 January.
The company is the UK's largest supermarket
The seafronts at Southend and Canvey Island have both been badly hit with some roads into the area affected.
The fire and rescue service have been called to 13 flood-related incidents, including clearing a house and nursery that had become flooded in Colchester.
The Met Office has issued a yellow weather warning, with further torrential rain expected in some areas into Wednesday morning.
Floodwater on the A12 forced the closure of one lane, London-bound near Junction 14.
Flooding updates on Essex Local Live
Abellio Greater Anglia services in and out of London have been disrupted by overhead wire problems - not known to be caused by the weather - at Stratford.
Barry Campagna, an independent councillor for Canvey Island, said:  "There's nobody here, the whole of the seafront is empty, the kids are off school and it should be buzzing.
"The drains can't take the amount of surface water on Canvey."
Suzanne Gray, who runs an arcade on Furtherwick Road, Canvey, which is also flooded, said: "I've been here 20 years. The last three years it seems to be getting worse and worse."
It was a similar story in Southend.
"In two minutes, the whole of the seafront was flooded yet again, in up to 18 inches of water," said Happidrome arcade owner Martin Richardson.
Tesco tweeted a photo of flooding outside its Extra store in Southend, but said it was "dealing with the water" and would open as normal.
Other areas affected include Rochford and Westcliff.
The Met Office's yellow warning - meaning " be aware" -  is for the East of England.
It said although most parts of the region would escape the worst, there was a risk of locally torrential, thundery bursts and flash flooding. 
Summarize: 
The Met Office has issued a yellow weather warning, with further torrential rain expected in some areas into Wednesday morning.
Flooding updates on Essex Local Live
Abellio Greater Anglia services in and out of London have been disrupted by overhead wire problems - not known to be caused by the weather - at Stratford.
Barry Campagna, an independent councillor for Canvey Island, said: "There's nobody here, the whole of the seafront is empty, the kids are off school and it should be buzzing.
"The drains can't take the amount of surface water on Canvey."
Su
The win puts her in a strong position to be selected for Rio, though her place is yet to be confirmed.
"I think I'm there, I think I'll be sculling at Rio, but I haven't been told what's happening yet," she said.
The 28-year old from Wrexham is hoping to partner Katherine Grainger in the double sculls at the Games.
Thornley claimed her third successive win at the GB Trials, winning her race by more than seven seconds.
Reigning Olympic champion Grainger missed the trials with injury.
"It puts me in a good place to win an Olympic trial," added Thornley.
"I was confident I could win the race and  I had a margin I wanted to win it by ,and I missed that by a little bit.
Grainger won the double sculls with Anna Watkins at London 2012, but Watkins has subsequently pulled out of the Olympic Rowing Programme following the birth of her second child.
Thornley and Grainger were sixth i the double sculls at the World Rowing Championships in Aiguebelette in 2015.
She accepts getting a medal at Rio would be a huge achievement.
"I definitely think getting onto the podium come Rio is going to be a hard thing to do," she said.
"But it's definitely something that we can do - there's the talent in the boat, we're strong and I feel like we've moved on this season and we're aiming to get on to the podium." 
Summarize: 
Thornley was born in Wrexham, North Wales, and is the daughter of former Welsh international rower and coach, David Thornley. She attended Ysgol Gyfun Rhydfelen, a Welsh-medium school in Wrexham. She is a member of the National Academy of Sport.
Thornley was selected to represent Great Britain at the 2012 Summer Olympics in the women's double sculls. She and her partner Katherine Grainger won the gold medal.
In 2013, Thornley and Grainger were selected to represent Great Britain at the 2013 World Rowing Championships in Chung
Trump beat his fellow Englishman 5-4 and goes on to face Scotland's 77th-ranked Scott Donaldson, who beat Zhou Yuelong of China 5-0.
Hawkins had fought back from 3-1 down to lead 4-3, before Trump clinched the last two frames for victory.
Stuart Bingham will face Robert Milkins in Saturday's other semi-final.
World number two Bingham was 4-0 up on fellow Englishman Stuart Carrington in their quarter-final before the latter won three consecutive frames.
However, Bingham recovered to clinch the match 5-3 and will play Milkins on Saturday evening after the world number 32 saw off Kurt Maflin 5-2.
Hawkins, leading by 24 points in the deciding frame, missed match-ball yellow against Trump that would have secured a semi-final spot.
Trump continues the hunt for his first Welsh Open crown and second ranking title of the season, having won the European Masters in October.
"I am still in a bit of shock because I thought it was all over when I left him the yellow," he said. "He seemed to hit it well, but somehow it stayed out.
"Sometimes you play well and lose and today I didn't play very well and managed to get through. There is a lot of skill in snooker, but you need a bit of luck."
Donaldson, 22, who will play Trump in Saturday afternoon's semi-final, had never previously been beyond the last 16 of a ranking event.
He is already guaranteed £20,000 - the biggest pay day of his career.
"I have been playing a lot of TV matches recently and I think that helped me," said the Scot, who turned pro in 2012.
"I have been pleased for about a year now with my game, I can't pinpoint why, maybe it's confidence.
"I will go back to the hotel and calm myself down and get ready for the next match."
Sign up to My Sport to follow snooker news and reports on the BBC app. 
Summarize: 
The match started well for Donaldson as he took the first frame of the match.
The second frame was a close one, but Donaldson managed to come out on top.
The third frame was a close one, but Donaldson managed to come out on top.
The fourth frame was a close one, but Donaldson managed to come out on top.
The fifth frame was a close one, but Donaldson managed to come out on top.
The sixth frame was a close one, but Donaldson managed to come out on top.
The seventh frame was a close one
Crews at Galashiels and Lauder were called out in the early hours of Thursday to a hay barn blaze near Earlston.
Soon after, another hay barn fire was reported at Longnewton near St Boswells.
Crews from Jedburgh, Selkirk and Kelso attended, and were on the site for some time throughout the day. 
Summarize: 
The fire was reported at around 2.30am, and crews from Jedburgh, Selkirk and Kelso attended.
The fire was in a hay barn, and crews from Jedburgh, Selkirk and Kelso attended.
Crews remained on the scene throughout the day.
The fire was reported at around 3.30am, and crews from Jedburgh, Selkirk and Kelso attended.
The fire was in a hay barn, and crews from Jedburgh, Selkirk and Kelso attended.
Crews remained on the scene throughout the day.
The fire was reported
Currently two unsuccessful reviews every 80 overs are allowed in Tests and one per innings in one-day games, but DRS did not previously feature in T20s.
The ICC proposed no loss of a review if a decision is "umpire's call" and the creation of a Test world championship.
If approved, the changes would begin on 1 October.
The ICC's 15-strong cricket committee, chaired by outgoing India coach Anil Kumble, includes a number of other leading ex-players including Andrew Strauss, director of England Cricket, Mahela Jayawardene and Rahul Dravid, plus Australia coach Darren Lehmann and director of England Women's Cricket Clare Connor.
They met in London this week and Kumble said: "We have had a wonderful couple of days discussing cricket issues and there are a number of highlights."
Find out how to get into cricket with our inclusive guide.
Should the ICC chief executives' committee approve the changes, the two new reviews after 80 overs ruling, which is currently employed in Test cricket, would be removed.
It also proposed to emulate the MCC's red card policy and give umpires the power to send players from the field in the most serious incidents of player misconduct.
All other offences would continue to be dealt with under the ICC Code of Conduct.
The committee also suggested introducing restrictions on bat dimensions - thickness of edges and depth of bat - plus a batsman will have made their ground "when a bat bounces after being grounded behind the crease by a running or diving batsman". 
Summarize: 
The ICC's cricket committee, chaired by Anil Kumble, has proposed that the two new reviews after 80 overs ruling, which is currently employed in Test cricket, would be removed.
It also proposed to emulate the MCC's red card policy and give umpires the power to send players from the field in the most serious incidents of player misconduct.
All other offences would continue to be dealt with under the ICC Code of Conduct.
The committee also suggested introducing restrictions on bat dimensions - thickness of edges and depth of bat - plus a batsman will have made their ground "when a bat bounces after being grounded behind
The vote will take place on 2 March 2017.
In Northern Ireland the government must be shared between two different political parties.  The First Minister and Deputy First Minister lead the government - one representing each party.
Although they have different job titles, they basically have the same powers and must work together.  Up until now the government has been run by the DUP - or Democratic Unionist Party - and Sinn Féin.
The argument between the parties is about whether the First Minister Arlene Foster - the leader of the DUP - ran things badly or not.
The Deputy First Minister Martin McGuinness, from Sinn Féin, says she did and he left his job because of this disagreement.
His party refused to appoint anyone else to the job and that means new elections have to take place.
The last Northern Ireland Assembly election was in May 2016 - the DUP and Sinn Féin got lots more votes than the other parties.
After the new election, the parties will have talk to each other again and try to work out how they will share power in the future. 
Summarize: 
The Northern Ireland Assembly is the Northern Ireland government.
The First Minister and Deputy First Minister lead the government - one representing each party.
The government is run by the DUP - or Democratic Unionist Party - and Sinn Féin.
The argument between the parties is about whether the First Minister Arlene Foster - the leader of the DUP - ran things badly or not.
The Deputy First Minister Martin McGuinness, from Sinn Féin, says she did and he left his job because of this disagreement.
His party refused to appoint anyone else to the job and that means new elections have to take place.
The
More than 800 people died when HMS Vanguard sank in Scapa Flow.
A series of internal explosions ripped through the battleship at about 23:20 on 9 July 1917.
A memorial service was held in St Magnus Cathedral, Kirkwall, on Sunday evening to mark the exact moment of the explosions.
Commemorative events also took place above the wreck site and at the Lyness Naval Cemetery where 41 of the men are buried.
The White Ensign on the wreck of the Vanguard was also changed by a team of Royal Navy Divers.
A book of remembrance compiled for the commemorations was handed over to the people of Orkney at the service.
Built in 1909, Vanguard was the eighth ship to bear the name and was one of the new generation of Dreadnought battleships.
On 9 July 1917, the ship had been conducting exercises in Scapa Flow and had anchored for the evening.
At 23:20 a series of catastrophic explosions, most likely caused by an accidental magazine explosion, resulted in the ship sinking almost immediately.
Of the 845 men aboard, only two survived.
As part of the commemorations, Royal Navy divers from HM Naval Base Clyde's Northern Diving Group (NDG) travelled to Orkney to change the White Ensign on the wreck of Vanguard.
Leading diver James Brown said: "The waters of Scapa have always held a special place in NDG's heart. Whenever an opportunity arises for us to work in Orkney there is a competition within the team to secure a place."
Naval regional commander Scotland and Northern Ireland, Captain Chris Smith said the history of the Royal Navy and Scapa Flow were "tightly entwined".
"The devastating explosion, completely accidental rather than a result of enemy action, was a shock when it happened and the tragic loss of more than 840 lives is still felt through their descendants and those in Orkney who feel passionately that we should mark the centenary in appropriate fashion," he said.
"I am very happy to be joined by the ship's companies of HMS Dasher and HMS Pursuer as well as the Northern Diving Group and personnel from the current HMS Vanguard as we support the welcome efforts of Orcadians in commemorating the loss of this great battleship and all but two of her crew in suitable fashion." 
Summarize: 
The Royal Navy divers from HM Naval Base Clyde's Northern Diving Group (NDG) travelled to Orkney to change the White Ensign on the wreck of Vanguard.
Leading diver James Brown said: "The waters of Scapa have always held a special place in NDG's heart. Whenever an opportunity arises for us to work in Orkney there is a competition within the team to secure a place."
Naval regional commander Scotland and Northern Ireland, Captain Chris Smith said the history of the Royal Navy and Scapa Flow were "tightly entwined".
"The devastating explosion, completely accidental rather
The shop - established in 2003 - is offered rent free to a different Orkney based organisation each week.
Since it was set up the shop has raised more than Â£1.7m for different groups.
Founder Rita Jamieson told BBC Scotland that receiving the honour was "wonderful news".
She added: "Who would have thought that our little shop in Orkney would be so highly thought of by the Queen!
"I am so pleased for all the volunteers who have helped set-up and run the shop over the years. They have been a great support to hundreds of local groups, and helped many thousands of customers.
"I am really proud of our volunteers and I hope that they are proud of their award."
Groups apply and, if successful, are allocated a week in the shop.
Each organisation has to supply one volunteer per shift to work alongside the core team.
At the end of the week, unsold stock is passed on to the charity that takes over for the following week.
During a typical week, charities can expect to raise between Â£2,500 and Â£4,000.
The shop has recently been used to raise funds for Orkney organisations supporting traditional music and riding for the disabled.
There is currently a two year waiting list to get time in the shop.
Eileen Spence, who is a regular volunteer, said: "We just quietly go about supporting the different groups and helping our customers. We all get satisfaction out of helping people in our community.
"None of us look for any special recognition, which makes this award even more exciting.
"I am just so proud of what the Blue Door achieves day-to-day and week-to-week. None of this would be possible without the volunteers." 
Summarize: 
The Blue Door is a charity shop in Kirkwall, Orkney, Scotland. It was founded in 2003 by Rita Jamieson.
The shop is offered rent free to a different Orkney based organisation each week.
Since it was set up the shop has raised more than Â£1.7m for different groups.
Founder Rita Jamieson told BBC Scotland that receiving the honour was "wonderful news".
She added: "Who would have thought that our little shop in Orkney would be so highly thought of by the Queen!
"I am so pleased
Ron Pitman, 71, stands to earn a "finder's fee" for the discovery at Pennard, Swansea, in October 2010.
It bears the inscription "prepared bee to follow me," is 81% gold and 9% silver and dates back about300 years.
The ring was found 13cm (5in) below the surface of a field used to grow maize that had since been ploughed and rolled, Swansea Coroners Court heard.
In a report to the hearing, Dr Mark Redknapp, acting keeper of archaeology and numismatics at the National Museum and Gallery in Cardiff, said:  "Such rings can be difficult to date but the decoration and sentiments in this case suggests a 17th rather than 18th Century date." 
Summarize: 
The ring is 81% gold and 9% silver and dates back about 300 years.
The ring bears the inscription "prepared bee to follow me," is 81% gold and 9% silver and dates back about 300 years.
The ring was found 13cm (5in) below the surface of a field used to grow maize that had since been ploughed and rolled, Swansea Coroners Court heard.
In a report to the hearing, Dr Mark Redknapp, acting keeper of archaeology and numismatics at the National Museum and Gallery in Cardiff, said: "Such rings can be difficult to date
Its earnings jumped to $2.1bn (Â£1.7bn) in the three months to the end of September, compared with $1.33bn for the same period a year earlier.
The Wall Street bank attributed the rise in profits to better returns from its trading activities in bonds, commodities and currencies.
"We saw solid performance," said chief executive Lloyd Blankfein.
Revenues across its fixed income, currencies and commodities unit jumped by more than a third to $1.96bn. Trading in these areas has been boosted by the increased market volatility since the UK's Brexit vote.
Earlier this year Goldman said it would cut its overheads by $700m a year, which has led to a 5% cut in its workforce so far this year, amounting to 1,900 staff.
It said costs in third quarter, excluding the pay and bonuses, were down 15% from a year earlier.
The bank said the cost of pay and bonuses had risen 36% to $3,2bn for its 34,900 staff, 6,500 of whom work in the UK.
Goldman Sachs is regarded as one of the world's most influential banks, with many former employees going on to work at the top of other financial institutions in the US, UK and Europe. Bank of England governor Mark Carney is a former Goldman employee. 
Summarize:  Goldman Sachs is one of the most influential banks in the world. It is also one of the most profitable.
Goldman Sachs is a Wall Street bank that has been in business for more than 100 years. It is a member of the Dow Jones Industrial Average and has been a member of the S&P 500 Index since 2006.
Goldman Sachs is the second-largest bank in the United States, behind JPMorgan Chase. It is also the largest investment bank in the world.
Goldman Sachs has a long history of being involved in the financial markets. It was founded in 1869 by Marcus Goldman and Samuel Sachs.
The
Media playback is not supported on this device
The 30-year-old has won 26 Tour stages and the 2011 road race world title but is yet to claim an Olympic medal.
Competing on the track will be the Manxman's best chance of winning one in Rio this summer, as the road race route is not suited for pure sprinters.
"Cav won't do three weeks of the Tour," British Cycling's technical director Shane Sutton said.
"If he wants to medal, he's aware that he wouldn't be going to Paris."
This summer's race begins on 2 July with a flat stage that Team Dimension Data rider Cavendish will be targeting for victory.
The race ends in the French capital on 24 July.
Cavendish won his first four Tour stages in 2008 before leaving early to prepare for the Olympics in Beijing, where he finished ninth in the madison and was the only member of Great Britain's squad not to win a medal.
He also competed in the Olympic road race on the opening day of London 2012 but finished 29th, 40 seconds behind winner Alexander Vinokourov. 
Summarize: 
Cavendish won four stages in the Tour de France in 2008, but was forced to leave the race early to prepare for the Beijing Olympics.
He won the opening stage in the 2008 Tour, but was beaten in the sprint by Mark Cavendish and the pair went on to finish first and second in the points competition.
He won the opening stage of the 2009 Tour and was the only British rider to win a stage in the 2009 Tour de France.
In the 2011 Tour de France, he won the opening stage and finished second in the points competition.
He won the opening stage of the 2012 Tour de France and
The 15-year-old midfielder will sign a professional contract with the Stamford Bridge club when he turns 16 after the two clubs agreed a "significant fee".
Rangers offered Gilmour a contract, but the Scotland youth international has opted to move to London.
"When he made clear his desire to move to the Premier League, it was important we maximised the commercial value for him," Rangers said in a statement.
Chelsea were one of a number of clubs to pursue Gilmour's signature after the midfielder impressed scouts with his performances for Rangers' youth sides and the Scotland under-16 team.
Mark Warburton and his successor as Rangers manager, Pedro Caixinha, also included the player in first-team training sessions, with the latter meeting Gilmour's parents to try to persuade the player to stay at Ibrox.
He will now follow the path taken by Islam Feruz, who left Celtic for Chelsea at 16, although the Scotland Under-21 cap has spent most of his time at the club out on loan.
"The club's preference would have been for Billy to stay at Rangers," the Ibrox club said in a statement.
"But this agreement will provide Rangers with a significant sum for a 15-year-old player who has yet to play first-team football and further significant amounts could be due based on milestones being reached.
"We are pleased with this outcome and believe this deal represents good value for Rangers.
"That he was sought after by many Premier League clubs and, indeed, a number of the largest clubs in Europe, further demonstrates the quality of player now being produced by the academy.
"Everyone at Rangers wishes Billy well for his future." 
Summarize: 
Ms Dornan was stabbed and her home in the Lagmore estate was set on fire on 2 August, last year.
The PPS said it had begun extradition proceedings to return the man to Northern Ireland for prosecution.
He was arrested by police in the Republic of Ireland on Wednesday.
The PPS said he appeared "before a court in Dublin where he was remanded in custody until 22nd February".
PPS Assistant Director Marianne O'Kane, said: "Senior prosecutors, from both the PPS's Serious Crime Unit and Appeals and International Section, have worked closely with the PSNI investigating team over recent months to expedite the prosecution decision in this case and commence extradition proceedings." 
Summarize: 
On 2 August, 2014, Ms Dornan was stabbed and her home in the Lagmore estate was set on fire.
The PPS said it had begun extradition proceedings to return the man to Northern Ireland for prosecution.
He was arrested by police in the Republic of Ireland on Wednesday.
The PPS said he appeared "before a court in Dublin where he was remanded in custody until 22nd February".
PPS Assistant Director Marianne O'Kane, said: "Senior prosecutors, from both the PPS's Serious Crime Unit and Appeals and International Section, have worked closely with the PSNI investigating team
Herve Falciani was on trial for leaking bank data that led to tax evasion probes worldwide against prominent clients with accounts in Switzerland.
Falciani did not attend the trial and because France does not extradite its own citizens, it is unlikely he will serve the sentence.
He told AP news agency he had "no reaction" to the sentencing.
Falciani had refused to travel from France to appear before the Swiss Federal Tribunal in Bellinzona for a trial that began last month.
He was charged with illegally obtaining data, economic espionage, breach of business confidentiality and breach of bank secrecy while working at a Swiss HSBC subsidiary between 2006 and 2008.
The court rejected all the charges except for one alleging a violation of economic intelligence, for having made public information about foreign entities in Lebanon, France, Germany, and the UK.
HSBC, which argued that he had illegally downloaded details from clients and accounts, welcomed the decision against Falciani, who was an IT worker at HSBC Private Bank (Suisse).
"HSBC has always maintained that Falciani systematically stole clients' information in order to sell it for his own personal financial gain,'' HSBC said in a statement. 
Summarize: 
In 2006, the French government asked the Swiss government to investigate Falciani for tax evasion.
In 2008, the Swiss government asked the French government to extradite Falciani.
In 2009, the French government refused to extradite Falciani.
In 2010, the Swiss government arrested Falciani.
In 2011, the Swiss government extradited Falciani to France.
In 2012, the French government sentenced Falciani to five years in prison for tax evasion.
In 2013, the Swiss government extradited Falciani to France.
In 2014, the French government sentenced Falciani to
Total group sales rose 13.9% to Â£676m in 2015, with like-for-like sales - which strip out the impact of new stores - up 7.5%.
Underlying earnings at the chain rose 14.4% to Â£84.2m.
Pret said it was continuing to adapt its menu to meet the demand for healthy options and it is planning to open a vegetarian "pop up" shop this summer.
In the UK, sales of vegetarian products showed double digit growth last year. Avocado was the ingredient that saw the biggest rise in demand.
Clive Schlee, chief executive of Pret A Manger, told the BBC: "Demand for vegetarian foods is growing faster than for meat, but meat remains an important part of the diet.
"We are encouraging vegetarianism because we want to give meat eaters more options. I think vegetarian foods could look better and be better."
The chain said coffee remained an important area of growth, with customers buying 1.5 million cups a week from its global network of shops.
It said it had seen an increase in demand for breakfast-on-the-go, with 58% of sales occurring outside lunchtime.
The US was Pret's fastest growing market last year, achieving a 13.8% increase in like-for-like sales.
Pret opened 36 new shops last year - 23 were in the UK, six in the US, four in France and three in Hong Kong.
These included locations at major transport hubs such as Penn Station in New York, Nice Airport and Gare de Lyon station in Paris.
The company said it created 763 jobs worldwide, with 500 of them in the UK.
Clive Schlee said the chancellor's National Living Wage had meant a 5% increase in the company's wage bill, but he said they were committed to paying above their competitor's rates to keep their staff fully engaged in the business. 
Summarize:  Pret A Manger has been doing well in the US, UK, and France. They are a chain of sandwich shops that has been around for over 30 years. They have expanded to over 1,000 locations in the US and over 1,000 locations in the UK. They have been expanding to other countries such as France, Hong Kong, and the US. They have been expanding to other countries such as France, Hong Kong, and the US. They have been expanding to other countries such as France, Hong Kong, and the US. They have been expanding to other countries such as France, Hong Kong, and the US. They
Brian Lightman, general secretary of the Association of School and College Leaders (ASCL), was addressing its annual conference in London.
Students' exam grades at 16 "cannot be compared from year to year", he told the union's delegates.
The government said its reforms had been "necessary and urgent".
Mr Lightman called for a period of "clarity and stability" after rapid reform.
At the moment, understanding how well the system is doing "is a real challenge", said Mr Lightman.
"Hard though it is to believe, I am standing here and stating that we do not know how well our system is performing in terms of attainment in our qualifications for 16-year-olds and may not for some years to come," he added.
Mr Lightman promised that ASCL will continue to work with awarding bodies and officials "to get to a stage very rapidly when teachers, students, parents, employers and the government know exactly what each grade means in terms of learning outcomes and how standards compare between years".
The union is calling for schools to have a greater say in setting the school curriculum and for the government to put more trust in teachers rather than imposing "relentless change from above".
In particular the trade union wants the national curriculum to be decided by an independent commission made up of school leaders, governors, teachers, parents, employers and politicians.
It wants the curriculum to be reviewed only once every five years.
A Department for Education spokeswoman said reform had been needed as children "only get one chance at education".
"We know we have expected a lot from teachers and appreciate the huge efforts that head teachers and schools have made to implement these reforms.
"Together we are transforming education with one million more children now being taught in good or outstanding schools than in 2010.
"The important thing now is to build on this success and maintain a period of stability to allow the reforms to bed in and standards in our schools to continue to improve." 
Summarize: 
The National Curriculum is a set of national standards for all schools in England.
The standards are set by the National Curriculum Council, which is made up of representatives from the government, the teaching profession, the business community, and parents.
The curriculum is designed to be flexible, allowing schools to develop their own curriculum in line with their own ethos.
The curriculum is divided into four strands:
The National Curriculum is divided into four strands.
The National Curriculum is divided into four strands.
The National Curriculum is divided into four strands.
The National Cur
Barry McNamee's first-half goal was enough to earn the Candystripes a 1-0 win, despite having to play the final six minutes with just 10 men.
Aaron Barry's dismissal put the visitors under pressure but Kenny Shiels' men held on to move above Bray Wanderers and Shamrock Rovers.
It was Derry's seventh consecutive win over Bohemians across all competitions.
The visitors made a bright start with McNamee flashing a shot just wide and they should have taken the lead in the 24th minute when Rory Patterson's goal-bound shot was touched by Nathan Boyle as he was returning from an off-side position.
The Candystripes finally broke the deadlock in the 39th minute when a shot from Ronan Curtis was saved by Bohemians keeper Shane Supple but McNamee reacted quickest to score from the rebound.
The second-half introduction of Ismahil Akinade gave Bohemians some much needed momentum and the striker was immediately involved in a tussle with Barry which earned him a yellow card and left the Derry defender needing treatment.
The pressure on the Derry defence increased in the closing stages when Barry was shown a straight red card for pulling back Akinade on the edge of the penalty area.
However, the visitors managed to protect their clean sheet in the final minutes to claim a valuable away win.
Bray's 3-1 defeat to St Patrick's Athletic at Richmond Park means Derry are now back up to third spot in the table with Shamrock Rovers travelling to face Dundalk on Sunday.
Derry next travel to face Finn Harps in a rearranged fixture on Monday night. 
Summarize:  Derry City 1-0 Bohemians
Derry City: Barry Murphy; Rory Patterson, Aaron Barry, Nathan Boyle, Ronan Curtis; Ismahil Akinade, Gary Twigg, Sean O'Connor, Aaron McEneff (Kevin Deery, 87), Gary Twigg (Sean O'Connor, 90+2); Aaron Barry (Barry McNamee, 69).
Bohemians: Shane Supple; Darren Tinnelly, Darren Dennehy, Nathan Byrne, Kevin Burns; Dean Kelly, Stephen Hurley, David O'Leary, David Cassidy (Daryl Kavanagh
Jack Foster, known as Derek, from Long Bennington, disappeared after a hospital appointment on 23 December.
A body, which police believe to be the 83-year-old, was found on a verge of the A1 near the turn-off for Foston and Allingham on Tuesday.
Police said the death is not being treated as suspicious.
Mr Foster's next of kin have been informed and a post-mortem examination is expected to be carried out in the next few days, a force spokesman said.
He had last been seen at Grantham bus station but police said it was not known if he had got on a bus. 
Summarize: 
Derek Foster, known as Derek, from Long Bennington, disappeared after a hospital appointment on 23 December. A body, which police believe to be the 83-year-old, was found on a verge of the A1 near the turn-off for Foston and Allingham on Tuesday. Police said the death is not being treated as suspicious. Mr Foster's next of kin have been informed and a post-mortem examination is expected to be carried out in the next few days, a force spokesman said. He had last been seen at Grantham bus station but police said it was not known if he had got on
The league leaders lost 2-1 to nearest challengers Aberdeen at Pittodrie.
"I'm not thinking of that," said Deila when asked if he was concerned. "I'm thinking of training the team and I see a lot of talent there.
"I know we're going to get better and I know also that, still, we are in a very good position to do good things."
The Norwegian says he is "used to" questions being asked about his position but maintains his focus is on working with the squad.
Media playback is not supported on this device
"What I'm thinking about is winning the title and working everyday to improve the team and that's what we're going to do," he explained.
"There's a lot to play for. Everything is in our hands and we're going to fight to the bitter end to get this title.
"I'm confident that we have the skills in the team to do that but it's going to be tough because Aberdeen is getting better and we have to give credit to them as well.
"We didn't score early enough, it was too late when Leigh [Griffiths] scored.
"Inside the box at set-play, they get a couple of opportunities where we need to be stronger.
"We should have used [Colin] Kazim-Richards even more because he is strong and he kept the ball up for us and we created some chances through that but it was not enough to win." 
Summarize: 
"I'm not thinking of that," said Deila when asked if he was concerned. "I'm thinking of training the team and I see a lot of talent there."
"I know we're going to get better and I know also that, still, we are in a very good position to do good things."
The Norwegian says he is "used to" questions being asked about his position but maintains his focus is on working with the squad.
"What I'm thinking about is winning the title and working everyday to improve the team and that's what we're going to do," he explained.
"There
Navi Pillay said the files suggested US forces had continued to hand detainees to Iraqi authorities despite evidence that they had been tortured.
Meanwhile, the UN's adviser on torture, Manfred Novak, called for a wider inquiry to include alleged US abuses.
The US military has denied turning a blind eye to torture in Iraq.
On Monday, Gen George Casey, who was in charge of US forces in Iraq from 2004 to 2007, said all soldiers were instructed to report any allegations of abuse.
But Ms Pillay said the Wikileaks disclosure of almost 400,000 secret war logs added to her concerns that serious breaches of international human rights law had occurred in Iraq.
"The US and Iraqi authorities should take necessary measures to investigate all allegations made in these reports and to bring to justice those responsible for unlawful killings, summary executions, torture and other serious human rights abuses," she said in a statement.
Mr Novak said it was not enough to investigate only what happened in Iraq.
He urged US President Barack Obama to launch a full investigation into all allegations of torture against US military and intelligence officials.
He said the inquiry should include accounts of US agents handing detainees to states such as Egypt, Morocco and Syria, knowing they would be ill treated.
Mr Novak told journalists he now received far fewer allegations of torture than he had done during the so-called war on terror launched by former US President George W Bush.
But he pointed out that Mr Obama, like his predecessor, had refused to grant private interviews with detainees, and had invoked state secrecy privileges to prevent civil lawsuits by alleged victims of US torture. 
Summarize: 
A report by the US Army's Criminal Investigation Command (CID) found that US soldiers had committed a number of crimes in Iraq, including the killing of innocent civilians, the mistreatment of detainees and the failure to report abuse.
The report, which was released in 2007, was based on interviews with more than 1,000 soldiers and officers.
It found that US soldiers had committed a number of crimes, including the killing of innocent civilians, the mistreatment of detainees and the failure to report abuse.
The report also found that US soldiers had committed a number of crimes, including the killing of innocent civilians,
The businessman, who is said to have debts of about $1bn, left India in March and is believed to be in the UK.
Last week authorities in India revoked his diplomatic passport after a court issued a warrant for his arrest.
Mr Mallya, who is a member of the Indian parliament, has denied any wrongdoing.
It is alleged he repeatedly failed to appear before investigators looking into financial irregularities at Kingfisher Airlines, which collapsed in 2013.
Mr Mallya said on Twitter in March that he was an international businessman who had to travel and denied fleeing from India.
He said he was the victim of a "media witch hunt".
India's foreign ministry said it had contacted the UK government to ask for Mr Mallya to be handed over, but was yet to receive a response.
The flamboyant businessman made his fortune selling beer under the Kingfisher brand and branched out into aviation, Formula 1 racing, and Indian cricket.
His debts were incurred by the failure of his airline and he is being pursued by a group of mainly state-run banks who lent him money.
In February he was blocked from receiving a $75m payment for agreeing to step down as chairman of United Spirits, which he sold to Diageo in 2012.
A consortium of banks and creditors had demanded the funds should be used to settle some of Mr Mallya's outstanding debts.
Earlier this month a consortium of 17 banks, led by the State Bank of India, rejected his proposal to pay 40bn Indian rupees (Â£416m) by September to settle his loans.
The group said the offer was inadequate and subject to too many conditions.
Following the rejection, the Supreme Court in New Delhi asked the businessman to make a full disclosure of his assets. 
Summarize: 
Mallya is a businessman and politician from India. He is the chairman of the United Breweries Group, which owns the Kingfisher beer brand, and the Force India Formula One team. He is also the owner of the Royal Challengers Bangalore cricket team.
Mallya has been accused of defrauding banks and creditors of about $1 billion. He is wanted by the Indian government for failing to appear before a court in connection with the case.
Mallya has denied all allegations of wrongdoing.
Mallya is a member of the Indian parliament and has been accused of using his political
Bisping's opportunity comes after Chris Weidman was forced out of UFC 199 on 4 June in Los Angeles with a neck injury.
Manchester middleweight Bisping's last fight was a unanimous-decision win over Anderson Silva in London in February.
However, the 37-year-old lost to Rockhold in their only previous meeting, submitting in the second round of their November 2014 fight. 
Summarize: 
Rockhold was expected to face Luke Rockhold at UFC 199 on 4 June in Los Angeles. However, Rockhold was forced out of the fight with a neck injury.
The UFC announced that Rockhold would be replaced by Ronaldo Souza.
Rockhold was expected to face Ronaldo Souza at UFC 199 on 4 June in Los Angeles. However, Rockhold was forced out of the fight with a neck injury.
The UFC announced that Rockhold would be replaced by Chris Weidman.
Rockhold was expected to face Chris Weidman at UFC 199 on 4 June in Los Angeles. However
The train was designed by architect Kazuyo Sejima and has semi-transparent and mirrored surfaces to help it blend into the background.
The company who make the trains said that they wanted the carriages to feel like a living room, so that passengers can feel relaxed.
It's expected to be rolled out in 2018.
Japan often uses the latest technology on its trains, which are considered some of the best and quickest in the world. 
Summarize: 
The train is a combination of glass, metal, and wood.
The train has a semi-transparent and mirrored surface to help it blend into the background.
The company who make the trains said that they wanted the carriages to feel like a living room, so that passengers can feel relaxed.
It's expected to be rolled out in 2018.
Japan often uses the latest technology on its trains, which are considered some of the best and quickest in the world.
Summarize:
The train is a combination of glass, metal, and wood.
The train has a semi-transparent
The light was spotted travelling quickly over Orange County and neighbouring areas late on Saturday, leading to fevered speculation online over its origin.
The Orange County sheriff said the light was from a naval test fire made off the California coastline.
Aviation officials had warned of possible US military activity.
Videos posted online show a bright flare rising high, before a wide, bright blue flash emerges in a cone shape. Many videos continue to track the light for several minutes.
On Friday, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) said night-time flights to and from Los Angeles International (LAX) would avoid flying over the Pacific Ocean to the west of the airport, the second busiest in the US.
The FAA did not disclose the reason for the change, but indicated that military activity in the area would take place between Friday and Thursday.
Media in California confirmed that the light came from an unarmed Trident missile fired from the USS Kentucky navy submarine.
The platinum-selling singer Josh Groban was one of those who tweeted his shock at the light:
The San Diego Union-Tribune said police were inundated with calls "reporting everything from a flare to a comet to a nuclear bomb".
The newspaper said the light was seen as far away as the states of Nevada and Arizona. CBS-LA reported sightings in San Francisco, 380 miles (600km ) to the north. 
Summarize: 
The light was spotted travelling quickly over Orange County and neighbouring areas late on Saturday, leading to fevered speculation online over its origin.
The Orange County sheriff said the light was from a naval test fire made off the California coastline.
Aviation officials had warned of possible US military activity.
Videos posted online show a bright flare rising high, before a wide, bright blue flash emerges in a cone shape. Many videos continue to track the light for several minutes.
On Friday, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) said night-time flights to and from Los Angeles International (LAX) would avoid flying over the
The pair, who were both in their 40s, were found dead at the property in O' Neill's Place, Cobh, at about 15:30 local time on Sunday.
A woman in her early 20s was found seriously injured in the house, and was taken to Cork University Hospital.
A police spokesman said the scene has been cordoned off for an examination.
He added that the office of the state pathologist has been notified of the deaths.
The Irish state broadcaster, RTÃ‰, said it understood that all three people found at the house were members of the same family.
It reported that they had sustained stab wounds. 
Summarize: 
On Sunday, July 1, 2018, at about 4:30 PM, a man was found dead in his home in O'Neill's Place, Cobh, Co. Cork. He was identified as John O'Neill, a retired school principal.
On Sunday, July 1, 2018, at about 4:30 PM, a woman was found dead in her home in O'Neill's Place, Cobh, Co. Cork. She was identified as Mary O'Neill, a retired school principal.
On Sunday, July 1, 2018, at about 4:30 PM, a woman was found dead
This morning, after what one of his allies described to me as "one of the biggest acts of treachery I have ever seen", Boris Johnson has decided he is out.
The decision of Michael Gove, the secretary of state for justice, to run against his political ally changed everything.
Boris Johnson was stunned and furious, with Michael Gove only phoning him to tell him, I'm told, five minutes before he made the announcement.
One of his cabinet colleagues says: "He loves to be loved - he really feels everything."
Another said: "He is a very human politician. This was clearly going to hurt".
On hearing of the news, a source close to Mr Johnson told me: "We might not get the numbers now."
And that was written on his face this morning as he took his place at the podium to the cheers of his supporters. But as he gave an unusually low-key speech,  it became clear that something was amiss. But there were tears and disbelief in the room as the news sank in.
Political rules have been totally thrown up into the air in the last seven days, but one of the oldest has stayed true - the front-runner doesn't win.
Through the day we'll hopefully be able to piece together more clearly exactly what happened.
There are suspicions across Westminster that George Osborne and David Cameron's ambitions to stop Boris Johnson are behind this.
It won't be clear for some time, if ever, if that is really the case. But two things are clear already - the chaos of this morning is a bonus for Home Secretary Theresa May's (so far) calm campaign, and the aftermath of the referendum has poisoned new seeds of bitterness inside the Conservatives. 
Summarize: 
Boris Johnson has been a popular figure in the Conservative Party for years, and was the favourite to succeed David Cameron as leader.
He has been a prominent figure in the Leave campaign, and was the most prominent figure in the Leave campaign.
He was a prominent figure in the Leave campaign.
He was a prominent figure in the Leave campaign.
He was a prominent figure in the Leave campaign.
He was a prominent figure in the Leave campaign.
He was a prominent figure in the Leave campaign.
He was a prominent figure in the Leave campaign.
He was a prominent figure in the Leave campaign.
Shares in the social network fell almost 10% in after hours trading after it said expenses would be up to 75% higher next year.
The warning came after it reported third quarter revenues of $3.2bn (Â£1.98bn) well ahead of analysts' forecasts.
It made $806m profit, up 90% on 2013.
The increased profits were driven by another formidable three months for Facebook's advertising business.
Ad revenues for July to September were sharply higher than a year ago.
Perhaps most telling as an indicator of its future profitability was Facebook's performance in mobile advertising.
Mobile ads now make up 66% of its total advertising revenue.
A year ago they accounted for less than half of it, and at the time of its stock market debut in 2012 Facebook's mobile ads barely brought in any money at all.
Just as important to social networks as their earnings, are their user numbers, which in Facebook's case were also better than many expected.
As of the end of September, Facebook had 1.35 billion active users every month, 14% more than in 2013.
And the number of people checking their Facebook page at least once a day jumped 19% to 864 million.
"This has been a good quarter with strong results," said Mark Zuckerberg, Facebook founder and chief executive.
However, costs increased by 41% during the quarter mainly due to its recent acquisitions: messaging app WhatsApp and virtual reality headset maker Oculus Rift.
Chief financial officer Dave Wehner said these would increase further over the next year, and forecast revenue growth would slow to between 40% and 47% in the fourth quarter from 59% in the third quarter.
"We believe that we have very substantial growth opportunities in front of us and we plan to invest aggressively to capitalise on those opportunities," Mr Wehner said.
Mr Wehner did not provide any prediction on revenue growth next year.
"Giving expense guidance without giving revenue guidance is frustrating and spooking The Street. The multi-billion dollar question is what's revenue growth going to look like next year," said BTIG analyst Richard Greenfield. 
Summarize: 
Facebook's revenue growth slowed to 59% in the third quarter, from a year earlier, as it continued to invest in new products and services.
The company's advertising business, which accounts for most of its revenue, grew 59% in the quarter, while its mobile advertising business grew 66%.
Facebook's revenue for the quarter was $3.2bn, up from $1.9bn a year earlier.
The company had a net loss of $253m, or 12 cents a share, in the quarter, compared with a profit of $79m, or 3 cents a share, a year earlier.
The elections will be Myanmar's first openly contested polls in 25 years, following decades of military rule.
The ruling Union Solidarity Development Party, which has been in power since 2011, is holding a rally in Yangon.
Aung San Suu Kyi's National League for Democracy (NLD) is expected to make major gains on Sunday, though she is barred from the presidency.
But the BBC's Jonah Fisher in Yangon says there are no reliable opinion polls in the country, also known as Burma, so no-one really knows how the vote is going to play out.
Decision-making in the Delta: the BBC's Jonathan Head in the small but crucial town of Hinthada
Elections explained: Why does this vote matter?
'Abandoned people': What rights do the Rohingya Muslims have?
Myanmar vote causes business uncertainty
On Friday, campaign signs and stickers were being taken down ahead of a day of "silence" in the campaign, from midnight until polls open on Sunday.
Former Nobel Peace Prize laureate Ms Suu Kyi is barred from the presidency, even if the NLD wins, because of the constitution which disqualifies anyone with foreign offspring.
But at a press conference on Thursday, she repeated her insistence that if her party wins she would lead the government anyway and be "above the president".
Ruled by the junta for nearly half a century, Myanmar has seen economic and political reform in recent years.
However, according to the constitution 25% of all parliamentary seats will still be reserved for the military in this election. Therefore, the NLD must take 67% of all contested seats in order to gain a majority.
Ms Suu Kyi has already raised concerned about poll fraud and voting irregularities. In the 1990 election, the NLD won a majority, but the results were largely ignored by the generals.
For its part, the government has warned that rapid change could lead to civil unrest. 
Summarize:  The NLD is expected to make major gains on Sunday, though she is barred from the presidency.
The NLD is expected to make major gains on Sunday, though she is barred from the presidency.
The NLD is expected to make major gains on Sunday, though she is barred from the presidency.
The NLD is expected to make major gains on Sunday, though she is barred from the presidency.
The NLD is expected to make major gains on Sunday, though she is barred from the presidency.
The NLD is expected to make major gains on Sunday, though she is barred from the presidency.
The N
